
Nonconformist support, and, therefore, flattering the self-love of
Nonconformity and repeating its catchwords without the least real
belief in them, is very noticeable.  When the Nonconformists, in a
transport of blind zeal, threw out Sir James Graham's useful
Education Clauses in 1843, one-half of their parliamentary
representatives, no doubt, who cried aloud against "trampling on the
religious liberty of the Dissenters by taking the money of Dissenters
to teach the tenets of the [124] Church of England," put their tongue
in their cheek while they so cried out.  And perhaps there is even a
sort of motion of Mr. Frederic Harrison's tongue towards his cheek
when he talks of the "shriek of superstition," and tells the working-
class that theirs are the brightest powers of sympathy and the
readiest powers of action.  But the point on which I would insist is,
that this involuntary tribute to truth and soberness on the part of
certain of our governors and guides never reaches at all the mass of
us governed, to serve as a lesson to us, to abate our self-love, and
to awaken in us a suspicion that our favourite prejudices may be, to
a higher reason, all nonsense.  Whatever by-play goes on among the
more intelligent of our leaders, we do not see it; and we are left to
believe that, not only in our own eyes, but in the eyes of our
representative and ruling men, there is nothing more admirable than
our ordinary self, whatever our ordinary self happens to be,--
Barbarian, Philistine, or Populace.

Thus everything in our political life tends to hide from us that
there is anything wiser than our ordinary selves, and to prevent our
getting the notion of a paramount right reason.  Royalty itself,
[125] in its idea the expression of the collective nation, and a sort
of constituted witness to its best mind, we try to turn into a kind
of grand advertising van, to give publicity and credit to the
inventions, sound or unsound, of the ordinary self of individuals.  I
remember, when I was in North Germany, having this very strongly
brought to my mind in the matter of schools and their institution.
In Prussia, the best schools are Crown patronage schools, as they are
called; schools which have been established and endowed (and new ones
are to this day being established and endowed) by the Sovereign
himself out of his own revenues, to be under the direct control and
management of him or of those representing him, and to serve as types
of what schools should be.  The Sovereign, as his position raises him
above many prejudices and littlenesses, and as he can always have at
his disposal the best advice, has evident advantages over private
founders in well planning and directing a school; while at the same
time his great means and his great influence secure, to a well-
planned school of his, credit and authority.  This is what, in North
Germany, the governors do, in the matter of education, for the [126]
governed; and one may say that they thus give the governed a lesson,
and draw out in them the idea of a right reason higher than the
suggestions of an ordinary man's ordinary self.  But in England how
different is the part which in this matter our governors are
accustomed to play!  The Licensed Victuallers or the Commercial
Travellers propose to make a school for their children; and I
suppose, in the matter of schools, one may call the Licensed
Victuallers or the Commercial Travellers ordinary men, with their
natural taste for the bathos still strong; and a Sovereign with the
advice of men like Wilhelm von Humboldt or Schleiermacher may, in
this matter, be a better judge, and nearer to right reason.  And it
will be allowed, probably, that right reason would suggest that, to
have a sheer school of Licensed Victuallers' children, or a sheer
school of Commercial Travellers' children, and to bring them all up,
not only at home but at school too, in a kind of odour of licensed
victualism or of bagmanism, is not a wise training to give to these
children.  And in Germany, I have said, the action of the national
guides or governors is to suggest and provide a better.  But, in
England, the action of the national [127] guides or governors is, for
a Royal Prince or a great Minister to go down to the opening of the
Licensed Victuallers' or of the Commercial Travellers' school, to
take the chair, to extol the energy and self-reliance of the Licensed
Victuallers or the Commercial Travellers, to be all of their way of
thinking, to predict full success to their schools, and never so much
as to hint to them that they are doing a very foolish thing, and that
the right way to go to work with their children's education is quite
different.  And it is the same in almost every department of affairs.
While, on the Continent, the idea prevails that it is the business of
the heads and representatives of the nation, by virtue of their
superior means, power, and information, to set an example and to
provide suggestions of right reason, among us the idea is that the
business of the heads and representatives of the nation is to do
nothing of the kind, but to applaud the natural taste for the bathos
showing itself vigorously in any part of the community, and to
encourage its works.

Now I do not say that the political system of foreign countries has
not inconveniences which may outweigh the inconveniences of our own
political [128] system; nor am I the least proposing to get rid of
our own political system and to adopt theirs.  But a sound centre of
authority being what, in this disquisition, we have been led to seek,
and right reason, or our best self, appearing alone to offer such a
sound centre of authority, it is necessary to take note of the chief
impediments which hinder, in this country, the extrication or
recognition of this right reason as a paramount authority, with a
view to afterwards trying in what way they can best be removed.

This being borne in mind, I proceed to remark how not only do we get
no suggestions of right reason, and no rebukes of our ordinary self,
from our governors, but a kind of philosophical theory is widely
spread among us to the effect that there is no such thing at all as a
best self and a right reason having claim to paramount authority, or,
at any rate, no such thing ascertainable and capable of being made
use of; and that there is nothing but an infinite number of ideas and
works of our ordinary selves, and suggestions of our natural taste
for the bathos, pretty equal in value, which are doomed either to an
irreconcileable conflict, or else to a [129] perpetual give and take;
and that wisdom consists in choosing the give and take rather than
the conflict, and in sticking to our choice with patience and good
humour.  And, on the other hand, we have another philosophical theory
rife among us, to the effect that without the labour of perverting
ourselves by custom or example to relish right reason, but by
continuing all of us to follow freely our natural taste for the
bathos, we shall, by the mercy of Providence, and by a kind of
natural tendency of things, come in due time to relish and follow
right reason.  The great promoters of these philosophical theories
are our newspapers, which, no less than our parliamentary
representatives, may be said to act the part of guides and governors
to us; and these favourite doctrines of theirs I call,--or should
call, if the doctrines were not preached by authorities I so much
respect,--the first, a peculiarly British form of Atheism, the
second, a peculiarly British form of Quietism.  The first-named
melancholy doctrine is preached in The Times with great clearness and
force of style; indeed, it is well known, from the example of the
poet Lucretius and others, what great masters of style the atheistic
[130] doctrine has always counted among its promulgators.  "It is of
no use," says The Times, "for us to attempt to force upon our
neighbours our several likings and dislikings.  We must take things
as they are.  Everybody has his own little vision of religious or
civil perfection.  Under the evident impossibility of satisfying
everybody, we agree to take our stand on equal laws and on a system
as open and liberal as is possible.  The result is that everybody has
more liberty of action and of speaking here than anywhere else in the
Old World."  We come again here upon Mr. Roebuck's celebrated
definition of happiness, on which I have so often commented: "I look
around me and ask what is the state of England?  Is not every man
able to say what he likes?  I ask you whether the world over, or in
past history, there is anything like it?  Nothing.  I pray that our
unrivalled happiness may last."  This is the old story of our system
of checks and every Englishman doing as he likes, which we have
already seen to have been convenient enough so long as there were
only the Barbarians and the Philistines to do what they liked, but to
be getting inconvenient, and productive of anarchy, [131] now that
the Populace wants to do what it likes too.  But for all that, I will
not at once dismiss this famous doctrine, but will first quote
another passage from The Times, applying the doctrine to a matter of
which we have just been speaking,--education.  "The difficulty here"
(in providing a national system of education), says The Times, "does
not reside in any removeable arrangements.  It is inherent and native
in the actual and inveterate state of things in this country.  All
these powers and personages, all these conflicting influences and
varieties of character, exist, and have long existed among us; they
are fighting it out, and will long continue to fight it out, without
coming to that happy consummation when some one element of the
British character is to destroy or to absorb all the rest."  There it
is; the various promptings of the natural taste for the bathos in
this man and that amongst us are fighting it out; and the day will
never come (and, indeed, why should we wish it to come?) when one
man's particular sort of taste for the bathos shall tyrannise over
another man's; nor when right reason (if that may be called an
element of the British character) shall absorb and [132] rule them
all.  "The whole system of this country, like the constitution we
boast to inherit, and are glad to uphold, is made up of established
facts, prescriptive authorities, existing usages, powers that be,
persons in possession, and communities or classes that have won
dominion for themselves, and will hold it against all comers."  Every
force in the world, evidently, except the one reconciling force,
right reason!  Sir Thomas Bateson here, the Rev. W. Cattle on this
side, Mr. Bradlaugh on that!--pull devil, pull baker!  Really,
presented with the mastery of style of our leading journal, the sad
picture, as one gazes upon it, assumes the iron and inexorable
solemnity of tragic Destiny.

After this, the milder doctrine of our other philosophical teacher,
the Daily News, has, at first, something very attractive and
assuaging.  The Daily News begins, indeed, in appearance, to weave
the iron web of necessity round us like The Times.  "The alternative
is between a man's doing what he likes and his doing what some one
else, probably not one whit wiser than himself, likes."  This points
to the tacit compact, mentioned [133] in my last paper, between the
Barbarians and the Philistines, and into which it is hoped that the
Populace will one day enter; the compact, so creditable to English
honesty, that no class, if it exercise power, having only the ideas
and aims of its ordinary self to give effect to, shall treat its
ordinary self too seriously, or attempt to impose it on others; but
shall let these others,--the Rev. W. Cattle, for instance, in his
Papist-baiting, and Mr. Bradlaugh in his Hyde Park anarchy-
mongering,--have their fling.  But then the Daily News suddenly
lights up the gloom of necessitarianism with bright beams of hope.
"No doubt," it says, "the common reason of society ought to check the
aberrations of individual eccentricity."  This common reason of
society looks very like our best self or right reason, to which we
want to give authority, by making the action of the State, or nation
in its collective character, the expression of it.  But of this
project of ours, the Daily News, with its subtle dialectics, makes
havoc.  "Make the State the organ of the common reason?"--it says.
"You may make it the organ of something or other, but how can you be
certain that [134] reason will be the quality which will be embodied
in it?"  You cannot be certain of it, undoubtedly, if you never try
to bring the thing about; but the question is, the action of the
State being the action of the collective nation, and the action of
the collective nation carrying naturally great publicity, weight, and
force of example with it, whether we should not try to put into the
action of the State as much as possible of right reason, or our best
self, which may, in this manner, come back to us with new force and
authority, may have visibility, form, and influence, and help to
confirm us, in the many moments when we are tempted to be our
ordinary selves merely, in resisting our natural taste of the bathos
rather than in giving way to it?

But no! says our teacher: "it is better there should be an infinite
variety of experiments in human action, because, as the explorers
multiply, the true track is more likely to be discovered.  The common
reason of society can check the aberrations of individual
eccentricity only by acting on the individual reason; and it will do
so in the main sufficiently, if left to this natural operation."
This is what I call the specially British form of [135] Quietism, or
a devout, but excessive, reliance on an over-ruling Providence.
Providence, as the moralists are careful to tell us, generally works
in human affairs by human means; so when we want to make right reason
act on individual reason, our best self on our ordinary self, we seek
to give it more power of doing so by giving it public recognition and
authority, and embodying it, so far as we can, in the State.  It
seems too much to ask of Providence, that while we, on our part,
leave our congenital taste for the bathos to its natural operation
and its infinite variety of experiments, Providence should
mysteriously guide it into the true track, and compel it to relish
the sublime.  At any rate, great men and great institutions have
hitherto seemed necessary for producing any considerable effect of
this kind.  No doubt we have an infinite variety of experiments, and
an ever-multiplying multitude of explorers; even in this short paper
I have enumerated many: the British Banner, Judge Edmonds, Newman
Weeks, Deborah Butler, Elderess Polly, Brother Noyes, the Rev. W.
Cattle, the Licensed Victuallers, the Commercial Travellers, and I
know not how [136] many more; and the numbers of this noble army are
swelling every day.  But what a depth of Quietism, or rather, what an
over-bold call on the direct interposition of Providence, to believe
that these interesting explorers will discover the true track, or at
any rate, "will do so in the main sufficiently" (whatever that may
mean) if left to their natural operation; that is, by going on as
they are!  Philosophers say, indeed, that we learn virtue by
performing acts of virtue; but to say that we shall learn virtue by
performing any acts to which our natural taste for the bathos carries
us, that the Rev. W. Cattle comes at his best self by Papist-baiting,
or Newman Weeks and Deborah Butler at right reason by following their
noses, this certainly does appear over-sanguine.

It is true, what we want is to make right reason act on individual
reason, the reason of individuals; all our search for authority has
that for its end and aim.  The Daily News says, I observe, that all
my argument for authority "has a non-intellectual root;" and from
what I know of my own mind and its inertness, I think this so
probable, that I should be inclined easily to admit it, if it were
not that, in [137] the first place, nothing of this kind, perhaps,
should be admitted without examination; and, in the second, a way of
accounting for this charge being made, in this particular instance,
without full grounds, appears to present itself.  What seems to me to
account here, perhaps, for the charge, is the want of flexibility of
our race, on which I have so often remarked.  I mean, it being
admitted that the conformity of the individual reason of the Rev. W.
Cattle or Mr. Bradlaugh with right reason is our true object, and not
the mere restraining them, by the strong arm of the State, from
Papist-baiting or railing-breaking,--admitting this, we have so
little flexibility that we cannot readily perceive that the State's
restraining them from these indulgences may yet fix clearly in their
minds that, to the collective nation, these indulgences appear
irrational and unallowable, may make them pause and reflect, and may
contribute to bringing, with time, their individual reason into
harmony with right reason.  But in no country, owing to the want of
intellectual flexibility above mentioned, is the leaning which is our
natural one, and, therefore, needs no recommending to us, so
sedulously recommended, and the leaning which is [138] not our
natural one, and, therefore, does not-need dispraising to us, so
sedulously dispraised, as in ours.  To rely on the individual being,
with us, the natural leaning, we will hear of nothing but the good of
relying on the individual; to act through the collective nation on
the individual being not our natural leaning, we will hear nothing in
recommendation of it.  But the wise know that we often need to hear
most of that to which we are least inclined, and even to learn to
employ, in certain circumstances, that which is capable, if employed
amiss, of being a danger to us.

Elsewhere this is certainly better understood than here.  In a recent
number of the Westminster Review, an able writer, but with precisely
our national want of flexibility of which I have been speaking, has
unearthed, I see, for our present needs, an English translation,
published some years ago, of Wilhelm von Humboldt's book, The Sphere
and Duties of Government.  Humboldt's object in this book is to show
that the operation of government ought to be severely limited to what
directly and immediately relates to the security of person and
property.  Wilhelm von Humboldt, one of the [139] most beautiful and
perfect souls that have ever existed, used to say that one's business
in life was, first, to perfect oneself by all the means in one's
power, and, secondly, to try and create in the world around one an
aristocracy, the most numerous that one possibly could, of talents
and characters.  He saw, of course, that, in the end, everything
comes to this,--that the individual must act for himself, and must be
perfect in himself; and he lived in a country, Germany, where people
were disposed to act too little for themselves, and to rely too much
on the Government.  But even thus, such was his flexibility, so
little was he in bondage to a mere abstract maxim, that he saw very
well that for his purpose itself, of enabling the individual to stand
perfect on his own foundations and to do without the State, the
action of the State would for long, long years be necessary; and soon
after he wrote his book on The Sphere and Duties of Government,
Wilhelm von Humboldt became Minister of Education in Prussia, and
from his ministry all the great reforms which give the control of
Prussian education to the State,--the transference of the management
of public schools from their old boards of trustees to the [140]
State, the obligatory State-examination for schools, the obligatory
State-examination for schoolmasters, and the foundation of the great
State University of Berlin,--take their origin.  This his English
reviewer says not a word of.  But, writing for a people whose dangers
lie, as we have seen, on the side of their unchecked and unguided
individual action, whose dangers none of them lie on the side of an
over-reliance on the State, he quotes just so much of Wilhelm von
Humboldt's example as can flatter them in their propensities, and do
them no good; and just what might make them think, and be of use to
them, he leaves on one side.  This precisely recalls the manner, it
will be observed, in which we have seen that our royal and noble
personages proceed with the Licensed Victuallers.

In France the action of the State on individuals is yet more
preponderant than in Germany; and the need which friends of human
perfection feel to enable the individual to stand perfect on his own
foundations is all the stronger.  But what says one of the staunchest
of these friends, Monsieur Renan, on State action, and even State
action in that very sphere where in France it is most excessive, the
sphere [141] of education?  Here are his words:--"A liberal believes
in liberty, and liberty signifies the non-intervention of the State.
But such an ideal is still a long way off from us, and the very means
to remove it to an indefinite distance would be precisely the State's
withdrawing its action too soon."  And this, he adds, is even truer
of education than of any other department of public affairs.

We see, then, how indispensable to that human perfection which we
seek is, in the opinion of good judges, some public recognition and
establishment of our best self, or right reason.  We see how our
habits and practice oppose themselves to such a recognition, and the
many inconveniences which we therefore suffer.  But now let us try to
go a little deeper, and to find, beneath our actual habits and
practice, the very ground and cause out of which they spring.

NOTES

119. +Proverbs 28:26.  "He that trusteth in his own heart is a fool:
but whoso walketh wisely, he shall be delivered."  The King James
Bible.

122.  +"Qui est-ce qu'on trompe ici?"  E-text editor's translation:
"Who is the one getting fooled here?"



CHAPTER IV

[142] This fundamental ground is our preference of doing to thinking.
Now this preference is a main element in our nature, and as we study
it we find ourselves opening up a number of large questions on every
side.

Let me go back for a moment to what I have already quoted from Bishop
Wilson:--"First, never go against the best light you have; secondly,
take care that your light be not darkness."  I said we show, as a
nation, laudable energy and persistence in walking according to the
best light we have, but are not quite careful enough, perhaps, to see
that our light be not darkness.  This is only another version of the
old story that energy is our strong point and favourable
characteristic, rather than intelligence.  But we may give to this
idea a more general form still, in which it will have a yet larger
range of application.  We may regard this energy driving at practice,
this paramount sense of the obligation of duty, self-control, and
work, this earnestness in going manfully with the best light we [143]
have, as one force.  And we may regard the intelligence driving at
those ideas which are, after all, the basis of right practice, the
ardent sense for all the new and changing combinations of them which
man's development brings with it, the indomitable impulse to know and
adjust them perfectly, as another force.  And these two forces we may
regard as in some sense rivals,--rivals not by the necessity of their
own nature, but as exhibited in man and his history,--and rivals
dividing the empire of the world between them.  And to give these
forces names from the two races of men who have supplied the most
signal and splendid manifestations of them, we may call them
respectively the forces of Hebraism and Hellenism.  Hebraism and
Hellenism,--between these two points of influence moves our world.
At one time it feels more powerfully the attraction of one of them,
at another time of the other; and it ought to be, though it never is,
evenly and happily balanced between them.

The final aim of both Hellenism and Hebraism, as of all great
spiritual disciplines, is no doubt the same: man's perfection or
salvation.  The very language which they both of them use in
schooling [144] us to reach this aim is often identical.  Even when
their language indicates by variation,--sometimes a broad variation,
often a but slight and subtle variation,--the different courses of
thought which are uppermost in each discipline, even then the unity
of the final end and aim is still apparent.  To employ the actual
words of that discipline with which we ourselves are all of us most
familiar, and the words of which, therefore, come most home to us,
that final end and aim is "that we might be partakers of the divine
nature."  These are the words of a Hebrew apostle, but of Hellenism
and Hebraism alike this is, I say, the aim.  When the two are
confronted, as they very often are confronted, it is nearly always
with what I may call a rhetorical purpose; the speaker's whole design
is to exalt and enthrone one of the two, and he uses the other only
as a foil and to enable him the better to give effect to his purpose.
Obviously, with us, it is usually Hellenism which is thus reduced to
minister to the triumph of Hebraism.  There is a sermon on Greece and
the Greek spirit by a man never to be mentioned without interest and
respect, Frederick Robertson, in which this rhetorical use of Greece
and the Greek [145] spirit, and the inadequate exhibition of them
necessarily consequent upon this, is almost ludicrous, and would be
censurable if it were not to be explained by the exigences of a
sermon.  On the other hand, Heinrich Heine, and other writers of his
sort, give us the spectacle of the tables completely turned, and of
Hebraism brought in just as a foil and contrast to Hellenism, and to
make the superiority of Hellenism more manifest.  In both these cases
there is injustice and misrepresentation.  The aim and end of both
Hebraism and Hellenism is, as I have said, one and the same, and this
aim and end is august and admirable.

Still, they pursue this aim by very different courses.  The uppermost
idea with Hellenism is to see things as they really are; the
uppermost idea with Hebraism is conduct and obedience.  Nothing can
do away with this ineffaceable difference; the Greek quarrel with the
body and its desires is, that they hinder right thinking, the Hebrew
quarrel with them is, that they hinder right acting.  "He that
keepeth the law, happy is he;" "There is nothing sweeter than to take
heed unto the commandments of the Lord;"+--that is the Hebrew [146]
notion of felicity; and, pursued with passion and tenacity, this
notion would not let the Hebrew rest till, as is well known, he had,
at last, got out of the law a network of prescriptions to enwrap his
whole life, to govern every moment of it, every impulse, every
action.  The Greek notion of felicity, on the other hand, is
perfectly conveyed in these words of a great French moralist: "C'est
le bonheur des hommes"--when? when they abhor that which is evil?--
no; when they exercise themselves in the law of the Lord day and
night?--no; when they die daily?--no; when they walk about the New
Jerusalem with palms in their hands?--no; but when they think aright,
when their thought hits,--"quand ils pensent juste."  At the bottom
of both the Greek and the Hebrew notion is the desire, native in man,
for reason and the will of God, the feeling after the universal
order,--in a word, the love of God.  But, while Hebraism seizes upon
certain plain, capital intimations of the universal order, and rivets
itself, one may say, with unequalled grandeur of earnestness and
intensity on the study and observance of them, the bent of Hellenism
is to follow, with flexible activity, the whole play of the universal
order, to be [147] apprehensive of missing any part of it, of
sacrificing one part to another, to slip away from resting in this or
that intimation of it, however capital.  An unclouded clearness of
mind, an unimpeded play of thought, is what this bent drives at.  The
governing idea of Hellenism is spontaneity of consciousness; that of
Hebraism, strictness of conscience.

Christianity changed nothing in this essential bent of Hebraism to
set doing above knowing.  Self-conquest, self-devotion, the following
not our own individual will, but the will of God, obedience, is the
fundamental idea of this form, also, of the discipline to which we
have attached the general name of Hebraism.  Only, as the old law and
the network of prescriptions with which it enveloped human life were
evidently a motive power not driving and searching enough to produce
the result aimed at,--patient continuance in well doing, self-
conquest,--Christianity substituted for them boundless devotion to
that inspiring and affecting pattern of self-conquest offered by
Christ; and by the new motive power, of which the essence was this,
though the love and admiration of Christian churches have for
centuries been employed in varying, amplifying, [148] and adorning
the plain description of it, Christianity, as St. Paul truly says,
"establishes the law,"+ and in the strength of the ampler power which
she has thus supplied to fulfil it, has accomplished the miracles,
which we all see, of her history.

So long as we do not forget that both Hellenism and Hebraism are
profound and admirable manifestations of man's life, tendencies, and
powers, and that both of them aim at a like final result, we can
hardly insist too strongly on the divergence of line and of operation
with which they proceed.  It is a divergence so great that it most
truly, as the prophet Zechariah says, "has raised up thy sons, O
Zion, against thy sons, O Greece!"+  The difference whether it is by
doing or by knowing that we set most store, and the practical
consequences which follow from this difference, leave their mark on
all the history of our race and of its development.  Language may be
abundantly quoted from both Hellenism and Hebraism to make it seem
that one follows the same current as the other towards the same goal.
They are, truly, borne towards the same goal; but the currents which
bear them are infinitely different.  It is true, Solomon will praise
[149] knowing: "Understanding is a well-spring of life unto him that
hath it."+  And in the New Testament, again, Christ is a "light,"+ and
"truth makes us free."+  It is true, Aristotle will undervalue
knowing: "In what concerns virtue," says he, "three things are
necessary,--knowledge, deliberate will, and perseverance; but,
whereas the two last are all important, the first is a matter of
little importance."  It is true that with the same impatience with
which St. James enjoins a man to be not a forgetful hearer, but a
doer of the work,+ Epictetus exhorts us to do what we have
demonstrated to ourselves we ought to do; or he taunts us with
futility, for being armed at all points to prove that lying is wrong,
yet all the time continuing to lie.  It is true, Plato, in words
which are almost the words of the New Testament or the Imitation,
calls life a learning to die.  But underneath the superficial
agreement the fundamental divergence still subsists.  The
understanding of Solomon is "the walking in the way of the
commandments;" this is "the way of peace,"+ and it is of this that
blessedness comes.  In the New Testament, the truth which gives us
the peace of God and makes us free, is the love of Christ
constraining [150] us to crucify, as he did, and with a like purpose
of moral regeneration, the flesh with its affections and lusts, and
thus establishing, as we have seen, the law.  To St. Paul it appears
possible to "hold the truth in unrighteousness,"+ which is just what
Socrates judged impossible.  The moral virtues, on the other hand,
are with Aristotle but the porch and access to the intellectual, and
with these last is blessedness.  That partaking of the divine life,
which both Hellenism and Hebraism, as we have said, fix as their
crowning aim, Plato expressly denies to the man of practical virtue
merely, of self-conquest with any other motive than that of perfect
intellectual vision; he reserves it for the lover of pure knowledge,
of seeing things as they really are,--the philomathes.+

Both Hellenism and Hebraism arise out of the wants of human nature,
and address themselves to satisfying those wants.  But their methods
are so different, they lay stress on such different points, and call
into being by their respective disciplines such different activities,
that the face which human nature presents when it passes from the
hands of one of them to those of the other, is no longer the [151]
same.  To get rid of one's ignorance, to see things as they are, and
by seeing them as they are to see them in their beauty, is the simple
and attractive ideal which Hellenism holds out before human nature;
and from the simplicity and charm of this ideal, Hellenism, and human
life in the hands of Hellenism, is invested with a kind of aerial
ease, clearness, and radiancy; they are full of what we call
sweetness and light.  Difficulties are kept out of view, and the
beauty and rationalness of the ideal have all our thoughts.  "The
best man is he who most tries to perfect himself, and the happiest
man is he who most feels that he is perfecting himself,"--this
account of the matter by Socrates, the true Socrates of the
Memorabilia, has something so simple, spontaneous, and
unsophisticated about it, that it seems to fill us with clearness and
hope when we hear it.  But there is a saying which I have heard
attributed to Mr. Carlyle about Socrates,--a very happy saying,
whether it is really Mr. Carlyle's or not,--which excellently marks
the essential point in which Hebraism differs from Hellenism.
"Socrates," this saying goes, "is terribly at ease in Zion"
Hebraism,--and here is the source of its [152] wonderful strength,--
has always been severely preoccupied with an awful sense of the
impossibility of being at ease in Zion; of the difficulties which
oppose themselves to man's pursuit or attainment of that perfection
of which Socrates talks so hopefully, and, as from this point of view
one might almost say, so glibly.  It is all very well to talk of
getting rid of one's ignorance, of seeing things in their reality,
seeing them in their beauty; but how is this to be done when there is
something which thwarts and spoils all our efforts?  This something
is sin; and the space which sin fills in Hebraism, as compared with
Hellenism, is indeed prodigious.  This obstacle to perfection fills
the whole scene, and perfection appears remote and rising away from
earth, in the background.  Under the name of sin, the difficulties of
knowing oneself and conquering oneself which impede man's passage to
perfection, become, for Hebraism, a positive, active entity hostile
to man, a mysterious power which I heard Dr. Pusey the other day, in
one of his impressive sermons, compare to a hideous hunchback seated
on our shoulders, and which it is the main business of our lives to
hate and oppose.  The discipline of the [153] Old Testament may be
summed up as a discipline teaching us to abhor and flee from sin; the
discipline of the New Testament, as a discipline teaching us to die
to it.  As Hellenism speaks of thinking clearly, seeing things in
their essence and beauty, as a grand and precious feat for man to
achieve, so Hebraism speaks of becoming conscious of sin, of
awakening to a sense of sin, as a feat of this kind.  It is obvious
to what wide divergence these differing tendencies, actively
followed, must lead.  As one passes and repasses from Hellenism to
Hebraism, from Plato to St. Paul, one feels inclined to rub one's
eyes and ask oneself whether man is indeed a gentle and simple being,
showing the traces of a noble and divine nature; or an unhappy
chained captive, labouring with groanings that cannot be uttered to
free himself from the body of this death.

Apparently it was the Hellenic conception of human nature which was
unsound, for the world could not live by it.  Absolutely to call it
unsound, however, is to fall into the common error of its Hebraising
enemies; but it was unsound at that particular moment of man's
development, it was premature.  The indispensable basis of conduct
and [154] self-control, the platform upon which alone the perfection
aimed at by Greece can come into bloom, was not to be reached by our
race so easily; centuries of probation and discipline were needed to
bring us to it.  Therefore the bright promise of Hellenism faded, and
Hebraism ruled the world.  Then was seen that astonishing spectacle,
so well marked by the often quoted words of the prophet Zechariah,
when men of all languages of the nations took hold of the skirt of
him that was a Jew, saying:--"We will go with you, for we have heard
that God is with you."+  And the Hebraism which thus received and
ruled a world all gone out of the way and altogether become
unprofitable, was, and could not but be, the later, the more
spiritual, the more attractive development of Hebraism.  It was
Christianity; that is to say, Hebraism aiming at self-conquest and
rescue from the thrall of vile affections, not by obedience to the
letter of a law, but by conformity to the image of a self-sacrificing
example.  To a world stricken with moral enervation Christianity
offered its spectacle of an inspired self-sacrifice; to men who
refused themselves nothing, it showed one who refused [155] himself
everything;--"my Saviour banished joy" says George Herbert.  When the
alma Venus, the life-giving and joy-giving power of nature, so fondly
cherished by the Pagan world, could not save her followers from self-
dissatisfaction and ennui, the severe words of the apostle came
bracingly and refreshingly: "Let no man deceive you with vain words,
for because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the children
of disobedience."+  Throughout age after age, and generation after
generation, our race, or all that part of our race which was most
living and progressive, was baptized into a death;+ and endeavoured,
by suffering in the flesh, to cease from sin.  Of this endeavour, the
animating labours and afflictions of early Christianity, the touching
asceticism of mediaeval Christianity, are the great historical
manifestations.  Literary monuments of it, each, in its own way,
incomparable, remain in the Epistles of St. Paul, in St. Augustine's
Confessions, and in the two original and simplest books of the
Imitation.*

Of two disciplines laying their main stress, the [156] one, on clear
intelligence, the other, on firm obedience; the one, on
comprehensively knowing the grounds of one's duty, the other, on
diligently practising it; the one on taking all possible care (to use
Bishop Wilson's words again) that the light we have be not darkness,
the other, that according to the best light we have we diligently
walk,--the priority naturally belongs to that discipline which braces
man's moral powers, and founds for him an indispensable basis of
character.  And, therefore, it is justly said of the Jewish people,
who were charged with setting powerfully forth that side of the
divine order to which the words conscience and self-conquest point,
that they were "entrusted with the oracles of God;"+ as it is justly
said of Christianity, which followed Judaism and which set forth this
side with a much deeper effectiveness and a much wider influence,
that the wisdom of the old Pagan world was foolishness compared to
it.  No words of devotion and admiration can be too strong to render
thanks to these beneficent forces which have so borne forward
humanity in its appointed work of coming to the knowledge and
possession of itself; above all, in those great [157] moments when
their action was the wholesomest and the most necessary.

But the evolution of these forces, separately and in themselves, is
not the whole evolution of humanity,--their single history is not the
whole history of man; whereas their admirers are always apt to make
it stand for the whole history.  Hebraism and Hellenism are, neither
of them, the law of human development, as their admirers are prone to
make them; they are, each of them, contributions to human
development,--august contributions, invaluable contributions; and
each showing itself to us more august, more invaluable, more
preponderant over the other, according to the moment in which we take
them, and the relation in which we stand to them.  The nations of our
modern world, children of that immense and salutary movement which
broke up the Pagan world, inevitably stand to Hellenism in a relation
which dwarfs it, and to Hebraism in a relation which magnifies it.
They are inevitably prone to take Hebraism as the law of human
development, and not as simply a contribution to it, however
precious.  And yet the lesson must perforce be [158] learned, that
the human spirit is wider than the most priceless of the forces which
bear it onward, and that to the whole development of man Hebraism
itself is, like Hellenism, but a contribution.

Perhaps we may help ourselves to see this clearer by an illustration
drawn from the treatment of a single great idea which has profoundly
engaged the human spirit, and has given it eminent opportunities for
showing its nobleness and energy.  It surely must be perceived that
the idea of the immortality of the soul, as this idea rises in its
generality before the human spirit, is something grander, truer, and
more satisfying, than it is in the particular forms by which St.
Paul, in the famous fifteenth chapter of the Epistle to the
Corinthians,+ and Plato, in the Phaedo, endeavour to develope and
establish it.  Surely we cannot but feel, that the argumentation with
which the Hebrew apostle goes about to expound this great idea is,
after all, confused and inconclusive; and that the reasoning, drawn
from analogies of likeness and equality, which is employed upon it by
the Greek philosopher, is over-subtle and sterile?  Above and beyond
the inadequate solutions which Hebraism and Hellenism here attempt,
extends the immense [159] and august problem itself, and the human
spirit which gave birth to it.  And this single illustration may
suggest to us how the same thing happens in other cases also.

But meanwhile, by alternations of Hebraism and Hellenism, of man's
intellectual and moral impulses, of the effort to see things as they
really are, and the effort to win peace by self-conquest, the human
spirit proceeds, and each of these two forces has its appointed hours
of culmination and seasons of rule.  As the great movement of
Christianity was a triumph of Hebraism and man's moral impulses, so
the great movement which goes by the name of the Renascence* was an
uprising and re-instatement of man's intellectual impulses and of
Hellenism.  We in England, the devoted children of Protestantism,
chiefly know the Renascence by its subordinate and secondary side of
the Reformation.  The Reformation has been often called a Hebraising
revival, a return to the ardour and sincereness of primitive [160]
Christianity.  No one, however, can study the development of
Protestantism and of Protestant churches without feeling that into
the Reformation too,--Hebraising child of the Renascence and
offspring of its fervour, rather than its intelligence, as it
undoubtedly was,--the subtle Hellenic leaven of the Renascence found
its way, and that the exact respective parts in the Reformation, of
Hebraism and of Hellenism, are not easy to separate.  But what we may
with truth say is, that all which Protestantism was to itself clearly
conscious of, all which it succeeded in clearly setting forth in
words, had the characters of Hebraism rather than of Hellenism.  The
Reformation was strong, in that it was an earnest return to the Bible
and to doing from the heart the will of God as there written; it was
weak, in that it never consciously grasped or applied the central
idea of the Renascence,--the Hellenic idea of pursuing, in all lines
of activity, the law and science, to use Plato's words, of things as
they really are.  Whatever direct superiority, therefore,
Protestantism had over Catholicism was a moral superiority, a
superiority arising out of its greater sincerity and earnestness,--at
the moment of its apparition at any [161] rate,--in dealing with the
heart and conscience; its pretensions to an intellectual superiority
are in general quite illusory.  For Hellenism, for the thinking side
in man as distinguished from the acting side, the attitude of mind of
Protestantism towards the Bible in no respect differs from the
attitude of mind of Catholicism towards the Church.  The mental habit
of him who imagines that Balaam's ass spoke, in no respect differs
from the mental habit of him who imagines that a Madonna of wood or
stone winked; and the one, who says that God's Church makes him
believe what he believes, and the other, who says that God's Word
makes him believe what he believes, are for the philosopher perfectly
alike in not really and truly knowing, when they say God's Church and
God's Word, what it is they say, or whereof they affirm.

In the sixteenth century, therefore, Hellenism re-entered the world,
and again stood in presence of Hebraism,--a Hebraism renewed and
purged.  Now, it has not been enough observed, how, in the
seventeenth century, a fate befell Hellenism in some respects
analogous to that which befell it at the commencement of our era.
The Renascence, that [162] great re-awakening of Hellenism, that
irresistible return of humanity to nature and to seeing things as
they are, which in art, in literature, and in physics, produced such
splendid fruits, had, like the anterior Hellenism of the Pagan world,
a side of moral weakness, and of relaxation or insensibility of the
moral fibre, which in Italy showed itself with the most startling
plainness, but which in France, England, and other countries was very
apparent too.  Again this loss of spiritual balance, this exclusive
preponderance given to man's perceiving and knowing side, this
unnatural defect of his feeling and acting side, provoked a reaction.
Let us trace that reaction where it most nearly concerns us.

Science has now made visible to everybody the great and pregnant
elements of difference which lie in race, and in how signal a manner
they make the genius and history of an Indo-European people vary from
those of a Semitic people.  Hellenism is of Indo-European growth,
Hebraism is of Semitic growth; and we English, a nation of Indo-
European stock, seem to belong naturally to the movement of
Hellenism.  But nothing more strongly marks the essential unity of
man than the affinities we can [163] perceive, in this point or that,
between members of one family of peoples and members of another; and
no affinity of this kind is more strongly marked than that likeness
in the strength and prominence of the moral fibre, which,
notwithstanding immense elements of difference, knits in some special
sort the genius and history of us English, and of our American
descendants across the Atlantic, to the genius and history of the
Hebrew people.  Puritanism, which has been so great a power in the
English nation, and in the strongest part of the English nation, was
originally the reaction, in the seventeenth century, of the
conscience and moral sense of our race, against the moral
indifference and lax rule of conduct which in the sixteenth century
came in with the Renascence.  It was a reaction of Hebraism against
Hellenism; and it powerfully manifested itself, as was natural, in a
people with much of what we call a Hebraising turn, with a signal
affinity for the bent which was the master-bent of Hebrew life.
Eminently Indo-European by its humour, by the power it shows, through
this gift, of imaginatively acknowledging the multiform aspects of
the problem of life, and of thus getting itself unfixed from its own
over- [164] certainty, of smiling at its own over-tenacity, our race
has yet (and a great part of its strength lies here), in matters of
practical life and moral conduct, a strong share of the assuredness,
the tenacity, the intensity of the Hebrews.  This turn manifested
itself in Puritanism, and has had a great part in shaping our history
for the last two hundred years.  Undoubtedly it checked and changed
amongst us that movement of the Renascence which we see producing in
the reign of Elizabeth such wonderful fruits; undoubtedly it stopped
the prominent rule and direct development of that order of ideas
which we call by the name of Hellenism, and gave the first rank to a
different order of ideas.  Apparently, too, as we said of the former
defeat of Hellenism, if Hellenism was defeated, this shows that
Hellenism was imperfect, and that its ascendency at that moment would
not have been for the world's good.

Yet there is a very important difference between the defeat inflicted
on Hellenism by Christianity eighteen hundred years ago, and the
check given to the Renascence by Puritanism.  The greatness of the
difference is well measured by the difference in force, beauty,
significance and usefulness, between [165] primitive Christianity and
Protestantism.  Eighteen hundred years ago it was altogether the hour
of Hebraism; primitive Christianity was legitimately and truly the
ascendent force in the world at that time, and the way of mankind's
progress lay through its full development.  Another hour in man's
development began in the fifteenth century, and the main road of his
progress then lay for a time through Hellenism.  Puritanism was no
longer the central current of the world's progress, it was a side
stream crossing the central current and checking it.  The cross and
the check may have been necessary and salutary, but that does not do
away with the essential difference between the main stream of man's
advance and a cross or side stream.  For more than two hundred years
the main stream of man's advance has moved towards knowing himself
and the world, seeing things as they are, spontaneity of
consciousness; the main impulse of a great part, and that the
strongest part, of our nation, has been towards strictness of
conscience.  They have made the secondary the principal at the wrong
moment, and the principal they have at the wrong moment treated as
secondary.  This contravention of the [166] natural order has
produced, as such contravention always must produce, a certain
confusion and false movement, of which we are now beginning to feel,
in almost every direction, the inconvenience.  In all directions our
habitual courses of action seem to be losing efficaciousness, credit,
and control, both with others and even with ourselves; everywhere we
see the beginnings of confusion, and we want a clue to some sound
order and authority.  This we can only get by going back upon the
actual instincts and forces which rule our life, seeing them as they
really are, connecting them with other instincts and forces, and
enlarging our whole view and rule of life.

NOTES

145. +Proverbs 29:18 is the source of the first passage.  I have not
found the exact language of the second quotation, but the thought
resembles that of Psalms 19:9-10: "The fear of the Lord is clean,
enduring for ever: the judgments of the Lord are true and righteous
altogether.  More to be desired are they than gold, yea, than much
fine gold: sweeter also than honey and the honeycomb."  King James
Bible.

148. +Romans 3:31.  "Do we then make void the law through faith? /
God forbid: yea, we establish the law."  King James Bible.

148. +Zechariah 9:12-13.  "Turn you to the strong hold, ye prisoners
of hope: even to day do I declare that I will render double unto
thee; / When I have bent Judah for me, filled the bow with Ephraim,
and raised up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and made
thee as the sword of a mighty man."  King James Bible.

149. +Proverbs 16:22.  "Understanding is a wellspring of life unto
him that hath it: but the instruction of fools is folly."  King James
Bible.

149.  +John 8:12.  "Then spake Jesus again unto them, saying, I am
the light of the world: he that followeth me shall not walk in
darkness, but shall have the light of life."  And again: John 9:4-5.
"I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is day: the
night cometh, when no man can work. / As long as I am in the world, I
am the light of the world."  King James Bible.

149. +John 8:31-32.  "Then said Jesus to those Jews which believed on
him, If ye continue in my word, then are ye my disciples indeed; /
And ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free."
King James Bible.

149. +James 1:25.  "But whoso looketh into the perfect law of
liberty, and continueth therein, he being not a forgetful hearer, but
a doer of the work, this man shall be blessed in his deed."  King
James Bible.

149. +Proverbs 2:20-21 may be the passage Arnold has in mind,
although the language differs: "That thou mayest walk in the way of
good men, and keep the paths of the righteous. / For the upright
shall dwell in the land, and the perfect shall remain in it."  One of
the central devices in Proverbs is the metaphor of the "path"--of
uprightness, folly, etc.  King James Bible.

150. +Romans 1:18.  "For the wrath of God is revealed from heaven
against all ungodliness and unrighteousness of men, who hold the
truth in unrighteousness."  King James Bible.

150. +Philomathes, "fond of knowledge, loving knowledge."  (Liddell
and Scott.)  GIF image:

154. +Zechariah 8:23.  "Thus saith the Lord of hosts; In those days
it shall come to pass, that ten men shall take hold out of all
languages of the nations, even shall take hold of the skirt of him
that is a Jew, saying, We will go with you: for we have heard that
God is with you."  King James Bible.

155. +Ephesians 5:6.  "Let no man deceive you with vain words: for
because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the children of
disobedience."  King James Bible.

155. +Romans 6:3.  "Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized
into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death?"  King James Bible.

155. *The two first books.  +Arnold refers to the Imitatio Christi,
attributed to fourteenth-century priest Thomas a Kempis.  The Benham
translation and a modern English translation are currently available
from the College of St. Benedict at Saint John's University Internet
Theology Resources site.  See also the Benham text link.

156. +Romans 3:1-2.  "What advantage then hath the Jew? or what
profit is there of circumcision? / Much every way: chiefly, because
that unto them were committed the oracles of God."  King James Bible.

158. +See 1 Corinthians 15.  Saint Paul wrestles in this chapter to
explain the Resurrection's promise.  For example, refer to 15:50-53:
"Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the
kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption. /
Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall
all be changed, / In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the
last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised
incorruptible, and we shall be changed. / For this corruptible must
put on incorruption, and this mortal must put on immortality."

159. *I have ventured to give to the foreign word Renaissance,
destined to become of more common use amongst us as the movement
which it denotes comes, as it will come, increasingly to interest us,
an English form.



CHAPTER V

[166] The matter here opened is so large, and the trains of thought
to which it gives rise are so manifold, that we must be careful to
limit ourselves scrupulously to what has a direct bearing upon our
actual discussion.  We have found that at the [167] bottom of our
present unsettled state, so full of the seeds of trouble, lies the
notion of its being the prime right and happiness, for each of us, to
affirm himself, and his ordinary self; to be doing, and to be doing
freely and as he likes.  We have found at the bottom of it the
disbelief in right reason as a lawful authority.  It was easy to show
from our practice and current history that this is so; but it was
impossible to show why it is so without taking a somewhat wider sweep
and going into things a little more deeply.  Why, in fact, should
good, well-meaning, energetic, sensible people, like the bulk of our
countrymen, come to have such light belief in right reason, and such
an exaggerated value for their own independent doing, however crude?
The answer is: because of an exclusive and excessive development in
them, without due allowance for time, place, and circumstance, of
that side of human nature, and that group of human forces, to which
we have given the general name of Hebraism.  Because they have
thought their real and only important homage was owed to a power
concerned with their obedience rather than with their intelligence, a
power interested in the moral side of their nature almost
exclusively.  Thus they have [168] been led to regard in themselves,
as the one thing needful, strictness of conscience, the staunch
adherence to some fixed law of doing we have got already, instead of
spontaneity of consciousness, which tends continually to enlarge our
whole law of doing.  They have fancied themselves to have in their
religion a sufficient basis for the whole of their life fixed and
certain for ever, a full law of conduct and a full law of thought, so
far as thought is needed, as well; whereas what they really have is a
law of conduct, a law of unexampled power for enabling them to war
against the law of sin in their members and not to serve it in the
lusts thereof.  The book which contains this invaluable law they call
the Word of God, and attribute to it, as I have said, and as, indeed,
is perfectly well known, a reach and sufficiency co-extensive with
all the wants of human nature.  This might, no doubt, be so, if
humanity were not the composite thing it is, if it had only, or in
quite overpowering eminence, a moral side, and the group of instincts
and powers which we call moral.  But it has besides, and in notable
eminence, an intellectual side, and the group of instincts and powers
which we call intellectual.  No doubt, mankind makes in general its
progress in a [169] fashion which gives at one time full swing to one
of these groups of instincts, at another time to the other; and man's
faculties are so intertwined, that when his moral side, and the
current of force which we call Hebraism, is uppermost, this side will
manage somehow to provide, or appear to provide, satisfaction for his
intellectual needs; and when his moral side, and the current of force
which we call Hellenism, is uppermost, this, again, will provide, or
appear to provide, satisfaction for men's moral needs.  But sooner or
later it becomes manifest that when the two sides of humanity proceed
in this fashion of alternate preponderance, and not of mutual
understanding and balance, the side which is uppermost does not
really provide in a satisfactory manner for the needs of the side
which is undermost, and a state of confusion is, sooner or later, the
result.  The Hellenic half of our nature, bearing rule, makes a sort
of provision for the Hebrew half, but it turns out to be an
inadequate provision; and again the Hebrew half of our nature bearing
rule makes a sort of provision for the Hellenic half, but this, too,
turns out to be an inadequate provision.  The true and smooth order
of humanity's development [170] is not reached in either way.  And
therefore, while we willingly admit with the Christian apostle that
the world by wisdom,--that is, by the isolated preponderance of its
intellectual impulses,--knew not God, or the true order of things, it
is yet necessary, also, to set up a sort of converse to this
proposition, and to say likewise (what is equally true) that the
world by Puritanism knew not God.  And it is on this converse of the
apostle's proposition that it is particularly needful to insist in
our own country just at present.

Here, indeed, is the answer to many criticisms which have been
addressed to all that we have said in praise of sweetness and light.
Sweetness and light evidently have to do with the bent or side in
humanity which we call Hellenic.  Greek intelligence has obviously
for its essence the instinct for what Plato calls the true, firm,
intelligible law of things; the love of light, of seeing things as
they are.  Even in the natural sciences, where the Greeks had not
time and means adequately to apply this instinct, and where we have
gone a great deal further than they did, it is this instinct which is
the root of the whole matter and the ground of all [171] our success;
and this instinct the world has mainly learnt of the Greeks, inasmuch
as they are humanity's most signal manifestation of it.  Greek art,
again, Greek beauty, have their root in the same impulse to see
things as they really are, inasmuch as Greek art and beauty rest on
fidelity to nature,--the best nature,--and on a delicate
discrimination of what this best nature is.  To say we work for
sweetness and light, then, is only another way of saying that we work
for Hellenism.  But, oh! cry many people, sweetness and light are not
enough; you must put strength or energy along with them, and make a
kind of trinity of strength, sweetness and light, and then, perhaps,
you may do some good.  That is to say, we are to join Hebraism,
strictness of the moral conscience, and manful walking by the best
light we have, together with Hellenism, inculcate both, and rehearse
the praises of both.

Or, rather, we may praise both in conjunction, but we must be careful
to praise Hebraism most.  "Culture," says an acute, though somewhat
rigid critic, Mr. Sidgwick, "diffuses sweetness and light.  I do not
undervalue these blessings, but religion gives fire and strength, and
the world wants fire [172] and strength even more than sweetness and
light."  By religion, let me explain, Mr. Sidgwick here means
particularly that Puritanism on the insufficiency of which I have
been commenting and to which he says I am unfair.  Now, no doubt, it
is possible to be a fanatical partisan of light and the instincts
which push us to it, a fanatical enemy of strictness of moral
conscience and the instincts which push us to it.  A fanaticism of
this sort deforms and vulgarises the well-known work, in some
respects so remarkable, of the late Mr. Buckle.  Such a fanaticism
carries its own mark with it, in lacking sweetness; and its own
penalty, in that, lacking sweetness, it comes in the end to lack
light too.  And the Greeks,--the great exponents of humanity's bent
for sweetness and light united, of its perception that the truth of
things must be at the same time beauty,--singularly escaped the
fanaticism which we moderns, whether we Hellenise or whether we
Hebraise, are so apt to show, and arrived,--though failing, as has
been said, to give adequate practical satisfaction to the claims of
man's moral side,--at the idea of a comprehensive adjustment of the
claims of both the sides in man, the moral as well [173] as the
intellectual, of a full estimate of both, and of a reconciliation of
both; an idea which is philosophically of the greatest value, and the
best of lessons for us moderns.  So we ought to have no difficulty in
conceding to Mr. Sidgwick that manful walking by the best light one
has,--fire and strength as he calls it,--has its high value as well
as culture, the endeavour to see things in their truth and beauty,
the pursuit of sweetness and light.  But whether at this or that
time, and to this or that set of persons, one ought to insist most on
the praises of fire and strength, or on the praises of sweetness and
light, must depend, one would think, on the circumstances and needs
of that particular time and those particular persons.  And all that
we have been saying, and indeed any glance at the world around us,
shows that with us, with the most respectable and strongest part of
us, the ruling force is now, and long has been, a Puritan force, the
care for fire and strength, strictness of conscience, Hebraism,
rather than the care for sweetness and light, spontaneity of
consciousness, Hellenism.

Well, then, what is the good of our now rehearsing [174] the praises
of fire and strength to ourselves, who dwell too exclusively on them
already?  When Mr. Sidgwick says so broadly, that the world wants
fire and strength even more than sweetness and light, is he not
carried away by a turn for powerful generalisation? does he not
forget that the world is not all of one piece, and every piece with
the same needs at the same time?  It may be true that the Roman world
at the beginning of our era, or Leo the Tenth's Court at the time of
the Reformation, or French society in the eighteenth century, needed
fire and strength even more than sweetness and light.  But can it be
said that the Barbarians who overran the empire, needed fire and
strength even more than sweetness and light; or that the Puritans
needed them more; or that Mr. Murphy, the Birmingham lecturer, and
the Rev. W. Cattle and his friends, need them more?

The Puritan's great danger is that he imagines himself in possession
of a rule telling him the unum necessarium, or one thing needful,+
and that he then remains satisfied with a very crude conception of
what this rule really is and what it tells him, thinks [175] he has
now knowledge and henceforth needs only to act, and, in this
dangerous state of assurance and self-satisfaction, proceeds to give
full swing to a number of the instincts of his ordinary self.  Some
of the instincts of his ordinary self he has, by the help of his rule
of life, conquered; but others which he has not conquered by this
help he is so far from perceiving to need subjugation, and to be
instincts of an inferior self, that he even fancies it to be his
right and duty, in virtue of having conquered a limited part of
himself, to give unchecked swing to the remainder.  He is, I say, a
victim of Hebraism, of the tendency to cultivate strictness of
conscience rather than spontaneity of consciousness.  And what he
wants is a larger conception of human nature, showing him the number
of other points at which his nature must come to its best, besides
the points which he himself knows and thinks of.  There is no unum
necessarium, or one thing needful, which can free human nature from
the obligation of trying to come to its best at all these points.
The real unum necessarium for us is to come to our best at all
points.  Instead of our "one thing needful," justifying in us
vulgarity, hideousness, ignorance, violence,--our [176] vulgarity,
hideousness, ignorance, violence, are really so many touchstones
which try our one thing needful, and which prove that in the state,
at any rate, in which we ourselves have it, it is not all we want.
And as the force which encourages us to stand staunch and fast by the
rule and ground we have is Hebraism, so the force which encourages us
to go back upon this rule, and to try the very ground on which we
appear to stand, is Hellenism,--a turn for giving our consciousness
free play and enlarging its range.  And what I say is, not that
Hellenism is always for everybody more wanted than Hebraism, but that
for the Rev. W. Cattle at this particular moment, and for the great
majority of us his fellow-countrymen, it is more wanted.

Nothing is more striking than to observe in how many ways a limited
conception of human nature, the notion of a one thing needful, a one
side in us to be made uppermost, the disregard of a full and
harmonious development of ourselves, tells injuriously on our
thinking and acting.  In the first place, our hold upon the rule or
standard to which we look for our one thing needful, tends to become
less and less near and vital, our conception of it more and more
[177] mechanical, and unlike the thing itself as it was conceived in
the mind where it originated.  The dealings of Puritanism with the
writings of St. Paul afford a noteworthy illustration of this.
Nowhere so much as in the writings of St. Paul, and in that great
apostle's greatest work, the Epistle to the Romans, has Puritanism
found what seemed to furnish it with the one thing needful, and to
give it canons of truth absolute and final.  Now all writings, as has
been already said, even the most precious writings and the most
fruitful, must inevitably, from the very nature of things, be but
contributions to human thought and human development, which extend
wider than they do.  Indeed, St. Paul, in the very Epistle of which
we are speaking, shows, when he asks, "Who hath known the mind of the
Lord?"+--who hath known, that is, the true and divine order of things
in its entirety,--that he himself acknowledges this fully.  And we
have already pointed out in another Epistle of St. Paul a great and
vital idea of the human spirit,--the idea of the immortality of the
soul,--transcending and overlapping, so to speak, the expositor's
power to give it adequate definition and expression.  But quite
distinct from the question [178] whether St. Paul's expression, or
any man's expression, can be a perfect and final expression of truth,
comes the question whether we rightly seize and understand his
expression as it exists.  Now, perfectly to seize another man's
meaning, as it stood in his own mind, is not easy; especially when
the man is separated from us by such differences of race, training,
time, and circumstances as St. Paul.  But there are degrees of
nearness in getting at a man's meaning; and though we cannot arrive
quite at what St. Paul had in his mind, yet we may come near it.  And
who, that comes thus near it, must not feel how terms which St. Paul
employs in trying to follow, with his analysis of such profound power
and originality, some of the most delicate, intricate, obscure, and
contradictory workings and states of the human spirit, are detached
and employed by Puritanism, not in the connected and fluid way in
which St. Paul employs them, and for which alone words are really
meant, but in an isolated, fixed, mechanical way, as if they were
talismans; and how all trace and sense of St. Paul's true movement of
ideas, and sustained masterly analysis, is thus lost?  Who, I say,
that has watched Puritanism,--the force which [179] so strongly
Hebraises, which so takes St. Paul's writings as something absolute
and final, containing the one thing needful,--handle such terms as
grace, faith, election, righteousness, but must feel, not only that
these terms have for the mind of Puritanism a sense false and
misleading, but also that this sense is the most monstrous and
grotesque caricature of the sense of St. Paul, and that his true
meaning is by these worshippers of his words altogether lost?

Or to take another eminent example, in which not Puritanism only,
but, one may say, the whole religious world, by their mechanical use
of St. Paul's writings, can be shown to miss or change his real
meaning.  The whole religious world, one may say, use now the word
resurrection,--a word which is so often in their thoughts and on
their lips, and which they find so often in St. Paul's writings,--in
one sense only.  They use it to mean a rising again after the
physical death of the body.  Now it is quite true that St. Paul
speaks of resurrection in this sense, that he tries to describe and
explain it, and that he condemns those who doubt and deny it.  But it
is true, also, that in nine cases out of ten where St. Paul thinks
and speaks of resurrection, he [180] thinks and speaks of it in a
sense different from this; in the sense of a rising to a new life
before the physical death of the body, and not after it.  The idea on
which we have already touched, the profound idea of being baptized
into the death of the great exemplar of self-devotion and self-
annulment, of repeating in our own person, by virtue of
identification with our exemplar, his course of self-devotion and
self-annulment, and of thus coming, within the limits of our present
life, to a new life, in which, as in the death going before it, we
are identified with our exemplar,--this is the fruitful and original
conception of being risen with Christ which possesses the mind of St.
Paul, and this is the central point round which, with such
incomparable emotion and eloquence, all his teaching moves.  For him,
the life after our physical death is really in the main but a
consequence and continuation of the inexhaustible energy of the new
life thus originated on this side the grave.  This grand Pauline idea
of Christian resurrection is worthily rehearsed in one of the noblest
collects of the Prayer-Book, and is destined, no doubt, to fill a
more and more important place in the Christianity of the future; but
almost as [181] signal as is the essentialness of this characteristic
idea in St. Paul's teaching, is the completeness with which the
worshippers of St. Paul's words, as an absolute final expression of
saving truth, have lost it, and have substituted for the apostle's
living and near conception of a resurrection now, their mechanical
and remote conception of a resurrection hereafter!

In short, so fatal is the notion of possessing, even in the most
precious words or standards, the one thing needful, of having in
them, once for all, a full and sufficient measure of light to guide
us, and of there being no duty left for us except to make our
practice square exactly with them,--so fatal, I say, is this notion
to the right knowledge and comprehension of the very words or
standards we thus adopt, and to such strange distortions and
perversions of them does it inevitably lead, that whenever we hear
that commonplace which Hebraism, if we venture to inquire what a man
knows, is so apt to bring out against us in disparagement of what we
call culture, and in praise of a man's sticking to the one thing
needful,--he knows, says Hebraism, his Bible!--whenever we hear this
said, we may, without [182] any elaborate defence of culture, content
ourselves with answering simply: "No man, who knows nothing else,
knows even his Bible."

Now the force which we have so much neglected, Hellenism, may be
liable to fail in moral force and earnestness, but by the law of its
nature,--the very same law which makes it sometimes deficient in
intensity when intensity is required,--it opposes itself to the
notion of cutting our being in two, of attributing to one part the
dignity of dealing with the one thing needful, and leaving the other
part to take its chance, which is the bane of Hebraism.  Essential in
Hellenism is the impulse to the development of the whole man, to
connecting and harmonising all parts of him, perfecting all, leaving
none to take their chance; because the characteristic bent of
Hellenism, as has been said, is to find the intelligible law of
things, and there is no intelligible law of things, things cannot
really appear intelligible, unless they are also beautiful.  The body
is not intelligible, is not seen in its true nature and as it really
is, unless it is seen as beautiful; behaviour is not intelligible,
does not account for itself to the mind and show the reason for its
existing, unless it is beautiful.  The [183] same with discourse, the
same with song, the same with worship, the same with all the modes in
which man proves his activity and expresses himself.  To think that
when one shows what is mean, or vulgar, or hideous, one can be
permitted to plead that one has that within which passes show; to
suppose that the possession of what benefits and satisfies one part
of our being can make allowable either discourse like Mr. Murphy's
and the Rev. W. Cattle's, or poetry like the hymns we all hear, or
places of worship like the chapels we all see,--this it is abhorrent
to the nature of Hellenism to concede.  And to be, like our honoured
and justly honoured Faraday, a great natural philosopher with one
side of his being and a Sandemanian with the other, would to
Archimedes have been impossible.  It is evident to what a many-sided
perfecting of man's powers and activities this demand of Hellenism
for satisfaction to be given to the mind by everything which we do,
is calculated to impel our race.  It has its dangers, as has been
fully granted; the notion of this sort of equipollency in man's modes
of activity may lead to moral relaxation, what we do not make our one
thing needful we may come to treat not [184] enough as if it were
needful, though it is indeed very needful and at the same time very
hard.  Still, what side in us has not its dangers, and which of our
impulses can be a talisman to give us perfection outright, and not
merely a help to bring us towards it?  Has not Hebraism, as we have
shown, its dangers as well as Hellenism; and have we used so
excessively the tendencies in ourselves to which Hellenism makes
appeal, that we are now suffering from it?  Are we not, on the
contrary, now suffering because we have not enough used these
tendencies as a help towards perfection?

For we see whither it has brought us, the long exclusive predominance
of Hebraism,--the insisting on perfection in one part of our nature
and not in all; the singling out the moral side, the side of
obedience and action, for such intent regard; making strictness of
the moral conscience so far the principal thing, and putting off for
hereafter and for another world the care for being complete at all
points, the full and harmonious development of our humanity.  Instead
of watching and following on its ways the desire which, as Plato
says, "for ever through all the universe tends towards that which
[185] is lovely," we think that the world has settled its accounts
with this desire, knows what this desire wants of it, and that all
the impulses of our ordinary self which do not conflict with the
terms of this settlement, in our narrow view of it, we may follow
unrestrainedly, under the sanction of some such text as "Not slothful
in business," or, "Whatsoever thy hand findeth to do, do it with all
thy might," or something else of the same kind.  And to any of these
impulses we soon come to give that same character of a mechanical,
absolute law, which we give to our religion; we regard it, as we do
our religion, as an object for strictness of conscience, not for
spontaneity of consciousness; for unremitting adherence on its own
account, not for going back upon, viewing in its connection with
other things, and adjusting to a number of changing circumstances; we
treat it, in short, just as we treat our religion,--as machinery.  It
is in this way that the Barbarians treat their bodily exercises, the
Philistines their business, Mr. Spurgeon his voluntaryism, Mr. Bright
the assertion of personal liberty, Mr. Beales the right of meeting in
Hyde Park.  In all those cases what is needed is a freer play of
consciousness [186] upon the object of pursuit; and in all of them
Hebraism, the valuing staunchness and earnestness more than this free
play, the entire subordination of thinking to doing, has led to a
mistaken and misleading treatment of things.

The newspapers a short time ago contained an account of the suicide
of a Mr. Smith, secretary to some insurance company, who, it was
said, "laboured under the apprehension that he would come to poverty,
and that he was eternally lost."  And when I read these words, it
occurred to me that the poor man who came to such a mournful end was,
in truth, a kind of type, by the selection of his two grand objects
of concern, by their isolation from everything else, and their
juxtaposition to one another, of all the strongest, most respectable,
and most representative part of our nation.  "He laboured under the
apprehension that he would come to poverty, and that he was eternally
lost."  The whole middle-class have a conception of things,--a
conception which makes us call them Philistines,--just like that of
this poor man; though we are seldom, of course, shocked by seeing it
take the distressing, violently morbid, and fatal turn, which [187]
it took with him.  But how generally, with how many of us, are the
main concerns of life limited to these two,--the concern for making
money, and the concern for saving our souls!  And how entirely does
the narrow and mechanical conception of our secular business proceed
from a narrow and mechanical conception of our religious business!
What havoc do the united conceptions make of our lives!  It is
because the second-named of these two master-concerns presents to us
the one thing needful in so fixed, narrow, and mechanical a way, that
so ignoble a fellow master-concern to it as the first-named becomes
possible; and, having been once admitted, takes the same rigid and
absolute character as the other.  Poor Mr. Smith had sincerely the
nobler master-concern as well as the meaner,--the concern for saving
his soul (according to the narrow and mechanical conception which
Puritanism has of what the salvation of the soul is), and the concern
for making money.  But let us remark how many people there are,
especially outside the limits of the serious and conscientious
middle-class to which Mr. Smith belonged, who take up with a meaner
master-concern,--whether it be pleasure, or field-sports, or [188]
bodily exercises, or business, or popular agitation,--who take up
with one of these exclusively, and neglect Mr. Smith's nobler master-
concern, because of the mechanical form which Hebraism has given to
this nobler master-concern, making it stand, as we have said, as
something talismanic, isolated, and all-sufficient, justifying our
giving our ordinary selves free play in amusement, or business, or
popular agitation, if we have made our accounts square with this
master-concern; and, if we have not, rendering other things
indifferent, and our ordinary self all we have to follow, and to
follow with all the energy that is in us, till we do.  Whereas the
idea of perfection at all points, the encouraging in ourselves
spontaneity of consciousness, the letting a free play of thought live
and flow around all our activity, the indisposition to allow one side
of our activity to stand as so all-important and all-sufficing that
it makes other sides indifferent,--this bent of mind in us may not
only check us in following unreservedly a mean master-concern of any
kind, but may even, also, bring new life and movement into that side
of us with which alone Hebraism concerns itself, and awaken a
healthier [189] and less mechanical activity there.  Hellenism may
thus actually serve to further the designs of Hebraism.

Undoubtedly it thus served in the first days of Christianity.
Christianity, as has been said, occupied itself, like Hebraism, with
the moral side of man exclusively, with his moral affections and
moral conduct; and so far it was but a continuation of Hebraism.  But
it transformed and renewed Hebraism by going back upon a fixed rule,
which had become mechanical, and had thus lost its vital motive-
power; by letting the thought play freely around this old rule, and
perceive its inadequacy; by developing a new motive-power, which
men's moral consciousness could take living hold of, and could move
in sympathy with.  What was this but an importation of Hellenism, as
we have defined it, into Hebraism?  And as St. Paul used the
contradiction between the Jew's profession and practice, his
shortcomings on that very side of moral affection and moral conduct
which the Jew and St. Paul, both of them, regarded as all in all--
("Thou that sayest a man should not steal, dost thou steal? thou that
sayest a man should not [190] commit adultery, dost thou commit
adultery?")+--for a proof of the inadequacy of the old rule of life,
in the Jew's mechanical conception of it, and tried to rescue him by
making his consciousness play freely around this rule,--that is, by
a, so far, Hellenic treatment of it,--even so, when we hear so much
said of the growth of commercial immorality in our serious middle-
class, of the melting away of habits of strict probity before the
temptation to get quickly rich and to cut a figure in the world; when
we see, at any rate, so much confusion of thought and of practice in
this great representative class of our nation, may we not be disposed
to say that this confusion shows that his new motive-power of grace
and imputed righteousness has become to the Puritan as mechanical,
and with as ineffective a hold upon his practice, as the old motive-
power of the law was to the Jew?  and that the remedy is the same as
that which St. Paul employed,--an importation of what we have called
Hellenism into his Hebraism, a making his consciousness flow freely
round his petrified rule of life and renew it?  Only with this
difference: that whereas St. Paul imported Hellenism within the
limits of our moral part only, [191] this part being still treated by
him as all in all; and whereas he exhausted, one may say, and used to
the very uttermost, the possibilities of fruitfully importing it on
that side exclusively; we ought to try and import it,--guiding
ourselves by the ideal of a human nature harmoniously perfect at all
points,--into all the lines of our activity, and only by so doing can
we rightly quicken, refresh, and renew those very instincts, now so
much baffled, to which Hebraism makes appeal.

But if we will not be warned by the confusion visible enough at
present in our thinking and acting, that we are in a false line in
having developed our Hebrew side so exclusively, and our Hellenic
side so feebly and at random, in loving fixed rules of action so much
more than the intelligible law of things, let us listen to a
remarkable testimony which the opinion of the world around us offers.
All the world now sets great and increasing value on three objects
which have long been very dear to us, and pursues them in its own
way, or tries to pursue them.  These three objects are industrial
enterprise, bodily exercises, and freedom.  Certainly we have, before
and beyond our neighbours, given ourselves [192] to these three
things with ardent passion and with high success.  And this our
neighbours cannot but acknowledge; and they must needs, when they
themselves turn to these things, have an eye to our example, and take
something of our practice.  Now, generally, when people are
interested in an object of pursuit, they cannot help feeling an
enthusiasm for those who have already laboured successfully at it,
and for their success; not only do they study them, they also love
and admire them.  In this way a man who is interested in the art of
war not only acquaints himself with the performance of great
generals, but he has an admiration and enthusiasm for them.  So, too,
one who wants to be a painter or a poet cannot help loving and
admiring the great painters or poets who have gone before him and
shown him the way.  But it is strange with how little of love,
admiration, or enthusiasm, the world regards us and our freedom, our
bodily exercises, and our industrial prowess, much as these things
themselves are beginning to interest it.  And is not the reason
because we follow each of these things in a mechanical manner, as an
end in and for itself, and not in reference to a general end of human
[193] perfection? and this makes our pursuit of them uninteresting to
humanity, and not what the world truly wants?  It seems to them mere
machinery that we can, knowingly, teach them to worship,--a mere
fetish.  British freedom, British industry, British muscularity, we
work for each of these three things blindly, with no notion of giving
each its due proportion and prominence, because we have no ideal of
harmonious human perfection before our minds, to set our work in
motion, and to guide it.  So the rest of the world, desiring
industry, or freedom, or bodily strength, yet desiring these not, as
we do, absolutely, but as means to something else, imitate, indeed,
of our practice what seems useful for them, but us, whose practice
they imitate, they seem to entertain neither love nor admiration for.
Let us observe, on the other hand, the love and enthusiasm excited by
others who have laboured for these very things.  Perhaps of what we
call industrial enterprise it is not easy to find examples in former
times; but let us consider how Greek freedom and Greek gymnastics
have attracted the love and praise of mankind, who give so little
love and praise to ours.  And what can be the reason [194] of this
difference?  Surely because the Greeks pursued freedom and pursued
gymnastics not mechanically, but with constant reference to some
ideal of complete human perfection and happiness.  And therefore, in
spite of faults and failures, they interest and delight by their
pursuit of them all the rest of mankind, who instinctively feel that
only as things are pursued with reference to this ideal are they
valuable.

Here again, therefore, as in the confusion into which the thought and
action of even the steadiest class amongst us is beginning to fall,
we seem to have an admonition that we have fostered our Hebraising
instincts, our preference of earnestness of doing to delicacy and
flexibility of thinking, too exclusively, and have been landed by
them in a mechanical and unfruitful routine.  And again we seem
taught that the development of our Hellenising instincts, seeking
skilfully the intelligible law of things, and making a stream of
fresh thought play freely about our stock notions and habits, is what
is most wanted by us at present.

Well, then, from all sides, the more we go into the matter, the
currents seem to converge, and together [195] to bear us along
towards culture.  If we look at the world outside us we find a
disquieting absence of sure authority; we discover that only in right
reason can we get a source of sure authority, and culture brings us
towards right reason.  If we look at our own inner world, we find all
manner of confusion arising out of the habits of unintelligent
routine and one-sided growth, to which a too exclusive worship of
fire, strength, earnestness, and action has brought us.  What we want
is a fuller harmonious development of our humanity, a free play of
thought upon our routine notions, spontaneity of consciousness,
sweetness and light; and these are just what culture generates and
fosters.  Proceeding from this idea of the harmonious perfection of
our humanity, and seeking to help itself up towards this perfection
by knowing and spreading the best which has been reached in the
world--an object not to be gained without books and reading--culture
has got its name touched, in the fancies of men, with a sort of air
of bookishness and pedantry, cast upon it from the follies of the
many bookmen who forget the end in the means, and use their books
with no real aim at perfection.  We will not stickle for a name,
[196] and the name of culture one might easily give up, if only those
who decry the frivolous and pedantic sort of culture, but wish at
bottom for the same things as we do, would be careful on their part,
not, in disparaging and discrediting the false culture, to
unwittingly disparage and discredit, among a people with little
natural reverence for it, the true also.  But what we are concerned
for is the thing, not the name; and the thing, call it by what name
we will, is simply the enabling ourselves, whether by reading,
observing, or thinking, to come as near as we can to the firm
intelligible law of things, and thus to get a basis for a less
confused action and a more complete perfection than we have at
present.

And now, therefore, when we are accused of preaching up a spirit of
cultivated inaction, of provoking the earnest lovers of action, of
refusing to lend a hand at uprooting certain definite evils, of
despairing to find any lasting truth to minister to the diseased
spirit of our time, we shall not be so much confounded and
embarrassed what to answer for ourselves.  We shall say boldly that
we do not at all despair of finding some lasting truth to minister to
the diseased spirit of our time; but that we have [197] discovered
the best way of finding this to be, not so much by lending a hand to
our friends and countrymen in their actual operations for the removal
of certain definite evils, but rather in getting our friends and
countrymen to seek culture, to let their consciousness play freely
round their present operations and the stock notions on which they
are founded, show what these are like, and how related to the
intelligible law of things, and auxiliary to true human perfection.

NOTES

174. +unum necessarium or one thing needful.  Arnold refers here, and
in his subsequent chapter title, Porro Unum est Necessarium, to Luke
10:42.  Here is the context, 10:38-42.  "[Jesus] . . . entered into a
certain village: and a certain woman named Martha received him into
her house. / And she had a sister called Mary . . . . / But Martha
was cumbered about much serving, and came to him, and said, Lord,
dost thou not care that my sister hath left me to serve alone? bid
her therefore that she help me. / And Jesus answered and said unto
her, Martha, Martha, thou art careful and troubled about many things:
/ But one thing is needful: and Mary hath chosen that good part,
which shall not be taken away from her."  King James Bible.

177. +Romans 11:34.  "For who hath known the mind of the Lord? or who
hath been his counsellor?"  King James Bible.

189-90. +Romans 2:21-22.  "Thou therefore which teachest another,
teachest thou not thyself? thou that preachest a man should not
steal, dost thou steal? / Thou that sayest a man should not commit
adultery, dost thou commit adultery? thou that abhorrest idols, dost
thou commit sacrilege?"  King James Bible.



CHAPTER VI

[197] But an unpretending writer, without a philosophy based on
inter-dependent, subordinate, and coherent principles, must not
presume to indulge himself too much in generalities, but he must keep
close to the level ground of common fact, the only safe ground for
understandings without a scientific equipment.  Therefore I am bound
to take, before concluding, some of the practical operations in which
my friends and countrymen are at this moment engaged, and [198] to
make these, if I can, show the truth of what I have advanced.
Probably I could hardly give a greater proof of my confessed
inexpertness in reasoning and arguing, than by taking, for my first
example of an operation of this kind, the proceedings for the
disestablishment of the Irish Church, which we are now witnessing.
It seems so clear that this is surely one of those operations for the
uprooting of a certain definite evil in which one's Liberal friends
engage, and have a right to complain and to get impatient and to
reproach one with delicate Conservative scepticism and cultivated
inaction if one does not lend a hand to help them.  This does,
indeed, seem evident; and yet this operation comes so prominently
before us just at this moment,--it so challenges everybody's regard,-
-that one seems cowardly in blinking it.  So let us venture to try
and see whether this conspicuous operation is one of those round
which we need to let our consciousness play freely and reveal what
manner of spirit we are of in doing it; or whether it is one which by
no means admits the application of this doctrine of ours, and one to
which we ought to lend a hand immediately.

[199] Now it seems plain that the present Church establishment in
Ireland is contrary to reason and justice, in so far as the Church of
a very small minority of the people there takes for itself all the
Church property of the Irish people.  And one would think, that
property assigned for the purpose of providing for a people's
religious worship when that worship was one, the State should, when
that worship is split into several forms, apportion between those
several forms, with due regard to circumstances, taking account only
of great differences, which are likely to be lasting, and of
considerable communions, which are likely to represent profound and
widespread religious characteristics; and overlooking petty
differences, which have no serious reason for lasting, and
inconsiderable communions, which can hardly be taken to express any
broad and necessary religious lineaments of our common nature.  This
is just in accordance with that maxim about the State which we have
more than once used: The State is of the religion of all its
citizens, without the fanaticism of any of them.  Those who deny
this, either think so poorly of the State that they do not like to
see religion condescend to touch the State, or they think [200] so
poorly of religion that they do not like to see the State condescend
to touch religion; but no good statesman will easily think thus
unworthily either of the State or of religion, and our statesmen of
both parties were inclined, one may say, to follow the natural line
of the State's duty, and to make in Ireland some fair apportionment
of Church property between large and radically divided religious
communions in that country.  But then it was discovered that in Great
Britain the national mind, as it is called, is grown averse to
endowments for religion and will make no new ones; and though this in
itself looks general and solemn enough, yet there were found
political philosophers, like Mr. Baxter and Mr. Charles Buxton, to
give it a look of more generality and more solemnity still, and to
elevate, by their dexterous command of powerful and beautiful
language, this supposed edict of the British national mind into a
sort of formula for expressing a great law of religious transition
and progress for all the world.  But we, who, having no coherent
philosophy, must not let ourselves philosophise, only see that the
English and Scotch Nonconformists have a great horror of
establishments and endowments for [201] religion, which, they assert,
were forbidden by Christ when he said: "My kingdom is not of this
world;"+ and that the Nonconformists will be delighted to aid
statesmen in disestablishing any church, but will suffer none to be
established or endowed if they can help it.  Then we see that the
Nonconformists make the strength of the Liberal majority in the House
of Commons, and that, therefore, the leading Liberal statesmen, to
get the support of the Nonconformists, forsake the notion of fairly
apportioning Church property in Ireland among the chief religious
communions, declare that the national mind has decided against new
endowments, and propose simply to disestablish and disendow the
present establishment in Ireland without establishing or endowing any
other.  The actual power, in short, by virtue of which the Liberal
party in the House of Commons is now trying to disestablish the Irish
Church, is not the power of reason and justice, it is the power of
the Nonconformists' antipathy to Church establishments.  Clearly it
is this; because Liberal statesmen, relying on the power of reason
and justice to help them, proposed something quite different from
what they now propose; and they proposed [202] what they now propose,
and talked of the decision of the national mind, because they had to
rely on the English and Scotch Nonconformists.  And clearly the
Nonconformists are actuated by antipathy to establishments, not by
antipathy to the injustice and irrationality of the present
appropriation of Church property in Ireland; because Mr. Spurgeon, in
his eloquent and memorable letter, expressly avowed that he would
sooner leave things as they are in Ireland, that is, he would sooner
let the injustice and irrationality of the present appropriation
continue, than do anything to set up the Roman image, that is, than
give the Catholics their fair and reasonable share of Church
property.  Most indisputably, therefore, we may affirm that the real
moving power by which the Liberal party are now operating the
overthrow of the Irish establishment is the antipathy of the
Nonconformists to Church establishments, and not the sense of reason
or justice, except so far as reason and justice may be contained in
this antipathy.  And thus the matter stands at present.

Now surely we must all see many inconveniences in performing the
operation of uprooting this evil, [203] the Irish Church
establishment, in this particular way.  As was said about industry
and freedom and gymnastics, we shall never awaken love and gratitude
by this mode of operation; for it is pursued, not in view of reason
and justice and human perfection and all that enkindles the
enthusiasm of men, but it is pursued in view of a certain stock
notion, or fetish, of the Nonconformists, which proscribes Church
establishments.  And yet, evidently, one of the main benefits to be
got by operating on the Irish Church is to win the affections of the
Irish people.  Besides this, an operation performed in virtue of a
mechanical rule, or fetish, like the supposed decision of the English
national mind against new endowments, does not easily inspire respect
in its adversaries, and make their opposition feeble and hardly to be
persisted in, as an operation evidently done in virtue of reason and
justice might.  For reason and justice have in them something
persuasive and irresistible; but a fetish or mechanical maxim, like
this of the Nonconformists, has in it nothing at all to conciliate
either the affections or the understanding; nay, it provokes the
counter-employment of other fetishes or mechanical maxims [204] on
the opposite side, by which the confusion and hostility already
prevalent are heightened.  Only in this way can be explained the
apparition of such fetishes as are beginning to be set up on the
Conservative side against the fetish of the Nonconformists:--The
Constitution in danger!  The bulwarks of British freedom menaced!
The lamp of the Reformation put out!  No Popery!--and so on.  To
elevate these against an operation relying on reason and justice to
back it is not so easy, or so tempting to human infirmity, as to
elevate them against an operation relying on the Nonconformists'
antipathy to Church establishments to back it; for after all, No
Popery! is a rallying cry which touches the human spirit quite as
vitally as No Church establishments!--that is to say, neither the one
nor the other, in themselves, touch the human spirit vitally at all.

Ought the believers in action, then, to be so impatient with us, if
we say, that even for the sake of this operation of theirs itself and
its satisfactory accomplishment, it is more important to make our
consciousness play freely round the stock notion or habit on which
their operation relies for aid, than to [205] lend a hand to it
straight away?  Clearly they ought not; because nothing is so
effectual for operating as reason and justice, and a free play of
thought will either disengage the reason and justice lying hid in the
Nonconformist fetish, and make them effectual, or else it will help
to get this fetish out of the way, and to let statesmen go freely
where reason and justice take them.

So, suppose we take this absolute rule, this mechanical maxim of Mr.
Spurgeon and the Nonconformists, that Church establishments are bad
things because Christ said: "My kingdom is not of this world."
Suppose we try and make our consciousness bathe and float this piece
of petrifaction,--for such it now is,--and bring it within the stream
of the vital movement of our thought, and into relation with the
whole intelligible law of things.  An enemy and a disputant might
probably say that much machinery which Nonconformists themselves
employ, the Liberation Society which exists already, and the
Nonconformist Union which Mr. Spurgeon desires to see existing, come
within the scope of Christ's words as well as Church establishments.
This, however, is merely a negative and [206] contentious way of
dealing with the Nonconformist maxim; whereas what we desire is to
bring this maxim within the positive and vital movement of our
thought.  We say, therefore, that Christ's words mean that his
religion is a force of inward persuasion acting on the soul, and not
a force of outward constraint acting on the body; and if the
Nonconformist maxim against Church establishments and Church
endowments has warrant given to it from what Christ thus meant, then
their maxim is good, even though their own practice in the matter of
the Liberation Society may be at variance with it.

And here we cannot but remember what we have formerly said about
religion, Miss Cobbe, and the British College of Health in the New
Road.  In religion there are two parts, the part of thought and
speculation, and the part of worship and devotion.  Christ certainly
meant his religion, as a force of inward persuasion acting on the
soul, to employ both parts as perfectly as possible.  Now thought and
speculation is eminently an individual matter, and worship and
devotion is eminently a collective matter.  It does not help me to
think a thing more clearly that thousands of other people are
thinking [207] the same; but it does help me to worship with more
emotion that thousands of other people are worshipping with me.  The
consecration of common consent, antiquity, public establishment,
long-used rites, national edifices, is everything for religious
worship.  "Just what makes worship impressive," says Joubert, "is its
publicity, its external manifestation, its sound, its splendour, its
observance universally and visibly holding its way through all the
details both of our outward and of our inward life."  Worship,
therefore, should have in it as little as possible of what divides
us, and should be as much as possible a common and public act; as
Joubert says again: "The best prayers are those which have nothing
distinct about them, and which are thus of the nature of simple
adoration."  For, "The same devotion," as he says in another place,
"unites men far more than the same thought and knowledge."  Thought
and knowledge, as we have said before, is eminently something
individual, and of our own; the more we possess it as strictly of our
own, the more power it has on us.  Man worships best, therefore, with
the community; he philosophises best alone.  So it seems that whoever
[208] would truly give effect to Christ's declaration that his
religion is a force of inward persuasion acting on the soul, would
leave our thought on the intellectual aspects of Christianity as
individual as possible, but would make Christian worship as
collective as possible.  Worship, then, appears to be eminently a
matter for public and national establishment; for even Mr. Bright,
who, when he stands in Mr. Spurgeon's great Tabernacle is so ravished
with admiration, will hardly say that the great Tabernacle and its
worship are in themselves, as a temple and service of religion, so
impressive and affecting as the public and national Westminster
Abbey, or Notre Dame, with their worship.  And when, very soon after
the great Tabernacle, one comes plump down to the mass of private and
individual  establishments of religious worship, establishments
falling, like the British College of Health in the New Road,
conspicuously short of what a public and national establishment might
be, then one cannot but feel that Christ's command to make his
religion a force of persuasion to the soul, is, so far as one main
source of persuasion is concerned, altogether set at nought.

[209] But perhaps the Nonconformists worship so unimpressively
because they philosophise so keenly; and one part of religion, the
part of public national worship, they have subordinated to the other
part, the part of individual thought and knowledge?  This, however,
their organisation in congregations forbids us to admit.  They are
members of congregations, not isolated thinkers; and a true play of
individual thought is at least as much impeded by membership of a
small congregation as by membership of a great Church; thinking by
batches of fifties is to the full as fatal to free thought as
thinking by batches of thousands.  Accordingly, we have had occasion
already to notice that Nonconformity does not at all differ from the
Established Church by having worthier or more philosophical ideas
about God and the ordering of the world than the Established Church
has; it has very much the same ideas about these as the Established
Church has, but it differs from the Established Church in that its
worship is a much less collective and national affair.  So Mr.
Spurgeon and the Nonconformists seem to have misapprehended the true
meaning of Christ's words, My kingdom is not of this world; [210]
because, by these words, Christ meant that his religion was to work
on the soul; and of the two parts of the soul on which religion
works,--the thinking and speculative part, and the feeling and
imaginative part,--Nonconformity satisfies the first no better than
the Established Churches, which Christ by these words is supposed to
have condemned, satisfy it; and the second part it satisfies much
worse than the Established Churches.  And thus the balance of
advantage seems to rest with the Established Churches; and they seem
to have apprehended and applied Christ's words, if not with perfect
adequacy, at least less inadequately than the Nonconformists.

Might it not, then, be urged with great force that the way to do
good, in presence of this operation for uprooting the Church
establishment in Ireland by the power of the Nonconformists'
antipathy to publicly establishing or endowing religious worship, is
not by lending a hand straight away to the operation, and
Hebraising,--that is, in this case, taking an uncritical
interpretation of certain Bible words as our absolute rule of
conduct,--with the Nonconformists.  If may be very well for born
[211] Hebraisers, like Mr. Spurgeon, to Hebraise; but for Liberal
statesmen to Hebraise is surely unsafe, and to see poor old Liberal
hacks Hebraising, whose real self belongs to a kind of negative
Hellenism,--a state of moral indifferency without intellectual
ardour,--is even painful.  And when, by our Hebraising, we neither do
what the better mind of statesmen prompted them to do, nor win the
affections of the people we want to conciliate, nor yet reduce the
opposition of our adversaries but rather heighten it, surely it may
be not unreasonable to Hellenise a little, to let our thought and
consciousness play freely about our proposed operation and its
motives, dissolve these motives if they are unsound, which certainly
they have some appearance, at any rate, of being, and create in their
stead, if they are, a set of sounder and more persuasive motives
conducting to a more solid operation.  May not the man who promotes
this be giving the best help towards finding some lasting truth to
minister to the diseased spirit of his time, and does he really
deserve that the believers in action should grow impatient with him?

But now to take another operation which does [212] not at this moment
so excite people's feelings as the disestablishment of the Irish
Church, but which, I suppose, would also be called exactly one of
those operations of simple, practical, common-sense reform, aiming at
the removal of some particular abuse, and rigidly restricted to that
object, to which a Liberal ought to lend a hand, and deserves that
other Liberals should grow impatient with him if he does not.  This
operation I had the great advantage of with my own ears hearing
discussed in the House of Commons, and recommended by a powerful
speech from that famous speaker, Mr. Bright; so that the effeminate
horror which, it is alleged, I have of practical reforms of this
kind, was put to a searching test; and if it survived, it must have,
one would think, some reason or other to support it, and can hardly
quite merit the stigma of its present name.  The operation I mean was
that which the Real Estate Intestacy Bill aimed at accomplishing, and
the discussion on this bill I heard in the House of Commons.  The
bill proposed, as every one knows, to prevent the land of a man who
dies intestate from going, as it goes now, to his eldest son, and was
thought, by its friends and by its enemies, to be a [213] step
towards abating the now almost exclusive possession of the land of
this country by the people whom we call the Barbarians.  Mr. Bright,
and other speakers on his side, seemed to hold that there is a kind
of natural law or fitness of things which assigns to all a man's
children a right to equal shares in the enjoyment of his property
after his death; and that if, without depriving a man of an
Englishman's prime privilege of doing what he likes by making what
will he chooses, you provide that when he makes none his land shall
be divided among his family, then you give the sanction of the law to
the natural fitness of things, and inflict a sort of check on the
present violation of this by the Barbarians.  It occurred to me, when
I saw Mr. Bright and his friends proceeding in this way, to ask
myself a question.  If the almost exclusive possession of the land of
this country by the Barbarians is a bad thing, is this practical
operation of the Liberals, and the stock notion, on which it seems to
rest, about the right of children to share equally in the enjoyment
of their father's property after his death, the best and most
effective means of dealing with it?  Or is it best [214] dealt with
by letting one's thought and consciousness play freely and naturally
upon the Barbarians, this Liberal operation, and the stock notion at
the bottom of it, and trying to get as near as we can to the
intelligible law of things as to each of them?

Now does any one, if he simply and naturally reads his consciousness,
discover that he has any rights at all?  For my part, the deeper I go
in my own consciousness, and the more simply I abandon myself to it,
the more it seems to tell me that I have no rights at all, only
duties; and that men get this notion of rights from a process of
abstract reasoning, inferring that the obligations they are conscious
of towards others, others must be conscious of towards them, and not
from any direct witness of consciousness at all.  But it is obvious
that the notion of a right, arrived at in this way, is likely to
stand as a formal and petrified thing, deceiving and misleading us;
and that the notions got directly from our consciousness ought to be
brought to bear upon it, and to control it.  So it is unsafe and
misleading to say that our children have rights against us; what is
true and safe to say is, that we have duties towards our [215]
children.  But who will find among these natural duties, set forth to
us by our consciousness, the obligation to leave to all our children
an equal share in the enjoyment of our property? or, though
consciousness tells us we ought to provide for our children's
welfare, whose consciousness tells him that the enjoyment of property
is in itself welfare?  Whether our children's welfare is best served
by their all sharing equally in our property depends on circumstances
and on the state of the community in which we live.  With this equal
sharing, society could not, for example, have organised itself afresh
out of the chaos left by the fall of the Roman Empire, and to have an
organised society to live in is more for a child's welfare than to
have an equal share of his father's property.  So we see how little
convincing force the stock notion on which the Real Estate Intestacy
Bill was based,--the notion that in the nature and fitness of things
all a man's children have a right to an equal share in the enjoyment
of what he leaves,--really has; and how powerless, therefore, it must
of necessity be to persuade and win any one who has habits and
interests which disincline him to [216] it.  On the other hand, the
practical operation proposed relies entirely, if it is to be
effectual in altering the present practice of the Barbarians, on the
power of truth and persuasiveness in the notion which it seeks to
consecrate; for it leaves to the Barbarians full liberty to continue
their present practice, to which all their habits and interests
incline them, unless the promulgation of a notion, which we have seen
to have no vital efficacy and hold upon our consciousness, shall
hinder them.

Are we really to adorn an operation of this kind, merely because it
proposes to do something, with all the favourable epithets of simple,
practical, common-sense, definite; to enlist on its side all the zeal
of the believers in action, and to call indifference to it a really
effeminate horror of useful reforms?  It seems to me quite easy to
show that a free disinterested play of thought on the Barbarians and
their land-holding is a thousand times more really practical, a
thousand times more likely to lead to some effective result, than an
operation such as that of which we have been now speaking.  For if,
casting aside the impediments of stock notions and mechanical action,
we try to find the intelligible law [217] of things respecting a
great land-owning class such as we have in this country, does not our
consciousness readily tell us that whether the perpetuation of such a
class is for its own real welfare and for the real welfare of the
community, depends on the actual circumstances of this class and of
the community?  Does it not readily tell us that wealth, power, and
consideration are, and above all when inherited and not earned, in
themselves trying and dangerous things? as Bishop Wilson excellently
says: "Riches are almost always abused without a very extraordinary
grace."  But this extraordinary grace was in great measure supplied
by the circumstances of the feudal epoch, out of which our land-
holding class, with its rules of inheritance, sprang.  The labour and
contentions of a rude, nascent, and struggling society supplied it;
these perpetually were trying, chastising, and forming the class
whose predominance was then needed by society to give it points of
cohesion, and was not so harmful to themselves because they were thus
sharply tried and exercised.  But in a luxurious, settled, and easy
society, where wealth offers the means of enjoyment a thousand times
more, and the temptation to abuse [218] them is thus made a thousand
times greater, the exercising discipline is at the same time taken
away, and the feudal class is left exposed to the full operation of
the natural law well put by the French moralist: Pouvoir sans savoir
est fort dangereux.  And, for my part, when I regard the young people
of this class, it is above all by the trial and shipwreck made of
their own welfare by the circumstances in which they live that I am
struck; how far better it would have been for nine out of every ten
among them, if they had had their own way to make in the world, and
not been tried by a condition for which they had not the
extraordinary grace requisite!

This, I say, seems to be what a man's consciousness, simply
consulted, would tell him about the actual welfare of our Barbarians
themselves.  Then, as to their actual effect upon the welfare of the
community, how can this be salutary, if a class which, by the very
possession of wealth, power and consideration, becomes a kind of
ideal or standard for the rest of the community, is tried by ease and
pleasure more than it can well bear, and almost irresistibly carried
away from excellence and strenuous virtue?  This must certainly be
what [219] Solomon meant when he said: "As he who putteth a stone in
a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool."+  For any one can
perceive how this honouring of a false ideal, not of intelligence and
strenuous virtue, but of wealth and station, pleasure and ease, is as
a stone from a sling to kill in our great middle-class, in us who are
called Philistines, the desire before spoken of, which by nature for
ever carries all men towards that which is lovely; and to leave
instead of it only a blind deteriorating pursuit, for ourselves also,
of the false ideal.  And in those among us Philistines whom this
desire does not wholly abandon, yet, having no excellent ideal set
forth to nourish and to steady it, it meets with that natural bent
for the bathos which together with this desire itself is implanted at
birth in the breast of man, and is by that force twisted awry, and
borne at random hither and thither, and at last flung upon those
grotesque and hideous forms of popular religion which the more
respectable part among us Philistines mistake for the true goal of
man's desire after all that is lovely.  And for the Populace this
false idea is a stone which kills the desire before it can even
arise; so impossible and unattainable for [220] them do the
conditions of that which is lovely appear according to this ideal to
be made, so necessary to the reaching of them by the few seems the
falling short of them by the many.  So that, perhaps, of the actual
vulgarity of our Philistines and brutality of our Populace, the
Barbarians and their feudal habits of succession, enduring out of
their due time and place, are involuntarily the cause in a great
degree; and they hurt the welfare of the rest of the community at the
same time that, as we have seen, they hurt their own.

But must not, now, the working in our minds of considerations like
these, to which culture, that is, the disinterested and active use of
reading, reflection, and observation, carries us, be really much more
effectual to the dissolution of feudal habits and rules of succession
in land than an operation like the Real Estate Intestacy Bill, and a
stock notion like that of the natural right of all a man's children
to an equal share in the enjoyment of his property; since we have
seen that this mechanical maxim is unsound, and that, if it is
unsound, the operation relying upon it cannot possibly be effective?
If truth and reason have, as we believe, any natural irresistible
effect on [221] the mind of man, it must.  These considerations, when
culture has called them forth and given them free course in our
minds, will live and work.  They will work gradually, no doubt, and
will not bring us ourselves to the front to sit in high place and put
them into effect; but so they will be all the more beneficial.
Everything teaches us how gradually nature would have all profound
changes brought about; and we can even see, too, where the absolute
abrupt stoppage of feudal habits has worked harm.  And appealing to
the sense of truth and reason, these considerations will, without
doubt, touch and move all those of even the Barbarians themselves,
who are (as are some of us Philistines also, and some of the
Populace) beyond their fellows quick of feeling for truth and reason.
For indeed this is just one of the advantages of sweetness and light
over fire and strength, that sweetness and light make a feudal class
quietly and gradually drop its feudal habits because it sees them at
variance with truth and reason, while fire and strength tear them
passionately off it because it applauded Mr. Lowe when he called, or
was supposed to call, the working-class drunken and venal.

[222] But when once we have begun to recount the practical operations
by which our Liberal friends work for the removal of definite evils,
and in which if we do not join them they are apt to grow impatient
with us, how can we pass over that very interesting operation of this
kind,--the attempt to enable a man to marry his deceased wife's
sister?  This operation, too, like that for abating the feudal
customs of succession in land, I have had the advantage of myself
seeing and hearing my Liberal friends labour at.  I was lucky enough
to be present when Mr. Chambers, I think, brought forward in the
House of Commons his bill for enabling a man to marry his deceased
wife's sister, and I heard the speech which Mr. Chambers then made in
support of his bill.  His first point was that God's law,--the name
he always gave to the Book of Leviticus,--did not really forbid a man
to marry his deceased wife's sister.  God's law not forbidding it,
the Liberal maxim that a man's prime right and happiness is to do as
he likes ought at once to come into force, and to annul any such
check upon the assertion of personal liberty as the prohibition to
marry one's deceased wife's sister.  A distinguished Liberal
supporter of Mr. Chambers, in [223] the debate which followed the
introduction of the bill, produced a formula of much beauty and
neatness for conveying in brief the Liberal notions on this head:
"Liberty," said he, "is the law of human life."  And, therefore, the
moment it is ascertained that God's law, the Book of Leviticus, does
not stop the way, man's law, the law of liberty, asserts its right,
and makes us free to marry our deceased wife's sister.

And this exactly falls in with what Mr. Hepworth Dixon, who may
almost be called the Colenso of love and marriage,--such a revolution
does he make in our ideas on these matters, just as Dr. Colenso does
in our ideas on religion,--tells us of the notions and proceedings of
our kinsmen in America.  With that affinity of genius to the Hebrew
genius which we have already noticed, and with the strong belief of
our race that liberty is the law of human life, so far as a fixed,
perfect, and paramount rule of conscience, the Bible, does not
expressly control it, our American kinsmen go again, Mr. Hepworth
Dixon tells us, to their Bible, the Mormons to the patriarchs and the
Old Testament, Brother Noyes to St. Paul and the New, and having
never before read anything else but [224] their Bible, they now read
their Bible over again, and make all manner of great discoveries
there.  All these discoveries are favourable to liberty, and in this
way is satisfied that double craving so characteristic of the
Philistine, and so eminently exemplified in that crowned Philistine,
Henry the Eighth,--the craving for forbidden fruit and the craving
for legality.  Mr. Hepworth Dixon's eloquent writings give currency,
over here, to these important discoveries; so that now, as regards
love and marriage, we seem to be entering, with all our sails spread,
upon what Mr. Hepworth Dixon, its apostle and evangelist, calls a
Gothic Revival, but what one of the many newspapers that so greatly
admire Mr. Hepworth Dixon's lithe and sinewy style and form their own
style upon it, calls, by a yet bolder and more striking figure, "a
great sexual insurrection of our Anglo-Teutonic race."  For this end
we have to avert our eyes from everything Hellenic and fanciful, and
to keep them steadily fixed upon the two cardinal points of the Bible
and liberty.  And one of those practical operations in which the
Liberal party engage, and in which we are summoned to join them,
directs itself entirely, as we have seen, to these cardinal points,
[225] and may almost be regarded, perhaps, as a kind of first
instalment or public and parliamentary pledge of the great sexual
insurrection of our Anglo-Teutonic race.

But here, as elsewhere, what we seek is the Philistine's perfection,
the development of his best self, not mere liberty for his ordinary
self.  And we no more allow absolute validity to his stock maxim,
Liberty is the law of human life, than we allow it to the opposite
maxim, which is just as true, Renouncement is the law of human life.
For we know that the only perfect freedom is, as our religion says, a
service; not a service to any stock maxim, but an elevation of our
best self, and a harmonising in subordination to this, and to the
idea of a perfected humanity, all the multitudinous, turbulent, and
blind impulses of our ordinary selves.  Now, the Philistine's great
defect being a defect in delicacy of perception, to cultivate in him
this delicacy, to render it independent of external and mechanical
rule, and a law to itself, is what seems to make most for his
perfection, his true humanity.  And his true humanity, and therefore
his happiness, appears to lie much more, so far as the relations of
love and [226] marriage are concerned, in becoming alive to the finer
shades of feeling which arise within these relations, in being able
to enter with tact and sympathy into the subtle instinctive
propensions and repugnances of the person with whose life his own
life is bound up, to make them his own, to direct and govern, in
harmony with them, the arbitrary range of his personal action, and
thus to enlarge his spiritual and intellectual life and liberty, than
in remaining insensible to these finer shades of feeling, this
delicate sympathy, in giving unchecked range, so far as he can, to
his mere personal action, in allowing no limits or government to this
except such as a mechanical external law imposes, and in thus really
narrowing, for the satisfaction of his ordinary self, his spiritual
and intellectual life and liberty.

Still more must this be so when his fixed eternal rule, his God's
law, is supplied to him from a source which is less fit, perhaps, to
supply final and absolute instructions on this particular topic of
love and marriage than on any other relation of human life.  Bishop
Wilson, who is full of examples of that fruitful Hellenising within
the limits of Hebraism itself, of that renewing of the [227] stiff
and stark notions of Hebraism by turning upon them a stream of fresh
thought and consciousness, which we have already noticed in St.
Paul,--Bishop Wilson gives an admirable lesson to rigid Hebraisers,
like Mr. Chambers, asking themselves: Does God's law (that is, the
Book of Leviticus) forbid us to marry our wife's sister?--Does God's
law (that is, again, the Book of Leviticus) allow us to marry our
wife's sister?--when he says: "Christian duties are founded on
reason, not on the sovereign authority of God commanding what he
pleases; God cannot command us what is not fit to be believed or
done, all his commands being founded in the necessities of our
nature."  And, immense as is our debt to the Hebrew race and its
genius, incomparable as is its authority on certain profoundly
important sides of our human nature, worthy as it is to be described
as having uttered, for those sides, the voice of the deepest
necessities of our nature, the statutes of the divine and eternal
order of things, the law of God,--who, that is not manacled and
hoodwinked by his Hebraism, can believe that, as to love and
marriage, our reason and the necessities of our humanity have their
true, [228] sufficient, and divine law expressed for them by the
voice of any Oriental and polygamous nation like the Hebrews?  Who, I
say, will believe, when he really considers the matter, that where
the feminine nature, the feminine ideal, and our relations to them,
are brought into question, the delicate and apprehensive genius of
the Indo-European race, the race which invented the Muses, and
chivalry, and the Madonna, is to find its last word on this question
in the institutions of a Semitic people, whose wisest king had seven
hundred wives and three hundred concubines?

If here again, therefore, we seem to minister better to the diseased
spirit of our time by leading it to think about the operation our
Liberal friends have in hand, than by lending a hand to this
operation ourselves, let us see, before we dismiss from our view the
practical operations of our Liberal friends, whether the same thing
does not hold good as to their celebrated industrial and economical
labours also.  Their great work of this kind is, of course, their
free-trade policy.  This policy, as having enabled the poor man to
eat untaxed bread, and as having wonderfully augmented trade, we
[229] are accustomed to speak of with a kind of solemnity; it is
chiefly on their having been our leaders in this policy that Mr.
Bright founds for himself and his friends the claim, so often
asserted by him, to be considered guides of the blind, teachers of
the ignorant, benefactors slowly and laboriously developing in the
Conservative party and in the country that which Mr. Bright is fond
of calling the growth of intelligence,--the object, as is well known,
of all the friends of culture also, and the great end and aim of the
culture that we preach.  Now, having first saluted free-trade and its
doctors with all respect, let us see whether even here, too, our
Liberal friends do not pursue their operations in a mechanical way,
without reference to any firm intelligible law of things, to human
life as a whole, and human happiness; and whether it is not more for
our good, at this particular moment at any rate, if, instead of
worshipping free-trade with them Hebraistically, as a kind of fetish,
and helping them to pursue it as an end in and for itself, we turn
the free stream of our thought upon their treatment of it, and see
how this is related to the intelligible law of human life, and to
national well- [230] being and happiness.  In short, suppose we
Hellenise a little with free-trade, as we Hellenised with the Real
Estate Intestacy Bill, and with the disestablishment of the Irish
Church by the power of the Nonconformists' antipathy to religious
establishments and endowments, and see whether what our reprovers
beautifully call ministering to the diseased spirit of our time is
best done by the Hellenising method of proceeding, or by the other.

But first let us understand how the policy of free-trade really
shapes itself for our Liberal friends, and how they practically
employ it as an instrument of national happiness and salvation.  For
as we said that it seemed clearly right to prevent the Church
property of Ireland from being all taken for the benefit of the
Church of a small minority, so it seems clearly right that the poor
man should eat untaxed bread, and, generally, that restrictions and
regulations which, for the supposed benefit of some particular person
or class of persons, make the price of things artificially high here,
or artificially low there, and interfere with the natural flow of
trade and commerce, should be done away with.  But in the policy of
our Liberal friends free-trade [231] means more than this, and is
specially valued as a stimulant to the production of wealth, as they
call it, and to the increase of the trade, business, and population
of the country.  We have already seen how these things,--trade,
business, and population,--are mechanically pursued by us as ends
precious in themselves, and are worshipped as what we call fetishes;
and Mr. Bright, I have already said, when he wishes to give the
working-class a true sense of what makes glory and greatness, tells
it to look at the cities it has built, the railroads it has made, the
manufactures it has produced.  So to this idea of glory and greatness
the free-trade which our Liberal friends extol so solemnly and
devoutly has served,--to the increase of trade, business, and
population; and for this it is prized.  Therefore, the untaxing of
the poor man's bread has, with this view of national happiness, been
used, not so much to make the existing poor man's bread cheaper or
more abundant, but rather to create more poor men to eat it; so that
we cannot precisely say that we have fewer poor men than we had
before free-trade, but we can say with truth that we have many more
centres of industry, as they are called, and much [232] more
business, population, and manufactures.  And if we are sometimes a
little troubled by our multitude of poor men, yet we know the
increase of manufactures and population to be such a salutary thing
in itself, and our free-trade policy begets such an admirable
movement, creating fresh centres of industry and fresh poor men here,
while we were thinking about our poor men there, that we are quite
dazzled and borne away, and more and more industrial movement is
called for, and our social progress seems to become one triumphant
and enjoyable course of what is sometimes called, vulgarly,
outrunning the constable.

If, however, taking some other criterion of man's well-being than the
cities he has built and the manufactures he has produced, we persist
in thinking that our social progress would be happier if there were
not so many of us so very poor, and in busying ourselves with notions
of in some way or other adjusting the poor man and business one to
the other, and not multiplying the one and the other mechanically and
blindly, then our Liberal friends, the appointed doctors of free-
trade, take us up very sharply.  "Art is long," says The Times, "and
life [233] is short; for the most part we settle things first and
understand them afterwards.  Let us have as few theories as possible;
what is wanted is not the light of speculation.  If nothing worked
well of which the theory was not perfectly understood, we should be
in sad confusion.  The relations of labour and capital, we are told,
are not understood, yet trade and commerce, on the whole, work
satisfactorily."  I quote from The Times of only the other day.  But
thoughts like these, as I have often pointed out, are thoroughly
British thoughts, and we have been familiar with them for years.

Or, if we want more of a philosophy of the matter than this, our
free-trade friends have two axioms for us, axioms laid down by their
justly esteemed doctors, which they think ought to satisfy us
entirely.  One is, that, other things being equal, the more
population increases, the more does production increase to keep pace
with it; because men by their numbers and contact call forth all
manner of activities and resources in one another and in nature,
which, when men are few and sparse, are never developed.  The other
is, that, although population always tends to equal the means of
[234] subsistence, yet people's notions of what subsistence is
enlarge as civilisation advances, and take in a number of things
beyond the bare necessaries of life; and thus, therefore, is supplied
whatever check on population is needed.  But the error of our friends
is just, perhaps, that they apply axioms of this sort as if they were
self-acting laws which will put themselves into operation without
trouble or planning on our part, if we will only pursue free-trade,
business, and population zealously and staunchly.  Whereas the real
truth is, that, however the case might be under other circumstances,
yet in fact, as we now manage the matter, the enlarged conception of
what is included in subsistence does not operate to prevent the
bringing into the world of numbers of people who but just attain to
the barest necessaries of life or who even fail to attain to them;
while, again, though production may increase as population increases,
yet it seems that the production may be of such a kind, and so
related, or rather non-related, to population, that the population
may be little the better for it.  For instance, with the increase of
population since Queen Elizabeth's time the production of silk-
stockings has wonderfully increased, and silk- [235] stockings have
become much cheaper and procurable in much greater abundance by many
more people, and tend perhaps, as population and manufactures
increase, to get cheaper and cheaper, and at last to become,
according to Bastiat's favourite image, a common free property of the
human race, like light and air.  But bread and bacon have not become
much cheaper with the increase of population since Queen Elizabeth's
time, nor procurable in much greater abundance by many more people;
neither do they seem at all to promise to become, like light and air,
a common free property of the human race.  And if bread and bacon
have not kept pace with our population, and we have many more people
in want of them now than in Queen Elizabeth's time, it seems vain to
tell us that silk-stockings have kept pace with our population, or
even more than kept pace with it, and that we are to get our comfort
out of that.  In short, it turns out that our pursuit of free-trade,
as of so many other things, has been too mechanical.  We fix upon
some object, which in this case is the production of wealth, and the
increase of manufactures, population, and commerce through free-
[236] trade, as a kind of one thing needful, or end in itself, and
then we pursue it staunchly and mechanically, and say that it is our
duty to pursue it staunchly and mechanically, not to see how it is
related to the whole intelligible law of things and to full human
perfection, or to treat it as the piece of machinery, of varying
value as its relations to the intelligible law of things vary, which
it really is.

So it is of no use to say to The Times, and to our Liberal friends
rejoicing in the possession of their talisman of free-trade, that
about one in nineteen of our population is a pauper, and that, this
being so, trade and commerce can hardly be said to prove by their
satisfactory working that it matters nothing whether the relations
between labour and capital are understood or not; nay, that we can
hardly be said not to be in sad confusion.  For here comes in our
faith in the staunch mechanical pursuit of a fixed object, and covers
itself with that imposing and colossal necessitarianism of The Times
which we have before noticed.  And this necessitarianism, taking for
granted that an increase in trade and population is a good in itself,
one of the chiefest of goods, tells us that disturbances of [237]
human happiness caused by ebbs and flows in the tide of trade and
business, which, on the whole, steadily mounts, are inevitable and
not to be quarrelled with.  This firm philosophy I seek to call to
mind when I am in the East of London, whither my avocations often
lead me; and, indeed, to fortify myself against the depressing sights
which on these occasions assail us, I have transcribed from The Times
one strain of this kind, full of the finest economical doctrine, and
always carry it about with me.  The passage is this:--

"The East End is the most commercial, the most industrial, the most
fluctuating region of the metropolis.  It is always the first to
suffer; for it is the creature of prosperity, and falls to the ground
the instant there is no wind to bear it up.  The whole of that region
is covered with huge docks, shipyards, manufactories, and a
wilderness of small houses, all full of life and happiness in brisk
times, but in dull times withered and lifeless, like the deserts we
read of in the East.  Now their brief spring is over.  There is no
one to blame for this; it is the result of Nature's simplest laws!"
We must all agree that it is impossible that [238] anything can be
firmer than this, or show a surer faith in the working of free-trade,
as our Liberal friends understand and employ it.

But, if we still at all doubt whether the indefinite multiplication
of manufactories and small houses can be such an absolute good in
itself as to counterbalance the indefinite multiplication of poor
people, we shall learn that this multiplication of poor people, too,
is an absolute good in itself, and the result of divine and beautiful
laws.  This is indeed a favourite thesis with our Philistine friends,
and I have already noticed the pride and gratitude with which they
receive certain articles in The Times, dilating in thankful and
solemn language on the majestic growth of our population.  But I
prefer to quote now, on this topic, the words of an ingenious young
Scotch writer, Mr. Robert Buchanan, because he invests with so much
imagination and poetry this current idea of the blessed and even
divine character which the multiplying of population is supposed in
itself to have.  "We move to multiplicity," says Mr. Robert Buchanan.
"If there is one quality which seems God's, and his exclusively, it
seems that divine philoprogenitiveness, [239] that passionate love of
distribution and expansion into living forms.  Every animal added
seems a new ecstasy to the Maker; every life added, a new embodiment
of his love.  He would swarm the earth with beings.  There are never
enough.  Life, life, life,--faces gleaming, hearts beating, must fill
every cranny.  Not a corner is suffered to remain empty.  The whole
earth breeds, and God glories."

It is a little unjust, perhaps, to attribute to the Divinity
exclusively this philoprogenitiveness, which the British Philistine,
and the poorer class of Irish, may certainly claim to share with him;
yet how inspiriting is here the whole strain of thought! and these
beautiful words, too, I carry about with me in the East of London,
and often read them there.  They are quite in agreement with the
popular language one is accustomed to hear about children and large
families, which describes children as sent.  And a line of poetry
which Mr. Robert Buchanan throws in presently after the poetical
prose I have quoted:--

     'Tis the old story of the fig-leaf time--

this fine line, too, naturally connects itself, when one is in the
East of London, with the idea of God's [240] desire to swarm the
earth with beings; because the swarming of the earth with beings does
indeed, in the East of London, so seem to revive

     . . . the old story of the fig-leaf time--

such a number of the people one meets there having hardly a rag to
cover them; and the more the swarming goes on, the more it promises
to revive this old story.  And when the story is perfectly revived,
the swarming quite completed, and every cranny choke-full, then, too,
no doubt, the faces in the East of London will be gleaming faces,
which Mr. Robert Buchanan says it is God's desire they should be, and
which every one must perceive they are not at present, but, on the
contrary, very miserable.

But to prevent all this philosophy and poetry from quite running away
with us, and making us think with The Times, and our practical
Liberal free-traders, and the British Philistines generally, that the
increase of small houses and manufactories, or the increase of
population, are absolute goods in themselves, to be mechanically
pursued, and to be worshipped like fetishes,--to prevent this, we
have got that notion of ours immoveably fixed, of which I [241] have
long ago spoken, the notion that culture, or the study of perfection,
leads us to conceive of no perfection as being real which is not a
general  perfection, embracing all our fellow-men with whom we have
to do.  Such is the sympathy which binds humanity together, that we
are indeed, as our religion says, members of one body, and if one
member suffer, all the members suffer with it; individual perfection
is impossible so long as the rest of mankind are not perfected along
with us.  "The multitude of the wise is the welfare of the world,"
says the wise man.  And to this effect that excellent and often
quoted guide of ours, Bishop Wilson, has some striking words:--"It is
not," says he, "so much our neighbour's interest as our own that we
love him."  And again he says: "Our salvation does in some measure
depend upon that of others."  And the author of the Imitation puts
the same thing admirably when he says:--"Obscurior etiam via ad
coelum videbatur quando tam pauci regnum coelorum quaerere
curabant,"+--the fewer there are who follow the way to perfection,
the harder that way is to find.  So all our fellow-men, in the East
of London and elsewhere, we must take along with us in the progress
towards perfection, [242] if we ourselves really, as we profess, want
to be perfect; and we must not let the worship of any fetish, any
machinery, such as manufactures or population,--which are not, like
perfection, absolute goods in themselves, though we think them so,--
create for us such a multitude of miserable, sunken, and ignorant
human beings, that to carry them all along with us is impossible, and
perforce they must for the most part be left by us in their
degradation and wretchedness.  But evidently the conception of free-
trade, on which our Liberal friends vaunt themselves, and in which
they think they have found the secret of national prosperity,--
evidently, I say, the mere unfettered pursuit of the production of
wealth, and the mere mechanical multiplying, for this end, of
manufactures and population, threatens to create for us, if it has
not created already, those vast, miserable, unmanageable masses of
sunken people,--one pauper, at the present moment, for every nineteen
of us,--to the existence of which we are, as we have seen, absolutely
forbidden to reconcile ourselves, in spite of all that the philosophy
of The Times and the poetry of Mr. Robert Buchanan may say to
persuade us.

[243] And though Hebraism, following its best and highest instinct,--
identical, as we have seen, with that of Hellenism in its final aim,
the aim of perfection,--teaches us this very clearly; and though from
Hebraising counsellors,--the Bible, Bishop Wilson, the author of the
Imitation,--I have preferred (as well I may, for from this rock of
Hebraism we are all hewn!) to draw the texts which we use to bring
home to our minds this teaching; yet Hebraism seems powerless, almost
as powerless as our free-trading Liberal friends, to deal
efficaciously with our ever-accumulating masses of pauperism, and to
prevent their accumulating still more.  Hebraism builds churches,
indeed, for these masses, and sends missionaries among them; above
all, it sets itself against the social necessitarianism of The Times,
and refuses to accept their degradation as inevitable; but with
regard to their ever-increasing accumulation, it seems to be led to
the very same conclusions, though from a point of view of its own, as
our free-trading Liberal friends.  Hebraism, with that mechanical and
misleading use of the letter of Scripture on which we have already
commented, is governed by such texts as: Be fruitful and multiply,+
the edict of [244] God's law, as Mr. Chambers would say; or by the
declaration of what he would call God's words in the Psalms, that the
man who has a great number of children is thereby made happy.  And in
conjunction with such texts as these it is apt to place another text:
The poor shall never cease out of the land.+  Thus Hebraism is
conducted to nearly the same notion as the popular mind and as Mr.
Robert Buchanan, that children are sent, and that the divine nature
takes a delight in swarming the East End of London with paupers.
Only, when they are perishing in their helplessness and wretchedness,
it asserts the Christian duty of succouring them, instead of saying,
like The Times: "Now their brief spring is over; there is nobody to
blame for this; it is the result of Nature's simplest laws!"  But,
like The Times, Hebraism despairs of any help from knowledge and says
that "what is wanted is not the light of speculation."  I remember,
only the other day, a good man, looking with me upon a multitude of
children who were gathered before us in one of the most miserable
regions of London,--children eaten up with disease, half-sized, half-
fed, half-clothed, neglected by their parents, without health,
without [245] home, without hope,--said to me: "The one thing really
needful is to teach these little ones to succour one another, if only
with a cup of cold water; but now, from one end of the country to the
other, one hears nothing but the cry for knowledge, knowledge,
knowledge!"  And yet surely, so long as these children are there in
these festering masses, without health, without home, without hope,
and so long as their multitude is perpetually swelling, charged with
misery they must still be for themselves, charged with misery they
must still be for us, whether they help one another with a cup of
cold water or no; and the knowledge how to prevent their accumulating
is necessary, even to give their moral life and growth a fair chance!

May we not, therefore, say, that neither the true Hebraism of this
good man, willing to spend and be spent for these sunken multitudes,
nor what I may call the spurious Hebraism of our free-trading Liberal
friends,--mechanically worshipping their fetish of the production of
wealth and of the increase of manufactures and population, and
looking neither to the right nor left so long as this increase goes
on,--avail us much here; and that here, again, what we [246] want is
Hellenism, the letting our consciousness play freely and simply upon
the facts before us, and listening to what it tells us of the
intelligible law of things as concerns them?  And surely what it
tells us is, that a man's children are not really sent, any more than
the pictures upon his wall, or the horses in his stable, are sent;
and that to bring people into the world, when one cannot afford to
keep them and oneself decently and not too precariously, or to bring
more of them into the world than one can afford to keep thus, is,
whatever The Times and Mr. Robert Buchanan may say, by no means an
accomplishment of the divine will or a fulfilment of Nature's
simplest laws, but is just as wrong, just as contrary to reason and
the will of God, as for a man to have horses, or carriages, or
pictures, when he cannot afford them, or to have more of them than he
can afford; and that, in the one case as in the other, the larger the
scale on which the violation of reason's laws is practised, and the
longer it is persisted in, the greater must be the confusion and
final trouble.  Surely no laudations of free-trade, no meetings of
bishops and clergy in the East End of London, no reading of papers
and reports, can tell [247] us anything about our social condition
which it more concerns us to know than that! and not only to know,
but habitually to have the knowledge present, and to act upon it as
one acts upon the knowledge that water wets and fire burns!  And not
only the sunken populace of our great cities are concerned to know
it, and the pauper twentieth of our population; we Philistines of the
middle-class, too, are concerned to know it, and all who have to set
themselves to make progress in perfection.

But we all know it already! some one will say; it is the simplest law
of prudence.  But how little reality must there be in our knowledge
of it; how little can we be putting it in practice; how little is it
likely to penetrate among the poor and struggling masses of our
population, and to better our condition, so long as an unintelligent
Hebraism of one sort keeps repeating as an absolute eternal word of
God the psalm-verse which says that the man who has a great many
children is happy; or an unintelligent Hebraism of another sort keeps
assigning as an absolute proof of national prosperity the multiplying
of manufactures and population!  Surely, the one set of Hebraisers
have [248] to learn that their psalm-verse was composed at the
resettlement of Jerusalem after the Captivity, when the Jews of
Jerusalem were a handful, an undermanned garrison, and every child
was a blessing; and that the word of God, or the voice of the divine
order of things, declares the possession of a great many children to
be a blessing only when it really is so!  And the other set of
Hebraisers, have they not to learn that if they call their private
acquaintances imprudent and unlucky, when, with no means of support
for them or with precarious means, they have a large family of
children, then they ought not to call the State well managed and
prosperous merely because its manufactures and its citizens multiply,
if the manufactures, which bring new citizens into existence just as
much as if they had actually begotten them, bring more of them into
existence than they can maintain, or are too precarious to go on
maintaining those whom for a while they maintained?  Hellenism,
surely, or the habit of fixing our mind upon the intelligible law of
things, is most salutary if it makes us see that the only absolute
good, the only absolute and eternal object prescribed to us by God's
law, or the divine order of [249] things, is the progress towards
perfection,--our own progress towards it and the progress of
humanity.  And therefore, for every individual man, and for every
society of men, the possession and multiplication of children, like
the possession and multiplication of horses and pictures, is to be
accounted good or bad, not in itself, but with reference to this
object and the progress towards it.  And as no man is to be excused
in having horses or pictures, if his having them hinders his own or
others' progress towards perfection and makes them lead a servile and
ignoble life, so is no man to be excused for having children if his
having them makes him or others lead this.  Plain thoughts of this
kind are surely the spontaneous product of our consciousness, when it
is allowed to play freely and disinterestedly upon the actual facts
of our social condition, and upon our stock notions and stock habits
in respect to it.  Firmly grasped and simply uttered, they are more
likely, one cannot but think, to better that condition, and to
diminish our formidable rate of one pauper to every nineteen of us,
than is the Hebraising and mechanical pursuit of free-trade by our
Liberal friends.

So that, here as elsewhere, the practical operations [250] of our
Liberal friends, by which they set so much store, and in which they
invite us to join them and to show what Mr. Bright calls a
commendable interest, do not seem to us so practical for real good as
they think; and our Liberal friends seem to us themselves to need to
Hellenise, as we say, a little,--that is, to examine into the nature
of real good, and to listen to what their consciousness tells them
about it,--rather than to pursue with such heat and confidence their
present practical operations.  And it is clear that they have no just
cause, so far as regards several operations of theirs which we have
canvassed, to reproach us with delicate Conservative scepticism; for
often by Hellenising we seem to subvert stock Conservative notions
and usages more effectually than they subvert them by Hebraising.
But, in truth, the free spontaneous play of consciousness with which
culture tries to float our stock habits of thinking and acting, is by
its very nature, as has been said, disinterested.  Sometimes the
result of floating them may be agreeable to this party, sometimes to
that; now it may be unwelcome to our so-called Liberals, now to our
so-called Conservatives; but what culture seeks is, above all, to
float them, to [251] prevent their being stiff and stark pieces of
petrifaction any longer.  It is mere Hebraising, if we stop short,
and refuse to let our consciousness play freely, whenever we or our
friends do not happen to like what it discovers to us.  This is to
make the Liberal party, or the Conservative party, our one thing
needful, instead of human perfection; and we have seen what mischief
arises from making an even greater thing than the Liberal or the
Conservative party,--the predominance of the moral side in man,--our
one thing needful.  But wherever the free play of our consciousness
leads us, we shall follow; believing that in this way we shall tend
to make good at all points what is wanting to us, and so shall be
brought nearer to our complete human perfection.

Thus we may often, perhaps, praise much that a so-called Liberal
thinks himself forbidden to praise, and yet blame much that a so-
called Conservative thinks himself forbidden to blame, because these
are both of them partisans, and no partisan can afford to be thus
disinterested.  But we who are not partisans can afford it; and so,
after we have seen what Nonconformists lose by being locked up in
their New Road forms of religious institution, [252] we can let
ourselves see, on the other hand, how their ministers, in a time of
movement of ideas like our present time, are apt to be more exempt
than the ministers of a great Church establishment from that self-
confidence, and sense of superiority to such a movement, which are
natural to a powerful hierarchy; and which in Archdeacon Denison, for
instance, seem almost carried to such a pitch that they may become,
one cannot but fear, his spiritual ruin.  But seeing this does not
dispose us, therefore, to lock up all the nation in forms of worship
of the New Road type; but it points us to the quite new ideal, of
combining grand and national forms of worship with an openness and
movement of mind not yet found in any hierarchy.  So, again, if we
see what is called ritualism making conquests in our Puritan middle-
class, we may rejoice that portions of this class should have become
alive to the aesthetical weakness of their position, even although
they have not yet become alive to the intellectual weakness of it.
In Puritanism, on the other hand, we can respect that idea of dealing
sincerely with oneself, which is at once the great force of
Puritanism,--Puritanism's great superiority over all products, like
ritualism, of our Catholicising [253] tendencies,--and also an idea
rich in the latent seeds of intellectual promise.  But we do this,
without on that account hiding from ourselves that Puritanism has by
Hebraising misapplied that idea, has as yet developed none or hardly
one of those seeds, and that its triumph at its present stage of
development would be baneful.

Everything, in short, confirms us in the doctrine, so unpalatable to
the believers in action, that our main business at the present moment
is not so much to work away at certain crude reforms of which we have
already the scheme in our own mind, as to create, through the help of
that culture which at the very outset we began by praising and
recommending, a frame of mind out of which really fruitful reforms
may with time grow.  At any rate, we ourselves must put up with our
friends' impatience, and with their reproaches against cultivated
inaction, and must still decline to lend a hand to their practical
operations, until we, for our own part at least, have grown a little
clearer about the nature of real good, and have arrived nearer to a
condition of mind out of which really fruitful and solid operations
may spring.

In the meanwhile, since our Liberal friends keep [254] loudly and
resolutely assuring us that their actual operations at present are
fruitful and solid, let us in each case keep testing these operations
in the simple way we have indicated, by letting the natural stream of
our consciousness flow over them freely; and if they stand this test
successfully, then let us give them our commendable interest, but not
else.  For example.  Our Liberal friends assure us, at the very top
of their voices, that their present actual operation for the
disestablishment of the Irish Church is fruitful and solid.  But what
if, on testing it, the truth appears to be, that the statesmen and
reasonable people of both parties wished for much the same thing,--
the fair apportionment of the church property of Ireland among the
principal religious bodies there; but that, behind the statesmen and
reasonable people, there was, on one side, a mass of Tory prejudice,
and, on the other, a mass of Nonconformist prejudice, to which such
an arrangement was unpalatable?  Well, the natural way, one thinks,
would have been for the statesmen and reasonable people of both sides
to have united, and to have allayed and dissipated, so far as they
could, the resistance of their respective extremes, and where [255]
they could not, to have confronted it in concert.  But we see that,
instead of this, Liberal statesmen waited to trip up their rivals, if
they proposed the arrangement which both knew to be reasonable, by
means of the prejudice of their own Nonconformist extreme; and then,
themselves proposing an arrangement to flatter this prejudice, made
the other arrangement, which they themselves knew to be reasonable,
out of the question; and drove their rivals in their turn to blow up
with all their might, in the hope of baffling them, a great fire,
among their own Tory extreme, of fierce prejudice and religious
bigotry,--a fire which, once kindled, may always very easily spread
further?  If, I say, on testing the present operation of our Liberal
friends for the disestablishment of the Irish Church, the truth about
it appears to be very much this, then, I think,--even with a
triumphant Liberal majority, and with our Liberal friends making
impassioned appeals to us to take a commendable interest in their
operation and them, and to rally round what Sir Henry Hoare (who may
be described, perhaps, as a Barbarian converted to Philistinism, as
I, on the other hand, seem to be a Philistine converted to culture)
finely calls the conscientiousness of a [256] Gladstone and the
intellect of a Bright,--it is rather our duty to abstain, and,
instead of lending a hand to the operation of our Liberal friends, to
do what we can to abate and dissolve the mass of prejudice, Tory or
Nonconformist, which makes so doubtfully begotten and equivocal an
operation as the present, producible and possible.

And so we bring to an end what we had to say in praise of culture,
and in evidence of its special utility for the circumstances in which
we find ourselves, and the confusion which environs us.  Through
culture seems to lie our way, not only to perfection, but even to
safety.  Resolutely refusing to lend a hand to the imperfect
operations of our Liberal friends, disregarding their impatience,
taunts, and reproaches, firmly bent on trying to find in the
intelligible law of things a firmer and sounder basis for future
practice than any which we have at present, and believing this search
and discovery to be, for our generation and circumstances, of yet
more vital and pressing importance than practice itself, we
nevertheless may do [257] more, perhaps, we poor disparaged followers
of culture, to make the actual present, and the frame of society in
which we live, solid and seaworthy, than all which our bustling
politicians can do.  For we have seen how much of our disorders and
perplexities is due to the disbelief, among the classes and
combinations of men, Barbarian or Philistine, which have hitherto
governed our society, in right reason, in a paramount best self; to
the inevitable decay and break-up of the organisations by which,
asserting and expressing in these organisations their ordinary self
only, they have so long ruled us; and to their irresolution, when the
society, which their conscience tells them they have made and still
manage not with right reason but with their ordinary self, is rudely
shaken, in offering resistance to its subverters.  But for us,--who
believe in right reason, in the duty and possibility of extricating
and elevating our best self, in the progress of humanity towards
perfection,--for us the framework of society, that theatre on which
this august drama has to unroll itself, is sacred; and whoever
administers it, and however we may seek to remove them from the
tenure of administration, yet, while they administer, [258] we
steadily and with undivided heart support them in repressing anarchy
and disorder; because without order there can be no society, and
without society there can be no human perfection.

With me, indeed, this rule of conduct is hereditary.  I remember my
father, in one of his unpublished letters written more than forty
years ago, when the political and social state of the country was
gloomy and troubled, and there were riots in many places, goes on,
after strongly insisting on the badness and foolishness of the
government, and on the harm and dangerousness of our feudal and
aristocratical constitution of society, and ends thus: "As for
rioting, the old Roman way of dealing with that is always the right
one; flog the rank and file, and fling the ringleaders from the
Tarpeian Rock!"  And this opinion we can never forsake, however our
Liberal friends may think a little rioting, and what they call
popular demonstrations, useful sometimes to their own interests and
to the interests of the valuable practical operations they have in
hand, and however they may preach the right of an Englishman to be
left to do as far as possible what he likes, and the duty of his
government to indulge him and connive as much as [259] possible and
abstain from all harshness of repression.  And even when they
artfully show us operations which are undoubtedly precious, such as
the abolition of the slave-trade, and ask us if, for their sake,
foolish and obstinate governments may not wholesomely be frightened
by a little disturbance, the good design in view and the difficulty
of overcoming opposition to it being considered,--still we say no,
and that monster processions in the streets and forcible irruptions
into the parks, even in professed support of this good design, ought
to be unflinchingly forbidden and repressed; and that far more is
lost than is gained by permitting them.  Because a State in which law
is authoritative and sovereign, a firm and settled course of public
order, is requisite if man is to bring to maturity anything precious
and lasting now, or to found anything precious and lasting for the
future.

Thus, in our eyes, the very framework and exterior order of the
State, whoever may administer the State, is sacred; and culture is
the most resolute enemy of anarchy, because of the great hopes and
designs for the State which culture teaches us to nourish.  But as,
believing in right reason, and having faith in the progress of
humanity [260] towards perfection, and ever labouring for this end,
we grow to have clearer sight of the ideas of right reason, and of
the elements and helps of perfection, and come gradually to fill the
framework of the State with them, to fashion its internal composition
and all its laws and institutions conformably to them, and to make
the State more and more the expression, as we say, of our best self,
which is not manifold, and vulgar, and unstable, and contentious, and
ever-varying, but one, and noble, and secure, and peaceful, and the
same for all mankind,--with what aversion shall we not then regard
anarchy, with what firmness shall we not check it, when there is so
much that is so precious which it will endanger!  So that, for the
sake of the present, but far more for the sake of the future, the
lovers of culture are unswervingly and with a good conscience the
opposers of anarchy.  And not as the Barbarians and Philistines,
whose honesty and whose sense of humour make them shrink, as we have
seen, from treating the State as too serious a thing, and from giving
it too much power;--for indeed the only State they know of, and think
they administer, is the expression of their ordinary self; and though
the headstrong and violent [261] extreme among them might gladly arm
this with full authority, yet their virtuous mean is, as we have
said, pricked in conscience at doing this, and so our Barbarian
Secretaries of State let the Park railings be broken down, and our
Philistine Alderman-Colonels let the London roughs rob and beat the
bystanders.  But we, beholding in the State no expression of our
ordinary self, but even already, as it were, the appointed frame and
prepared vessel of our best self, and, for the future, our best
self's powerful, beneficent, and sacred expression and organ,--we are
willing and resolved, even now, to strengthen against anarchy the
trembling hands of our Barbarian Home Secretaries, and the feeble
knees of our Philistine Alderman-Colonels; and to tell them, that it
is not really in behalf of their own ordinary self that they are
called to protect the Park railings, and to suppress the London
roughs, but in behalf of the best self both of themselves and of all
of us in the future.

Nevertheless, though for resisting anarchy the lovers of culture may
prize and employ fire and strength, yet they must, at the same time,
bear constantly in mind that it is not at this moment true, what the
majority of people tell us, that the world [262] wants fire and
strength more than sweetness and light, and that things are for the
most part to be settled first and understood afterwards.  We have
seen how much of our present perplexities and confusion this untrue
notion of the majority of people amongst us has caused, and tends to
perpetuate.  Therefore the true business of the friends of culture
now is, to dissipate this false notion, to spread the belief in right
reason and in a firm intelligible law of things, and to get men to
allow their thought and consciousness to play on their stock notions
and habits disinterestedly and freely; to get men to try, in
preference to staunchly acting with imperfect knowledge, to obtain
some sounder basis of knowledge on which to act.  This is what the
friends and lovers of culture have to do, however the believers in
action may grow impatient with us for saying so, and may insist on
our lending a hand to their practical operations, and showing a
commendable interest in them.

To this insistence we must indeed turn a deaf ear.  But neither, on
the other hand, must the friends of culture expect to take the
believers in action by storm, or to be visibly and speedily
important, and to rule and cut a figure in the world.  Aristotle
says, [263] that those for whom ideas and the pursuit of the
intelligible law of things can have much attraction, are principally
the young, filled with generous spirit and with a passion for
perfection; but the mass of mankind, he says, follow seeming goods
for real, bestowing hardly a thought upon true sweetness and light;--
"and to their lives," he adds mournfully, "who can give another and a
better rhythm?"  But, although those chiefly attracted by sweetness
and light will probably always be the young and enthusiastic, and
culture must not hope to take the mass of mankind by storm, yet we
will not therefore, for our own day and for our own people, admit and
rest in the desponding sentence of Aristotle.  For is not this the
right crown of the long discipline of Hebraism, and the due fruit of
mankind's centuries of painful schooling in self-conquest, and the
just reward, above all, of the strenuous energy of our own nation and
kindred in dealing honestly with itself and walking steadfastly
according to the best light it knows,--that, when in the fulness of
time it has reason and beauty offered to it, and the law of things as
they really are, it should at last walk by this true light with the
same staunchness [264] and zeal with which it formerly walked by its
imperfect light; and thus man's two great natural forces, Hebraism
and Hellenism, should no longer be dissociated and rival, but should
be a joint force of right thinking and strong doing to carry him on
towards perfection?  This is what the lovers of culture may perhaps
dare to augur for such a nation as ours.  Therefore, however great
the changes to be accomplished, and however dense the array of
Barbarians, Philistines, and Populace, we will neither despair on the
one hand, nor, on the other, threaten violent revolution and change.
But we will look forward cheerfully and hopefully to "a revolution,"
as the Duke of Wellington said, "by due course of law;" though not
exactly such laws as our Liberal friends are now, with their actual
lights, fond of offering us.

But if despondency and violence are both of them forbidden to the
believer in culture, yet neither, on the other hand, is public life
and direct political action much permitted to him.  For it is his
business, as we have seen, to get the present believers in action,
and lovers of political talking and doing, to make a return upon
their own minds, scrutinise their stock notions and habits much more,
value their present [265] talking and doing much less; in order that,
by learning to think more clearly, they may come at last to act less
confusedly.  But how shall we persuade our Barbarian to hold lightly
to his feudal usages; how shall we persuade our Nonconformist that
his time spent in agitating for the abolition of church-rates would
have been better spent in getting worthier ideas than churchmen have
of God and the ordering of the world, or his time spent in battling
for voluntaryism in education better spent in learning to value and
found a public and national culture; how shall we persuade, finally,
our Alderman-Colonel not to be content with sitting in the hall of
judgment or marching at the head of his men of war, without some
knowledge how to perform judgment and how to direct men of war,--how,
I say, shall we persuade all these of this, if our Alderman-Colonel
sees that we want to get his leading-staff and his scales of justice
for our own hands; or the Nonconformist, that we want for ourselves
his platform; or the Barbarian, that we want for ourselves his pre-
eminency and function?  Certainly they will be less slow to believe,
as we want them to believe, that the intelligible law of things has
in itself something desirable and [266] precious, and that all place,
function, and bustle are hollow goods without it, if they see that we
can content ourselves with it, and find in it our satisfaction,
without making it an instrument to give us for ourselves place,
function, and bustle.

And although Mr. Sidgwick says that social usefulness really means
"losing oneself in a mass of disagreeable, hard, mechanical details,"
and though all the believers in action are fond of asserting the same
thing, yet, as to lose ourselves is not what we want, but to find the
intelligible law of things, this assertion too we shall not blindly
accept, but shall sift and try it a little first.  And if we see that
because the believers in action, forgetting Goethe's maxim, "to act
is easy, to think is hard," imagine there is some wonderful virtue in
losing oneself in a mass of mechanical details, therefore they excuse
themselves from much thought about the clear ideas which ought to
govern these details, then we shall give our chief care and pains to
seeking out those ideas and to setting them forth; being persuaded,
that, if we have the ideas firm and clear, the mechanical details for
their execution will come a great deal more simply and easily than we
now [267] suppose.  And even in education, where our Liberal friends
are now, with much zeal, bringing out their train of practical
operations and inviting all men to lend them a hand; and where, since
education is the road to culture, we might gladly lend them a hand
with their practical operations if we could lend them one anywhere;
yet, if we see that any German or Swiss or French law for education
rests on very clear ideas about the citizen's claim, in this matter,
upon the State, and the State's duty towards the citizen, but has its
mechanical details comparatively few and simple, while an English law
for the same concern is ruled by no clear idea about the citizen's
claim and the State's duty, but has, in compensation, a mass of
minute mechanical details about the number of members on a school-
committee, and how many shall be a quorum, and how they shall be
summoned, and how often they shall meet,--then we must conclude that
our nation stands in more need of clear ideas on the main matter than
of laboured details about the accessories of the matter, and that we
do more service by trying to help it to the ideas, than by lending it
a hand with the details.  So while Mr. Samuel Morley and his friends
talk [268] of changing their policy on education, not for the sake of
modelling it on more sound ideas, but "for fear the management of
education should be taken out of their hands," we shall not much care
for taking the management out of their hands and getting it into
ours; but rather we shall try and make them perceive, that to model
education on sound ideas is of more importance than to have the
management of it in one's own hands ever so fully.

At this exciting juncture, then, while so many of the lovers of new
ideas, somewhat weary, as we too are, of the stock performances of
our Liberal friends upon the political stage, are disposed to rush
valiantly upon this public stage themselves, we cannot at all think
that for a wise lover of new ideas this stage is the right one.
Plenty of people there will be without us,--country gentlemen in
search of a club, demagogues in search of a tub, lawyers in search of
a place, industrialists in search of gentility,--who will come from
the east and from the west, and will sit down at that Thyestean
banquet of clap-trap, which English public life for these many years
past has been.  Because, so long as those old organisations, of which
we have seen [269] the insufficiency,--those expressions of our
ordinary self, Barbarian or Philistine,--have force anywhere, they
will have force in Parliament.  There, the man whom the Barbarians
send, cannot but be impelled to please the Barbarians' ordinary self,
and their natural taste for the bathos; and the man whom the
Philistines send, cannot but be impelled to please those of the
Philistines.  Parliamentary Conservatism will and must long mean
this, that the Barbarians should keep their heritage; and
Parliamentary Liberalism, that the Barbarians should pass away, as
they will pass away, and that into their heritage the Philistines
should enter.  This seems, indeed, to be the true and authentic
promise of which our Liberal friends and Mr. Bright believe
themselves the heirs, and the goal of that great man's labours.
Presently, perhaps, Mr. Odger and Mr. Bradlaugh will be there with
their mission to oust both Barbarians and Philistines, and to get the
heritage for the Populace.  We, on the other hand, are for giving the
heritage neither to the Barbarians nor to the Philistines, nor yet to
the Populace; but we are for the transformation of each and all of
these according to the law of perfection.

[270] Through the length and breadth of our nation a sense,--vague
and obscure as yet,--of weariness with the old organisations, of
desire for this transformation, works and grows.  In the House of
Commons the old organisations must inevitably be most enduring and
strongest, the transformation must inevitably be longest in showing
itself; and it may truly be averred, therefore, that at the present
juncture the centre of movement is not in the House of Commons.  It
is in the fermenting mind of the nation; and his is for the next
twenty years the real influence who can address himself to this.

Pericles was perhaps the most perfect public speaker who ever lived,
for he was the man who most perfectly combined thought and wisdom
with feeling and eloquence.  Yet Plato brings in Alcibiades
declaring, that men went away from the oratory of Pericles, saying it
was very fine, it was very good, and afterwards thinking no more
about it; but they went away from hearing Socrates talk, he says,
with the point of what he had said sticking fast in their minds, and
they could not get rid of it.  Socrates is poisoned and dead; but in
his own breast does not every man carry about with him a possible
Socrates, [271] in that power of a disinterested play of
consciousness upon his stock notions and habits, of which this wise
and admirable man gave all through his lifetime the great example,
and which was the secret of his incomparable influence?  And he who
leads men to call forth and exercise in themselves this power, and
who busily calls it forth and exercises it in himself, is at the
present moment, perhaps, as Socrates was in his time, more in concert
with the vital working of men's minds, and more effectually
significant, than any House of Commons' orator, or practical operator
in politics.

Every one is now boasting of what he has done to educate men's minds
and to give things the course they are taking.  Mr. Disraeli
educates, Mr. Bright educates, Mr. Beales educates.  We, indeed,
pretend to educate no one, for we are still engaged in trying to
clear and educate ourselves.  But we are sure that the endeavour to
reach, through culture, the firm intelligible law of things, we are
sure that the detaching ourselves from our stock notions and habits,
that a more free play of consciousness, an increased desire for
sweetness and light, and all the bent which we call [272]
Hellenising, is the master-impulse now of the life of our nation and
of humanity,--somewhat obscurely perhaps for this moment, but
decisively for the immediate future; and that those who work for this
are the sovereign educators.  Docile echoes of the eternal voice,
pliant organs of the infinite will, they are going along with the
essential movement of the world; and this is their strength, and
their happy and divine fortune.  For if the believers in action, who
are so impatient with us and call us effeminate, had had the same
fortune, they would, no doubt, have surpassed us in this sphere of
vital influence by all the superiority of their genius and energy
over ours.  But now we go the way the world is going, while they
abolish the Irish Church by the power of the Nonconformists'
antipathy to establishments, or they enable a man to marry his
deceased wife's sister.

THE END.

NOTES

201. +John 18:36.  "Jesus answered, My kingdom is not of this world:
if my kingdom were of this world, then would my servants fight, that
I should not be delivered to the Jews: but now is my kingdom not from
hence."  King James Bible.

219. +Proverbs 26:8.  "As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is
he that giveth honour to a fool."  King James Bible.

241. +Arnold refers to fourteenth-century priest Thomas a Kempis.
The Benham translation and a modern English translation of the
Imitatio are currently available from the College of St. Benedict at
Saint John's University Internet Theology Resources site.  See also
the Benham text link.

243. +Genesis 1:21-22.  "And God created great whales, and every
living creature that moveth, which the waters brought forth
abundantly, after their kind, and every winged fowl after his kind:
and God saw that
it was good. / And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and
multiply, and fill the waters in the seas, and let fowl multiply in
the earth."  King James Bible.

244. +Deuteronomy 15:11.  "For the poor shall never cease out of the
land: therefore I command thee, saying, Thou shalt open thine hand
wide unto thy brother, to thy poor, and to thy needy, in thy land."




[Portions of this header are copyright (C) 2001 by Michael S. Hart
and may be reprinted only when these Etexts are free of all fees.]
[Project Gutenberg is a TradeMark and may not be used in any sales
of Project Gutenberg Etexts or other materials be they hardware or
software or any other related product without express permission.]





Typist:  Brett Fishburne (william.fishburne@verizon.net) 
Proofer:  Jennifer Francisco (seattle717@yahoo.com)
Proofer:  Bob Redman (redmanb@mindspring.com)





The Army of the Cumberland

By Henry M. Cist, Brevet Brigadier-General U.S.V.; A. A. G. on the
staff of Major-General Rosecrans, and the staff of Major-General
Thomas; Secretary of the Society of the Army of the Cumberland.




Preface.




The scope of this work precluded the entering into details as to the
minor operations of the troops in the commands named.  It has even
been impossible to give the movements of troops on the battlefields
in lesser organizations than brigades.  The rosters of the several
armies given in full in the appendices will enable those interested
to trace the movements of the minor commands.

The subject is too great a one to be fully and justly treated within
the limitations, both of time and space, which have necessarily
been imposed here.  Still, with the hope that the future student
of history may glean something of value in this volume not found
elsewhere, it is sent forth for the favorable consideration of its
readers.

To the many friends who have kindly aided me in various ways, I
return my sincere thanks.  To Col. R. N. Scott, U.S.A., I am under
special obligations for data furnished.

The maps for this volume were prepared by permission from those of
Captain Ruger in Van Horne's "History of the Army of the Cumberland,"
published by Robert Clarke & Co., Cincinnati.

H. M. C.





CONTENTS.




                                           PAGE
List of Maps, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  ix
              CHAPTER I.
Early Movements,  . . . . . . . . . . . . .   1
              CHAPTER II.
Mill Springs, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   9
              CHAPTER III.
Concentration at Nashville, . . . . . . . .  21
              CHAPTER IV.
Morgan's and Forrest's Raids, . . . . . . .  31
              CHAPTER V.
Bragg's Advance into Kentucky,  . . . . . .  48
              CHAPTER VI.
Battle of Perryville, . . . . . . . . . . .  61
              CHAPTER VII.
The Advance to Murfreesboro,  . . . . . . .  87
              CHAPTER VIII.
The Battle of Stone's River,  . . . . . . . 102
              CHAPTER IX.
In Murfreesboro,  . . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
              CHAPTER X.
The Advance on Tullahoma, . . . . . . . . . 154
              CHAPTER XI.
The Movement to Chickamauga,  . . . . . . . 173
              CHAPTER XII.
The Battle of Chickamauga,  . . . . . . . . 193
              CHAPTER XIII.
The Siege of Chattanooga, . . . . . . . . . 230
              CHAPTER XIV.
Chattanooga, Lookout Mountain, and Missionary
   Ridge Battles, . . . . . . . . . . . . . 243

Appendix, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 263
Index,  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 273





LIST OF MAPS.



                                           PAGE
General Map of the Campaign,  . . . . . . .   1
Mill Springs, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  15
Battle of Perryville, . . . . . . . . . . .  64
Battle-Map Stone's River, . . . . . . . . . 103
Chickamauga Campaign, . . . . . . . . . . . 172
Battle of Chickamauga,  . . . . . . . . . . 194
Battlefield of Chattanooga, . . . . . . . . 245





THE ARMY OF THE CUMBERLAND.


CHAPTER I.




EARLY MOVEMENTS.


In Kentucky, during the spring of 1861, every shade of opinion
prevailed, from the most pronounced Union sentiment to the most
ultra secession sympathy.

The Government at Washington wished to enlist Kentucky heartily
in support of the Union, while every effort was made by the rebel
leaders to secure the secession of the State from the Union, and
to have it join its fortunes to those of the South.  These several
efforts enlisted the active support of those in the State in sympathy
with them, and Kentuckians became ultimately divided into two
sharply defined parties.  Under the peculiar doctrine of "armed
neutrality" adopted by the local authorities, no serious infraction of
the peace of the State was had until the fall.  With the invitation
given General Anderson to take command in Kentucky, by the State
Legislature, the doctrine of "armed neutrality" came to an end.  While
it at times restrained prompt action on the part of the Union men
of Kentucky during the first six months of the war, and hampered
the Federal Government in the movement of troops in the State, still
in the end it was of immense benefit to the cause of the Union,
and enabled those in support of it in Kentucky to unite and perfect
their plans in comparative peace, unmolested by the rebels from
Tennessee and their own State.  Under cover of "armed neutrality"
the Union men remained quiet until the time had arrived for prompt
and decided action, with men, and arms for their support, in the
measures they adopted to retain Kentucky in the Union.

In accordance with a general plan of operations adopted by General
Albert Sidney Johnston, on September 18th, General Buckner broke
camp with the rebel forces at Camp Boone, Tenn., near the Kentucky
line, and marching north, occupied Bowling Green, throwing out his
advance as far as Elizabethtown.

On receipt of reliable information as to Buckner's movements,
General Anderson sent General W. T. Sherman, second in command,
to Camp Joe Holt, with instructions to order Colonel Rousseau with
his entire command to report at once in Louisville.  The "Home
Guards" were also ordered out, and they assembled promptly in large
force, reporting at the Nashville depot, and by midnight they were
started to the front by train.  Rousseau's command followed at once,
General Sherman being in command of the entire force, amounting to
some three thousand men.  The advance by train was stopped at the
Rolling Fork of the Salt River, about thirty-one miles south of
Louisville, at which point the railroad bridge had been burned by
the rebels.  During the following day the troops under Rousseau
forded the stream, and pressing forward occupied Muldraugh's Hills
with its two trestles and a tunnel over fifteen hundred feet long.
The Home Guards were left in camp at Lebanon Junction, some two
or three miles in the rear, where Lieutenant-Colonel R. W. Johnson
of the Third Kentucky Cavalry reported later in the day with some
additional companies of Home Guards, and, by order of General
Anderson, assumed command of the camp.

This disposition of troops caused Buckner to retire with his entire
command to Bowling Green, where he strongly fortified his position.

The Kentucky State troops were under orders for ten days' service
only, and their place was then filled by several regiments from
the States immediately north of Kentucky.  These troops were placed
in camp, and there received instruction in drill, discipline, and
camp regulations, waiting for orders for the advance.

General Johnston, under his general plan of creating a defensive
line from Columbus on the west, running through Bowling Green east
to some point to be determined on, early in September sent General
Zollicoffer with a force numbering several thousand men to make an
advance into Eastern Kentucky by way of Knoxville, East Tennessee,
through Cumberland Gap to Cumberland Ford, threatening Camp Dick
Robinson.  On the 19th of that month the advance of Zollicoffer's
command had a spirited skirmish with the "Home Guards" at Barboursville
Bridge.  These troops were compelled to retire, which they did,
to Rock Castle Hills, where they were re-enforced by two Kentucky
regiments under Colonel T. T. Garrard, of the Seventh Kentucky Infantry,
who had received instructions from General Thomas to obstruct the
roads and to hold the rebels in check.  Garrard established his
force at Camp Wildcat, behind temporary breastworks, where, on
October 21st, he was attacked by Zollicoffer with 7,000 troops.
Shortly after the attack General Schoepff [NOTE from Brett Fishburne
the correct spelling is "Schoepf" as I know because this is my
great-great-grandfather, but I have kept the spelling as in the
original book for subsequent references], with five regiments of
infantry, one of cavalry, and a battery of artillery, re-enforced
Garrard, and after a severe fight the enemy was repulsed.

After Buckner's retreat to Bowling Green, Zollicoffer fell back to
Mill Springs, on the southern bank of the Cumberland River, and soon
afterward crossed the river to the opposite bank at Beech Grove,
fortifying this encampment with extensive earthworks.

During the month of September, General George H. Thomas, who with
General Wm. T. Sherman had been ordered to report to General Anderson
for duty in Kentucky--at General Anderson's personal request of the
President--was placed in command of Camp Dick Robinson, relieving
General Nelson.  The latter then established Camp Kenton in Mason
County, three miles from Maysville, near the spot where Simon
Kenton's station was erected in 1785.

On the 7th of October General Anderson, on account of ill-health,
relinquished the command of the department, and General W.
T. Sherman on the following day succeeded him.  At the same time
General A. McD. McCook was placed in command of the force that
[had] been ordered to the front under Sherman.

During the month of October the rebel Colonel J. S. Williams was
organizing a force of some two thousand troops at Prestonburg,
on the Big Sandy River, intending to operate in Central Kentucky
through McCormick's Gap.  General Nelson early in the month started
with all the troops of his command to drive the rebels out of their
encampment.  Nelson ordered the Second Ohio under Colonel L. A.
Harris to move from Paris, and the Twenty-first Ohio under Colonel
Norton to advance from Nicholasville to Olympia Springs, where
the entire command was concentrated.  From here he advanced to
McCormick's Gap, and then divided his command, sending the Second
Ohio, a section of Captain Konkle's battery, and a company of
Ohio cavalry under Captain McLaughlin--all under the command of
Colonel Harris--through West Liberty to unite with the command at
Salyersville.  Nelson then moved forward with three regiments of
infantry, two detachments of Kentucky troops, and two sections of
Konkle's battery, with a battalion of cavalry, on the road to Hazel
Green.  On the 23d Harris occupied West Liberty, after a brisk
skirmish.  The command united at Salyersville and followed the
enemy to Prestonburg.  At this point Nelson sent the Thirty-third
Ohio, with the Kentucky troops and a section of Konkle's battery
under Colonel Sill, by a detour to the right to flank the rebel
position at Ivy Mountain.  Nelson on the next day then advanced
with his command on the direct road to Piketon, and encountered the
enemy in ambush on the mountain at Ivy Creek.  Pushing forward at
once with the force under his immediate command, Nelson attacked the
enemy, and after a brisk engagement, lasting over an hour, routed
them from their cover and drove them in full retreat.

Sill occupied Piketon on the 9th without much opposition.  General
Nelson arrived there on the 10th, when the rebels leaving the State
and retreating through Pound Gap, he was ordered to report with
his command to General Buell at Louisville.

On the retirement of General Anderson, as the ranking officer in
the department, General Sherman assumed the command.  On the 9th
of November, by general order from the headquarters of the army,
No. 97, the Department of the Ohio was created, "to consist of the
States of Ohio, Michigan, Indiana, that portion of Kentucky east of
the Cumberland river, and the State of Tennessee, and to be commanded
by Brigadier-General D. C. Buell, headquarters at Louisville;" and
General Sherman was relieved from command at his own request.

Nelson's command being ordered out of East Kentucky, the rebel
forces again entered, and in small bands were depredating on Union
people in the Big Sandy Valley.  The Fourteenth Kentucky under Colonel
L. P. Moore was ordered to move from Catlettsburg and advance up
the valley.  General Buell finding that the rebel force had been
largely re-enforced by the advance of General Humphrey Marshall, one
of the ablest rebel generals in that part of the country, ordered
the Twenty-second Kentucky under Colonel Lindsay from Maysville to
join the Fourteenth, and Lindsay was placed in command of the two
regiments.  Marshall was a graduate of West Point; he had served
in the Black Hawk War and had seen service in Mexico as a Colonel
of Kentucky cavalry, winning distinction at Buena Vista.  He had now
entered the State from Virginia through Pound Gap, and had reached
a strong natural position near Paintville, where he was rapidly
increasing his army, with the intention of raising a sufficient
force--already some five thousand--to operate on General Buell's
flank and to retard his advance into Tennessee.  The Forty-second
Ohio, just organized, was in a camp of instruction near Columbus,
Ohio, under its Colonel, James A. Garfield.  While there, in
December, he was ordered by General Buell to move his regiment at
once to Catlettsburg, at the mouth of the Big Sandy River, and to
report in person to Louisville for orders.

Starting his regiment eastward, from Cincinnati, Garfield, on the
19th of December, reported to General Buell, who informed him that
he had been selected to command an expedition to drive Marshall
and his forces from Kentucky.  That evening Garfield received his
orders, which organized the Eighteenth Brigade of the Army of the
Ohio, and placed him in command.  General Buell with these orders
sent a letter of instruction, giving general directions as to the
campaign, leaving all matters of detail and the fate of the expedition,
however, largely to the discretion of the brigade commander.  The
latter reached his command on the 24th of December, at Louisa, some
twenty-eight miles up the Big Sandy.  He then proceeded to concentrate
his troops, the main body consisting of his own regiment--the
Forty-second Ohio--the Fourteenth Kentucky, and a battalion of Ohio
cavalry under Major McLaughlin, which was with him; but these gave
only some fifteen hundred men for duty.

The next largest portion of his command was stationed at Paris,
Kentucky, under Colonel Cranor, with his regiment, the Fortieth
Ohio, 800 strong.  Cranor was ordered to join the main body as
expeditiously as possible, and to bring with him that portion of
Colonel Wolford's Kentucky cavalry stationed at Stanford, consisting
of three small battalions under Lieutenant-Colonel Letcher, and
to report at Prestonburg.  The twenty-second Kentucky was ordered
from Maysville, and some three hundred men of that command reported
before Garfield reached Paintville.  He was also joined by a battalion
of west Virginia cavalry under Colonel Bolles.  After a toilsome
march in mid-winter, Garfield's command, on the 7th of January,
drove Marshall's forces from the mouth of Jenny's Creek, and occupied
Paintville.  On the morning of the 9th, Cranor reported with his
command, footsore and exhausted, after a march of over one hundred
miles through the mountains of Eastern Kentucky.  At noon of the 9th
Garfield advanced his command to attack Marshall with his cavalry,
pressing the rebels as they fell back.  Reaching Prestonburg
some fifteen miles from Paintville, he learned that Marshall was
encamped and fortified on Abbott's Creek.  Pushing on to the mouth
of the creek, some three miles below Prestonburg, he there encamped
for the night, a sleety rain adding to the discomfort of the men.
Intending to force the enemy to battle, he ordered up his reserves
under Colonel Sheldon from Paintville, with every available man.
As soon as the morning light enabled the command to move, Garfield
advanced, and soon engaged the rebel cavalry, which was driven in
after a slight skirmish, falling back on the main body some two
miles in the rear, strongly posted on high ground, between Abbott's
Creek and Middle Creek, at the mouth of the latter stream.  It was
impossible to tell what disposition Marshall had made for his defence,
owing to the formation of the ground at this point concealing his
troops until our forces drew his fire.  Throwing several detachments
forward, the entire command was soon actively engaged.  The
engagement lasted for some four hours, commending at about twelve
o'clock.  At 4 P.M., the reserves under Sheldon reached the field
of battle, and the enemy was driven from his position.  Night coming
on prevented pursuit.

Marshall's command fled down the valley, set fire to their stores,
and pressed forward in rapid retreat to Abington, Va.  Garfield
with his command returned to Paintville, where it could receive
supplies.  In February he received orders from Buell, directing
him to advance to Piketon, and drive the rebels from that place,
which he did, and later from Pound Gap.  This freed Eastern Kentucky
of rebel troops, and relieved the Union men of that section of the
depredations that had been committed on them by the roving bands
of the enemy.  The services of Garfield's command were recognized
by Buell, and the thanks of the Commanding General extended to
Garfield and his troops.  Shortly after this Garfield received his
commission as Brigadier-General of Volunteers, to date from the
"Battle of Middle Creek."

In the latter part of March General Garfield was ordered to leave
a small force in the Big Sandy Valley, and to report with the rest
of his brigade to General Buell at Louisville.





Chapter II.




Mill Springs.


On September 10, 1861, General Albert Sidney Johnston, who had
resigned the Colonelcy of the Second United States Cavalry to engage
in the service of the Confederacy, was assigned to the command of
the Department of the West, embracing, with a large number of the
Western States, the States of Kentucky and Tennessee.  On the 18th
Johnston directed Buckner to occupy Bowling Green, and ordered
Zollicoffer to advance from Knoxville to Cumberland Gap.  The rebels,
under General Polk, occupied Columbus, Ky., September 7th, and the
line of operations of the Confederates, under General Johnston,
as then formed, had the Mississippi river at its extreme left,
Cumberland Gap at its extreme right, with Bowling Green as the centre.
With the force at his command, no point in advance of Bowling Green
could have been safely taken by the Confederate general, owing to
the disposition of the Union troops in Kentucky at that time.

As we have seen, Zollicoffer with his command was driven from Rock
Castle Hills and Wildcat, and taking a new position nearer Bowling
Green, encamped at Beech Grove, where he fortified his position.

General Zollicoffer was a civilian appointment, without military
training of any kind.  He had been editor of a Nashville paper,
had held a number of minor State offices, and served two terms in
Congress prior to the war.  Johnston, in ordering Zollicoffer to
the Cumberland River at Mill Springs, intended that he should occupy
a position of observation merely until he should be re-enforced,
or his troops be incorporated in the main command.  He could not
have been located farther west without inviting the advance of
the Federal forces into East Tennessee or to Nashville, flanking
Bowling Green.  Zollicoffer had no ability as a soldier to handle
troops, and General George B. Crittenden, of Kentucky, a graduate
of West Point, who had seen service in the Mexican War, and who held
at the outbreak of the rebellion, a commission as Lieutenant-Colonel
in the regiment of Mounted Riflemen, was, in November, assigned
to the command of the district as Major-General, with headquarters
at Knoxville.  Great expectations were entertained in regard to
Crittenden's military abilities; and about the first of the year
1862 he assumed command in person of the rebel forces at Beech
Grove.  The fact that Zollicoffer had established his camp on the
north side of the Cumberland, "with the enemy in front and the
river behind," was known to Johnston, and information given by him
to Crittenden.  General Johnston had written Zollicoffer that the
interest of the service required him simply to watch the river,
and that he could do this better from Mill Springs without crossing
it.

Zollicoffer, however, had crossed the river before he heard from
Johnston, and replied that, while from this letter he inferred that
he should not have done so, it was now too late, as his means of
recrossing were so limited that he could hardly accomplish it in
the face of the enemy.  On his reaching the Cumberland with his
command, he had sent forward his cavalry to seize the ferryboats at
Mill Springs.  In this they failed, and the crossing was effected on
one ferry-boat, seized lower down, and barges built by his troops.

General Thomas was ordered in November to concentrate his command
in order to be prepared for any movement Zollicoffer might make,
and, if necessary, to attack him in his camp.  General Carter with
his brigade was stationed at London, Colonel Hoskins was near
Somerset, and Colonel Bramlette at Columbia, all watching Zollicoffer's
movements, and reporting them to General Thomas, who endeavored to
stop his advance at the Cumberland River.  Five hundred of Wolford's
Cavalry were ordered from Columbia to reinforce Colonel Hoskins;
and General Schoepff, with the Seventeenth Ohio, the Thirty-eighth
Ohio, and Standart's battery, to take position on the Cumberland
River at Waitsborough, where he could command the crossing.  Here
he was to fortify and guard the river at this point and above and
below, to prevent the enemy from crossing, or from obtaining the
means for doing so.

On December 2d, Zollicoffer, while building his ferries, sent some
troops to shell General Schoepff's camp.  A brisk cannonading was
kept up for some time, when the rebels withdrew.  Schoepff regarding
this as a feint, and anticipating a movement of Zollicoffer's
troops to cross the river, ordered two companies of cavalry under
Captain Dillon to guard the ford and to give timely notice of any
attempt to effect a crossing.  He also ordered the Seventeenth Ohio
with three pieces of artillery and another company of cavalry, all
under the command of Colonel Connell, to support the cavalry under
Dillon.  The latter proved wholly incompetent, and failed to comply
with his orders in any particular.  He went into camp two miles
in the rear from where he was ordered, and neglected even to post
his men to guard the ford, whereby Zollicoffer was enabled to occupy
the north bank of the Cumberland without opposition and without
Dillon's even knowing that the movement had been made.  This was
only discovered on the 4th, when the rebels drove back the Federal
cavalry and attacked Connell, who was advancing on a reconnoissance.
Connell, in ignorance of the movement of the enemy, had reached
the vicinity of the ford and found himself confronted by a strong
force of rebels, who had crossed the river, and who being rapidly
re-enforced rendered his situation one of extreme peril.  He
withdrew under cover of the night beyond Fishing Creek, without
being molested.  Schoepff, finding that the advance of the rebels
was supported by reinforcements and that Zollicoffer's entire
force was slowly crossing, which would make the enemy's force in
his front largely exceed his own, asked General Carter at London to
reinforce him.  He also ordered Colonel Coburn with the Thirty-third
Indiana to move from Crab Orchard to his support; and on the 6th
established his camp in a strong position three miles north of
Somerset, where he was able to command both the Stanford and the
Crab Orchard roads.  Here Carter reported with two regiments on
the 9th, Colonel Van Deveer's regiment, the Thirty-fifth Ohio, with
Captain Hewitt's battery having already arrived.  On the 8th, the
rebel cavalry crossed Fishing Creek and reconnoitered the Federal
camps.  They were fired on by Wolford's cavalry, which then fell
back; and after a brisk skirmish with the Thirty-fifth Ohio they
were driven back with a loss of two or three men on each side.

General Buell had ordered Thomas to keep his immediate command
at Columbia, and had directed him not to send any more troops to
Schoepff at Somerset, considering that the latter had sufficient
force to drive the rebels across the Cumberland.  Thomas was directed
to hold himself in readiness to make an immediate movement, when
ordered, from Columbia on the rebel General Hindman, who with some
seven thousand troops was operating in that vicinity, throwing
out his cavalry far in advance of his main column, and feeling
the position of the Federal forces.  Hindman had been ordered by
General Johnston to make a diversion in favor of Zollicoffer; and
when Thomas from Columbia checked Hindman's advance, the latter
reported that the force under Thomas had not been weakened to
reinforce Schoepff, or to strengthen the main command at Bowling
Green, and that Zollicoffer was in no immediate danger.

Schoepff with his entire command on the 18th made a reconnoissance
to determine the location and purposes of the rebel force.  Pushing
his command forward he drove their cavalry pickets in and found that
Zollicoffer had been intrenching his camp, his line of fortifications
extending from the river to Fishing Creek and his camp being in the
angle formed by the junction of this stream with the Cumberland.
Having accomplished this, and not intending to bring on an engagement,
Schoepff returned with his command to their encampment north of
Somerset.

Buell now finding that the only rebel force encamped in Eastern
Kentucky was that under Zollicoffer, and deeming it important that
he be driven from the State, modified his previous order to Thomas,
and on December 29th directed him to advance against Zollicoffer
from Columbia and attack on his left flank.  He also ordered Schoepff
to attack him in front.  Two days later Thomas started from Lebanon
with the Second Brigade, under command of Colonel Manson, and two
regiments of Colonel McCook's brigade, Kinney's battery of artillery,
and a battalion of Wolford's cavalry.  Heavy rains, swollen streams,
and almost impassable roads impeded the movement of the troops so
that it was not until the 17th of January that they reached Logan's
Cross Roads, ten miles from the rebel encampment.  At this point
Thomas halted his command and awaited the arrival of the Fourth
and Tenth Kentucky, the Fourteenth Ohio, and the Eighteenth United
States Infantry, detained in the rear by the condition of the road.
He communicated at once with Schoepff, and the same day the latter
reported in person.  General Thomas directed Schoepff to send him
Standart's battery, the Twelfth Kentucky and the First and Second
Tennessee regiments, which were to strengthen the command on the
immediate front until the arrival of the regiments in the rear.
Thomas placed the Tenth Indiana, Wolford's cavalry, and Kinney's
battery on the main road leading to the enemy's camp.  The Ninth
Ohio and the Second Minnesota were posted three-quarters of a mile
to the right on the Robertsport road.  Strong pickets were thrown
out on the main road in the direction of the enemy, with cavalry
pickets beyond.  Our pickets were fired on and had a skirmish
with the rebel pickets on the night of the 17th.  On the 18th, the
Fourth Kentucky, a battalion of the Michigan Engineers and Wetmore's
Battery also reported to Thomas.

Crittenden, on learning that Zollicoffer had crossed the Cumberland,
had sent at once an order by courier, post haste, directing him to
recross; but on his arrival at Mill Springs he found Zollicoffer
still on the north bank, waiting his arrival before retiring.
Crittenden gave orders at once for the construction of boats to
take his command across the river; but they were not ready when he
heard of the approach of General Thomas on January 17th.

On the 18th, Crittenden reported to General Johnston that he was
threatened by a superior force of the enemy in his front, and that
as he found it impossible to cross the river, he should have to
make the fight on the ground he then occupied.

His weekly reports showed eight infantry regiments, four battalions
(seventeen companies) of cavalry, and two companies of artillery,
making an aggregate of 9,417 men.  His circular order of the 18th,
directing the order of march in his advance to attack, shows that
his army was on the day of battle composed of the same companies,
and that his force was about the same.

At midnight, on January 18th, in a heavy winter rain, the Confederate
army marched out to battle with Bledsoe's and Saunders's independent
cavalry companies in advance.  Zollicoffer's brigade of four
regiments, with Rutledge's battery of artillery, followed.  Then
came General Carroll's brigade of four regiments, one in reserve,
with McClung's battery of artillery, Brauner's battalion of cavalry
on the right, and McClellan's battalion of cavalry on the left, with
Cary's battalions in the rear.  After a six hours' march through
the rain and the mud, the advance struck our cavalry pickets at
six o'clock, in the early gray of a winter morning, two miles in
front of the Federal camp.  Wolford's cavalry slowly fell back,
reporting the enemy's advance to Manson, who immediately formed
his regiment--the Tenth Indiana--and took position on the road to
await the attack.  Manson then ordered the Fourth Kentucky, Colonel
Speed S. Fry, to support him; and reported to Thomas, in person,
the advance of the rebels in force, and the disposition he had made
of his troops to meet the attack.  General Thomas directed him to
return to his brigade immediately, with orders to hold the enemy
in check until the other troops could be brought up.  Orders were
given to the other commanders to form immediately, and in ten minutes
they were all marching to the battle-field, except the battalion
of Michigan Engineers and a company of the Thirty-eighth Ohio,
detailed to guard the camp.

The rebels, in their advance, opened the attack with Walthall's
Mississippi and Battle's Tennessee regiments, which as they moved
forward, forming the right of the rebel line, encountered the Fourth
Kentucky and the Tenth Indiana, formed on the first line to resist
their attack in the edge of the woods to their front.  The Tennessee
regiment endeavored to flank the Fourth Kentucky on the left, while
the latter regiment was resisting the rebel attack on the front in
a most obstinate manner.  Carter's Tennessee brigade was ordered
up in position to meet this flanking movement with a section of
Kinney's battery; and the attempt of Battle's regiment was checked.

Orders were sent to Colonel McCook to advance with the Ninth Ohio
and the Second Minnesota regiments.  These regiments coming up
occupied the position of the Fourth Kentucky and Tenth Indiana, who
by that time were out of ammunition.  As soon as this disposition
of these troops had been made the enemy opened a most determined and
galling fire, pressing our troops at all points.  General Thomas's
command returned the fire with spirit, and holding their position
the contest was maintained for half an hour on both sides most
obstinately.

At this time, General Zollicoffer, being in the rear of the Nineteenth
Tennessee regiment of his command, became convinced that the Fourth
Kentucky (Federal) regiment was a part of his brigade, ordered the
Tennessee regiment to cease firing, as they were shooting their
own troops.  He then rode to the front, where he met Colonel Fry,
the commanding officer of the Fourth Kentucky.  Zollicoffer stated
to Fry that both commands belonged to the same side, and that firing
should stop.  To this Fry assented and started to order the Fourth
Kentucky to cease firing, when one of Zollicoffer's aids coming up,
seeing that Fry was a Federal officer, opened fire upon him with
a revolver, wounding his horse.  Fry returned the fire, shooting
Zollicoffer through the heart.

Shortly after, the First and Second East Tennessee regiments of
Carter's brigade and Hoskins's Kentucky regiment were placed on
the left of the Second Minnesota regiment, and opening a heavy fire
on the right flank of the rebel line caused it to give way.  The
Second Minnesota regiment kept up a galling fire in the centre,
while the Ninth Ohio charged the enemy with fixed bayonets on the
left, turned that flank, and drove them from the field.  The whole
rebel line then gave way, retreating in the utmost confusion and
disorder to their intrenchments at Beech Grove.  Thomas ordered
an immediate advance, after supplying his troops with ammunition,
driving the rebels into their intrenchments.  As these were approached
they were invested by the division deployed in the line of battle.
Cannonading was kept up until dark, firing being in the direction
of the ferry to defeat a crossing.  During the night preparations
were made for an assault on the intrenchments on the following
morning.  The Fourteenth Ohio, Colonel Steedman, and the Tenth
Kentucky, Colonel Harlan, reported after the fight, where placed
in the front of the advance, and were the first to enter the
intrenchments.  Schoepff's brigade joined the command during the
evening, and was placed in position for the attack.

At midnight Crittenden abandoned everything, and between that hour
and daylight escaped across the river by means of a steamer and
some barges at the landing, which he burned, leaving behind him
his badly wounded, all of his cannon--twelve pieces--with their
caissons packed with ammunition, a large amount of small arms,
with ammunition for the same, over one hundred and fifty wagons,
and more than one thousand horses and mules, with a large amount
of tools, stores, camp and garrison equipage.

As all the boats were destroyed, it was impossible for Thomas to
cross his command in pursuit.  General Thomas in his official report
of the engagement says:  "Their command was completely demoralized
and retreated with great haste and in all directions, making their
capture in any number quite doubtful if pursued.  There is no doubt
but that the moral effect produced by their complete dispersion
will have a more decided effect in re-establishing Union sentiments
than though they had been captured."

The rebels suffered terribly by heavy marching through the rain,
mud, and cold, with insufficient food; frequently with nothing but
parched corn to sustain life.  Crittenden finally took position at
Chestnut Mound, within reach of relief from Nashville.

In the Life of Albert Sidney Johnston, speaking of Crittenden's
retreat, the author says:  "During his retreat his army became
much demoralized, and two regiments, whose homes were in that
neighborhood, almost entirely abandoned their organization and went
every man to his own house.  A multitude deserted, and the tide of
fugitives filled the country with dismay."

The battle fought at Logan's Cross Roads, called by the rebels the
Battle of Fishing Creek, and by the Federals the Battle of Mill
Springs, was most disastrous to the enemy, and inflicted the most
severe blow they had up to that time experienced.  The victory for
the Federal forces was the first complete success of the war, and
was hailed everywhere with joy and hope.  An order was issued by
the President congratulating the troops on their success, and the
general in command conveyed his thanks to General Thomas and troops
for their brilliant victory.

Thomas's command lost in the engagement 39 killed, and 207 wounded.
He reported the rebel loss at 122 killed, and the total loss at
349.  The large proportion of killed to the wounded indicates heavy
fighting at close quarters, and also a superiority of either the
arms of the Federal troops or their firing.

The body of General Zollicoffer was treated with great respect.
General Thomas had it embalmed and carried around by Lebanon.  It
was then sent to General Buell through his lines under a flag
of truce.  Zollicoffer's death was a very depressing event to the
Tennesseeans.  He was their most popular leader, and his death was
felt by the people of Tennessee as a personal bereavement.

Crittenden's attack and defeat were a great surprise to Johnston.
This force had been ordered to Mill Springs to maintain that point
of the general military line as a corps of observation merely.  With
the attack and defeat Johnston found his line broken, his position
at Bowling Green liable to be turned on that flank, and an army on
which he counted demolished.  This with his losses on his left in
Western Kentucky and at Fort Henry compelled his main command at
Bowling Green to abandon that place, and retire into Tennessee.
Thomas, after the battle of Mill Springs, concentrated his command
at Somerset, awaiting orders.  He was ordered to Mumfordsville,
February 15th, to take part in the general advance against Bowling
Green.  These orders were countermanded by reason of the evacuation
of that place, on the 14th; and on the 22d, Thomas was ordered
with his division to proceed by forced marches to Louisville, and
there embark for Nashville.  The command arrived at Nashville on
the 2d, 3d, and 4th days of March.





Chapter III.




Concentration at Nashville


Don Carlos Buell, who was placed in command of the Department
of the Ohio on Sherman's request to be relieved, had been serving
from the early summer of 1861 as Assistant Adjutant-General on the
staff of Brigadier-General E. V. Sumner, U.S.A., in command of the
Department of the Pacific.  He had been promoted to the rank of
lieutenant-Colonel in the adjutant-general's department, May 11,
1861.  His appointment as brigadier-general in the volunteer force
was made May 17, 1861.  General Buell was a graduate of West Point,
and had been in the army all his life.  He was a thoroughly trained
soldier, with great pride in his profession, a man of great integrity,
with abilities of the first order, animated by high principle.  His
long training in the adjutant-general's department, added to his
natural faculty, made him a first-class organizer of an army.  Under
his direction the soldiers of the Army of the Ohio received their
training in the drill of the camp, the discipline of the march,
and learned endurance under fire in the skirmishes and engagements
during his command.  For all the soldierly qualities that the troops
of the later organization--the Army of the Cumberland--possessed,
they were indebted in large measure to their first commander in
the field, General Buell.  He was constant in his endeavors for
the care of the troops, and insisted on their camps being carefully
selected and well drained.  His highest aim was to make good
soldiers of his command, and everything that detracted from this,
as straggling, pillaging, disobedience of orders, he regarded as
unworthy of a soldier, and meriting prompt and stern punishment at
his hands.  In the earlier days of the war, with the lack of the
knowledge that the stricter obedience to orders the better for the
soldier, General Buell seemed at times harsh and severe.  But as
time brought hard campaigns and heavy fighting to the Army of the
Cumberland, the older soldiers who were under Buell saw that he
was actuated solely for their good and the good of the service in
all he did.

The organization of the troops into brigades and divisions first
engaged Buell's attention on assuming command.  On December 2d,
an order was issued creating this organization and designating it
the "Army of the Ohio," consisting of six divisions.  The brigades
were numbered consecutively throughout the army, and not as they
were formed in the divisions.  General G. H. Thomas was assigned
to the command of the First Division, consisting of four brigades.
The entire force of the First Division was at Nashville on March
4th.

The Second Division was organized at Camp Nevin, a camp established
by General Rousseau, when left by Sherman in command after the
latter assumed the command of the department.  General Alexander McD.
McCook, who had relieved Rousseau October 14, by order of Sherman,
was assigned to the command of this division, which consisted also
of four brigades.

The Third Division was placed under the command of General O. M.
Mitchel, who had been in Cincinnati in command at the "Military
Department of Ohio," and who was relieved November 19th, after two
months' service there, superintending the forwarding of troops to
the armies in the field.  This division consisted of three brigades.

General William Nelson, on reporting at Louisville after his Eastern
Kentucky campaign, was placed in command of the Fourth Division,
consisting of three brigades.

The Fifth Division, consisting of three brigades, was placed under
the command of General Thomas L. Crittenden, a son of John J.
Crittenden.

In January, 1862, General Buell organized the Sixth Division, and
relieving General T. J. Wood from the command of the Fifth Brigade,
assigned him as commander of this division, which consisted of
three brigades.

To each brigade was attached a battery of artillery.

In this organization of the "Army of the Ohio," as the new regiments
from the North reported, additional brigades and divisions were
formed from time to time.  Thus organized, the army under Buell, in
the early spring entered upon its first campaign.  There had been
some slight skirmishing during the winter with portions of the command.
A detachment of the Thirty-ninth Indiana, under Lieutenant-Colonel
Jones, met a body of the rebel cavalry a few miles beyond Camp
Nevin, and routed it with slight loss to the enemy.

On December 10th, General R. W. Johnson moved onward his brigade,
and occupied Mumfordsville, sending a detachment of the Thirty-second
Indiana to Green River, where a temporary bridge was constructed.
On the 17th, four companies of this regiment, under Lieutenant-Colonel
Von Trebra, crossed and took position at Rowlett's Station.  General
A. S. Johnston had sent Hindman with his brigade from Bowling Green,
with instructions to destroy the railroad as far north as Green
River.  On the same day that the Thirty-second Indiana crossed the
river, Hindman reached Woodsonville.  On the approach of Hindman,
Von Trebra threw out two companies as skirmishers.  The enemy fell
back with the purpose of decoying the Federals to the point where
his main command of infantry and artillery was posted.  The cavalry--a
squadron of the "Texas Rangers" under Colonel Terry--made a spirited
attack.  The skirmishers rallied by fours to receive this charge.
After repeated charges from the cavalry, which were resisted by the
Thirty-second--in one of which Colonel Terry was killed--Colonel
Willich re-enforced Von Trebra with four additional companies.  After
maintaining their position under fire for an hour and a half, the
Indiana troops repulsed the enemy in every charge, and Hindman's
force then withdrew.  Colonel Willich had in the engagement only
the eight companies of his command, with Cotter's battery.  The
enemy attacked with a force of 1,100 infantry, 250 cavalry, and 4
pieces of artillery.  The Thirty-second Indiana lost 8 men killed
and ten wounded.  After the fall of Bowling Green, the Second
Division reached Nashville on March 3d.

The Third Division in February was ordered to make a demonstration,
moving by forced marches against the enemy's position at Bowling
Green, to prevent troops being sent from there to reinforce Fort
Donelson.  The rebels had commenced their retreat from this place
to Nashville prior to the arrival of Mitchel's command, but the
shells thrown by his artillery on the 14th into the city hastened
the movements of the rear guard of Johnston's army.  Before their
retreat, the enemy burned both bridges over Barren River, and set
fire to a large quantity of military stores, railroad cars, and
other property.  Turchin's brigade, capturing a small ferryboat,
crossed over the river, swollen above the high-water mark by the
heavy rains, entered the city at five o'clock the next morning,
and succeeded in extinguishing the fire and saving a portion of
the railroad cars.  During the succeeding week Mitchel crossed the
greater part of his command over the river, and without his wagons,
reached Edgefield opposite Nashville on the evening of the 14th,
at the same time that General Buell arrived by rail, the latter
using some of the cars captured at Bowling Green.  At Edgefield
Mitchel found both of the bridges into Nashville destroyed, and
his crossing was effected on the steamers that brought Nelson's
division to that place.

The Fourth Division was ordered in February to reinforce the Federal
troops at Fort Donelson.  Nelson, with two brigades, moved from
Camp Wickliffe to the Ohio River on February 13th, and there took
steamer for the Cumberland River.  On his arrival at Fort Donelson,
he found it in possession of the Federal troops, and he then proceeded
by the boats with his command to Nashville, arriving there on the
25th.  Nelson's Third Brigade reported a few days later, having
marched direct from Bowling Green.

General Thomas L. Crittenden's command, organizing at Owensboro,
had a skirmish with a force of 500 rebels at Woodland.  Colonel
Burbridge was sent with some three hundred troops of his own command
and a small force from Colonel McHenry's regiment.  Attacking the
enemy, they routed him, inflicting a loss of some fifty killed,
wounded, and prisoners.  On the 24th, the rebel General Breckenridge
made a demonstration with 4,000 men at Rochester, occupying Greenville
with his cavalry, Crittenden made such disposition of his troops
that the enemy, without risking an attack, returned to Bowling
Green.  Early in February General Buell ordered Crittenden to send
Colonel Cruft with his brigade to report to General Grant.  Cruft,
however, reached Fort Henry after the surrender, but his brigade
was incorporated into Grant's army, and rendered effective service
in the reduction of Fort Donelson.  Later, the brigade was transferred
to General Halleck.  Crittenden, soon after this, proceeded by
boat with the balance of his division, and reported at Nashville,
arriving there at the same time as Nelson's division.

The Sixth division, after aiding in the repair of the railroad,
arrived at Nashville March 6, 1862.

General A. S. Johnston, at no time prior to his retreat had sufficient
force to meet or to resist the advance of the Federal forces.  His
long line, extending from Columbus to Knoxville, invited attack,
and wherever the attack was made his troops were not able to
successfully resist it.  Concentrating his command at Bowling Green,
after Mill Springs and the fall of Fort Henry, he found that, to
save Nashville, it was necessary to make a determined stand at Fort
Donelson, and this he re-enforced with all his available troops.
The fall of Donelson compelled the evacuation of Nashville.  To
the Southern people these reverses were a bitter blow to their high
hopes and boasting threats that the war was to be carried into the
North, and peace was to follow the first victories to their arms.
Duke, in his "History of Morgan's Cavalry," says:  "No subsequent
reverse, although fraught with far more real calamity, ever
created the shame, sorrow, and wild consternation that swept over
the South with the news of the surrender of Fort Donelson.  To some
in the South these reverses were harbingers of the final defeat
and overthrow of the Confederacy."

With the fall of Donelson, after detaching the troops at Columbus,
Johnston's force was reduced to a little over one-half of his
total effective strength as reported by him at Bowling Green.  In
a report to Richmond, he gave the total of his command as barely
forty-three thousand men.

General Buell's army amounted to over seventy-five thousand men, not
all of these available for field duty, as a very large proportion
of the command was needed to maintain his line of supplies, and
the farther his advance the greater the drain on his command for
railroad guards.

With the fall of Donelson, Johnston modified his plans of operations,
and then determined to relinquish the defensive, and to concentrate
all available forces of the Confederacy in the southwest for offensive
operations.  He had, as early as January, 1862, contemplated the
possibility of the disasters that had taken place, and the retreat
consequent upon them, and at that time indicated Corinth, Miss.,
as being the proper place to concentrate the troops.

On January 3d General Buell wrote at length to General Halleck,
proposing a joint campaign against the enemy in "a combined attack
on its centre and flanks," moving the troops by water under protection
of the gunboats, striking for the railroad communications of the
enemy, and destroying his bridges over the Cumberland and Tennessee
Rivers, both of which were protected by batteries, the first at
Dover--Fort Donelson--and the other at Fort Henry, respectively
thirty-one and eighteen miles below the bridges.  To this, on the
6th, General Halleck replied that, situated as he was, he could
render no assistance to Buell's forward movement on Bowling Green,
and advised the delay of the movement, if such co-operation by troops
sent to Cairo and Paducah should be deemed necessary to the plan
of the campaign, of which he knew nothing, and then adds:  "But it
strikes me that to operate from Louisville and Paducah or Cairo,
against an enemy at Bowling Green, is a plain case of exterior
lines, like that of McDowell and Patterson, which, unless each of
the columns is superior to the enemy, leads to disaster ninety-nine
times in a hundred."

On the 30th of January, Buell received a despatch from Halleck,
without particulars, saying that he had ordered an expedition
against Fort Henry.  On the 15th of February Halleck telegraphed
Buell "to move from Bowling Green to Nashville is not good strategy.
Come and help me take and hold Fort Donelson and Clarksville, then
move to Florence, cutting the railroad at Decatur, and Nashville
must be abandoned precisely as Bowling Green has been."  After the
fall of Fort Donelson, and the occupation of Nashville, General
Halleck directed a column of troops under General C. F. Smith to
proceed up the Tennessee River by steamer, and to operate as occasion
presented, either on Corinth, Jackson, or Humboldt, destroying the
railroad communications at these points.  At this time Halleck had
no thought of the subsequent movement of the command, that Johnston
would concentrate at Corinth, or that the Armies of the Ohio and
Tennessee should unite at Pittsburg Landing.  On the 15th General
Smith dropped down the river to Pittsburg Landing, and there placed
his troops in camp.  On the 11th of March, President Lincoln,
by War Order No. 3, created the Department of the Mississippi,
consolidating the three departments under Generals Halleck, Hunter,
and Buell, and placed General Halleck in command.  Halleck at once
ordered Buell to march his army to Savannah, and to execute the
movements that had already been agreed on by them.

Buell immediately gave his attention to the preparation of his
command to carry out these orders.  He directed O. M. Mitchel to
march south, strike, and hold the Memphis and Charleston Railroad.
Organizing the seventh division of his army, Buell assigned General
George W. Morgan to this command.  This division was formed of four
brigades, out of a number of regiments gathered up from different
points in Kentucky.  General Morgan concentrated his entire
command at Cumberland Ford, being directed to take Cumberland Gap
if possible and to occupy East Tennessee if able to enter.  If not,
then to resist any advance of the rebels.

General E. Dumont was placed in command of Nashville.  The Twenty-third
Brigade under Colonel Duffield, composed of four regiments, was
ordered from Kentucky to garrison Murfreesboro, and protect the
road from Shelbyville to Lavergne.

Buell designated the First Division under Thomas, the Second under
McCook, the Fourth under Nelson, the Fifth under Crittenden, and
the Sixth under Wood, to constitute the army under his personal
command, which was to join Halleck in the operations against the
enemy's position at Corinth.  These divisions, with cavalry and
artillery attached made a force of 37,000 effective troops.  In
addition to these, Buell had under his command 36,000 effective men
to defend his communications, maintain his line of supply, enforce
order within his lines, and to perform any special duty assigned
to them.  The muster-rolls of his army showed that he had at this
time 92 regiments of infantry--not including those sent to Halleck
under Cruft.  These regiments aggregated 79,334 men.  He had 11
regiments, 1 battalion, and 7 detached companies of cavalry, making
a total of 11,496 men, and 28 field, and 2 siege batteries, with
3,935 men.  The grand total was 94,765 men.  His effective force,
however, was 73,487 men, comprising 60,882 infantry, 9,237 cavalry,
and 3,368 artillery.

Buell's army, after crossing Duck River, pressed rapidly forward.
The day before Nelson's arrival at the Tennessee River he was
informed by General Grant, to whom he had reported his movements by
courier, that he need not hasten his march, as he could not cross
the river before the following Tuesday, the 8th.  Nelson's entire
division, with forced marches, reached Savannah April 5th, the other
division closely following.  Ammen's brigade of Nelson's division
crossed the river on the afternoon of the 6th, and reported to Buell,
and was engaged in the battle of that day, aiding in resisting the
final attack of Chalmers on the left of Grant's command.  Crittenden's
and McCook's divisions arrived on the field during the night of
the 6th, and took an active part in the fighting of the next day.
The rest of the command arrived on the field after the battle.

The movements of the troops of the "Army of the Ohio" in the battle
of Shiloh and in the operations against Corinth are treated in
Volume II. of this series, and it is not within the purview of this
volume to enter further into the narrative of their service than
to give a few brief facts as to the disposition of the troops, in
order to follow the subsequent events in which the Army of the Ohio
was the main actor.





Chapter IV.




Morgan's and Forest's Raids.


On April 11th, Halleck arrived at Pittsburg Landing and at once
reorganized the troops in his command, designating the divisions of
his army as the right wing, centre, left wing, reserves, and cavalry
under Major-Generals George H. Thomas, D. C. Buell, John Pope, and
J. A. McClernand and Brigadier-General A. J. Smith respectively.
Thomas's command comprised four divisions of the "Army of the
Tennessee," and his old division of the "Army of the Ohio."  The
remainder of the army was under the command of Buell.  After the
fall of Corinth, the enemy breaking his large force into several
smaller commands rendered necessary a similar disposition of the
Federal forces.  Buell was ordered with his command to enter into a
campaign looking to the occupation of East Tennessee.  One division
of his army under O. M. Mitchel left Nashville about the middle
of March under orders to proceed to Murfreesboro and repair the
railroad bridges burned by Johnston on his retreat.  On Colonel
Duffield's reporting with the Twenty-third brigade, Mitchel pressed
forward to Shelbyville and from there by a rapid movement on the
7th of April he occupied Huntsville, Ala., with Turchin's brigade,
Kennett's Ohio cavalry, and Simonson's battery, capturing 170
prisoners, 15 locomotives, and 150 passenger and freight cars, and
a large amount of army stores.  On the 8th, Mitchel ordered Sill
with his brigade to proceed east along the line of the railroad
to seize Stevenson, the junction of the Nashville and Chattanooga,
and Memphis and Charleston Railroads, and directed Turchin with his
command to move west and take possession of Decatur and Tuscumbia.
This was successfully done, and Mitchel was in possession of over
one hundred miles of this important link connecting Corinth with
Richmond in the heart of the enemy's territory.  He then posted
his troops at the more prominent points, ready to move to any place
threatened by the enemy.

On April 29th, Mitchel, hearing of the advance of the force under
Kirby Smith from Bridgeport against the command beyond Stevenson,
moved as rapidly as possible by rail from Huntsville to resist him.
He found the enemy had attacked the detachment posted five miles
west of Bridgeport, and that his troops had driven the enemy's
advance back across Widow's Creek.  The bridge over this creek had
been burned by the enemy on their retreat.  Mitchel strengthened
the detachment and engaged the attention of the enemy by an apparent
effort to cross this creek, while with his main force he advanced
on Bridgeport by a detour by the left and drove that portion of
the enemy in the town across the Tennessee River.  In their retreat
the enemy set fire to the bridge reaching from the west bank of
the river to the Island.  This bridge Mitchel succeeded in saving,
but the bridge east of the Island was completely destroyed.  General
Mitchel then turned his attention to that part of the enemy's force
at Widow's Creek, which he succeeded in capturing, taking in all
some three hundred and fifty prisoners.  Early in May, Mitchel,
who had been placed in command of all the troops between Nashville
and Huntsville, ordered General Negley with the Seventh Brigade,
belonging to McCook's division--who had been left at Columbia
on the advance of the main army upon Savannah--to make an advance
against General Adams with a brigade of troops at Rogersville, Ala.
At the same time Mitchel sent Colonel Lytle from Athens, Ala.,
to cooperate with Negley.  On the 13th, the enemy learning of the
approach of the Federal forces, retreated across the Tennessee
River.  This placed Mitchel in complete position of that portion
of Alabama north of that river.  On May 29th, Mitchel concentrated
Negley's command from Columbia, Turchin's brigade from Huntsville,
and the Eighteenth Ohio under T. R. Stanley from Athens at Fayetteville
for an expedition against Chattanooga under the command of Negley.
These troops passed through Winchester, Cowen, and University Place
to Jasper.  Advancing upon the latter place, the head of his column,
under Colonel Hambright, encountered a brigade of the enemy's troops
under General Adams.  The enemy was driven from the place after a
sharp engagement, leaving his supply and ammunition trains.  His
loss was 18 killed, 20 wounded, and 12 prisoners.  Leaving Jasper,
Negley arrived on the north bank of the Tennessee, opposite
Chattanooga, on the 7th.  Negley, on the evening of that day and the
morning of the next, bombarded Chattanooga, and made a demonstration
of crossing the river and attacking the town.  General Duke says:
"The commandant of the place, General Leadbetter, had two or three
guns in battery and replied, when the gunners, who were the most
independent fellows I ever saw, chose to work the guns.  The defence
of the place was left entirely to the individual efforts of those
who chose to defend it, and nothing prevented its capture but the
fact that the enemy could not cross the river."

Negley then withdrew and encamped his command at Shelbyville.

General G. W. Morgan, under orders from Buell, assumed command of
the forces in Eastern Kentucky early in April.  Acting under his
orders he proceeded to Cumberland Ford and commenced operations at
once against Cumberland Gap.  This gap is situated in the Cumberland
range on the boundary line between Kentucky and Tennessee, near the
Western Virginia line, is a deep depression in the mountain range,
making a natural roadway through it, and is the centre of all the
roads in that section of country.  It is a stronghold protected by
nature with abrupt slopes on the mountains, frequently so steep as
to be almost perpendicular, with the ranges much broken by spurs,
knobs, and ravines, protected by parallel ranges of less height in
close proximity on the east and west.  Morgan, after encountering
the enemy in several skirmishes, determined either to compel him
to fight or retreat.  He sent General Spears with three brigades to
Pine Mountain, on the road to Big Creek Gap.  General Kirby Smith,
commanding the enemy's forces in East Tennessee, placed General
Barton's command of two brigades of infantry in Big Creek Gap,
and then advanced with some eight thousand men under his immediate
command to cut Spears off, and to threaten the Federal forces at
Cumberland Ford.  Morgan, under orders, withdrew Spears, but learning
a few days later from Buell of the operations of Negley's command
before Chattanooga, and that Kirby Smith had proceeded with a part
of his command to the relief of that place, resumed the advance.
Negley's movements had caused Smith to suspend his operations,
but when he heard of Negley's withdrawal he proceeded at once to
execute his plans against Morgan.  On June 18th, the latter, finding
that Kirby Smith had taken his entire command away from Cumberland
Gap, marched his troops up Powell's Valley and late in the evening
of that day reached the fortifications, found the Gap empty, and
took possession.  This natural stronghold had been extensively
fortified by the rebels, who regarded the position of their troops
such as to prevent the success of any attempt on the part of the
Federal forces to obtain possession without a battle.  The enemy were
completely out-maneuvred, and General Morgan had the satisfaction
of occupying this fortress without the loss of any of his command.

In the early part of May, the rebel Colonel John H. Morgan's command
of some five hundred men, in the neighborhood of Pulaski, Tenn.,
captured a wagon train with about four hundred Federal troops,
mostly convalescents going to Columbia.  On the night of the 5th,
Morgan reached Lebanon and quartered his entire force in houses in
the town.  On the evening of the 6th, Dumont with his command from
Nashville, joined by that of Duffield from Murfreesboro, surprised
and attacked Morgan's troopers, completely routing them after
a severe engagement.  Morgan with a few men under his immediate
command escaped after a chase of twenty-one miles from Lebanon,
crossing the Cumberland River on a ferry.  Dumont had with him
detachments of Wynkoop's Seventh Pennsylvania cavalry, of Wolford's
First Kentucky cavalry and of Green Clay Smith's regiment of Kentucky
cavalry.  Morgan's loss was 150 men captured, with the same number
of horses.  The balance of his command was dispersed.  Wolford
and Smith were both wounded, and the Federals lost 6 killed and 25
wounded.  On the 11th, Morgan with his men that had escaped, and
two new companies, made a raid on the Louisville and Nashville
Railroad at Cave City, captured a freight train of forty-eight
cars and burned it.  He also captured a passenger train, which had
a few Federal officers on it.  His object was to rescue the men of
his command taken prisoners at Lebanon, but in this he failed, as
they had been sent North by boat.

From this place Morgan reported with his command at Chattanooga to
refit, prepatory to his first extended raid into Kentucky.  Here
he was joined by two full companies of Texan cavalry under Captains
R. M. Gano and John Huffman, both native Kentuckians, who, on
reporting at Corinth, had asked to be ordered on duty with Morgan
and his command, enlarged from a squadron to a full regiment.  After
he had obtained all the recruits he could at Chattanooga he set
out for Knoxville, to further increase his command and to re-arm.
It was at this place that he received the two mountain howitzers
which were used so effectively in the first raid into Kentucky, and
which just before his command started on the Ohio raid were taken
from it by Bragg's ordnance officers.  This came near raising
a mutiny, and the only consolation that Morgan's men had was that
Bragg lost the guns within two weeks after they were taken away
from them.  In the latter part of June, Colonel Hunt, of Georgia,
reported at Knoxville with a regiment of "Partisan Rangers," nearly
four hundred strong, ordered to accompany Morgan on his contemplated
raid, making the strength of his entire command 876 effective men.

Morgan set out from Knoxville on the morning of July 4, 1862,
taking the road to Sparta, one hundred and four miles due west
from Knoxville, which was reached on the evening of the third day
of this march.  The Union men of East Tennessee frequently gave
these raiders medicine of their own prescription, lying in wait
for them and firing upon them from the bushes.  This was a new
experience for these freebooting troopers, who wherever they went
in the South were generally made welcome to the best of everything,
being regarded as the beau-ideals of Southern chivalry.  On the 8th,
Morgan's command reached the Cumberland River at the ford near the
small village of Celina, eighteen miles from Tompkinsville, where
a detachment of the Ninth Pennsylvania, 250 strong, was encamped
under command of Major Jordan.  Morgan learned at Knoxville the fact
that a Federal force was at this point, and was told the particulars
of it on his arrival at Celina, and he now wished to surprise and
capture the entire command.  Sending a detachment under Gano by the
right to cut off Jordan's retreat, at five o'clock in the morning
of the 9th Morgan moved to the attack.  Jordan posted himself on
a thickly wooded hill and fired several volleys at the rebels as
they advanced over an open field, but being outnumbered was routed
with a loss of four killed, six wounded, and nineteen prisoners.
The enemy's loss was several wounded, among them Colonel Hunt,
who died a few days later from the effects of his wound.  Morgan
paroled the prisoners and then left for Glasgow, reaching there at
one o'clock that night, where they were received with open arms by
the citizens, breakfast cooked for the entire command, and three
days' rations prepared for them.  From here the command marched
all night, and at eleven o'clock next morning was within a short
distance of Lebanon.  Morgan, prepatory to an attack, despatched
one of his companies to destroy the railroad north of the town
to prevent the arrival of reinforcements.  The company struck the
railroad at New Hope Church, and had just commenced their work of
destruction when a train came up with a number of Federal troops
on it, who drove the rebels off in confusion, but for some unknown
cause the train then returned to Louisville, leaving Morgan
unmolested at Lebanon, who advanced to the attack and drove in
the pickets.  After a slight skirmish the place was surrendered
by Lieutenant-Colonel Johnson of the Twenty-eighth Kentucky, with
a small detachment of that command.  Morgan destroyed some fifty
thousand dollars' worth of Government stores.  He left Lebanon at
two o'clock in the afternoon, passed through Springfield without
halting the command, and pushed on for Harrodsburg, reaching
there at nine o'clock on Sunday morning.  Here he sent Gano with
his squadron around Lexington to burn the railroad bridges on the
Kentucky Central Railroad, in order to prevent troops being sent
there from Cincinnati.  Another detachment was sent to destroy
the bridge on the Louisville and Lexington Railroad, cutting off
reinforcements from Louisville.  Morgan's design was to make it
appear that he intended to attack Frankfort, then turn suddenly to
the right and attempt the capture of Lexington.  He had given out
everywhere in Kentucky that he was marching on the State Capital
with a force five thousand strong, and had succeeded in spreading
the utmost alarm.  On the 15th Morgan reached Midway, captured
the telegraph operator and installed his own operator at the same
instrument, sent despatches in the name of Federal Generals, and
changed the orders for the movement of troops.  He telegraphed in all
directions, without the slightest regard for truth, and succeeded
in creating the utmost confusion and alarm at Cincinnati, Louisville,
Lexington, and Frankfort.  The command left Midway late in the
afternoon and started for Georgetown, which place they reached
at sundown, where they met a small force of Home Guards, who were
driven out of town.  From here Morgan sent a force to burn the
bridges on the Kentucky Railroad between Lexington and Paris.  Then
learning how strongly Lexington was garrisoned, he gave up all
thought of attacking it, and finding that the Federal forces were
closing in on him commenced his return south.  On the 18th, Morgan
attacked Cynthiana, which was garrisoned by some five hundred men,
under the command of Lieutenant-Colonel John J. Landrum, of the
Eighteenth Kentucky.  The fighting continued for two hours, when
the Federal force was driven from the town and nearly all captured.
Landrum and a few of his command escaped.  The Federals lost
16 killed and 40 wounded, and 14 of the enemy were killed and 42
wounded.  The rebels claimed to have captured 420 prisoners, who
were at once paroled.  The depot, with a large amount of Government
stores, was burned.  Morgan then left for Paris, where he arrived
late in the evening and rested there that night.  About eight
o'clock in the morning his command was driven out of this place by
the troops under General Green Clay Smith, numbering some twelve
hundred men, who killed 2, wounded six, and captured several
prisoners.  Morgan pushed through Winchester, reaching that point
about twelve o'clock, crossed the Kentucky River just at dark, and
arrived at Richmond at four o'clock in the morning.  Here he rested
his command twelve hours, then marched toward Crab Orchard, arriving
about daybreak the next morning.  It had been his intention to
make a stand at Richmond, but there were too many troops marching
to attack him.  Besides General Smith's command, which was following
him closely, Colonel Wolford was collecting forces in the southern
part of Kentucky to intercept him, and troops were EN ROUTE from
Louisville to aid in the pursuit.  Morgan left Crab Orchard at
eleven o'clock the same morning, and reached Somerset about sunset.
At these two places he captured 130 wagons, with large quantities
of Government stores, of which he loaded as much into wagons for
the use of his command as he wanted, and burned the rest.  From
Somerset he marched to Stagall's Ferry on the Cumberland River,
and there crossed, reaching Monticello, twenty-one miles from the
river, that night, when all pursuit ended.

Morgan's object in making this raid was to obtain recruits
and horses, to equip and arm his men, and to prepare for his fall
raiding trip.  In his official report he says:  "I left Knoxville
on the 4th day of this month with about nine hundred men, and returned
to Livingston on the 28th inst. with nearly twelve hundred, having
been absent just twenty-four days, during which time I have traveled
over a thousand miles, captured seventeen towns, destroyed all
the Government supplies and arms in them, dispersed about fifteen
hundred Home Guards, and paroled nearly twelve hundred regular
troops.  I lost in killed, wounded, and missing of the number that
I carried into Kentucky, about ninety."

When Buell received his orders to open the campaign in East
Tennessee, the key to that part of the State was Chattanooga, and
this was the objective point of his campaign.  With the concentration
of the Southern forces in Mississippi, both Halleck and Buell thought
that a favorable time had arrived for this movement, anticipating
that no advance of the enemy's forces would be made to dispute the
occupancy of those portions of Kentucky and Tennessee already held
by the Federal forces.  The great problem with Buell was to furnish
supplies to his army, now some three hundred miles away from its
base at Louisville, dependent during the greater part of the year
on one line of road, which was subject to being raided at any time,
bridges burned, the roadbed destroyed, and the entire road rendered
useless for months.  To continue this line the many miles through
the enemy's country, subject to increased risks before Chattanooga
could be reached, was a matter that required a great amount of careful
thought and deliberation.  Buell had tried infantry in stockades
at bridges, and was satisfied that this was not the proper solution
to the problem.  He then made earnest and repeated application for
more cavalry, to protect his communications and to meet and repulse
the enemy's raiding parties before they could reach his line
of communication.  If he was to move with his command into East
Tennessee, he regarded the line from Nashville to Chattanooga as
the proper road on which he should depend for his supplies, and to
which he should give his care and attention for this purpose.

Halleck considered the line from Memphis to Chattanooga the one
over which the supplies for Buell's army should pass.  The latter
objected to this, by reason of that road crossing the Tennessee
River twice, thus giving two long bridges to rebuild and protect,
instead of one, and for the additional reason that this road ran
for a considerable distance parallel with the front of the enemy,
and thus invited raiding parties.  While the risks attending the other
road were great enough, Buell regarded the Memphis and Charleston
road far the more objectionable.  Besides, he wished to move through
Middle Tennessee to McMinnville, and thence to Chattanooga, with
Nashville as his depot of supplies.  In this Halleck overruled him
and directed that he march his command on the line of the Memphis
road, repairing the track as he advanced.

While this matter was under consideration by the Federal commanders,
Bragg, who had been appointed to the position of General made vacant
by the death of General Johnston, and who had succeeded Beauregard
in the command in the West, put his columns in motion eastward to
occupy Chattanooga.  Johnston, on the retreat from Nashville, sent
all surplus army stores to Chattanooga, and Bragg now regarded that
point as the proper place to refit his command, and from which to
assume the offensive, and open the campaign he had planned to free,
for a time at least, Tennessee from the control of the Federal
forces.

With the start thus made by both commands for Chattanooga,
everything was in favor of Bragg, whose movements were unimpeded,
as his route was south of the Tennessee, through his own territory,
with his lines of communication open when he arrived at that place.
With Buell, the repairs of the railroad retarded his progress,
and the advance weakened his command by the increased number of
detachments required to guard his line as it lengthened.

McCook's and Crittenden's commands were started eastward, the
first from Corinth, and the latter from Booneville.  McCook reached
Florence on the 15th of June, where ferryboats had been provided by
Mitchel for the crossing of his division.  A delay was occasioned
here by the report that Nelson had been attacked, but this was found
to be false; and, on the 26th, the divisions of McCook, Crittenden,
and Nelson crossed, and started at once for Athens, which place
they reached on the 29th.  On the same day Buell established his
headquarters at Huntsville, Ala., and gave personal supervision to
the repair of the railroads, now extremely urgent.  He placed his
troops by division upon the different sections of the line, under
orders to push repairs with all possible expedition.  These troops,
as repairs were made, advanced from time to time, concentrating on
the line of the Nashville and Chattanooga road.  The repairs to
this railroad were completed on July 28th, and on the Nashville
and Decatur road on August 3d.  During the latter part of July the
last division of Buell's army, under Thomas, crossed the Tennessee
River, being relieved--on the line of the Memphis and Charleston
Railroad--by troops from Grant's army.  Thomas established his
headquarters at Dechard.  It was on this march with his brigade
that General Robert L. McCook was murdered by guerillas.  He was
riding in an ambulance, ill at the time, and unarmed.

Nelson's division had been sent to Murfreesboro about the middle
of July, to drive Forrest, who, with his cavalry, on the 13th,
attacked the Federal garrison in the town.  The post was under the
command of General T. L. Crittenden, and the troops composting the
Twenty-third Brigade were under the command of Colonel Duffield.
There was, unfortunately, a disagreement between the ranking officers
at the post that led to the most unfortunate results.  Colonel
Lester, of the Third Minnesota, during the absence of Duffield,
commanding the brigade, had, by reason of the unpleasant relations
existing between portions of the command, widely distributed them
in different parts of the town.  On the return of Crittenden and
Duffield on July 11th, neither of them assumed command, and their
dignity, thinking more of their own personal importance than the
good of the service.  With no one in command, there was no unity
or proper "esprit de corps" among the troops, and no disposition
for defence when Forrest made his attack.  the latter had advanced
through McMinnville from Chattanooga, with about two thousand men,
and arrived at Murfreesboro about five o'clock on the morning of
the 13th, captured the pickets, and made disposition of his forces
for immediate attack.  Forming his entire command into columns of
fours, with the Eighth Texas in front, Forrest moved forward on a
trot until he reached the Federal encampments, which Colonel Wharton,
with two regiments, charged.  The Second Georgia dashed into the
town, captured the provost guard and all Federal officers and men
on the streets, seized and secured the supplies.

Major Smith with the Kentucky troops was sent to the rear of the
Federal command to cut off the retreat.  The Texans charged into
the camp of the Ninth Michigan, and reaching the tents, roused
some of the men from sleep.  A portion of that regiment, however,
rallied by the officers, made a handsome stand and drove the Texans
off.  Duffield was wounded while rallying his men.  The Second
Georgia charged into the public square and surrounded the Court
House, occupied by a company of the Ninth Michigan, who twice
repulsed the attacking force.  Reinforcements being brought forward,
the doors of the building were battered down and the company was
forced to surrender.  Forrest now attacked the Third Minnesota on
the east bank of Stone's River, about a mile and a half from town,
which had just left their camp to join the force in the town, when
Forrest with three regiments moved to the attack.

Colonel Lester formed his command in line of battle, with nine
companies of infantry and four pieces of artillery, and opened fire
on the rebels as they advanced.  Forrest attempting to get to the
rear of his force, encountered the camp guard of some hundred men
left by Lester to protect his camp, posted behind a strong barricade
of wagons and some large ledges of rocks, difficult to carry.
Forrest at once ordered a charge which was twice made and repulsed.
Leading his men the third time, he succeeded in driving the guard
from their position to the main command, posted some six hundred
yards away.  It was now one o'clock, and beyond the skirmishes
between the commands but little had been accomplished.

Forrest's officers urged him to withdraw with the results obtained
up to that time.  This he refused to do, and made disposition of
his command for further attack on the Federal forces occupying the
camp of the Ninth Michigan, which consisted of this regiment and a
company of the Second Kentucky cavalry.  He dismounted two of his
regiments and threw forward skirmishers, directed them to open
brisk firing, and sent the Second Georgia dismounted to attack on
the left.  After this he brought up the Eighth Texas and placed
them in position to charge on the left.

Having made this disposition of his forces, he sent forward, under
a flag of truce, a written demand for the surrender of Duffield's
command, which was complied with at once.  After this, Forrest
demanded the surrender of the Third Minnesota, which Lester, after
an interview with Duffield and a consultation with his own officers,
made, surrendering some five hundred infantry of his regiment and
two sections of Hewitt's battery of artillery.  The entire forces
surrendered were seventeen hundred troops with four pieces of
artillery.  Forrest captured about six hundred horses and mules,
and a very large quantity of stores and Government supplies, part
of which he carried away and the rest he destroyed, to the value
of nearly a million of dollars.

This loss occurred the day after the opening of the road from
Nashville south, and very seriously interfered with the movements
at the front.  Nelson endeavored to intercept Forest, but could not
successfully "chase cavalry with infantry."  Forrest on Nelson's
approach withdrew to McMinnville, and from there made a dash on
Lebanon, some fifty miles distant, where he expected to find a force
of five hundred Federal cavalry.  This force escaped him, and he
then swept around to the south of Nashville, captured 150 bridge
guards and burned four bridges.  Learning that Nelson was again in
pursuit of him, Forrest returned to McMinnville.

From this point he made repeated raids on the line of road south
of Nashville, leaving Morgan to operate against the Louisville and
Nashville Railroad.  These raiders were able to move almost without
opposition, as Buell was without sufficient cavalry to cope with
them.  The latter had been compelled to divide his cavalry into
small bands to run down the guerillas that had been operating on
his line of railroad.  Now that Forrest's and Morgan's commands
had become so formidable, he was compelled to organize his cavalry
into united bodies for better defensive movements against these
raiders.  The Second Indiana, Fourth and Fifth Kentucky, and
Seventh Pennsylvania cavalry regiments he formed into one brigade,
and on August 11th, he sent it under General R. W. Johnson against
Morgan, who had been ordered by Bragg to break the railroad between
Louisville and Nashville, in order to retard Buell's movement north
to Louisville as much as possible, and who was operating about
Gallatin, Tennessee, which he had captured with 200 prisoners.
Colonel Boone was in command of the Federal forces at this point.
Morgan hearing that Boone slept in the town away from the camp,
sent a small force to capture him, which was done, just as he had
dressed and was starting to camp.  Morgan then destroyed a railroad
bridge south of Gallatin, and the tunnel six miles north, the roof
of which was supported with large beams on upright timbers.  Running
some freight cars into the tunnel, they were set on fire and some
eight hundred feet of it destroyed, the roof caving in.

Johnson sought to attack Morgan before he could unite with Forrest,
who was on his Lebanon raid at that time, but Morgan hearing that
Johnson had infantry and artillery supports, endeavored to avoid an
engagement.  Johnson forced the fight, engaged Morgan with spirit,
and although repulsed three times, after the first and second
repulse formed promptly and renewed the attack.  After the third
repulse the Federal forces commenced retreating, when Morgan followed,
attacked Johnson's retreating forces and drove the Federals some
three miles.  Johnson reformed his lines twice, but the enemy
broke, and drove them each time.  He then reformed the remnant of
his command and fought the enemy dismounted, when the latter charged
again, and Johnson, seeing that the greater part of his command
had scattered, surrendered.  The force that was with him at this
time was only a small band of some twenty-five soldiers and a few
officers.  His loss was 20 killed and 42 wounded.  Duke in his
"History of Morgan's Cavalry," says:  "A great deal of censure was
at the time cast upon these men"--Johnson's command--"and they were
accused of arrant cowardice by the Northern press.  Nothing could
have been more unjust.  They attacked with spirit and without
hesitation, and were unable to close with us on account of their
heavy loss in men and horses.  I have seen troops much more highly
boasted than these were before their defeat, behave not nearly so
well."  And of Johnson, Duke says:  "His attack was made promptly
and in splendid style; his dispositions throughout the first fight
were good, and he exhibited fine personal courage and energy."





Chapter V.




Bragg's Advance into Kentucky.


After Nelson's pursuit of Forrest on his raid around Nashville, he
was ordered by General Buell to McMinnville.  Crittenden and McCook
with their divisions were at Battle Creek, Thomas and Wood were on
the line of the Nashville and Chattanooga Railroad, and Mitchel's
division, under the command of Rousseau, on the line of railroad
from Decatur to Columbia.  Bragg had so well concealed his intention
as to his advance, that Buell was compelled to be in readiness
to meet him in the event of one of three movements, which it was
supposed he would make if he moved before Buell was ready to advance
upon him.

The latter thought Bragg would either move by the left, pass
around into Northern Alabama, cross at Decatur, and press north
for Nashville.  This he regarded as the most likely movement.  Or,
second, more direct, crossing the mountains, pass through McMinnville,
and so on to Nashville.  Or, third, to move by way of Knoxville
into Eastern Kentucky.  The latter, up to the first of September,
Buell regarded as hardly a possibility, supposing Bragg's movements
all indicated an advance on Nashville.  Thomas was ordered to assume
command of the troops at McMinnville, to repair the railroad from
Tullahoma to that point as he went, and to establish posts of
observation with signal stations on the mountains to watch Bragg's
movements.  Thomas assumed command at McMinnville on the 19th
of August, on the same day that Bragg sent a column of three or
four thousand troops across the river at Chattanooga.  Buell, in
anticipation of this being the advance of Bragg's entire army en
route for Nashville, despatched Wood to the vicinity of McMinnville,
to aid in resisting his advance.  He then ordered McCook to move
from Battle Creek to the Therman road, where he was to hold the
enemy in check until re-enforced by Thomas.  Crittenden's division
was sent up the valley through Tracy City, by the Altamont road,
to be within supporting distance of McCook, and to watch the road
from there to Chattanooga.  Thomas was directed to hold his command
in readiness to move at a moment's notice, either on the Therman
or Dunlap road.  On the 22d, Buell learned that Bragg's whole army
was north of the Tennessee, and he then, further to concentrate his
command, moved his supplies from the depot at Stenvson to Dechard.
Thomas on the same day telegraphed from McMinnville to Buell that
he believed Bragg's movements meant an advance of his entire army
into Kentucky.  Thomas reconnoitered thoroughly the front of his
position, and ascertained that the enemy was not there and not
as yet even in Sequatchie Valley.  This he reported to Buell, and
suggested that Wood's division be posted at Sparta, to intercept
Bragg's advance, if made through that place; that another division be
left at Dechard, to watch any movement in that direction, and that
the remaining portions of the command be concentrated at McMinnville,
ready to offer battle to Bragg's army if it should advance on that
front.  Thomas regarded Bragg's advance either on Nashville or
Louisville as possible only through McMinnville or Sparta, and he
proposed to attack before Bragg could reach either.  On the next
day Buell, under advices that he regarded as reliable, ordered the
First, Second, Fourth, Fifth, and Sixth Divisions to concentrate
at Altamont, intending there to offer battle.  He sent detailed
instructions to Thomas, in charge of the movement, as to the
disposition of his command, with orders in the event of defeat to
fall back, keeping his force between the enemy and Nashville.  On
the 25th, Thomas reached Altamont, and finding no enemy nearer
than the Sequatchie Valley, and regarding Bragg's advance by way of
Altamont improbable, owing to the bad condition of the roads, and
lack of forage and water, returned to McMinnville with the Fourth
and Sixth Divisions.  On the 30th, Buell gave orders concentrating
his entire command at Murfreesboro, still under the impression that
Bragg expected to strike for Nashville.  The latter's movements
were so well guarded, and Buell had as yet so little reliable
information in regard to them, that he hesitated even after the
order was issued, and the next day asked Thomas's advice in regard
to it, in the light of any further information as to the movements
of the enemy.  Thomas advised that the movement proceed, having
been commenced, and gave a plan of battle in the movement from
Murfreesboro.  Thomas, on the 30th, captured a despatch that Bragg,
on the 27th, had sent to Van Dorn, in command in Mississippi,
conveying to him in full his plans in regard to his advance into
Kentucky, and informed him that Kirby Smith, re-enforced with two
divisions from this army, had turned Cumberland Gap, and was marching
on Lexington, Ky.

Buell's army at Murfreesboro consisted of five divisions under
his immediate command, the troops being then on the line of the
railroad.  In addition he had two divisions sent to him from the
Army of the Tennessee--General J. C. Davis' division, under General
R. B. Mitchell, which arrived at Murfreesboro on the 2d of September,
and General E. A. Paine's division, under the command of General J.
M. Palmer, which reached Nashville on the 10th.  This concentration
of the army at Murfreesboro of course withdrew all troops from the
mountains, leaving Bragg unhampered in the selection of his route,
either west to Nashville, or north to Louisville.  He made choice
of the latter, and pushed down the valley of the Cumberland to
Carthage, where he crossed, moving through Scottsboro and Glasgow,
to strike the Louisville and Nashville Railroad.  Bragg entered
Kentucky with five divisions, making an army of some thirty-five
thousand men, divided between Generals Polk and Hardee.  While at
Murfreesboro Buell first learned definitely of Bragg's movements,
and of his intended advance into Kentucky.  The news of the movements
of Kirby Smith and of Nelson's defeat also reached him here.

On August 16th, Buell had ordered Nelson to assume command
in Kentucky, and to make such dispositions of his troops as would
resist any movement by Kirby Smith, then threatening Cumberland
Gap.  The plan of the rebels in their campaign, which was intended
to free the soil of the South from the Northern armies by carrying
the war into the North, was for Kirby Smith to move through Eastern
Kentucky to Lexington and thence to Cincinnati, and for Bragg to
push through Central Kentucky to Louisville.  With these two cities
in the possession of their armies it would be a short step to enter
upon the rich fields of the Northern States, and with the large
number of new recruits gained en route their armies could resist
any Northern troops that would be brought against them.  This had
been Sidney Johnston's plan to be worked out after he had achieved
the victory he contemplated at Shiloh, and Bragg as his successor
endeavored to carry out Johnston's plan of campaign.  One was as
much a success as the other, and in both the hour of defeat trod
so quickly on their apparent victory that the campaign in each
instance ultimately resulted in failure.  So far as the advance of
Bragg and Kirby Smith into Kentucky was concerned, by it the South
suffered a loss instead of a gain, and was compelled from that
time on to act upon a steadily lessening line of defence.  Bragg's
report shows he took a smaller command out than he took into the
State.

On the same day that Nelson's orders were dated, Stevenson appeared
with his division before Cumberland Gap.  George W. Morgan in command
there immediately sent out cavalry to the adjoining gaps to watch
for further movements of the enemy.  When a short distance from
Roger's Gap the cavalry struck the head of Kirby Smith's army
on its advance to Kentucky.  Smith's forces were those of his own
command in East Tennessee, re-enforced by the divisions of McCown
from Mississippi, sent him by Bragg, and also the two fine brigades
of Cleburne and Preston Smith, ordered to report to him from
Chattanooga.  Kirby Smith moved with his main command to Barboursville,
and ordered McCown to Cumberland Ford with a large force, which cut
off Morgan, in the Gap, from his base of supplies in that direction.
Leaving Stevenson in Morgan's front to engage his attention, Kirby
Smith with his entire force advanced into Kentucky, thus entirely
cutting off re-enforcements and supplies to Morgan's command.  The
latter failing in his efforts to bring on an engagement, placed
his command on half rations, and after a council of war abandoned
the Gap, dismounting his siege guns and destroying what stores and
ammunition he could not remove, marched out with his entire command,
to the east of Kirby Smith's force, to the Ohio River.  John Morgan's
cavalry annoyed the command for some days, without inflicting any
material loss.

When Nelson reached Kentucky he found that a new department had
been created, with General H. G. Wright in command, embracing that
part of the State east of Louisville and the line of the Nashville
Railroad, taken from under Buell's command.  Wright ordered Nelson
to proceed to Lexington and assume command of all the troops in
that locality, nearly all of them new regiments, principally from
Ohio and Kentucky, hastily gathered together, without drill or
discipline.  Nelson concentrated these troops at Lexington, and
organized them into a division with Generals M. D. Manson, J. S.
Jackson, and Charles Cruft as brigade commanders.  On August 23d,
Nelson sent a detachment of the Seventh Kentucky cavalry and Colonel
Child's battalion of Tennessee cavalry, under Colonel Metcalfe's
command, to Big Hill to resist the advance of the enemy.  These
troops being attacked by a greatly superior force the Seventh Kentucky
broke and fled, leaving, however, about one-fourth of the command
with the Tennessee battalion, which, after fighting bravely, was
compelled to retire.  Metcalfe rallied his men, but on the approach
of the enemy they again broke and ran, leaving the Tennesseeans
to resist the attack, which they so far succeeded in doing as to
secure a safe retreat to Richmond.  The enemy pushed forward and
demanded the surrender of the town, but learning that re-enforcements
had arrived, retired.  Nelson then ordered Manson's and Cruft's
brigades, under the command of the former, to proceed to Richmond.
On arriving there Manson went into camp south of the town and threw
out his pickets.  The cavalry, on the 29th, reported an advance
of the enemy in large numbers, and that a heavy force of infantry
was driving in the pickets.  Manson advanced to their support
with his own brigade, leaving Cruft with his command at Richmond.
Moving forward with his troops he drove the attacking party back
and formed his line of battle on each side of the road some two
miles from the town.  The enemy attacked with infantry, artillery,
and cavalry, but was driven back with the loss of one field piece
and several men captured.  Manson then occupied Rogersville, where
he remained in camp all night.  In the morning he ordered Cruft to
join him, and moved out beyond the town to meet the enemy's advance.
After heavy fighting for over an hour the left of Manson's command
was fiercely assaulted, which being re-enforced, the right began
to give way in confusion.

The troops were rallied on a new line a mile to the rear, but as this
was badly posted for defense, the command was withdrawn from this
position to the line occupied the day before, and from this--the
enemy attacking in heavy force--the Federal troops were again routed
and driven back to their camps, where the last stand was made and
the heaviest fighting took place.  Nelson, arriving on the ground,
assumed command and endeavored to stem the tide of defeat.  The
enemy advanced in such overwhelming numbers upon the position of
the Federal forces that they were driven in complete disorder at
all points from the field.  Nelson was twice wounded, but was able
to reach Louisville with several detachments of his routed troops.
Here he assumed command and bent every energy to the organization
of new troops, forming the citizens in commands for the defence
of that city.  Nelson's losses in the engagement at Richmond were
two hundred and twenty-five killed, six hundred wounded, and over
two thousand captured.  He also lost nine guns.  His entire command
consisted of some seven thousand troops.  The enemy's force was
twelve thousand men and thirty-six pieces of artillery, and he
lost over nine hundred killed and wounded.  Kirby Smith then pushed
his command north, occupying Lexington, and sent out detachments
threatening Louisville and Cincinnati.  On the 6th of September,
General Heth with some six thousand troops advanced and took
position a few miles south of Covington.  He was ordered by Kirby
Smith not to attack, but to hold his command in readiness to move
at a moment's notice to form a junction with Bragg, then marching
north through Kentucky.

Smith, while waiting to form a junction with Bragg, was actively
employed in gathering supplies for his army in the richest part
of the State.  He also sought to obtain recruits for his command,
but recruiting for the infantry service did not prove a success.
During the entire period the rebel army was in Kentucky not one
entire infantry regiment was raised.  Individual enlistment was
constantly going on, but the leading officers of that army estimated
their entire gain was not over five thousand men, including three
regiments of cavalry recruited under Buford.  Heth's advance alarmed
the three cities of Covington, Newport, and Cincinnati, spreading
consternation among all classes.  Martial law was proclaimed, and
all able-bodied citizens were ordered to report for work on the
fortifications south of Covington.  These works were manned by the
population of the surrounding country, coming to Cincinnati to
defend that city from pillage.  Regiments of "Squirrel Hunters"
were formed, and a show of force was kept up until veteran troops
could be brought forward to take their place.  Heth wished to attack,
but Kirby Smith would not permit this, as he anticipated a battle
with Buell, and that Bragg would have to fight his entire army, in
which event he would need every available man.  Heth fell back in
a few days and on October 4th Smith reported with his command to
Bragg at Frankfort.

Bragg's movements became clearly apparent to Buell while the
latter was concentrating at Murfreesboro.  On September 7th, Buell
started with Ammen's, Crittenden's, McCook's, Wood's, Rousseau's,
and Mitchell's divisions in the race between the opposing armies
for Louisville. If Bragg moved energetically and with the intent
of taking Louisville without fighting a battle in Kentucky before
he reached that city, his start in the race and the shorter line
he was moving on gave him the decided advantage in the movement.
Buell's object was to overtake Bragg, and, if necessary, force the
fighting.  This would compel the latter to move his army so closely
on the one road open to him that his movements would be necessarily
slow.  Failing in this, Buell's plans were to press Bragg so hard
that if he refused to fight in Kentucky he must leave the State in
possession of the Federal forces before he could gain anything by
his advance.

Buell, after reaching Nashville, crossed the river there at once
and pushed on with all possible speed.  He left Thomas's, Palmer's,
and Negley's divisions, with Thomas in command, as the garrison
at this place.  So important did Buell regard the holding of
Nashville, that he determined to weaken his immediate command and
leave this strong force under his most trusted subordinate, to
retain possession of that point.  He considered his army in pursuit
of Bragg of sufficient strength to make the fight for the possession
of Kentucky, and in the event Bragg was driven from that State he
would concentrate in the vicinity of Nashville, where the battle
for that important position with Middle Tennessee would yet have to
be fought.  In the happening of the latter event it was an absolute
necessity that the Federal army should hold Nashville as a point
at which to concentrate and move to the attack.  If the result of
the movement in Kentucky should be the defeat of Buell, then it was
important that the general in command of the forces at Nashville
should be an officer of experience, to save the troops left there,
in their retreat to rejoin the main army.  Buell regarded the
holding of Nashville by our forces as second only to the safety
of Kentucky, and made the disposition of his command accordingly.
With this view, on the 12th, he ordered R. B. Mitchell's division
to return to Nashville and form part of the garrison of that place.
Bragg, on the 8th, had reached the railroad, where he burned the
bridge at Salt River, and for some days in his northward march was
engaged in tearing up the railroad as he advanced.  On the 13th,
his cavalry reached Munfordville beyond Green River.

Buell, on the 10th, learning that additional forces of Bragg's command
were crossing the Cumberland at Gainesville, at once countermanded
the order to Mitchell, and directed Thomas to place Negley in
command of Nashville, and if he regarded it best to do so, to leave
Paine's division [Palmer in command] with Negley's to hold that
place.  If Paine could be spared, then Thomas was to move forward
by forced marches with his division and Paine's, and unite his
command with the main army.  Thomas, knowing that Bragg had left
a large force to threaten Nashville, ordered Paine's division to
remain there, and started at once with the first division to report
to Buell.

Bragg, to reach Munfordville, had only sixty-eight miles to march
from his crossing of the Cumberland River, while Buell had one
hundred and five miles to travel before he could intercept him at
that place.  Bragg's advance had reached and attacked Munfordville
before Buell's army had arrived at Bowling Green.  On Bragg's
advance under General Chalmers, arriving at Munfordville, his
cavalry engaged the attention of the garrison there under Colonel
John T. Wilder, while the artillery and infantry were being placed
in position.  On the 13th, demand was made of Wilder to surrender.
This he refused to do.  With the early light of the next day an
assault was made by the enemy, which was repulsed with heavy loss.
Two detachments reported during the day, reinforcing Wilder's command.
One of them was under Colonel Dunham from Louisville, who, being
Wilder's senior in rank, assumed command.  On the following day a
second demand for surrender was made by Chalmers, who represented
his command sufficiently large to capture the place.  Dunham
refused to comply with this demand, and the enemy then withdrew,
going north.  Two days later the rebels made another attack on the
works and were again repulsed.  In the afternoon Bragg appeared in
person before the town, and sent, under a flag of truce, another
demand for the surrender of the command, as the garrison of the
place was surrounded by an entire army, and to assault would only
be a needless sacrifice of human life.  This was declined, but with
the request from Colonel Dunham that Bragg suspend hostilities to
give time for consultation.  This Bragg agreed to do until nine
o'clock in the evening.  Dunham, who had succeeded in opening
communication with General Gilbert at Louisville, telegraphed him
the facts, and added that he feared he would have to surrender.
Gilbert telegraphed back an order placing Dunham in arrest, and
ordering Wilder to assume command.  At the Council of War that
was held by Wilder it was determined that the place should not be
surrendered without personal inspection by the commanding officer
that Bragg's statements as to his force and situation were true.
Wilder, under Gilbert's orders, assumed command at seven o'clock in
the evening, and notified Bragg of the result of the consultation,
proposing, with Bragg's permission, to satisfy himself as to the
truth of his statements.  Remarkable as it appears, this proposition
was agreed to by Bragg, and Wilder, under escort, investigated the
enemy's lines prepared for assault, and counting forty-five cannon
in position, supported by 25,000 men, he concluded it was impossible
to further successfully defend the place.  He reported the facts
to the Council of War, and the demand for the surrender was acceded
to at two o'clock in the morning of the 17th.  Under the terms of
the capitulation the troops marched out with the honors of war at
daylight, retained their sidearms and private property, and were
at once paroled.  This attack on Munfordville by Bragg established
the fact that it was not his intention to press on to Louisville,
and the advantage Buell derived from the delay attending this attack
was in a measure some compensation for the loss of the place.

Bragg then took position at Prewitt's Knob, where Buell moved with
his entire army, Thomas having reported on the 20th.  The two armies
confronted each other at this point for three days, and disposition
was made for battle.  On the 21st, while the troops were being placed
in position by Thomas, under order of Buell, the enemy retreated,
marching for a short distance toward Louisville, then turned to
the right, and took position near Bardstown.  Bragg claimed in his
official report that after maneuvring unsuccessfully for four days
to draw General Buell into an engagement, he found himself with
only three days' rations on hand for his troops "and in a hostile
country," that even a successful engagement would materially cripple
him, and as Buell had another route to the Ohio, to the left, he
concluded to turn to the right, send to Lexington for supplies to
meet him in Bardstown, and commenced the movement to that place.
This gave Buell an open road to Louisville, of which he immediately
availed himself, and on the 29th, the last division of the Army
of the Ohio reached that city.  The place was under the command of
Gilbert, who had nothing but new levies of inexperienced troops.
These Buell incorporated with the brigades of his Army of the Ohio,
and on the morning of the 30th, after furnishing his command with
needed supplies, moved his army out of Louisville against the enemy.
The movement was delayed by a day, by Halleck's order relieving
Buell and placing Thomas in command.  The latter remonstrated
against this order, and at his request it was withdrawn.  The next
day Buell again assumed command, with Thomas announced in General
Orders as second in command, and commenced the advance movement of
his army in five columns.





Chapter VI.




Battle of Perryville


The main portion of the army had been organized into three corps,
designated the First, Second, and Third, under McCook, Crittenden,
and Gilbert, respectively.  General Sill, in command of two divisions,
was ordered to move on the left toward Frankfort, to hold in check
the force of the enemy under Kirby Smith at that place.  The other
columns marched by different routes upon roads converging upon
Bardstown, through Shepardsville, Mount Washington, Fairfield, and
Bloomfield.  Each column engaged the enemy's cavalry and artillery
in a series of skirmishes from within a short distance of Louisville.  As
the army approached Bardstown the resistance constantly increased,
retarding Buell's advance, and enabling Bragg to effect his withdrawal
from that place, which was accomplished eight hours before the
arrival of Buell's army.  A sharp cavalry engagement occurred at
this place between Buell's advance and Bragg's rear-guard, when the
whole of Bragg's command retired, taking the road to Springfield.
At Bardstown Buell received information that a junction of Bragg's
and Kirby Smith's commands would be made at Danville.  He ordered
McCook to advance from Bloomfield on the Harrodsburg road, and
directed Thomas to move with Crittenden's corps on the Lebanon road,
which passes four miles south of Perryville, with a branch to the
latter place, while he accompanied Gilbert's corps, which moved
on the direct road to Perryville.  After leaving Bardstown, Buell
learned that Kirby Smith's force had crossed to the west side of
the Kentucky River, near Salvisa, and that Bragg was concentrating
either at Harrodsburg or Perryville.  He at once ordered McCook
to change his line of march from the former road, and to proceed
direct to Perryville.  On the afternoon of October 7th, Buell,
with Gilbert's corps, arrived in front of the rebels in strong
force three miles from Perryville, where he immediately drew his
troops up in line of battle.  Advancing the cavalry and artillery,
supported by two regiments of infantry, the rear guard of the enemy
was pressed to within two miles of the town, when it was discovered
that the rebels were concentrating for battle.  Orders were sent by
Buell to Crittenden and McCook to march at 3 o'clock on the morning
of the 8th, and for them to take position as early as possible on
the left and right of the centre corps respectively, the commanders
themselves to report in person their arrival, for orders, the
intention being to make the attack that day if possible.

McCook did not receive this order until 2.30 o'clock, and was on
the march at five.  Owing to the difficulty of finding water for
his command where the troops were expected to encamp, Thomas, on
the night of the 7th, moved off the direct line of march some six
miles and was delayed several hours in reaching his position on
the field.  During the night some pools of water were discovered
in small creek about two miles and a half from Perryville.  Colonel
Dan McCook with the Thirty-sixth Brigade was ordered forward, and,
after a sharp engagement, secured possession of the pools, and a
supply of bad water for Gilbert's troops was obtained.

On October 1st, Bragg, leaving Polk in command at Bardstown, under
orders to slowly retire to Bryantsville, started for Lexington.
Here he ordered Kirby Smith with all his forces to Frankfort, to
assist in the installation services of the rebel Provisional Governor
of Kentucky at the capital of the State.  At Lexington, on the 2d,
learning of Buell's movements from Louisville, Bragg ordered Polk
in writing--sending two copies to him--to advance at once, "with
his whole available force, by way of Bloomfield, toward Frankfort,
to strike the enemy in the flank and rear."  Polk was informed in
the order that Kirby Smith would at the same time attack the front.

On the 3d, Polk received the orders, and, submitting them to a
council of war, decided not to obey them, but to move as originally
ordered.  Of this Bragg was notified in time to prevent the attack
on Buell's front with Smith's command alone.  Giving orders for
the supplies that had been accumulated in Lexington to be sent to
Bryantsville, Bragg, on the 6th, proceeded to Harrodsburg, where
he met Polk at the head of his column that had left Bardstown on
the 3d.  On the 7th, Bragg ordered Polk to move Cheatham's division
back to Perryville, and to proceed to that point himself, to attack
the Federal force, immediately rout them, and move rapidly to join
Kirby Smith.  These orders were given under the impression that
Buell's command was so separated that his right and left were sixty
miles apart.  Bragg also sent Wither's division to Kirby Smith at
Frankfort, who reported himself threatened by a large force on his
front--the troops under Sill.

Early on the morning of the 8th an attempt was made by the enemy
to drive Colonel McCook from his position at the creek.  He was
supported by Mitchell's and Sheridan's divisions, who were ordered
up and directed to hold the position until the entire army was
prepared to attack.  The assault was made with great spirit on Colonel
McCook, but the enemy was handsomely repulsed.  Buell anticipated
an attack on Gilbert's corps in its isolated position in the early
morning, but nothing occurred until after the arrival of McCook's
corps on the Maxville road, between 10 and 11 o'clock, when he
at once formed his command, of Rousseau's and Jackson's division,
in line of battle on the left of Gilbert, Rousseau on the right,
and sent his cavalry to the front to make a reconnoissance toward
Perryville.  Thomas arrived and took position with Crittenden's
corps about twelve o'clock.

On McCook getting his command into position, he reported to General
Buell in person, who ordered him to send out a force to the Chaplin
River, and find out the position of the enemy in his front.  During
McCook's absence Rousseau had advanced the right of his line a
half mile to obtain a supply of water, for which the troops were
suffering.  On seeing this, the rebels opened a heavy fire with
some twenty pieces of artillery.  Rousseau moved his other troops
to support his right, and, posting Simonson's and Loomis's batteries,
returned the enemy's artillery fire.

When McCook returned to his command, seeing that a good position on
high ground could be occupied by our troops on the left and front
of Rousseau's new line and near the river, he at once sent skirmishers
into the woods at that point, to find out if the enemy held the
position.  He also directed Jackson to form a new line of battle
with his division nearer the stream, and sent the skirmishers
forward to the river as soon as this was done, where they obtained
the needed supply of water.  On the formation of the new line, as
no heavy force of the enemy had been encountered, McCook, at about
half-past one o'clock, rode to the right of his line.  About half
an hour later, Hardee, in command of three divisions, under Cheatham,
Buckner, and Anderson, some sixteen thousand strong, advanced to
the attack on McCook, driving back the skirmishers, first striking
those posted in the woods.  McCook had formed his line of battle,
with Rousseau's right near a barn on the right of the Maxville
road, extending to the left and across that road on a ridge through
a cornfield to the woods where the skirmishers were.  The right of
Jackson's line was holding a wooded elevation, running off to the
left in rear of Chaplin River, while his left, north of Maxville
road, was thrown back in a northwesterly direction, forming an
obtuse angle, deflected about thirty degrees along broken heights
from their centre and right, the point of the angle being near where
the Maxville road crosses Doctor's Creek.  The enemy considered
the key of McCook's position to be at this crossing, and directed
their main attack on that point.  McCook had posted Starkweather's
brigade in the rear of the left as support to Jackson, with Stone's
and Bush's batteries of Rousseau's division, and had placed Webster's
brigade of Jackson's division in rear of Rousseau's line.  The enemy
opened the attack on the extreme left of the Federal force posted
in the angle.  This was a very strong position, by reason of the
character of the ground, which enabled these troops to sweep their
front with a heavy fire.  The troops here were protected by being
posted behind stone fences, and were supported by batteries in the
rear.  In the attack on the left Jackson was killed by the first
fire.  Terrill's troops--nearly all new--were driven back, and
McCook's left turned.  In falling back, Terrill endeavored to rally
his command near the batteries posted in his rear.  While gallantly
doing so, he fell, mortally wounded, and died in a few hours.
McCook sent to Sheridan, asking him to protect his right, and sent
to Gilbert for reinforcements.

The advance of the enemy was checked by Starkweather's brigade, with
Stone's and Bush's batteries, all well posted to meet the assault
after Terrill's brigade had been driven back.  The enemy made
repeated assaults with fresh troops at this point, but was driven
back each time with heavy loss until the troops and batteries were
out of ammunition, when they fell back to the original line, and
obtaining a supply renewed the fight.

On the right in Rousseau's front the enemy under Anderson made
a vigorous charge on Lytle's and Harris's brigades, attacking in
greatly superior numbers.  They were however handsomely repulsed.
After fighting until their ammunition was exhausted, these troops
retired on the line with Starkweather's command.  The rebels then
pushing forward under heavy fire from their batteries drove Lytle's
brigade from the new line.  Sloan's battery getting into position
opened on the rebels with canister and checked their advance.
Colonel Gooding's brigade from Mitchell's division of Gilbert's
corps, with Penney's Fifth Wisconsin Battery, was ordered up, and
after a brisk engagement the enemy was driven back and the original
line of battle reoccupied.  Steedman's brigade of Schoepff's division
also came up, and attacking the enemy aided in the final repulse.

When the heaviest attack was made on Rousseau the enemy assaulted
Sheridan's division in the advanced position which he occupied
after forcing back their line earlier in the day.  He now withdrew
his troops, and posting them in a more favorable position on the
original line, opened on the rebels with heavy musketry fire and
canister.  The enemy pressing him very hard at this point, he called
on Gilbert for support, who re-enforced him with Carlin's brigade
from Mitchell's division.  As the enemy moved forward in strong
force to the attack, Carlin immediately ordered his troops to
charge, which they did, and drove the rebels before them through
Perryville, capturing in the town two caissons, fifteen wagons
loaded with ammunition, and a guard of 138 men under command of
three officers.  Sheridan also drove the enemy for some distance,
but did not consider it prudent to advance too far, leaving McCook's
right exposed.  He then directed his artillery fire on the enemy
at his left, and aided in checking the advance in that quarter.
Wagner's brigade of Wood's division became engaged, and did good
service on the right of Mitchell's division.  The rest of Crittenden's
corps was not engaged in the action.  Thomas, on arriving on the
battlefield with this corps, was directed to take position in the
line of battle on the right and wait for orders.  Here he waited
during the entire day, and received none.  Only part of Gilbert's
corps was engaged in the fight, the heavy blow striking McCook's,
which he failed to report to Buell until after two hours' fighting.
The battle was closed by night coming on, and a general engagement
was anticipated the next day.  Thomas was directed to move Crittenden's
and Gilbert's corps forward in the morning at six o'clock, and
attack the enemy's front and left flank.

Buell ordered McCook during the night to close the opening between
his right and Gilbert's left.  His orders for the following day
were to hold his position and take advantage of any opportunity
that the events of the day might present, the main attack to be
made by the other corps.  On the following morning, the advance
being made in accordance with these orders, it was discovered that
the enemy's main body had retired during the night, and was falling
back on Harrodsburg, with indications that he would there make a
stand.  Bragg left his dead and wounded on the field, but retired
leisurely and in good order.

Buell reported the strength of his command before the engagement at
58,000 effective men.  Of these he claimed 22,000 were raw troops,
not drilled, and undisciplined.  Less than one-half of this entire
force was in the action.  His reports show a loss of 4,348, being
916 killed, 2,943 wounded, and 489 missing.  Nearly all the losses
were from McCook's command, which bore the brunt of the heavy
fighting.  Bragg referring to his loss in his official report says:
"In such a conflict our own loss was necessarily severe, probably
not less than 2,500 killed, wounded, and missing."  During the
campaign General Buell captured nearly five thousand prisoners.

The enemy's troops engaged in the battle were under the immediate
command of General Polk.  Bragg had been with Kirby Smith at Frankfort,
where these active operations found him engaged in superintending
"the ceremony of installing the Provisional Governor into office."

In his official report of the battle of Perryville, made from
Bryantsville, October 12, 1862, Bragg says:  "After consulting with
the General (Polk) and reconnoitering the ground and examining his
dispositions, I declined to assume the command, but suggested some
changes and modifications of his arrangements, which he promptly
made."  In a subsequent report of Perryville, made while he was at
Shelbyville, of date May 20, 1863, he reflects very severely upon
Polk's movements at Perryville.  He says that he ordered the attack
to be made by Polk on Gilbert early in the morning of the 8th, that
he waited until 10 A.M., and hearing no firing started to see Polk
and have an explanation of the delay.  Here he was "informed that
it was determined not to attack, but to assume the 'defensive
offensive.'"  Bragg gave orders for some changes in the line of
battle, restoring certain portions of the command that had been
withdrawn, and again ordering Polk to bring on the engagement.  The
execution of this order was delayed by Polk, and Bragg, becoming
"impatient at the delay after this order," "despatched a staff
officer to repeat it to the General, and soon thereafter followed
in person and put the troops in motion."

Bragg's intention was not to fight a general engagement at Perryville,
but merely to check the advance of Buell's army, thereby gaining
time to gather his supplies and men together and leave the State.
Bragg had been urged, by leading Kentuckians in his command and
others, to undertake the campaign in Kentucky with the promise of
immense numbers of recruits and large quantities of supplies.  He
anticipated that his coming would be hailed as that of a deliverer,
and that the young men of the State would flock to his banners
and fill up his army, so that he could attack Buell at any point.
Bragg's entire command in Kentucky was estimated at thirty-five to
forty thousand.  He anticipated enlisting twenty thousand recruits,
and took arms to Kentucky for that number of new troops.  Buell's
command, with his losses and the garrison at Nashville was less
than this, but at Louisville he received some twenty-two thousand
new troops.  The number of infantry recruits for Bragg's army was
very small, for he says in his first official report of the battle
of Perryville--when he at that time was preparing to leave the
State--"with ample means to arm twenty thousand men and a force
with that to fully redeem the State, we have not yet issued half
the arms left us by casualties incident to the campaign."

General Buell waited for Sill to join him with his division, leaving
Dumont at Frankfort.  On the march Sill's advance was attacked by
a portion of Kirby Smith's command, which he repulsed and arrived
at Perryville on the 11th.  Buell then moved forward, expecting Bragg
to give battle at Harrodsburg, and throwing out a strong force to
reconnoitre, discovered the enemy in force some three miles south
of that place.  During the day Bragg continued his march south,
his rear guard being driven out of the place with the loss of
considerable stores and about twelve hundred prisoners, in the main
sick and wounded.  On the next day Buell made a strong reconnoissance
to the crossing of Dick's River, and there ascertained that Bragg
had crossed his entire army.

Learning on the 13th that the enemy was retreating south, Buell
ordered pursuit to be made immediately, for the purpose of overtaking
Bragg, or of intercepting him if he should attempt to pass toward
Somerset.  Wood's division marched at midnight, and engaged the enemy
at Stanford at daylight the next morning.  The rest of Crittenden's
and McCook's corps followed on the same road; Gilbert marching on
the Lancaster road.  The enemy was steadily pressed on the road to
Cumberland Gap, but could not be brought to an engagement.  McCook's
and Gilbert's corps were halted at Crab Orchard, while Crittenden,
with W. S. Smith's division, was sent in pursuit as far as London
on the direct road to the Gap.  It now appearing that Bragg did not
intend to fight in the State, and the country beyond Crab Orchard
being extremely barren and rough--no supplies existing in it--the
pursuit was discontinued, and the Army of the Ohio was turned toward
Bowling Green and Glasgow, preparatory to the advance to Nashville.
McCook's and Gilbert's corps were concentrated at the former place,
and Crittenden's at the latter.  This movement of the troops was
made by Buell, who was confident that Bragg would concentrate in
the vicinity of Nashville, and seek to recover that place, and to
fight his great battle for the possession of Kentucky.

The military affairs of the nation at this time were unfortunately
in charge of General Halleck, who had been called to Washington as
Commander-in-Chief.  On the retreat of Bragg from Kentucky, Halleck
insisted that Buell should make a campaign into East Tennessee, a
distance of two hundred and forty miles, over mountain and river,
without any communication to the rear, except by wagon train, over
almost impassable roads, the advance to be made in the face of the
enemy, who, operating on his line of communications could move his
entire command to defeat our advance in detail.  Buell reported
to the War Department that it was impossible to make the campaign
as ordered, and knowing the necessity of protecting Nashville, he
directed the concentration of his troops on the line of the railroad
to that place.  That road had been repaired up to Bowling Green,
after the destruction of two months before, and here the troops
received their needed supplies.  On the 30th of October, Buell was
relieved of the command of the Department of the Ohio, and Major-General
William S. Rosecrans was, by the direction of the General-in-Chief,
assigned to the command of the troops.  The designation of the
command being changed to that of the Department of the Cumberland.

It is a somewhat singular fact, that the campaign in Kentucky
should have caused the most intense feeling in the opposing armies
against their respective commanders.  In the Federal army, after
Buell allowed Bragg to move north from Munfordville without an
engagement, the expressions of the troops against their commanding
general were open, bitter, and almost universal, from the lowest to
the highest.  However, there was one who never for a moment lost
faith, soldierly trust, and esteem for his commander, and he was
of all persons in the command most competent to judge.  This was
General Thomas.  He knew the great difficulties of Buell's position,
how his place had been interfered with by Halleck, under whose
command it was his misfortune early in the year to be; and later,
how he was made to feel the power of this same man as a personal
matter.  Halleck, invested by the Administration with supreme powers,
planned a campaign into East Tennessee, on paper in Washington, and
ordered Buell to execute it.  This, the latter, with full knowledge
of the situation, refused to do, and quietly ordering his troops
to the line of the railroad from whence they could be moved with
the least delay, as needed, waited for the order he knew was pending
for his removal.

General Buell was right in refusing to attack Bragg at Munfordville,
or in fact at any time until he had placed his army north of the
enemy, and received his own reinforcements from Louisville.  Then
this point was safe, and Nashville could not be imperiled by the
defeat of our army.  Buell made three dispositions for an engagement
during the Kentucky campaign, but each time Bragg drew off except
at Perryville, and here there was no design of the latter to fight,
beyond checking Buell's advance, and gaining time for his troops
to make their retreat from the State with all stores and material.
Bragg, from his closing remarks in his first report of the battle
of Perryville, certainly did not consider--so far as the Confederacy
was concerned--that the State was worth fighting for.  Had he
received the 20,000 new troops he was promised, instead of General
Buell having his army increased by that number, then he would have
struck quick and sharp.  He left the State deeply disgusted with
Kentucky, and took every occasion after that to show it.  The account
was even, however, as Bragg was not a favorite in that State.

At Perryville Buell labored under the same disadvantage in the
organization of his command that made itself felt on the first
two great battlefields of the Army of the Cumberland.  That was
the inefficiency of his corps commanders.  Of Gilbert it is only
necessary to say, that a worse appointment as a corps commander
was not made during the war.  Fortunately, the battle of Perryville
was his first and only appearance in that position.  Buell, after
expressing his thanks for McCook's services on that field and in
the campaign, in his official report says:  "It is true that only
one serious battle has been fought, and that was incomplete, and less
decisive than it might have been.  That this was so is due partly
to unavoidable difficulties which prevented the troops, marching
on different roads, from getting on the ground simultaneously, but
more to the fact that I was not apprised early enough of the condition
of affairs on my left.  I can find no fault with the former, nor
am I disposed at this time to censure the latter, though it must be
admitted to have been a grave error.  I ascribe it to the too great
confidence of the general commanding the left corps (Major-General
McCook), which made him believe that he could manage the difficulty
without the aid or control of his commander."  Buell was not notified
of any attack by the enemy on his left until over two hours after
the engagement was begun.  He then hurried to the field, and sent
the necessary supports forward, at once checking the enemy, and
made disposition of his troops for battle.

With a willingness to lay down command that characterized all
the commanders of the Army of the Cumberland when the authorities
in Washington regarded the good of the service as requiring it,
Buell placed the new commander in full possession of all plans and
information that he possessed, and without a word left the troops
that were to win undying fame on other battle-fields, largely by
reason of the training he had given them during the period of his
command, half a month less than one year.

The Comte de Paris, in his "History of the Civil War in America,"
in writing on the battle of Shiloh, where he refers to the massing
of the artillery by Grant's Chief of Staff, Colonel Webster, says:
"The fate of the day depends upon the preservation of these heights,
whence the enemy could have commanded Pittsburg Landing," and on
the following page adds, "Nevertheless, at the sight of the enemy's
battalions advancing in good order, the soldiers that have been
grouped together in haste, to give an air of support to Webster's
battery, became frightened and scattered.  It is about to be carried,
when a new body of troops deploying in the rear of the guns, with
as much regularity as if they were on the parade-ground, receives
the Confederates with a fire that drives them back in disorder into
the ravine.  This was the brigade of Ammen, belonging to Nelson's
division, that rushed forward so opportunely."  In speaking of
the second day's fight he says:  "At a signal given by Buell, his
three divisions, under Nelson, Crittenden, and McCook, put themselves
in motion at the same time.  The soldiers of the Army of the Ohio,
constantly drilled for the year past by a rigid disciplinarian, and
trained by their long marches across three States, are distinguished
by their discipline and fine bearing.  The readiness with which
they march against the enemy wins the admiration of the generals,
who, like Sherman, have had to fight a whole day at the head of
raw and inexperienced troops."

The greatest service that General Buell rendered to his country
was as the organizer and disciplinarian of the mass of the raw,
undrilled troops that were hurried to the front under the need of
the hour, and who, unaccustomed to military or other restraint, had
all the freedom that characterizes the American sovereign both in
speech and action.  To take these troops by the thousands and make
an army of fifty to seventy-five thousand trained skilled soldiers,
who, in later days, were to do as splendid fighting as the world
ever saw, was a stupendous undertaking.  General Buell not only
did this, but accomplished the task in time to bring some of these
soldiers that he was justly proud of to the field of Shiloh, where,
under his eye, they met the enemy like veterans.  Buell's military
training and habits of life led him, however, to one error.  He
was so good a soldier himself, that he failed to recognize the
distinction between the regular soldier in garrison during times
of peace and the thinking volunteer during the active campaigns
of the rebellion.  The latter could not and would not be made the
mere machine the former becomes, and Buell's failure to appreciate
this caused great ill-feeling against him at the time in his army.
Then, again, Buell's earlier military training in the bureau
office he held so many years unfitted him for the handling, on
the battle-field, of the large number of troops which composed his
command.  But very few generals during the rebellion were able to
successfully handle on the battle-field as large an army as was
under Buell.  In fact, the general who has sufficient talent as a
good organizer and drill-master to enter into the details necessary
to bring an army out of raw troops, has not the military genius
required to handle a large army in fighting and winning great
battles.  But Buell rendered many valuable services, in the camp
and on the field, to his country.  It was Buell who planned the
Fort Henry, Fort Donelson, and Nashville campaign, which Halleck
put under his hat, and proceeded to carry out as HIS original idea,
being careful to say nothing in regard to his plans until they
were so far executed as to render any action on the part of Buell
and his command simply that of a supporting column.  Then to Buell
is due the credit of the second day's fight at Shiloh.  That day's
battle was the fight of the Army of the Ohio with Lewis Wallace's
division, General Grant giving Buell largely his discretion in
the movements of the troops.  Whitelaw Reid says of him, in "Ohio
in the War," "He came into that action when, without him, all was
lost.  He redeemed the fortunes of the field, and justly won the
title of the 'Hero of Pittsburg Landing.'"

The order placing Rosecrans in command--General Order No. 168, War
Department, of date October 24, 1862--created the Department of
the Cumberland, embracing that portion of the State of Tennessee
lying east of the Tennessee River, and such portion of Georgia and
Alabama as should be occupied by the Federal troops.  The troops
in the field were designated in the same order as the "Fourteenth
Army Corps."

General Rosecrans assumed command on October 30th at Louisville.
On November 2d he arrived at Bowling Green, and on the 7th he
announced, in General Orders, the division of his army organization
into "the Right Wing," "the Centre," and "the Left Wing," under the
command respectively of McCook, Thomas, and Crittenden, with five
divisions in the centre and three in each wing.  He instructed
Thomas to advance Fry and Dumont's divisions to Gallatin, and to
push rapidly forward the repairs of the railroad to Nashville.

Up to this time the movements of Bragg's army remained undeveloped,
and no disposition of the Federal forces could be safely made
without the knowledge of what Bragg's plan of operation would be.
That he would ultimately attempt the capture of Nashville or force
a battle for it there could be but little doubt.  Not to fight for
Nashville was the abandonment of Tennessee.  Kentucky surrendered
without a blow produced such demoralization in Bragg's command that
to have given up Tennessee without a struggle would have either
compelled a change in the commanding officer of that army or a
disbandment of it, so far as the Kentucky and Tennessee troops were
concerned.

General Halleck's brilliant paper campaign into East Tennessee again
was produced and aired with a show of the most profound wisdom,
based on the extreme ignorance of the situation and surroundings.
Buell's forethought in concentrating the army within supporting
distance of Nashville became apparent on the appearance of the
advance of Bragg's army at Murfreesboro, reinforcing Breckinridge's
command, which had been left in Tennessee to enforce the "blockade
of Nashville."  This was another grievance the Kentucky troops had
against Bragg.  All the Kentucky infantry troops under Bragg were
in Breckenridge's command, and they were exceedingly anxious to
return to the State with Bragg's army to visit their friends and
relatives and aid in recruiting that army.  Bragg's distrust of
these troops was such that he refused to allow them this privilege,
and his action in holding them in Tennessee, just out of Kentucky,
did not materially increase his popularity with them.  Breckinridge
had established his headquarters at Murfreesboro and assumed chief
command, with about ten thousand troops under him, over one-third
of which were cavalry under Wheeler and Forrest.  With this force
Breckinridge endeavored to enforce the siege of Nashville, using
his cavalry to prevent the gathering of forage and supplies by our
troops from the surrounding country.  These foraging parties were
constantly sent out, going as far at times as ten miles on these
expeditions.  The main deprivation the garrison suffered during
the six weeks of the siege was in having nearly all communication
cut off from their friends in the North, and while they received
nothing, they embraced every opportunity of sending letters by
citizens returning north.  The garrison was not willing to remain
entirely on the defensive.  Besides the numerous raiding parties
sent out for forage which were uniformly successful, on the night
of the 6th of October, Negley sent Palmer with some twenty-eight
hundred troops to attack General S. R. Anderson, who had established
his camp at Lavergne with some three thousand men, principally new
recruits.  Palmer with the artillery and about four hundred infantry
to support it, moved directly on Lavergne, some fifteen miles from
Nashville, while Colonel John F. Miller with about twenty-four
hundred men in his command moved on the road to the right to make
the attack on the rear of the enemy.  Miller marched his command
during the night, captured the enemy's pickets at daylight and
moved on the encampment.  Palmer opened with artillery as soon as he
heard Miller's musketry firing and the latter, pushing his troops
rapidly forward, after an engagement lasting half an hour, had the
enemy in full retreat on the road to Murfreesboro with a loss of
80 killed and wounded and 175 prisoners.  He also captured three
pieces of artillery, and the regimental colors of the Thirty-second
Alabama.  Palmer's command then returned to Nashville.

During the siege of Nashville skirmishing between our pickets and
the scouting parties of the enemy was constantly occurring, and the
garrison of Nashville was indebted for its safety to the services
of Lieutenant-Colonel Von Schrader of the Seventy-fourth Ohio,
Inspector of Negley's division, as much as any one thing.  Von
Schrader was an educated Prussian officer and a thorough soldier.
He established a system of pickets, strongly posted, with block
houses for their protection, and then gave his personal attention
to it that the pickets performed their entire duty.  There was no
determined assault on the place at any time during the siege.  The
only appearance of an attack in force was on the 6th of November,
by a body of some eight thousand troops, equally divided between
cavalry and infantry, under General Roger Hanson.  Forrest,
knowing that the Federal force at Nashville was not a very strong
one and that by the pursuit of Bragg by Buell's army, Nashville was
completely cut off from any immediate support or relief, obtained
General Breckinridge's permission to make an attack with his cavalry,
numbering over four thousand men, in concert with the infantry
under Hanson, numbering a little less than Forrest's command.  The
enemy's cavalry moved in columns on the Charlotte, Franklin, and
Nolinsville turnpikes from the south, while Forrest in person with
1,000 cavalry and Hanson's infantry, pushed rapidly forward on the
Murfreesboro pike, arriving at the Lunatic Asylum, six miles from
Nashville, by daylight.  Our pickets and cavalry were driven in,
and Hanson was in readiness to make the attack with the infantry
when a peremptory order from Breckinridge was received, directing
further operations to cease, under express orders from Bragg.
After skirmishing with his cavalry around the city at the different
outposts, Forrest withdrew, greatly incensed at being ordered to
desist from the attack when confident of success.

Bragg in leaving a large number of men in middle Tennessee merely
to watch the post of Nashville--thus crippling his army to that
extent--committed a great mistake.  He needed every available man
in his army to make the Kentucky campaign a success.  With these
10,000 troops, if Buell had left Negley's and Paine's divisions
as garrisons at Nashville, Bragg's force would have outnumbered
Buell's command before he reached Louisville three to two.  With
the defeat of Buell, Nashville would have been worse than worthless,
proving an incumbrance instead of a benefit.  On the other hand,
with Bragg driven out of Kentucky, and opening the struggle for
that State in Tennessee, the possession of Nashville as a second
base of supplies for our army was an absolute necessity.  Bragg,
however, was correct in refusing to allow the place to be attacked
by Forrest, for even in the event of success the non-combatants
and sympathizing friends of the South would have suffered in person
and property to an extent far beyond what the temporary occupation
of the city by the Southern forces would have compensated.

Nashville was re-enforced by the arrival of the advance of the army
concentrating there on the 17th of November, and a few days after
Rosecrans arrived and established his headquarters in that city.
The first thing that demanded the attention of the new commander
was that which had given the most serious trouble to General Buell,
viz.:  the safety of his communications in the rear to his base
of supplies.  The repair to the tunnel just south of Mitchelville
occupied a large force several weeks to complete.  During this time
all supplies for troops at Nashville were with the greatest labor
hauled fifty-five miles by wagon train.  The railroad from Louisville
to Nashville was re-opened on the 26th of November, and for one
month every effort was made to forward supplies, so the troops could
have new clothing issued to them, and that they could be provided
with ammunition.  The depots at Nashville were filled with needful
supplies to provide against the interruption of communication arising
from raids on the railroad by rebel cavalry.  Since the middle of
November Bragg had been concentrating his forces at Murfreesboro,
and anticipating that the Federal forces would go into winter
quarters at Nashville, had placed his troops in quarters for the
winter in the vicinity of the former place.  He had sent nearly all
of his cavalry to raid on the lines of the Federal communication--Morgan
into Kentucky and Wheeler into West Tennessee.  With this knowledge,
Rosecrans, on the 26th of December, ordered his army to move out
of Nashville to attack the enemy on his front.

While the army was being refitted at Nashville, Morgan's cavalry
was raiding the surrounding country.  On the 7th Morgan's command
captured the Ninety-ninth Brigade under Colonel A. B. Moore, at
Hartsville, where he had been posted by Thomas to guard the ford of
the Cumberland River, and to watch the enemy on the Lebanon road.
The brigade consisted of three infantry regiments, a battalion of
cavalry, and a section of artillery, making a force of about two
thousand effective men.  The command was badly posted, and the
commanding officers of the infantry regiments failed to cooperate,
or to obey orders.  It was, in the main, a repetition of the
disgraceful affair at Murfreesboro, when Forrest captured that
place during the previous summer.  Moore was surprised in his camp
early in the morning.  No warning was given by the pickets, and
before any disposition could be made of the troops, Morgan's men
were upon them.  Morgan's command consisted of his cavalry, and two
regiments of infantry.  Moore threw out a skirmish line to resist
the advance of Morgan's infantry and dismounted cavalry in line.
The rebels pressed steadily forward to a ravine at the foot of the
hill on which Moore had formed his line, and under shelter of this
poured such a destructive fire upon the Federal troops, that he
ordered a new line to be formed in the rear. In this movement the
whole line was thrown into confusion, and being attacked on their
right and rear by the rebel cavalry, who had, up to this time not
been engaged, Moore's command was crowded one on the other into a
narrow space where the fire of the enemy proved terribly effective.
Moore's troops being unable to return the fire, and he not being
able to make another disposition of them, the white flag was raised,
and the entire command surrendered.  Colonel Tafel, in command of
the One Hundred and Sixth Ohio, becoming separated from the other
troops, made some further resistance, but, being overpowered, he
also surrendered.  The contest only lasted a little over an hour.
Moore's loss was 150 killed and wounded, his entire command
captured, with all army and camp equipment, trains, and two pieces
of artillery.  Morgan's loss was 125 killed and wounded.

General D. S. Stanley, on reporting to Rosecrans from the Army of
the Tennessee, had been assigned to the position of Chief of Cavalry
to the Commanding General.  On the 12th he attacked and drove the
enemy out of the town of Franklin, killing five and capturing twelve
men, with a large number of horses and stores.  He destroyed the
mills at that place, with a great quantity of valuable property.

After the capture of Hartsville by Morgan, his services were
recognized by his superiors to the extent that Mr. Davis, who was
on a visit to Murfreesboro shortly after this engagement, signed
and handed him his commission as Brigadier-General.  General Hardee
urged that the appointment be made as Major-General, but this was
refused.  Morgan's command had increased so that it was unwieldy
as one body, and he decided to form it into two brigades.  His
command consisted now of seven regiments,--an aggregate force of
over four thousand men.  This he divided, placing three regiments
under Colonel Basil W. Duke, in the first brigade, with a battery
of four guns.  The second brigade was placed in command of Colonel
W. C. P. Breckenridge, and was composed of four regiments, with one
three-inch Parrot gun and the two mountain howitzers.  This force,
trained as it had been, had no superior for the work it was ordered
to do--raiding in the rear, destroying bridges, trestleworks, and
capturing bridge-guards.  So accustomed had they become to hardships
of every nature, that it was almost incredible the amount of rough
riding, scant fare, and loss of sleep these men endured.  Proud of
their past success, and emboldened by it to the belief that they
were able to defeat any force that could overtake them, they at
last found the country south of the Ohio too confined for them,
and, aiming at grander feats, they passed north of that river,
and, entering upon an entirely different kind of warfare, met with
complete disaster.

On the morning of the 22d the command of Morgan took the road again
for Kentucky.  Bragg ordered the railroad in Rosecrans's rear to be
broken, and his communication with Louisville destroyed.  Morgan and
his men were in most excellent spirits at the prospect of another
raid into that State.  He had with him the pick of the youth of the
State of Kentucky.  On the 24th Morgan's command had their first
skirmish with a battalion of Michigan troops, which resulted in
the loss to Morgan of seventeen of his men and two of his officers.
On the 25th Colonel Hobson had an engagement with Johnson's regiment
near Munfordville, in which the rebels suffered a loss of some
fifty men killed and wounded.  Morgan then attacked the stockade at
Bacon Creek, held by a force of 100 men, who made a most stubborn
and determined resistance, inflicting severe loss upon the attacking
party, and demonstrating the worth of a stockade properly built and
efficiently manned.  These stockades were built with heavy upright
timber ten or twelve feet high.  They were surrounded by ditches
and pierced for musketry.  Assailants, when right at the base,
were still far from taking them.  It was supposed that they would
not resist artillery, and, in fact, they were not built with the
expectation of doing so.  If the garrison of the stockade succeeded
in driving off the guerilla parties that swarmed through the country,
it fully accomplished its purpose.  This stockade successfully
resisted the heavy artillery firing brought to bear upon it, even
when a number of shells exploded within the work.  After making
such a brave defiance, it is to be regretted that they did not hold
out to the last, and refuse to surrender at all.  The commanding
officer had rejected a number of demands made on him to surrender;
when Morgan came up in person, and in his own name offering them
liberal terms, they surrendered.  Morgan then burnt the bridge
across Bacon Creek, and pressed on to Nolin, fourteen miles beyond,
where the stockade was surrendered without a fight.  The bridge here
also was destroyed.  Morgan's division, on the 27th, captured
Elizabethtown, after a severe engagement with the command
of Lieutenant-Colonel Smith--a detachment of some six hundred
infantry.  Smith sent Morgan a demand for him to surrender, which
Morgan declined, and returned the compliment by making the same
demand on Smith, who also declined.  After an engagement lasting
some six hours, Morgan's artillery rendered the building Smith's
command was fighting in untenable, and he then surrendered.  The
next day Morgan, moving along the railroad, destroyed it thoroughly.
The principal object of the expedition was the great trestleworks
at Muldraugh's Hills, only a short distance apart.  The garrison
defending the lower trestle, 600 strong, was captured by the Second
Brigade.  The First Brigade captured the garrison at the upper
trestle--200 strong.  These trestles were respectively 80 and 90
feet high, and each of them 500 feet long.  They were thoroughly
destroyed.  Thus was accomplished the objects of the raid, but
the destruction of these bridges--trestle and railroad--did not
accomplish the design contemplated by Bragg.  Rosecrans's prompt
movement from Nashville on the rebels encamped at Murfreesboro,
and the result of that campaign, rendered Morgan's raid a failure
in the main, as Bragg intended the road should be so thoroughly
destroyed as to prevent the further occupation of Nashville by our
army.  The loss to the Federals was an exceedingly severe one, and
had Rosecrans remained at Nashville inactive all the winter of 1862,
Bragg's designs would have met with a greater degree of success.

On the 29th, Colonel Harlan with his brigade attacked and routed
Morgan's troopers at Rolling Fork of Salt River, and drove them to
Bardstown.  While Morgan was moving around Lebanon, Colonel Hoskins's
command attacked him and captured 150 men.  Morgan passed between
the forces sent against him, showing again that it is impossible
to catch cavalry with infantry.  Morgan then commenced his retreat
form the State.  On the morning of January 1, 1863, as his command
was passing Columbia, 115 miles in an air-line from Murfreesboro,
his men reported hearing distinctly the roar of heavy cannonading
in that direction.  On the 2d Morgan crossed the Cumberland, and
felt safe once more from all pursuit.

On December 21st, General Carter moved with three regiments of
cavalry toward East Tennessee, from Lebanon, Ky., to raid on the
rebel line of communication.  Crossing the Cumberland Mountains forty
miles northeast of Cumberland Gap, he passed through Southwestern
Virginia and Tennessee to Carter's Station, destroying the Holston
and Watauga bridges and several miles of railroad.  He then leisurely
returned to Kentucky by the same route he had advanced.





Chapter VII.




The Advance to Murfreesboro.

On December 22d, General Thomas moved his headquarters from Gallatin
to Nashville, and there concentrated the divisions of Rousseau
and Negley, and Walker's brigade of Fry's division.  Of the five
divisions composing the Centre, that of J. J. Reynolds was guarding
the Louisville and Nashville railroad; and on the same duty were
the remaining two brigades of Fry's division.  R. B. Mitchell
was assigned to the command of Nashville with his division as the
garrison.  This left, under the immediate command of Thomas, the
two divisions and the brigade as above, as his only available force.
McCook with three divisions under Johnson, Davis, and Sheridan,
and Crittenden, also with three divisions under Wood, Palmer, and
Van Cleve, were in camp in front of Nashville, on the Franklin,
Nolinsville, and Murfreesboro turnpikes.

The position of the enemy under Bragg was fully known to Rosecrans.
Two corps under Polk and Kirby Smith were at Murfreesboro with
strong outposts at Stewart's Creek and Lavergne.  The corps under
Hardee was on the Shelbyville and Nolinsville pike, between Triune
and Eaglesville, with an advance guard at Nolinsville.  Rosecrans,
on the morning of the 26th, directed the advance movement to commence
in the following order.  McCook was to move his command of three
divisions direct on the Nolinsville pike to Triune.  Thomas was
to advance his command of two divisions and a brigade on McCook's
right by the Franklin and Wilson pikes, threatening Hardee's left,
and on his falling back was then to cross over on country roads
and occupy Nolinsville.  Crittenden was ordered to move his command
direct on the Murfreesboro pike.  On the arrival of Thomas at
Nolinsville, and being in a position to support, McCook was to attack
Hardee at Triune, and if the latter was re-enforced and McCook's
advance resisted, Thomas was to go to his aid.  If Hardee fell back
to Stewart's Creek, five miles south of Lavergne, and the enemy
made a stand there, then Crittenden was to attack him at once, and
Thomas was to come in on his left flank, while McCook was to bring
his forces in supporting distance of Thomas and Crittenden as
needed, after sending a division to watch Hardee and to pursue him
if retreating.

Davis took the advance of the Right Wing with the First Division.
He moved from camp at 6 A.M. on the Edmondson pike, on which he was
ordered to move to Prim's blacksmith shop, from whence he was to
march direct on a country road to Nolinsville.  The Third Division
under Sheridan moved on the Nolinsville pike, followed by the Second
under Johnson.  The advance of both these columns encountered the
cavalry pickets of the enemy, within two miles of the Federal picket
line.  As these commands advanced, there was constant skirmishing
until the heads of each of these columns reached Nolinsville.
About one mile south of the town the enemy made a determined stand
in a defile, and upon the hills through which the pike ran at this
place, known as Knobb's Gap.  This was a favorable position for
the rebels, well guarded by their artillery, which opened fire at
long range upon Carlin's lines.  Davis then brought up two batteries
and opened fire upon the enemy, while Carlin charged their position,
capturing two guns and several prisoners.  Davis's other brigades
carried the enemy's position on the right and left.  His divisions
then bivouacked for the night.  McCook's loss that day was about
seventy-five killed and wounded.

Early on the morning of the 27th, McCook's command pressing
forward, encountered the enemy in force.  A dense fog prevailed at
the time, rendering it hazardous in the extreme to open an engagement
at that time, as McCook's troops could not distinguish friend from
foe at one hundred and fifty yards, and his cavalry had been fired
on by his infantry.  On learning that Hardee was in position and
had been in line of battle since the night before, McCook ordered
a halt until the fog lifted.  This it did about noon, when Johnson's
division was pushed rapidly forward, followed by that of Sheridan.
As the command approached Triune they found the enemy had burned
the bridge across Wilson's Creek and retired, leaving a battery
of six pieces with cavalry supports to hold the crossing.  As the
skirmishers of Johnson's command advanced, the battery withdrew,
and with the cavalry moved off rapidly on the Eaglesville road.
Johnson's division then repaired the bridge, crossed and went into
camp beyond Wilson's Creek.

On Sunday the 28th, there was no general movement of the troops.
McCook, however, sent Willich's brigade out on reconoissance, to
learn whether the enemy had retired to Murfreesboro or Shelbyville.
Willich went several miles on the Shelbyville road and found that
the force in his front had turned to the left and moved toward that
former place. Stanley with the cavalry also made a reconoissance,
and reported that Hardee had retreated to Murfreesboro.

On the 29th, McCook, leaving Baldwin's brigade at Triune to cover
the extreme right, moved forward with the remainder of his command
on a country road known as the Bole Jack road toward Murfreesboro.
The command did not reach their encampment until late in the
evening, when from the movements of the enemy it was concluded that
he intended to give battle at Murfreesboro, and every disposition
of troops was made with reference to this.  That night McCook's
command was encamped in line of battle with two brigades of Johnson's
division watching the right, Woodruff's brigade guarding the bridge
at Overall's Creek, Davis on the right of the Wilkinson pike, with
Sheridan on the left of that road.  The brigade that McCook had left
at Triune was ordered up and assumed its position with the troops
on the 30th.  McCook's entire command on the morning of that day
advanced down the Wilkinson turnpike until the head of the column
encountered the enemy's pickets.  The line of battle was at once
formed with the division deployed in a line running to the right in
a southeast direction with the left of Sheridan upon the Wilkinson
pike immediately on Negley's right.  Davis's division was at once
thrown into line of battle with his left resting on Sheridan's
right, and Johnson's held in reserve.  Covering the front with a
strong line of skirmishers, McCook moved his men slowly forward,
the enemy stubbornly contesting every foot of ground.  McCook's
skirmishers soon became sharply engaged with those of the rebels.
The ground was very favorable to the enemy, they being under cover
of heavy woods and cedar thickets.  At 12 o'clock part of the
enemy's line of battle was determined, McCook's skirmishers being
then about five hundred yards from it.  The resistance to Davis's
advance was especially stubborn, and the losses of the day footed
up seventy-five in Sheridan's division and some two hundred
in Davis's.  Shortly before sunset the rebel position was plainly
discernible from Davis's front, and was formed diagonally across
the old Murfreesboro and Franklin road.  In the afternoon, McCook
learned from a citizen who had seen the enemy's line of battle and
the position of his troops, that they were posted with the right
of Cheatham's division resting on the Wilkinson pike; Wither's
division on Cheatham's left, with his left resting on the Franklin
road; the entire of Hardee's corps to the left of that road extending
toward Salem pike.  This formation of the enemy's line placed the
right of McCook's line as then formed directly in front of the
enemy's centre.  Information was at once sent to Rosecrans, and
McCook informed his three division commanders of this fact and
then placed two brigades of the reserve division under Willich and
Kirk--two of the best and most experienced brigade commanders in
the army--on the right of Davis, to protect the right flank and
guard against surprise--that of Kirk with his left resting on Davis's
right, with his right refused, Willich on Kirk's right and in a
line nearly perpendicular to the main line, thus covering the right
flank.  The third brigade of Johnson's division was held as reserve.
McCook's line of battle as thus formed was broken in several
points.  The general direction of Sheridan's line was to the east
and south, facing nearly at right angles with Negley, that of Davis
was to the west, facing south, nearly at right angles to Sheridan,
Kirk's brigade to Davis's right faced more to the east, while
Willich's faced due south.  The general direction of McCook's line,
however, conformed to the line of the enemy in its front, except
the latter had no breaks in the line and that its left division
under McCown had its left extended due south.  The main portion
of the enemy's battle-line faced northwest.  Breckinridge on the
right of the line was facing nearly north while McCown on the left
faced due west.  The enemy awaiting attack--acting on the defensive--had
as far as practicable located its line in the cedars, with open
ground in the front.  McCook considered his line a strong one,
with "open ground in the front for a short distance."  Rosecrans,
on being informed by McCook of the location of his line of battle,
expressed himself against it, saying:  "I don't like the facing
so much to the east, but must confide that to you, who know the
ground.  If you don't think you present the best position, change
it."  At six o'clock in the evening McCook received an order from
Rosecrans to have large and extended camp-fires made on the right,
extending far beyond the right of the line, to deceive the enemy
and make him believe that troops were being massed there.  Fires
were built extending nearly a mile beyond the right of McCook's
line.  In this position the right wing rested in the cedars the
night before the battle.  The troops, cutting cedar boughs for
beds, and officers and men, wrapping themselves in their blankets,
slept in the frosty night air with the silent stars looking down.

On the 26th, Thomas's command, "the Centre," with Negley's division
in the advance, moved out promptly to Brentwood on the Franklin
pike, and from there turned to the left and advanced on the Wilson
pike to Owen's store, where the troops were to encamp for the night.
But on arriving there, Negley left his train and pushed on at once
with his troops to Nolinsville, from whence the sound of Davis's guns
had reached him, to his support.  Negley encamped at Nolinsville,
Rousseau at Owen's store, and Walker's brigade at Brentwood.  A very
heavy rain during the night rendered the country roads impassable,
and it was not until the night of the 27th that Rousseau's command
reached Nolinsville.  On the morning of the 27th, Negley's train
coming up, his division moved to the east, over an extremely rough
by-road, to the right of Crittenden on the Murfreesboro pike,
taking position at Stewartsboro.  Walker was sent back by Thomas
from Brentwood, to take the direct Nolinsville pike.  On the 28th,
Rousseau, under order, marched to Stewartsboro, where he joined
Negley's division.  On the 29th Negley crossed Stewart's Creek at
the ford southwest of, and two miles above the turnpike bridge, and
marched in supporting distance of the head of Crittenden's command
on the Murfreesboro pike.  Rousseau was ordered to remain in camp
at Stewartsboro, detaching Starkweather's brigades with a section
of artillery to the Jefferson pike, to watch the movements of the
enemy.  Negley's division moved eight miles that day and took position
within three miles of Murfreesboro.  Walker reached Stewartsboro
from the Nolinsville pike about dark.  Early in the morning,
Crittenden's command moved into line of battle on the left, under
a brisk fire, while Negley's division, by an oblique movement to
the right, took position on the right of Palmer's division, and
was then advanced through a dense cedar thicket several hundred
yards in width to the Wilkinson cross roads, driving the enemy's
skirmishers steadily, and with considerable loss.  Rousseau's
division, with the exception of Starkweather's brigade, was ordered
up from Stewartsboro, reached the front, and bivouacked on the
Murfreesboro pike in the rear of the centre.  Thomas during the
night ordered Walker's brigade to take a strong position near the
bridge over Stewart's Creek, and to defend it against any attempt
of the enemy's cavalry to destroy it.  Rousseau was ordered to
take position in rear of Negley's division, with his left on the
Murfreesboro pike, and his right extending into the cedar thicket
through which Negley had marched to take position.  The troops held
every foot of ground that had been won from the enemy and remained
in line of battle during the night.

The "Left Wing" under Crittenden advanced on the 26th to Lavergne,
Palmer's division in the front.  He was engaged in a short time
with heavy skirmishing, which increased as the command moved south.
The advance of the column was over a rough country, intersected
with forests and cedar thickets.  Crittenden was ordered to delay
his movements until McCook reached Triune, in order to determine
the direction in which Thomas should move as support;  Crittenden's
command encamped that night four miles north of Lavergne.  On the
27th Wood's division was placed in the advance of Crittenden's
column.  Hascall's brigade drove the enemy from Lavergne with
a loss of twenty men wounded, and pushing rapidly on, forced them
south of Stewart's Creek, five miles beyond.  At this place the
enemy set fire to the bridge, which Hascall's advance reached in
time to save.  Hazen's brigade of Palmer's division was sent down
the Jefferson pike to seize the bridge over Stewart's Creek at the
crossing of that road.  That night the "Left Wing" went into camp
at Stewartsboro, and remained there over the next day, Sunday.
On the 29th, Crittenden's command crossed Stewart's Creek by the
Smyrna bridge, and the main Murfreesboro pike, and advanced that
day--Palmer's division leading--to within two miles of Murfreesboro,
driving back the enemy after several severe skirmishes, saving two
bridges on the route, and forcing the enemy into his intrenchments.

Rosecrans, about three o'clock in the afternoon, received a
signal message from Palmer at the front, that he was in sight of
Murfreesboro, and that the enemy was running.  Rosecrans then sent
an order to Crittenden to send a division to occupy Murfreesboro,
camping the other two outside.  Crittenden received this order
as he reached the head of his command, where Wood and Palmer were
gathering up their troops prepatory to encamping for the night.
These divisions were in line of battle,--Wood on the left and Palmer
on the right,--with the rebels in sight in such heavy force that
it was evident that they intended to dispute the passage of the
river, and to fight a battle at or near Murfreesboro.  On receipt
of the order, Crittenden gave the command to advance.  Wood was
ordered to occupy the place, and Palmer to advance in line of battle
until the passage of the river had been forced.  Wood on receiving
the order objected greatly to carrying it out, saying that it was
hazarding a great deal for very little, to move over unknown ground
in the night, instead of waiting for daylight, and that Crittenden
ought to take the responsibility of disobeying the order.  This
the latter refused to do.  After Wood and Palmer had issued their
orders to advance, they both insisted that the order should not
be carried out.  The order was then suspended an hour, so that
Rosecrans could be heard from.  During this interval the general
himself came to this portion of the front, and approved of the
action of Crittenden, as the order had been issued on the report
that the enemy had evacuated Murfreesboro.  Under the order, before
it was suspended, Harker with his brigade had crossed the river at
a ford on his left, where he surprised a regiment of Breckinridge's
division, and drove it back on its main lines, not more than five
hundred yards distant, in considerable confusion.  He held this
position until it was dark, with Breckinridge in force on his
front, when Crittenden ordered his return.  Hascall's command was
fording the river, advancing when the order was suspended.  Harker
succeeded in recrossing the river in the face of this strong force
of the enemy without any serious loss.  Crittenden placed Van Cleve's
division, which had reported marching from the Jefferson turnpike
to the Murfreesboro road, in reserve behind Wood.  During the 30th
there was but little change in the position of the Left Wing, while
the other troops were moving into position on the line of battle.
Palmer's division was advanced a short distance, the enemy contesting
stubbornly.

The pioneer brigade had prepared the banks at three places for the
fording of the river.  Wood's division covered two, and the pioneer
brigade, under Captain St. Clair Morton, covered the lower one.
At night Crittenden's corps with Negley's division bivouacked
in order of battle, being on seven hundred yards from the enemy's
entrenchments.  The left of Crittenden's command extended down the
river some five hundred yards.

The first movement of Rosecrans's advance was made known to Bragg
as soon as it had reached a point two miles beyond the Federal
picket-line, where the heads of the several columns encountered
the rebel cavalry pickets.  For all Bragg had placed his army in
winter quarters, and presumed that Rosecrans had done the same,
his experience with the matter of surprise to an army led him to be
well prepared to know and take advantage of the slightest change
in his immediate front.  By the night of the 26th Bragg knew
that Rosecrans's entire army was moving out to force him to fight
or compel his retreat.  He at once selected his line of battle
at Stone's River, and directed his three cavalry brigades, under
Wheeler, Wharton, and Pegram, supported by three brigades of infantry
with artillery, to check the advance of the several columns until
he could unite this army.  He then gave the necessary orders for
the concentration of his command and the formation of his line of
battle.

Murfreesboro is situated on the railroad to Chattanooga, thirty miles
southeast of Nashville, in the midst of the great plain stretching
from the base of the Cumberland Mountains toward the Cumberland
River, and is surrounded by a gently undulating country, exceedingly
fertile and highly cultivated.  Leading in every direction from
the town are numerous excellent turnpikes.  Stone's River--named
after an early settler--is formed here by the middle and south
branches of the stream uniting, and flows in a northerly direction
between low banks of limestone, generally steep and difficult to
cross, emptying into the Cumberland.  At the time of the battle the
stream was so low that it could be crossed by infantry everywhere.
The Nashville Railroad crosses the river about two hundred yards
above the turnpike bridge.  At some five hundred yards beyond, it
intersects the Nashville turnpike at a sharp angle, then runs some
eight hundred yards between the pike and the river, when the stream
turns abruptly to the east and passes to the north.  Open fields
surrounded the town, fringed with dense cedar-brakes.  These
afforded excellent cover for approaching infantry, but were almost
impervious to artillery.

The centre of Bragg's army was at Murfreesboro, under Polk.  The
right was at Readyville, under McCown, and the left at Triune and
Eaglesville, under Hardee.  Polk's command consisted of Cheatham's
and Wither's divisions.  These divisions and three brigades of
Breckenridge's division of Hardee's corps were at Murfreesboro.
Cleburne's division and Adams's brigade of Breckinridge's division
were under the immediate command of Hardee, near Eaglesville, about
twenty miles west of Murfreesboro.  McCown's division of Kirby
Smith's corps was at Readyville, twelve miles east of Murfreesboro.
Each of the two divisions of Hardee's corps consisted of four
brigades of infantry.  To this corps Wheeler's brigade of cavalry
was attached.  The brigade of T. R. Jackson--which was in the rear,
guarding the railroad from Bridgeport to the mountains--Bragg also
ordered up.  On Sunday, the 28th, Bragg formed his line of battle,
placing Breckinridge's division on his extreme right, across Stone's
River, to protect that flank and cover the town.  Adams's brigade
rested on the Lebanon road, about a mile and a half from town.
Breckinridge's division formed the first line, facing north, and
was posted in the edge of the forest, with Cleburne's division in
the second line, 800 yards to the rear.  To the left of Adams the
line was broken by an intervening field, about three hundred yards
in width, which was apparently left unoccupied, but was covered by
the Twentieth Tennessee and Wright's battery, of Preston's brigade,
which swept it and the fields in front.  The remainder of Preston's
brigade rested with its right in the woods, and extended along
the edge with its left toward the river.  On the left of Preston,
Palmer's brigade was formed, and on his left Hanson's completed that
portion of the line.  Jackson's brigade reported to Breckinridge
and was placed on the east side of the Lebanon road, on commanding
ground, a little in the advance of the right of Adams.  On the
other side of the river the right of Withers's division rested at
the bank, near the intersection of the turnpike with the railroad,
and was slightly in advance of Hanson's right.  It extended
southwardly across the Wilkinson pike to the Triune or Franklin
road, in an irregular line adapted to the topography of the country.
In the rear of Withers's division that of Cheatham was posted as
a supporting force.  McCown's division was placed in the rear of
these divisions as the reserve.  This was Bragg's first disposition
of his troops for battle.  On Monday, the 29th, no change of
importance was made, the troops remaining in line of battle.  In
the evening, when Harker's brigade crossed the river, Bragg thought
this was a movement to occupy a hill situated about six hundred
yards in front of Hanson's centre.  This commanded the ground sloping
to the river south and west, and from it the right of Withers's
division across the river could be enfiladed.  Hanson's brigade
was sent out, and, on Harker's return, the hill was occupied by the
batteries of the enemy.  On Monday Bragg, finding that Rosecrans
was extending his line on his right,--as Bragg supposed to operate
on that flank--threw his reserve division under McCown on Withers's
left.  Hardee was ordered to take command of McCown's division, and
to move Cleburne from the second line in the rear of Breckinridge,
and place him on the left as support to McCown.  Cleburne was brought
forward and placed five hundred yards in rear of the latter.  Bragg's
main line of battle was in the edge of the woods, with open ground
to the front.  His troops were formed in two lines, the first line
protected by intrenchments, and his second line formed some six
hundred yards to the rear.  He awaited the attack of Rosecrans on
the 30th, and not receiving it, on Tuesday made his arrangements
for an advance and attack in force on the morning of the 31st.  His
troops remained in line of battle, ready to move with the early
dawn of the coming day.  The two armies were now arrayed only some
five hundred yards apart, facing each other, and eager for the
conflict of the morrow.

At nine o'clock on the evening of the 30th, the corps commanders
met at Rosecrans's headquarters, in the cedars near the Murfreesboro
pike, to receive their final instructions and to learn the details
of the plan of battle for the next day.  McCook was directed with
his three divisions to occupy the most advantageous position,
refusing his right as much as practicable and necessary to secure
it, to await the attack of the enemy, and in the event of that
not being made, to himself engage and hold the force on his front,
Johnson's division held the extreme right of his line; on Johnson's
left was Davis's division, and on Davis's left Sheridan's was
posted.  Thomas was instructed to open with skirmishing and engage
the enemy's centre with Negley's division of his command and Palmer's
of Crittenden's corps, Negley's right resting on Sheridan's left,
and Palmer's right on the left of Negley, Rousseau being in reserve.
Crittenden was ordered to move Van Cleve's division across the river
at the lower ford, covered and supported by the pioneer brigade
and at once advance on Breckinridge.  Wood's division was to
follow--crossing at the upper ford and joining Van Cleve's right--when
they were to press everything before them into Murfreesboro.  This
gave a strong attack from two divisions of Federal troops on the
one of Breckinridge's, which was known to be the only one of the
enemy's on the east of the river.  As soon as Breckinridge had been
dislodged from his position, the artillery of Wood's division was
to take position on the heights east of the river and open fire on
the enemy's lines on the other side, which could here be seen in
reverse, and dislodge them, when Palmer was to drive them southward
across the river or through the wood.  Sustained by the advance
of the Centre under Thomas crushing their right, Crittenden was to
keep advancing, take Murfreesboro, move rapidly westward on the
Franklin pike, get on their flank and rear and drive them into
the country toward Salem, with the prospect of cutting off their
retreat and probably destroying their army.  Rosecrans called the
attention of the corps commanders to the fact that this combination,
which gave to him such a superiority on the left, depended for its
success upon McCook's maintaining his position on the right for at
least three hours, and if compelled to fall back that he should do
so in the same manner he had advanced the day before, slowly and
steadily, refusing his right.  McCook was asked if he could hold
his position for three hours, and replied that he thought he could.
The importance of doing so was again impressed upon him, and the
officers then separated.

As will be seen, the plan of battle as formed by Rosecrans
contemplated a feint attack by his right, which in the event of a
repulse was to fall back slowly, contesting the ground stubbornly,
while the main attack was to be made by the forces on the left,
followed up the advance of the centre, the right to be temporarily
sacrificed for the success of the general plan.  Rosecrans knew
that Bragg had weakened his right to support his left, looking to
offensive movements on his part, and that the vital point in his
own plan was the ability of McCook to hold the enemy in check on
his front.

During the 30th, Bragg formed his plan of battle, which, singular
as it appears, was the exact counterpart of that of the Federal
commander.  Hardee on the left, with McCown's and Cleburne's
divisions, was to advance against the Federal right, which being
forced back, Polk and Withers's and Cheatham's divisions were then
to push the centre.  The movement made by a steady wheel to the
right on the right of Polk's command as a pivot.  Bragg's plan
was to drive our right and centre back against our left on Stone's
River, seize our line of communication with Nashville, thus cutting
us off from our base of operations and supplies, and ultimately
securing the objective of his campaign, Nashville.  Bragg's plan
was equally as bold as that of his opponent--whose command was
slightly inferior in strength to the rebel force--and the success
of either depended very largely on the degree of diligence in
opening the engagement.  Rosecrans's orders were for the troops
to breakfast before daylight and attack at seven o'clock.  Bragg
issued orders to attack at daylight.





Chapter VIII.




The Battle of Stone's River.

With early light, on the morning of the 31st, the movement in each
army began.  Rosecrans had established his headquarters in the rear
of the left, in order to direct in person the forward movement of
that portion of his army which was to cross Stone's River, sweep
all resistance before it, and swing into Murfreesboro.  The command
was given, and at once Van Cleve advanced two brigades, making the
crossing of the river at the lower ford without opposition.  Wood's
division had reached the river bank prepared to make the crossing
and support Van Cleve.  Everything on the left appeared to be working
satisfactorily, when the opening sounds of the enemy's attack on
the right reached the left.  This was as intended, and went to show
that if Bragg's left was fully occupied he then could give the less
attention to his right, engaged by our army.  with high hopes the
troops then pressing forward continued to cross the river.  Within
an hour after the opening of the battle, one of McCook's staff
officers reported to Rosecrans that the Right Wing was heavily
pressed and needed assistance.  Rosecrans was not told of the rout
of Johnson's division, nor of the rapid withdrawal of Davis, made
necessary thereby.  Rosecrans, sending word to McCook to make a
stubborn fight, continued his own offensive movement.  Everything
was working well as far as he knew.  His strong force on the left
was not yet engaged.  This he could hurl at the enemy's line of
communications and strike on the flank of Bragg's army that was
flanking him.  Soon after another staff officer from McCook arrived
and reported that the entire Right Wing was being driven, a fact
that manifested itself by the troops from the broken divisions
pouring forth from the cedars in alarming numbers, and by the rapid
movement of the noise of the battle to the north.  Then Rosecrans
saw the necessity of abandoning his own movement, of recalling the
left, and of proceeding at once to the right to save what was left
of that corps as speedily as possible.  He ordered back his left
from across the river, and calling on his staff to mount, rode full
gallop over to the right to reform that command on a new line and
save his army.  Now that he was on the defensive, after McCook's
disaster, it was impossible to carry out his original plan of
battle.

On the 30th, McCown in posting his division placed Ector's and
Rains's brigades in the first line, and McNair's brigade in the
second.  Hardee ordered McCown at once to change this so as to
bring McNair on the front line.  This order was not obeyed until the
morning of the 31st, when the movement was made, causing, however,
some delay in the advance of Hardee's command on our right.  At
half past six o'clock, McCown's division in the front line with
Cleburne's division in the second swinging around by a continuous
change of direction to the right, advanced on to the right of McCook.
McCown did not properly execute the movement as intended, and was
carried so far west as to leave a gap in the rebel front between
Withers's left and McCown's right.  Into this gap Cleburne immediately
threw his division, and advanced, filling the interval in the front
line between McCown and Polk.  This gave Hardee double the length
of front originally contemplated, and made it a single line instead
of a double with division front.  These two divisions thus formed
then struck McCook's right flank--Johnson's division.  McCook's line
was very weak and poorly posted.  It was thin and light, without
reserves, with neither the troops nor commanding officers in their
places, as they should have been, under Rosecrans's orders of the
evening before.

Every soldier on that field knew when the sun went down on the 30th
that on the following day he would be engaged in a struggle unto
death, and the air was full of tokens that one of the most desperate
of battles was to be fought.  In the face of all this, Johnson, the
commander of the First Division on the right, was not on the line
nor near enough to his troops to give orders to them, his headquarters
being a mile and a half in the rear.  General Willich the commander
of the Second Brigade, which had been posted for the express purpose
of protecting the extreme right of our army, was absent from his
command at division headquarters.  His brigade was not even in line,
as they had been ordered to get their breakfast.  The batteries of
the division were not properly posted, and in some cases the horses
were away from the guns to the rear for water.  All this was criminal
negligence--a failure in the performance of duty--for which some
one should have suffered.  To the faulty position of the line and
to the unprepared condition of the troops is to be attributed the
almost overwhelming disaster that overtook our army on that day.
As the two divisions of the enemy advanced, Kirk threw forward the
Forty-fourth Illinois to support the skirmish line, and called on
Willich's brigade for help.  This brigade being without an immediate
commander, no effort was made to support Kirk.  The contest was
too unequal to be maintained for any great length of time, and
Johnson's division, after a sharp and spirited but fruitless contest,
crumbling to pieces, was driven back with a loss of eleven guns.
Kirk was mortally wounded and Willich was captured, returning to
his command as it was driven back.  Kirk's brigade lost 473 killed
and wounded, and had 342 captured.  Willich's brigade had a few
less killed and wounded, but more than twice that number captured.

Baldwin in reserve near headquarters was too far from the front
to aid in supporting either of the other brigades of Johnson's
division.  Stragglers from Kirk's and Willich's brigades gave the
first information to Baldwin of the disaster on the right.  Hastily
forming his troops, he had barely time to post them in line of battle
before the enemy in immense masses appeared on his front at short
range, their left extending far beyond the extreme right of his
line.  Opening at once a destructive fire upon their dense masses
with his infantry and artillery, Baldwin succeeded in checking
their advance in his front, but their left continued to swing around
on his right.  Here four pieces of Simonson's battery posted near
the woods in the rear of the first position opened with terrible
effect.  The enemy came on in such overwhelming numbers, that after
half an hour's stubborn resistance Baldwin was compelled to retire,
not however until the enemy had flanked his right and were pouring
in an enfilading fire.  As it was he barely made his escape, since
in a moment longer his entire command would have been surrounded
and captured.  At the edge of the woods Baldwin endeavored to make
another stand, but before he could form his line he was again forced
back.  Retiring slowly, with several halts in the cedars, Baldwin
with his brigade reached the railroad where the rest of the division
was being reformed.

The right flank being driven from its position by the left of the
enemy, Davis's division then felt the full force of the victorious
sweep of the rebel troops, flushed with success and aided by the
forces immediately in his front.  Davis, as soon as the disaster
on his right had fully developed, at once changed front and formed
a new line, with his right brigade under Post nearly at right angles
to its former position, and made all necessary disposition of his
troops to receive the attack.  Baldwin's brigade had hastily taken
position and had already felt the force of the enemy's concentrated
attack.  Still the advancing lines of the enemy greatly overlapped
the extreme right of Baldwin.  Hardly had the troops been placed
in this position before the enemy swept down in heavy masses upon
both the flank and front, charging with the rebel yell.  The two
divisions of McCown's and Cleburne's troops which had driven Johnson,
hurled themselves upon Baldwin's and Post's brigades, while the
fresh troops of Withers's division, composed of Manigualt's and
Loomis's brigades, rushed upon those of Davis, under Carlin and
Woodruff, and upon that on the right of Sheridan's line under Sill.
The change of position of Post's brigade gave to the two remaining
brigades of Davis's division, and Sill's brigade of Sheridan's
command, the length of division front, and on this the enemy made
a united attack.  After Baldwin had been compelled to retire, Post
repulsed the attack on his brigade, and Carlin, Woodruff, and Sill
in the front drove back the assaulting column of the rebels with
heavy loss.  The enemy then reformed his lines, strengthened them
with his reserves under Vaughan and Maney of Cheatham's division
and once more pressed forward.  Again these heavy lines struck
Carlin, Woodruff, and Sill, and were again handsomely repulsed;
Sill gallantly charging the rebels and driving them into their line
of intrenchments.  In this charge, General Sill was killed.  His
brigade then slowly retired and formed anew in line of battle.
Cleburne at the same time charged down on Post's brigade, and he
too was a second time repulsed.

The formation of the battle-front of Davis's two left brigades under
Carlin and Woodruff was almost perpendicular to that of Sheridan's
division, and the left of Woodruff's with the right of Sill's
brigade formed the apex of a right triangle.  This position was
at once observed by the enemy, who saw that if he could take this
extreme point of the angle he would be in position to enfilade both
lines at once.  For the possession of this point every effort was
made, and a third attack was ordered upon it with four brigades,
under the immediate command of Cheatham, in double lines.  Hardee
had gathered his command together again for another attack on Post's
position.  Pressing forward with the victorious troops of McCown's
and Cleburne's divisions--the troops that had swept Johnson from
the field--he enveloped both flanks of Post's brigade, and compelled
him to fall back, with the loss of one gun, to the Nashville pike,
where he also reformed his command.

On the withdrawal of Post's brigade, Carlin's right was left exposed
to the enemy, who with renewed vigor pressed forward in overwhelming
numbers on converging lines, massing as they advanced.  Circling
around on their right the rebels swept down on the remaining brigades
of Davis's division in dense columns.  In the previous charge the
attack had been so heavy upon the angle formed by Woodruff's left
and Sill's right, that in the new formation--after the second
repulse--the line at this point was somewhat broken, and after
Sill's death the right of the brigade was reformed somewhat to the
rear of the former line, the better to support the battery attached
to it.  In the heavy fighting of the morning the position of all
the brigades had been more or less changed, and in several instances
the commanding officer of each brigade considered his command as
being without support on either flank.  On the third assault both
Carlin and Woodruff thought this to be the case with their commands,
and in the attack then made upon their brigades they became almost
surrounded.  Carlin stubbornly resisted every effort to drive him
from his position until by his remaining longer the loss of his
entire brigade became imminent.  His regiment on the left gave way
and he then retreated across open fields in the rear to the edge
of the woods, where Davis was attempting to reform his line, having
placed Hotchkiss's battery just within the timber.  Woodruff then
fell back, but being closely pressed, turned and with a determined
charge sent the enemy beyond his original position.  Being unsupported
he was compelled to retire into the cedars.  Before Woodruff reached
the new lines that Davis was trying to form, Carlin's troops opened
fire on the advancing enemy, when he was informed that Davis had
ordered a farther withdrawal.  He then fell back across the Wilkinson
pike, where he rallied his men, who however, on the advance of
the enemy, fired one volley and broke to the rear without orders.
Carlin then went with them through the lines of reserves, halting
at the railroad, where he reformed his command.  After reaching the
cedars Woodruff charged a second time, and compelled the enemy to
fall back, but his ammunition giving out, his troops passed to the
rear, resisting every effort to rally them until they reached the
Murfreesboro pike.

Davis's division had up to this time protected Sheridan's right,
and these divisions unitedly had resisted two assaults.  After the
charge of the enemy that broke Davis's division and sent it through
the cedars, Sheridan was compelled to change his line and to protect
the right flank of his command from the enemy, now pressing that
part of his position, as well as his front, in increasing numbers,
as the line became shortened.  Hastily withdrawing Sill's brigade,
with the reserves sent it as support, he directed Roberts, with
the left brigade, which had changed front and formed in columns
of regiments, to charge the enemy in the cedars from which he had
withdrawn Sill's brigade and the reserves.  This charge was at once
made by Roberts, and the enemy's advance checked sufficiently to
give Sheridan time to form his troops on the new line, which he
at once did by placing Sill's and Shafer's brigades on a line at
right angles to his first one, and ordered Roberts to return and
form his command on this same line.  Sheridan now attempted to
form the broken troops of the other division on the right of his
new line, but in this he was not successful.  After making a gallant
fight with his division, finding the right of his new line turned,
Sheridan was directed by McCook to advance to the front and reform
his troops to the right of Negley's division of the Centre under
Thomas.  Throwing forward his left to join Negley's right, he
placed Roberts's brigade in position at right angles to Negley's
line, facing south, and then placed his two other brigades in the
rear, and at right angles to Roberts, so as to face westward and
to cover the rear of Negley's lines.  In the angle of these lines
on the right of Negley, he placed his artillery.  Here he was again
fiercely assaulted by the enemy, and one of the fiercest and most
sanguinary contests of the day ensued.  Massing the four divisions
of Hardee's and Polk's corps--each of four brigades--Bragg hurled
them against the divisions of Sheridan and Negley, and at the same
time the enemy opened fire from the intrenchments in the direction
of Murfreesboro.  Here the fighting was terrific.  Five batteries
were posted with these two divisions, the artillery range of the
respective forces being not to exceed two hundred yards.  Three
times in dense masses the enemy charged on these divisions, and
three times were they repulsed.  Here Colonel Roberts was killed.
Sheridan's troops having now exhausted their ammunition--Shafer's
brigade being entirely out and nearly all his horses killed--then
gave way, after over four hours of some of the hottest fighting of
the day.  Sheridan lost in falling back from this position eight
guns.  Nearly all the remainder of his artillery was drawn by his
men through the cedars.  On arriving at the Murfreesboro pike,
Sheridan reformed his command in an open space near the right of
Palmer.

Before assisting in the gallant fight on the right of the center
with Sheridan in his new position, Negley's division, after
repelling all assaults made on it, had been engaged in heavy fighting
on its front since the middle of the morning.  On the withdrawal
of Sheridan, Negley's division found themselves surrounded by the
enemy in swarms.  Rousseau's division in reserve, and Palmer's
on the left, had retired to the rear of the cedars, to form a new
line.  Falling back through the cedar-brakes in the rear of the
division, under a concentrated fire of musketry and artillery at
short range, the rebels were driven back in front and checked in
the rear.  Miller's and Stanley's brigades on reaching the woods
reformed their lines, faced to the rear and fired several volleys
into the enemy, then advanced over the open fields across which
these brigades had just retired.  In passing through the cedars
the enemy pressed so closely on the division that in some parts of
Miller's brigade the lines of the opposing armies seemed commingled.
The division then reformed on the new line, as directed by Thomas,
near the Nashville pike.

Early in the day, with the breaking up and retreat of the two fine
divisions of McCook's corps, the extent of the disaster to the right
was forced upon Rosecrans with terrible earnestness.  Realizing at
once that upon him devolved the task of making such disposition of
his command as would ensure the safety of his army, he immediately
gave the necessary orders for the movement of the troops.  Hurriedly
galloping to the centre, where he found Thomas, he at once ordered
Rousseau's division--held as reserve heretofore--to be sent to the
support of what was left of McCook's line into the cedar-brakes to
the right and rear of Sheridan.  Rosecrans then ordered Crittenden
to suspend Van Cleve's movement across the river on the left, to cover
the crossing with one brigade, and to move the other two brigades
westward across the fields toward the railroad for a reserve.  He
also directed Wood to suspend his preparations for his crossing
and for him to move at once to the new line on the right and hold
Hascall in reserve.  Up to this time Rosecrans had hoped that
McCook, notwithstanding the disaster to the right, might stay the
onset with his own troops.  With the volume of stragglers and the
detachments from the broken commands swarming to the rear through
the cedars Rosecrans soon became satisfied that McCook was routed.
He then ordered Van Cleve to be sent in to the right of Rousseau,
and Wood to send Colonel Harker's brigade farther down the Murfreesboro
pike with orders to go in and attack the enemy on the right of Van
Cleve.  The pioneer brigade had been posted on the knoll of ground
west of the Nashville pike and about four or five hundred yards
in the rear of Palmer's centre, supporting Stokes's battery.  On
Negley's division being compelled to retire, Thomas ordered him
with Rousseau to form their divisions along a depression in the
open ground in rear of the cedars, as a temporary line, until the
artillery could be posted on the high ground near to and west of
the Murfreesboro pike.  Rousseau's division, cutting its way through
the enemy in falling back from the cedars, took position on this
temporary line with all its batteries posted on the knoll a short
distance to the rear.  Here the severest engagement of this day of
heavy fighting was had, almost hand to hand.  At this point the new
line had open ground in front of it for some four or five hundred
yards.  Rousseau, while his batteries were unlimbering, requested
Van Cleve to move with Colonel Samuel Beatty's brigade of his
division to form on his right, check the rebel advance and drive
it back.  Van Cleve instantly moved his troops on the double quick
and reached the desired position in good season.  Upon these troops
in this new line the rebels charged in dense masses, flushed with
the victory of the early morning and elate with the hope of continued
success to the end.  They had swept everything before them thus
far, and felt that with renewed effort the successful issue of the
battle was within their grasp.  Emerging from the cedars with yell
after yell, firing as they came, they rushed forward four lines
deep in the attempt to cross the open field and drive back this
new line that stood in their pathway to final victory.  At once
Rousseau's division and Beatty's brigade opened fire upon the
advancing columns, while Guenther's and Loomis's batteries added
effect to it by sending double shotted canister into their thick
ranks.  The rebels moved on for a time, but the fire proved too
terrible and they were driven back with great slaughter.  On reaching
the cedars these troops were rallied by their officers, and with
fresh troops as supports they advanced once more, with a determined
effort to carry our position at this point.  But again they were,
after a more desperate struggle, driven back.  Again and again they
returned to the assault, in four deliberate and fiercely sustained
efforts, each time to meet with a repulse.  The brigade of regulars
under the command of Colonel Shepherd sustained the heaviest blows
of this assault.  They had the efficient support of Scribner's and
John Beatty's brigades, of Loomis's and Guenther's batteries, and
of the pioneer brigade under Captain St. Clair Morton, with Stokes's
battery.  Sheppard's command lost in killed and wounded in this
short and severe contest, 26 officers and 611 enlisted men, making
a total loss of 637 out of 1,566 effectives.  The centre succeeded
in driving back the enemy from its front, gallantly holding its
ground against overwhelming odds, while the artillery concentrating
its fire on the cedar thickets on their right drove the enemy far
back under cover of the woods.

While the right and centre had been thus actively engaged, the left
had also borne its full share of the heavy fighting of the day.
Palmer's division was posted in line of battle with his right
resting on Negley's left.  His line was formed with Cruft's brigade
on the right, connecting with Negley, and his left extending across
a point of woods to the right of Hazen's brigade, which was formed
in two lines with his left resting on the Nashville pike, while
Grose's brigade was in reserve some two hundred yards to the rear,
formed in two lines nearly opposite the interval between the brigades
in line of battle.  On the withdrawal of the troops of the left
from across the river, Wood ordered Wagner with his brigade to hold
his position in the woods on the left of the Murfreesboro pike at
all hazards, this being an exceedingly important point, protecting
our left front and flanks and securing command of the road leading
to the rear.  Hascall's and Harker's brigades were withdrawn, and
the latter, under an order from Rosecrans, was moved to the right
and rear.  In the heavy fighting of the general movement on the
right and centre, the left gradually became engaged, and with this
Hascall was ordered by Wood to take position between Wagner and
Hazen on Wagner's right.  With the general advance of the enemy,
moving on the right of Polk's corps as a pivot, Palmer and the
two brigades of Wood's division on the left became engaged.  Cruft
early in the morning had been ordered by Palmer to advance, keeping
in line with Negley, the latter having sent word to Palmer that he
intended to advance his division to attack the enemy.  Cruft was
advanced in two lines, two regiments in each line with Miller's
brigade of Negley's division on the right and Hazen's brigade on
his left.  After Cruft had advanced about a hundred yards, Palmer
discovered that Negley had thrown back his right so that his line
was almost perpendicular to Cruft's and to his rear.  After Cruft
had driven the enemy's skirmishers in, the rebels advanced in great
force in four ranks with double lines, Chalmers in the front line
with Donelson's brigade following.  This charge Cruft repulsed,
inflicting severe loss on the enemy.  Chalmers was so severely
wounded by the bursting of a shell as to disqualify him for further
duty on the field.  Advancing once more, the rebels again attacked
Cruft's line, when a very severe engagement ensued, and after some
thirty minutes' firing the enemy was again repulsed.  When Negley's
division went back through the cedars, Cruft was left without
support on his right and he then withdrew to the wood, the enemy
following him closely and pressing him hard.  While Cruft was thus
engaged on the front, Palmer found that the right and centre had
been driven from the first line, and that the enemy in Negley's
front was forcing his way into the open ground to his rear.  He
then changed Grose from front to rear, retired his new left so as
to bring the rebels under the direct fire of his line, and opened
on them with great effect, holding his ground until the enemy was
driven back.  Hazen was ordered to fall back from the advanced
position he then held, and to occupy the crest of a low wooded
hill between the pike and the railroad, and there resist the attack.
This was about eleven o'clock, and all of Palmer's command was
engaged with the enemy--Hazen on the railroad, one or two detached
regiments to the right, Cruft still farther to the right, actively
engaged, while Grose to the rear was fighting heavy odds.  Grose
shortly after this changed to the front again, the enemy being
driven back from his rear, and moved to the left to co-operate
with Hazen.  After aiding in the repulse of the troops that struck
Cruft's lines, Hazen with constant firing maintained his position
on his left at the railroad, retiring his right to place his troops
behind the embankment at that place.  General Palmer had ordered
Grose to co-operate with Hazen, and part of Grose's troops reporting
to him, they were placed in position on the front.  Here was held
what was considered by the enemy to be the key to our position,
known as the "Round Forest."  This was attacked by the right of
Donelson's brigade, but the attack was met with a fire that mowed
down half its number, one regiment losing 207 out of 402.  In
another regiment the loss was 306 out of 425.  Polk finding that
his troops had been so severely punished that they were not able
to renew the attack on the extreme left of our line, and that the
new line on the right as formed by Rosecrans resisted every attack,
applied for an order from Bragg directing four brigades from
Breckenridge's command to be sent to him to drive our left from
its line, and especially to dislodge us from our position in the
"Round Forest."  These brigades were sent to him, arriving in two
detachments of two brigades each.  Adams and Jackson's brigades
first reported, under Breckinridge in person.  Those of Preston
and Palmer reported about two hours later.  About two o'clock in
the afternoon Adams and Jackson's brigades assailed our left with
determined energy, but after a severe contest they were compelled
to yield and fall back.  They were rallied by Breckenridge, but
were too badly cut up to renew the attack.  About four o'clock, on
the arrival of the brigades of Preston and Palmer, the assault on
the left was renewed and again repulsed, when the enemy withdrew and
made no further attack upon that position.  When this last attack
was made, Rosecrans, anxious as to this vital point of his lines,
hurried there with his staff to assist in the repulse.  It was here
that a shell grazing the person of Rosecrans carried off the head
of his chief of staff, the lamented Garesche.

The new line formed by Rosecrans to protect his communication extended
from Hazen on the Murfreesboro pike in a northwesterly direction,
Hascall supporting Hazen, Rousseau filling the interval to the
pioneer brigade, Negley in reserve, Van Cleve west of the pioneer
brigade, McCook's corps refused on his right and slightly to the rear
on the Nashville pike, with the cavalry at and beyond Overall's
Creek.  After the formation had been completed later in the afternoon,
with a wild yell the enemy debouched from the cedar thickets, and
forming into line, advanced as if to charge once more.  At once a
terrific fire of artillery and infantry opened on them, and their
broken ranks went back over the fields driven in great confusion;
the batteries Rosecrans had placed on the commanding ground near
the railroad inflicting a heavier loss on Polk's brigade than it
had suffered in all the previous fighting of the day.  This attack
was in the main repulsed by Van Cleve's division, aided by Harker's
brigade, and the cavalry under General Stanley.  This was the last
assault on the right and centre, and with the repulse of Breckinridge's
command on the left, the fighting for the day was over; and on the
field where death had reaped such a heavy harvest, on the last day
of 1862, the troops slept on their arms, waiting for what the next
day might bring forth.  The night was clear and cold.  The armies
maintained their relative positions, with some picket firing
occurring during the night.  Rosecrans gave orders that all the
spare ammunition should be issued, and it was found that there was
enough for another battle, the main question being where the battle
was to be fought.  During the night Rosecrans, in order to complete
the new formation of his lines, withdrew the left from the advanced
position it occupied, and placed it in line some two hundred and
fifty yards to the rear, on more advantageous ground, the extreme
left resting on Stone's River above the lower ford and extending
to the railroad.  Late in the afternoon the brigades under Colonels
Starkweather and Walker, that had been on duty in the rear, arrived
at the front and were posted in reserve on the line of battle, the
former in rear of McCook's left, and Walker in rear of the left of
Sheridan's division near the Murfreesboro pike.  On the morning of
the 1st they were placed in the front line, relieving Van Cleve,
who then returned to his position on the left.

The extent of the disaster on the right was appalling and seemed
at one time about to envelop the entire army.  As the storm of
battle passed down the line it reached Thomas, who cool, calm, and
self-sustained, stood the test of one of the fiercest contests of
the war.  It was to him that Rosecrans first turned in the hour of
disaster and in him he trusted most.  The commander of the army,
too, was sorely tried.  He had come to win victory, but in place
of it defeat seemed almost inevitable.  Reforming his lines and
bravely fighting, he had hurled back Bragg's army before it had
achieved any decisive success.  Rosecrans knew that his losses had
been extremely heavy, but those of the enemy had been still more
severe.  He felt that on a question of endurance his army would
come out first, although the dash and onset of the rebels had at
the opening been able to sweep all before them.  In the face of
an earnest effort on the part of some of his general officers to
persuade him to fall back to Nashville and then throw up works and
wait for reinforcements, Rosecrans determined to await the attack
of the enemy in the positions of his lines late Wednesday afternoon.
He sent for the provision trains, ordered up fresh supplies
of ammunition, and decided that if Bragg should not attack before
these arrived, that he himself would then resume offensive operations.

During the morning of January 1, 1863, the rebels made repeated
attempts to advance on Thomas's front in the centre, but were driven
back before emerging from the woods.  Crittenden was ordered to
send Van Cleve's division across the river, to occupy the position
opposite the ford on his left, his right resting on high ground
near the river and his left thrown forward perpendicular to it.
The rebel right, under Polk, kept up a brisk skirmish fire on their
front.  Chalmer's brigade was ordered to occupy the ground in front
of the "Round Forest."  Bragg, anticipating an attack on his right
under Breckinridge on the morning of the 1st, during the night
ordered two brigades of that division to recross to the east side
of the river.  But none was made.  About two o'clock in the afternoon
the enemy showed signs of movement, by massing large numbers of
his troops on our right at the extremity of an open field a mile
and a half from the Murfreesboro pike.  Here the rebels formed in
lines six deep, and passed thus heavily, remained without advancing
for over an hour.  Gibson's brigade and battery occupied the woods
near Overall's creek, while Negley's was placed as support on
McCook's right.  The evident design of Bragg during the day was
simply to feel the lines of our army to find out if Rosecrans was
retreating.  Satisfied of this, he felt that while he could maintain
his position he was not in condition to attack, after the heavy
hammering his army had received the day before.

At daylight the next day Bragg gave orders to his corps commanders
to feel our lines and ascertain Rosecrans's position.  Fire was
opened from four batteries on the centre, and a demonstration of
force was made by his infantry, followed by another on McCook; but
at all points meeting with a heavy artillery fire, he concluded that
our army still occupied the battle field in force.  Bragg ordered
Wharton's and Pegram's brigades of cavalry to cross to the right
bank of Stone's River immediately in Breckinridge's front.  Soon
after this a number of his staff officers discovered for the first
time that Van Cleve's troops, sent over the day before, had quietly
crossed unopposed, and had established themselves on and under cover
of an eminence from which Polk's line was commanded and enfiladed.
It was an evident necessity either to withdraw Polk's line or to
dislodge Van Cleve's.  The first alternative was not to be entertained
until the failure of an attempt to accomplish the latter.  Polk was
at once ordered to send over to Breckenridge the remaining brigades
belonging to his division still with Polk, and Breckenridge, reporting
to Bragg, received his orders.  The attack was to be made with the
four brigades of Breckinridge's command, the cavalry protecting
his right and co-operating with him.  The crest of ground near the
river, where Van Cleve's division was in position, was the point
against which the main attack was to be directed.  This taken,
Breckinridge was to bring up his artillery and establish it on the
high ground, so as to enfilade our lines on the other side of the
river.  Polk was to open with a heavy fire on our left as Breckinridge
commenced his advance.  The signal for the attack was to be one gun
from the centre, and four o'clock was the hour set for the firing
of this gun.

Breckinridge drew up his division in two lines, the first in a
narrow skirt of woods, the other some two hundred yards in rear.
General Pillow, after the first day's fighting, reporting for
duty, was assigned to the command of Palmer's brigade.  Pillow's
and Hanson's brigades formed the first line, Preston's and Adams's
brigades the second.  The artillery was placed in rear of the
second line, and in addition to that of his brigade, ten Napoleon
guns--12-pounders--were sent to aid in the attack.

Van Cleve's division was under the command of Colonel Samuel Beatty,
with Price's brigade on the right next to the river, Fyffe's brigade
on the left.  Grider's brigade formed Beatty's support, while a
brigade of Palmer's division was placed in position on the extreme
left to protect that flank.  Drury's battery was posted in the
rear.  In front of Breckinridge's line was an open space some six
hundred and fifty yards in width, with a gentle ascent which it
was necessary for his troops to cross before reaching our lines.
Several hundred yards in the rear of the latter was the river,
increasing the distance as it flowed beyond our left.

General Rosecrans had ordered Crittenden to send Beatty's division
across the river as protection to the troops on the left and centre,
as from the high ground near the river the enemy, by an enfilading
fire, could sweep these portions of our line.  During the morning
of the 2d Negley's division was ordered from the right, and placed
in position on the west bank of the river, in the rear of Beatty's
division, as reserves, being here on the left of Hazen's and Cruft's
brigades of Palmer's division.

As soon as Breckinridge's command entered the open ground to his
front, the artillery massed on the west bank of the river by order
of Crittenden, consisting of all the guns of the left wing, together
with the batteries belonging to Negley's division and Stoke's
battery, making 58 guns in position, opened a heavy, accurate,
and destructive fire.  Large numbers of the enemy fell before they
reached Beatty's infantry lines.  Pressing forward without waiting
to throw out a skirmish line, Breckinridge's command swept onward,
reckless of the artillery fire and that of the infantry, and struck
Price's and Grider's brigades, broke their lines, drove them from
their position on to their support in the rear, which also gave
way, when the entire division retreated in broken ranks across
the river, taking refuge behind the line of Negley's division, and
there reforming.  Breckenridge reports that he "after a brief but
bloody conflict routed both the opposing lines, took 400 prisoners
and several flags, and drove their artillery and the great body
of their infantry across the river."  His success, however, was
exceedingly short-lived.  Colonel John F. Miller, commanding the
right brigade of Negley's division, had, in the absence of Negley
in the rear, ordered the troops of his division to lie down under
cover of the bluff of the river bank, and hold their fire until
our troops from the other side crossed over and moved to the rear.
As soon as the last of Beatty's men had passed through Miller's lines,
he commanded the division to rise and open fire on Breckinridge's
troops.  Miller's fire was so effectively given as to cause the
enemy at once to recoil, Breckenridge's command being also under
the artillery fire on the left, enfilading his ranks.  His division
soon wavered, and then began falling back.  At this Miller-Negley
still not appearing--ordered the division to charge across the
river, and to drive the enemy from their line of intrenchments,
which they did.  While crossing, Miller received word from Palmer
not to cross his command, but as the greater part of his troops
were over the river driving the enemy, Miller pressed on in person,
and hurried the troops last to cross, up to the support of those in
the advance.  He was then ordered by Palmer to recross the river,
and to support the artillery on the hill on the west bank.  The
troops under Miller were then advancing through the cornfield,
driving the enemy, and as his right flank was fully protected, he
had no inclination to turn back, and he ordered the troops forward.
One of the enemy's batteries was posted in a wood just beyond the
cornfield to the front.  It was keeping up a brisk fire on Miller's
advance, when he ordered his men to charge this battery, which
they did, capturing three guns.  At the time of the charge the
Twenty-sixth Tennessee was supporting the battery.  This regiment
was broken by the assault, a large number of them captured, with
the colors of the command.  Sending the prisoners, guns, and colors
to the rear, Miller reformed his line so as to hold the ground
until relieved by other troops.  These being crossed over the river
under Hazen, together with Davis's division, Miller's command
returned to the west bank of the river and there reformed the
division in line, and took position for the night.  Negley himself
was not across the river with the command during the engagement.

Bragg was deeply chagrined at the failure of Breckinridge's movement.
In his report of the action he says, "The contest was short and
severe, the enemy were driven back and the eminence gained, but
the movement as a whole was a failure, and the position was again
yielded.  Our forces were moved, unfortunately, to the left so far
as to throw a portion of them into and over Stone's River, where
they encountered heavy masses of the enemy, while those against
whom they were intended to operate had a destructive enfilade on
our whole line.  Our reserve line was so close to the front as to
receive the enemy's fire, and returning it took their friends in
the rear.  The cavalry force was left entirely out of the action."
Bragg immediately sent Anderson's brigade across the river, which
formed in line on the front of Breckinridge's command, and remained
there in position during the night.  He also sent Cleburne's
division over, and placed Hardee in command of that side of the
river.  Rosecrans ordered Davis to take and hold the line occupied
by Beatty's division.  Later, all the troops of Crittenden's corps
crossed the river and occupied the crests, intrenching themselves
in this position.

During the morning of the 3d Bragg ordered a heavy and constant
picket firing to be kept up on his front, to determine whether our
army still confronted him.  At one point in the wood to the left of
the Murfreesboro pike the rebel sharpshooters had all day annoyed
Rousseau, who requested permission to dislodge them from their
supports, coving a ford at that place.  About six o'clock in the
evening two regiments from John Beatty's brigade of Rousseau's
division, co-operating with two regiments of Spear's brigade of
Negley's division, under cover of a brisk artillery fire, advanced
on the woods and drove the enemy not only from their cover, but
also from their intrenchments a short distance from the rear.

At noon Bragg, on consultation with his generals, decided to retreat,
leaving the field in possession of his opponent.  At 12.15 of the
night of the 2d, after Breckinridge's failure, Cleburne and Withers
had sent a communication to Bragg's headquarters, through Polk,
stating that there was but "three brigades that are at all reliable,
and even some of these are more or less demoralized from having
some brigade commanders who do not possess the confidence of their
commands."  They expressed their fears of great disaster which
should be avoided by retreat.  This was endorsed by Polk at 12.30
A.M., January 3d, "I send you the enclosed papers as requested, and
I am compelled to add that after seeing the effect of the operations
of to-day, added to that produced upon the troops by the battle of
the 31st, I very greatly fear the consequences of another engagement
at this place on the ensuing day.  We could now perhaps get off with
some safety, and with some credit if the affair was well managed;
should we fail in the meditated attack, the consequences might be
very disastrous."

By 11 P.M. the whole of Bragg's army, except his cavalry, was in
retreat in good order to a position behind Duck River.  His cavalry
held the front at Murfreesboro until Monday morning, when they
fell back and covered Bragg's immediate front.  Sunday the 4th was
spent in burying the dead, and the cavalry was sent to reconnoitre.
On the 5th Thomas's entire command, preceded by Stanley's cavalry,
marched into Murfreesboro, and encamped on the Manchester and
Shelbyville road.

The cavalry under Stanley rendered very efficient service on the
advance from Nashville.  Dividing these troops into three columns
he sent the first brigade under Colonel Minty with Crittenden's
corps; the second brigade under Colonel Zahm moved to the right,
protecting McCook's right flank; the reserve Stanley commanded in
person, and moved with the head of McCook's command on the Nolinsville
pike.  Colonel John Kennett, in command of the cavalry division,
commanded the cavalry on the Murfreesboro pike.  There was constant
skirmishing between the enemy's cavalry and artillery and each
of the columns up to the 31st, as the army advanced, getting into
position.  At midnight on the 30th, Stanley moved with part of his
command to Lavergne, where the enemy's cavalry was interfering with
the trains.  At 9.30 he was ordered by General Rosecrans to hasten
to the right and cover McCook's flank.  On reaching there he found
McCook's new line formed on the Nashville road, when the enemy's
skirmishers advanced and drove Stanley's dismounted cavalry out of
the woods to the open field.  Here he was re-enforced, and charging
the rebels routed them, driving them back to their lines.  On the
1st Zahm's brigade was sent to Lavergne to protect the wagon trains
being sent to Nashville.  He had several skirmishes with Wheeler,
but finally secured the safety of the train and repulsed every
attack of the rebel cavalry.

On the 2d and 3d of January the cavalry was engaged in watching
the flanks of our position.  On the 4th Stanley discovered that
the enemy had fled.  Collecting his cavalry he moved to the fords
of Stone's River, in readiness to cross, and on the 5th, preceding
Thomas, they entered Murfreesboro.  Zahm's command went out on the
Shelbyville pike six miles, meeting with no opposition.  Stanley
with the rest of his cavalry marched down the Manchester pike,
encountering the enemy's cavalry strongly posted at Lytle's Creek in
heavy force.  Fighting here until sundown, the rebels were driven
from one cedar-brake to another until Spear's brigade came up, when
they were driven from their last stand in disorder.  The cavalry
returned and camped at Lytle's Creek to recuperate, after nine
days of active campaigning.  During this time the saddles were only
taken off the horses to groom them, and were immediately replaced.

Bragg in his retreat left in his hospitals all his wounded in
Murfreesboro.  By this some 2,500 prisoners fell into our hands to
be cared for.

Thus, after seven days' battle, the Army of the Cumberland rested
in Murfreesboro having achieved the object of the winter campaign.
The final battle for Kentucky had been fought by Bragg and lost.
Nashville, too, was now beyond his hopes, and for the great victory
of the 31st, which he claimed, Bragg had but little to show.

In the heavy skirmishing prior to the 31st, success attended every
movement of the Federal army.  The heavy fighting of the early part
of the 31st was all in Bragg's favor up to the time his advance
was checked by our centre and the new line on the right.  From that
time to the occupation of Murfreesboro every movement resulted in
favor of the army under Rosecrans, and the retreat of Bragg after
the defeat of Breckinridge gave the halo of victory to our army
as the result of the campaign.  In his retreat Bragg admitted that
he had gained nothing but a victory barren of results, at the cost
of him of 10,125 killed, wounded, and missing, 9,000 of whom were
killed and wounded, over twenty per cent of his command.  Bragg's
field return of December 10, 1862, shows an effective total of 51,036,
composed of 39,304 infantry, 10,070 cavalry, and 1,662 artillery.
By reason of Morgan and Forrest being absent on their raids, Bragg's
cavalry was reduced to 5,638.  This gave an effective force of
46,604, which was the strength of the army with which Bragg fought
the battle.

Rosecrans's force on the battle-field was:  Infantry, 37,977;
artillery, 2,223; cavalry, 3,200; total, 43,400.  His loss was:
killed, 1,553; wounded, 7,245.  The enemy captured about 2,800 men.
Making his total loss about twenty-five per cent. of his force in
action.  Rosecrans lost twenty-eight pieces of artillery and a large
portion of his wagon train.  Bragg lost three pieces of artillery.

Why did Rosecrans's plan of battle miscarry so fatally and Bragg's
come so near absolute success?  The fault was not the plan as
conceived by the former.  The near success of the latter proved a
vindication of that.  The originator of the plan was not at fault
personally, for at no time during the battle did he falter or prove
unequal to his command.  When called on to give up his plan of the
offensive and assume the defensive to save his army, the wonderful
power of Rosecrans as a general over troops was never displayed
to a greater advantage.  With the blood from a slight wound on his
cheek, in a light blue army overcoat, through the mud and rain of
the battle-field, he rode along the line inspiring his troops with
the confidence he felt as to the final result.  To Rosecrans there
was but one outcome to the battle at Stone's River, and that was
victory.  When some of his general officers advised retreat to
Nashville, not for an instant did he falter in his determination to
"fight or die right here."  The demoralization of one of his division
commanders was so great, that on Thursday afternoon, when the
rebels were massing on Rosecrans's right, this general, commanding
a division, announced to his brigade commanders that in the event
of the anticipated assault resulting disastrously, he proposed to
take his division and cut his way through to Nashville.  To his
troops--the greater part of whom had never seen Rosecrans under
the enemy's fire--when on the return from the cedars, they formed
anew in front of the Nashville pike--seeing the Commanding General
of the army riding fearlessly on the extreme front, in the heat
of battle, cool and collected, giving orders and encouraging his
men--his mere presence was an inspiration.  His personal bravery
was never more fully shown than when he rode down to the "Round
Forest" with his staff, under fire, at the time Garesche was killed
by a shell that only missed the chief by a few inches.  In this
ride Rosecrans had three mounted orderlies shot dead while following
him.  When the entire extent of McCook's disaster in its crushing
force was revealed to him, he felt the full burden of his responsibility,
and rising to the demands of the hour he was superb.  Dashing from
one point to another, quick to discern danger and ready to meet
it, shrinking from no personal exposure, dispatching his staff on
the gallop, hurrying troops into position, massing the artillery
and forming his new lines on grounds of his own choosing, confident
of ultimate success, and showing his troops that he had all confidence
in them, it was worth months of ordinary life-time to have been
with Rosecrans when by his own unconquered spirit he plucked victory
from defeat and glory from disaster.

But if the plan was not at fault, what was?  Rosecrans started from
Nashville for an offensive campaign, and before his plan of battle
had met the test, he was compelled to abandon it, and assume the
defensive.  Where was the fault and who was to blame?  The fault
was McCook's defective line, and in part Rosecrans was responsible
for it.  He ought never to have trusted the formation of a line
of battle so important to the safety of his whole army to McCook
alone, and he certainly knew this.  Rosecrans gave his personal
attention to the left, but he should at least have ordered the
change his quick eye had detected as necessary in McCook's line,
and not trusted to chance and McCook's ability to withstand the
attack with his faulty line.  No one who saw him at Stone's River
the 31st of December will say aught against the personal bravery
and courage of McCook under fire.  All that he could do to aid in
repairing the great disaster of that day he did to the best of his
ability.  He stayed with Davis's division under fire as long as
it held together, and then gave personal directions to Sheridan's
troops, in the gallant fight they made against overwhelming odds.
As Rosecrans himself says in his official report of McCook, "a
tried, faithful, and loyal soldier, who bravely breasted the battle
at Shiloh and Perryville, and as bravely on the bloody field of
Stone's River."  But there is something more than mere physical
bravery required in a general officer in command of as large a
body of troops as a corps d'armee.  As an instructor at West Point,
McCook maintained a high rank.  As a brigade and division commander
under Buell, there was none his superior in the care and attention
he gave his troops on the march, in camp, or on the drill-ground.
His division at Shiloh as it marched to the front on the second
day did him full credit, and in his handling of it on that field he
did credit to it and to himself.  What McCook lacked was the ability
to handle large bodies of troops independently of a superior officer to
give him commands.  This was his experience at Perryville, and it
was repeated at Stone's River.  With the known results of Perryville,
McCook ought never to have been placed in command of the "right
wing."  Rosecrans at Stone's River, of necessity was on the left,
and being there he should have had a general in command of the right
with greater military capacity than McCook.  Rosecrans's confidence
was so slight in his commander of the left that he felt his own
presence was needed there in the movement of the troops in that
part of the plan of battle.

Rosecrans in his report repeatedly speaks of "the faulty line of
McCook's formation on the right."  But he knew this on the 30th,
and told McCook that it was improperly placed.  McCook did not
think so.  Rosecrans told him that it faced too much to the east
and not enough to the south, that it was too weak and long, and
was liable to be flanked.  Knowing all this and knowing McCook's
pride of opinion, for McCook told him he "did not see how he could
make a better line," or a "better disposition of my troops," it
was the plain duty of Rosecrans to reform the line, to conform to
what it should be in his judgment.  The order to McCook to build
camp fires for a mile beyond his right was another factor that
brought about the combination that broke the line on the right.
Rosecrans was correct in his conception of this, in order to mislead
Bragg and cause him to strengthen his left at the expense of his
right.  Had Bragg awaited Rosecrans's attack, this building of fires
was correct--if it took troops away from the right to reinforce the
left; but this it did not do.  Bragg moved McCown and Cleburne's
divisions from his right to his left on Tuesday, but after this
Bragg brought none of his forces across the river until Wednesday
afternoon.  The building of the fires caused Bragg to prolong his
lines, lengthening them to the extent that before Hardee struck
Kirk's and Willich's brigades, he thought our line extended a
division front to their right.  Finding this not to be the case,
he whirled his left with all the force of double numbers on to the
right of McCook.  The rebels then swinging around found themselves
in the rear of Johnson's division before they struck any troops
on their front.  Of course it is mere guess-work to say just what
the outcome might have been  of any other formation of the line,
but it is safe to say that had the left instead of the centre of
Hardee struck the right of McCook, there would have been a better
chance for the troops on the extreme right of his line to have shown
the spirit that was in them, before they were overpowered by mere
superiority of numbers.

Then there were some minor mistakes that aided in a great degree the
bringing about of that mishap which imperiled the safety of the
entire army.  Even granting that Johnson was not in any way responsible
for the position occupied by his troops on the front line of
battle, still it is hard to find any excuse or even explanation for
a general officer in command of a division who, knowing the enemy
were in force on his front, and intending to attack his command
at daylight the next morning, would place his headquarters a mile
and a half in the rear.  This too, when he knew that the post of
honor and responsibility for the safety of the entire army had been
committed to his keeping.  What then shall be said for him when
it appears by the report of the commanding officer of his reserve
brigade that when it returned from the support of a cavalry
reconnoissance, the general commanding the division ordered this
brigade, on the eve of the battle, to take position in the woods,
"near the headquarters of the division," instead of in supporting
distance of the front line?  He could not have thought that the
division headquarters needed the support of the reserve more than
the line of battle.  It is safe to say that had the line of Johnson's
division been properly formed, so as to give the most strength to
the command--short and well centered, with a good brigade like that
of Baldwin's in reserve, with all officers in their places--these
troops would have given a very different account of themselves when
the blow struck the right.  There was no commanding officer in the
front with Johnson's division, of greater command than a regiment--save
General Kirk.  The troops of Willich's brigade on the right flank
refused to come to his assistance, because there was no one there
to give them orders.  Johnson says in his official report that "In
consultation with Major-General McCook, late in the afternoon of
December 30th, he informed me that he had reliable information to
the effect that the centre of the rebel line of battle was opposite
our extreme right, and that we would probably be attacked by the
entire rebel army early on the following morning."  Johnson then
coolly adds:  "His prediction proved true."  Yet with these facts
staring them in the face, McCook and Johnson made no other efforts
to strengthen the right of the line, and Johnson, on the arrival
of his reserve brigade later, posted it in the woods a mile and
a half from his front "near his headquarters."  General Kirk was
mortally wounded in the attack on his command, but lived long enough
after the battle to make a report of the part taken in the engagement
by his brigade.  He states in his report, that he suggested to
Johnson to send his reserve brigade to support the main lines, and
that Johnson declined to do so.

The location of Johnson's headquarters, and Johnson being there,
makes him responsible for the capture of Willich, and the breaking
up of that brigade.  Willich had been on the line for an hour before
daylight with his brigade under arms, and from what he heard of
the movements of the enemy to his front, he was satisfied that a
change should be made in the position of his division, and started
to Johnson's headquarters to communicate with him.  Before he
could return to his troops, the enemy was upon them, and drove them
from the position they held, without their making a stand.  Being
without either division or brigade commander, they drifted to the
rear.  Willich had a horse shot under him, and was captured without
giving an order, before he reached his command.

When the artillery was posted in line of battle on the 30th,
roads were cut through the cedars to allow the batteries to reach
the front line.  The heavy loss of guns, reported by Rosecrans,
was occasioned by these batteries being unable to reach the roads
through the cedar thickets in the retreat, and in many instances
guns were abandoned in the woods, through which it was impossible
to haul them.

Bragg alleges in his official report that our troops were surprised,
and cites the fact that his men passed through the camps where
breakfast was being prepared.  He was right as to this fact, but
wrong about his deduction.  Willich's brigade was the only one that
was not through the morning meal, and this was by reason of his
troops being under arms for nearly two hours prior to this time,
after which Willich gave them orders to prepare their meal.  Kirk's
brigade had been under arms since five o'clock in the morning, ready
for action an hour before the battle commenced, and in Post's brigade
the men were in order of battle for an hour before the first dawn
of light.  The front of all these brigades was covered with heavy
picket lines well thrown out.  General Sill reported to General
Sheridan at two o'clock in the morning, "great activity on the part
of the enemy immediately in his front, with movements of troops
to their left," and from four o'clock in the morning until seven,
Sheridan's troops were standing under arms, and the cannoneeers
were at their places.

It is difficult to determine which to admire more, the heavy,
quick, decided onset of the rebels, as with ranks well closed up,
without music, and almost noiselessly, they moved in the gray light
of the early December morning, out of the cedars, across the open
fields, hurling the full weight of their advancing columns upon
our right, with all the dash of Southern troops, sweeping on with
rapid stride, and wild yells of triumph, to what appeared to them
an easy final victory; or, later in the afternoon, when our troops
that had been driven from the field early in the morning, were
reformed under the eye of the commanding general, met and threw
back from the point of the bayonet, and from the cannon mouth, the
charge after charge of the same victorious troops of the earlier
portion of the day.  One was like the resistless sweep of a whirlwind
in its onward course of destruction, the other the grand sturdy
resistance of the rocky coast, which the waves only rush upon to
be dashed to pieces.  In each of these, the two armies displayed
their distinctive feature to the best.  Under Thomas, the Centre
of the army evinced, in a marked degree, the staying qualities
of that commander, which afterward were shown so conspicuously at
Chickamauga.





Chapter IX.




In Murfreesboro.

During the first six months of 1863, the military operations of the
Army of the Cumberland were of a minor character.  The exhaustion
attending the severe fighting of the last week of the previous
year, kept that army in camp for some time to restore the losses
of arms and material, to reclothe the army, to recruit the strength
of the troops, to forward the needed supplies, and to build
the necessary works to fortify Murfreesboro as a new base.  The
rebuilding of the Muldraughs Hills' trestleworks, and the heavy
repairs elsewhere needed on the railroad north of Nashville,
together with having the road from Nashville to Murfreesboro placed
in proper order, all required time and were necessary to be done,
to supply the wants of the army in the immediate present.  But
the future was what demanded the greatest thought and most careful
planning.  The problem that gave Buell the greatest trouble to
solve--the protection of his lines of communication and supplies--was
now forced upon Rosecrans.  The enemy with more than one-half of
his cavalry force absent during the battle of Stone's River, under
Morgan in Kentucky and Forrest in West Tennessee, outnumbered that
arm of the service of the Army of the Cumberland during the battle
almost two to one.  These troopers were nearly all old veterans,
accustomed to the severest hardships of service, and it was wonderful
the rapidity with which they got over ground and the amount of
fatigue they could undergo.  To afford perfect protection to his
line supplying the army from its base at Louisville, as against
these raiding bands, if infantry was to be employed, Rosecrans's
entire force was needed, posted by brigades at the vulnerable points.
To make an advance and thus lengthen his lines, simply increased
the present difficulties.  Without making the necessary preparation
to protect his line of supplies, Rosecrans would hamper his forward
movement and retard and cripple his advance when commenced.  The
only proper force to meet the enemy's troopers was cavalry.  In
the early days of the Army of the Ohio, under Buell, a number of
unsuccessful attempts were made to chase and fight cavalry with
infantry, and in every instance the effort was crowned with failure,
the only result being the discomfort and complete exhaustion of
the marching troops.

The repair of the most complete wrecking the Louisville road ever
suffered, demanded Rosecrans's attention the first thing after
the Battle of Stone's River.  When the army left Nashville, on the
advance to meet Bragg, the supplies in that city were very limited.
With the disabling of the road it was impossible at that time to
forward sufficient supplies to meet the wants of the command, and
for the first few weeks while the army remained at Murfreesboro the
troops were on half rations, and many of the articles constituting
the "ration" entirely dispensed with, leaving but three or four on
the list.  The surrounding country for miles was scoured for forage
and provisions.  Everything of that kind was gathered in by raiding
parties, not leaving sufficient for the actual necessities of the
inhabitants.  To such an extent did this go, that to the officers
with means to purchase such provisions as were to be had, potatoes
and onions became luxuries.  The whole army was threatened with
scurvy.

The number and extent of these raids, and the damage sustained by
the Louisville and Nashville Railroad during the year from July 1,
1862, is concisely set forth in the report of the superintendent
of that road.  His report shows that during this time "the road has
been operated for its entire length only seven months and twelve
days;" "all the bridges and trestleworks on the main stem and
branches, with the exception of the bridge over Barren River and
four small bridges, were destroyed and rebuilt during the year.
Some of the structures were destroyed twice and some three times.
In addition to this, most of the water stations, several depots,
and a large number of cars were burnt, a number of engines badly
damaged, and a tunnel in Tennessee nearly filled up for a distance
of eight hundred feet."

By reason of this condition of things, Rosecrans determined to
increase the cavalry arm of his army, so that he could meet the
ten or twelve thousand cavalry of the enemy in their detached raids
on more of an equal footing.  From the commencement of operations
in Tennessee under Buell, the enemy's cavalry had been steadily
increasing in numbers and in efficiency, until at this time it was
a greater problem how to meet this arm of the enemy's force than
his infantry.  Rosecrans made repeated urgent applications to the
department at Washington for additional cavalry; for horses and
improved arms for those already under his command.  He detailed
infantry to be mounted and armed as cavalry, organizing a brigade
of "mounted infantry" under Colonel John T. Wilder.

On Bragg's retreating from Murfreesboro, he took position with a
portion of his army and established his headquarters at Shelbyville.
He then ordered part of his command to move to Tullahoma, and there
intrench, throwing up extensive earthworks and fortifications.
Later, he placed his troops in winter quarters.  In addition to the
cavalry that had formerly been under Bragg, Van Dorn in February
reported to him with his command of three brigades of cavalry,
about five thousand effective troops.  Bragg placed Van Dorn and
Wheeler to protect the front and flanks of his army, assigning the
former to the left, with his headquarters at Columbia, and directing
the latter to take position on the right, constituted each command
a corps.  To Wheeler's command he assigned Morgan's, Wharton's, and
Martin's divisions.  Forrest's command was assigned to Van Dorn.
Some important events took place during the first six months of 1863,
that had a bearing on the fortunes of the Army of the Cumberland.

On January 9th, in recognition of the services of that army, by General
Order No. 9 of the War Department, that command was reorganized,
and the Centre, Right, and Left were constituted corps d'armee, with
the designation of Fourteenth, Twentieth, and Twenty-first Corps,
under the same commanders, who were thus advanced to this higher
command.  During this month, Steedman, in command of Fry's old
division, was ordered from Gallatin to the front, and posted at
Triune and La Vergne.  Reynold's division was ordered from Gallatin
to Murfreesboro.  A slight change was also made in the boundaries
of the Department.  On the 25th, by order of the War Department,
the commands of Fort Henry and Fort Donelson were transferred from
the department under Grant, to that under Rosecrans, and later Fort
Heiman.  To Rosecrans was then committed the care and control of
the Cumberland River, his second and secondary line of communication
and supplies connecting his two principal depots.

On January 26th, Bragg ordered Wheeler on an expedition to capture
Fort Donelson.  Wheeler directed Forrest to move his brigade with
four guns on the river road, via the Cumberland Iron Works, to
the vicinity of Dover, which was the real position occupied and
fortified by Federal forces, and not the old site of Fort Donelson,
while Wheeler with Wharton's command of some twenty-five hundred
men moved on a road to the left.  Rosecrans, hearing from his scouts
that this movement was contemplated, ordered Davis in command of
his division and two brigades of cavalry under Minty, to march by
the Versailles road, and take Wheeler in the rear.  Steedman was
directed to watch Wheeler's movements by way of Triune.  Davis
despatched Minty to move with his cavalry around by way of Unionville
and Rover, while he moved with the infantry direct to Eaglesville.
At Rover, Minty captured a regiment of some three hundred and fifty
men.  Davis and Steedman's forces united at Franklin, the latter
marching by way of Nolinsville.  Wheeler, advancing rapidly, passed
between the troops in pursuit, and, on February 3d, his entire
force attacked the post at Dover, occupied by Colonel Harding with
the Eighty-third Illinois, some six hundred men in the command.
The rebels opened fire at once, and made vigorous assault in force
upon Harding's position.  His little command repulsed the enemy
with heavy loss.  Again they advanced, making a more determined
assault than before, but again they were driven back with still
greater loss.  In this last repulse Harding ordered his men to charge
beyond his works, which they did with great gallantry, capturing
forty-two of the rebels.  Wheeler then withdrew with a total loss
of one hundred and fifty killed, four hundred wounded, and one
hundred and fifty captured.  Colonel Harding lost sixteen killed,
sixty wounded, and fifty captured.  Efforts were made to cut off
the retreat of Wheeler's force by Davis's command, re-enforced by
five hundred cavalry, which went as far west as Kinderhook and Bon
Aqua Springs, but Wheeler took the road through Centreville, where
he crossed Duck River.

In the latter part of the engagement at Dover, Harding was aided
by the fire from six gunboats which were acting as convoys for a
fleet of transports conveying reinforcements to Rosecrans's command,
consisting of eighteen regiments of infantry, with four batteries
of artillery that had been serving in Kentucky under the command
of General Gordon Granger.  The troops forming this column were
under the immediate command of Crook, Baird, and Gilbert.  After
the danger at Dover had passed, the fleet steamed up to Nashville,
and there the troops disembarked.  During February Crook was sent
with his command to take post at Carthage, on the Cumberland River,
and watch the movements of the enemy from there to Rome, and Gilbert
was ordered to proceed with his brigade to Franklin.

On March 4th, Gilbert at Franklin ordered Colonel Coburn, with five
regiments of infantry, four detachments of cavalry under Colonel
Jordan, and Aleshire's battery, the whole command nearly three
thousand strong, to proceed south from Franklin with a wagon-trail
of one hundred wagons, ostensibly on a foraging expedition, but
also to reconnoitre the enemy's front toward Columbia.  Coburn's
command some twelve miles south of Franklin, was to meet a force
moving from Murfreesboro toward Columbia, and these commands were
to co-operate and determine the position of the enemy.  Unknown to
Gilbert, Van Dorn, on assuming command in Columbia, in February,
determined to establish outposts and picket-lines within sight of
Franklin and Triune, and to move his headquarters north of Duck
River to Spring Hill.  Jordan's cavalry struck the enemy only three
miles from town, formed in line of battle.  Opening with artillery,
Jordan advanced, and, after a sharp conflict, the enemy retreated
to Spring Hill.  That night Coburn notified Gilbert that he was
confronted by a largely superior force, and suggested that he fall
back.  Gilbert, however, ordered him to advance.  Proceeding next
morning, the column met the enemy drawn up in line of battle a short
distance from Thompson's Station.  Forrest's command occupied the
extreme right, with a battery of artillery on the left of this,
and some paces retired was Armstrong's brigade.  On the left of his
command and in line with it was the Texan brigade under Whitfield,
with two guns on each side of the Columbia turnpike, making a force
of 10,000 men under Van Dorn.  It was about half-past nine o'clock
in the morning when Coburn struck these troops in line.  He
immediately deployed his infantry across the pike and to the right,
and ordered his command to advance.  The enemy's battery posted at
the pike opening fire, Coburn's troops charged it handsomely, his
entire command moving in line of battle down the pike.  When within
one hundred and fifty yards, Armstrong's and Whitfield's brigades
sprang forward and opened a destructive fire.  Coburn's troops held
their lines for over half an hour under heavy fire, replying with
the same, when he ordered his command to fall back.  Finding this
large force in his front, he directed Jordan with his cavalry to
cover his retreat.  Van Dorn now advanced his line, pressed forward
his right and left to surround Coburn and capture the entire force.
Jordan formed two detachments, dismounted behind a stone fence to
check the advance of Forrest and enable the artillery to escape.
Forrest made two sustained attempts to dislodge these detachments
from their position, but he was repulsed each time; on a third
attempt they were surrounded and captured.  The regiment in charge
of the train with the artillery and cavalry now moved off rapidly
on the pike to Franklin, and Coburn, being surrounded by the rebels
in overwhelming numbers, and finding his ammunition exhausted,
surrendered.  His loss was 40 killed, and 150 wounded, and 2,200
prisoners, including his wounded.  The enemy's loss was 35 killed
and 140 wounded.  The rebels lost heavily in officers, several of
the most valued of Forrest's falling in the repulses of his command.

The surrender of Coburn weakened the forces at Franklin, and revealed
the enemy in such strong force on the immediate front, that Gordon
Granger at once ordered Baird to proceed by rail to Franklin, and
moving his own headquarters there, assumed the command in person.

On the 7th, Sheridan's division was ordered to the front to
reconnoitre the enemy's position.  He reached Franklin, and the force
at that place was further increased by the arrival of a brigade from
Nashville.  On the 9th, Minty's brigade of cavalry also reported,
and on the day following, Granger with his troops advanced from
there upon Van Dorn's encampment at Spring Hill.  In support of
Granger's movement on Van Dorn, Rosecrans ordered Davis to move
with his division from Salem to Eaglesville, with R. S. Granger's
brigade in supporting distance, posted at Versailles.  Gordon
Granger drove Van Dorn from Spring Hill, and the next day compelled
his entire command to retire south of Rutherford's Creek.  On
account of the high water the pursuit was not continued further.

During March the rebel cavalry under Morgan met with one of the
most decisive repulses yet experienced by that command.  On the
18th of March Colonel Hall with his command, the second brigade
of Reynolds's division, was sent from Murfreesboro after Morgan.
Starting northeast from that place he advanced beyond Statesville,
when hearing that Morgan was advancing on him he retired toward
Milton, posted his command on some high ground near that place and
awaited the attack.  Morgan endeavored first to turn the right and
then the left of Hall's command, but in each of these attempts he
was driven off with heavy loss.  He then dismounted the main portion
of his command and ordered an attack to be made on the front.  A
vigorous assault was at once made with a heavy force, but this
was also repulsed, Morgan losing a large number of men.  After an
engagement lasting some four hours, in which Hall's brigade fought
with the utmost determination, Morgan's command, being repulsed
at all points and in every assault, withdrew from the field with a
loss of some ninety-five killed, three hundred and fifty wounded,
and twenty prisoners.

Early in April, Morgan's troopers were defeated with great loss.
On the 2d of April Stanley advanced with his cavalry to Liberty,
where Morgan met them with his entire command.  The two forces
encamped within two miles of each other.  On the morning of the 3d,
Stanley advanced, intending to engage Morgan's command at once, but
found that he had retreated to what he regarded as a very strong
position at Snow Hill.  Morgan, however, had left a strong force
at Liberty to watch Stanley's movements.  As Stanley advanced,
he struck this force and quickly drove upon it with part of his
command, sending a portion around to the right, which turned the
enemy's left flank.  Pressing Morgan's command from both positions,
it soon gave way at all points, and was in full retreat.  Morgan's
officers tried to rally their men, but the latter were thoroughly
demoralized and had no fight in them.  The teamsters became
panic-stricken and added to the general rout.  It was two weeks
before Morgan succeeded in getting his men together again.

Early in April, Rosecrans ordered Colonel Streight to the command
of a brigade he had organized for the purpose of making a raid on
the lines of communication of the rebels, and to move through the
country south and southeast, destroying as he went all property of
use to them.  Streight's command started from Nashville, partially
mounted, going by way of Clarksville to Fort Henry, at which place
he took steamer from Eastport, Miss.  En route to Fort Henry his
command secured as many animals as they could, but only four-fifths
of the men were mounted, and they poorly.  The animals were nearly
all mules, and very few of them were fit for the service required.
It was expected that the command would capture enough good animals
to carry the expedition successfully through, but this was not
realized.  Leaving Eastport on the 21st, he passed through Tuscumbia
three days later, and reached Moulton on the 26th.  From here on
the 28th he pressed forward through Day's Gap on Sand Mountain,
in the direction of Blountsville.  In the gap their rear guard was
overtaken and attacked on the 30th by the enemy's cavalry under
Forrest, who had pressed forward, riding night and day.  Selecting
the best mounted of his men, he pushed at once to Streight's camp.
Here coming upon the rear of Streight's force as it was leaving
camp, Forrest opened with artillery firing.  Dismounting his men,
Streight formed his command on the crest of a hill on each side
of the road and awaited the enemy's attack.  As Forrest advanced,
Streight ordered a charge to be made which drove the enemy at all
points, capturing their two pieces of artillery.  Forrest lost in
killed and wounded seventy-five men, a large percentage of whom
were killed.  Streight's loss was twenty-one killed and wounded.  A
good many of horses were captured from the enemy, on which Streight
mounted a number of his men.  On the same afternoon the enemy
attacked again, but was driven back with considerable loss, after
a severe engagement lasting from three o'clock until dark.  On May
1st, the Federal forces reached Blountsville at noon.  Here all
the wagons save one were burned, and the ammunition placed on pack
mules, after distributing to the men all that they could carry.
At three o'clock Streight started again, and skirmishing commenced
at once on their rear.  Pressing on, the command marched until
twelve o'clock that night.  Resuming their march in the morning,
the rear skirmished all the forenoon of the 2d with the rebels.
Arriving at Gadsden, Streight remained long enough to destroy a
large quantity of provisions in store there for the enemy.  It was
expected at this place that a small steamer would be found, upon
which a detachment of men could be sent to capture Rome.  In this
Streight was disappointed.  From this point Streight's animals became
much exhausted, and the men were falling to the rear and getting
captured.  To prevent this the command had to go much slower.  Forrest
coming up about one o'clock on the 2d, attacked the command while
the horses were being fed at Blount's farm.  Here Colonel Hathaway
fell, shot through the breast.  Again the rebels were repulsed,
but they constantly pressed upon the rear of Streight's command,
keeping up a brisk skirmish fire.  The enemy were kept in check at
Blount's farm until after dark.  In the meantime the main command had
crossed the Coosa.  Here the river was so high that the ammunition
was damaged by being wet.  From this place Streight sent a detachment
to burn the Round Mountain iron works, one of the principal
manufactories of munitions of war in the South.  It was burned to
the ground and all the machinery destroyed.  On arriving at the
other branch of the Coosa a bridge was found, and, as soon as the
command had crossed, it was destroyed.  On the morning of the 3d,
as the men were preparing their breakfast, the enemy again attacked.
Shortly afterward Forrest sent in a flag of truce, demanding the
surrender of the entire command.  This was at first refused, but
on consultation with his officers, and considering the damaged
condition of his ammunition and the complete exhaustion of his
command, Streight, after making a personal inspection of Forrest's
artillery, finally yielded, and the entire force of 1,466 officers
and men was surrendered.

On April 20th, Thomas sent J. J. Reynolds with three brigades of
infantry and Minty's brigades of cavalry, together with Wilder's
brigade of mounted infantry, to proceed to McMinnville, capture what
force was there, destroy the railroad from Manchester to McMinnville,
and co-operate with a force to move from Carthage against Morgan.
Reynolds made a successful raid on the railroad and nearly destroyed
it; burned all the bridges, trestle-work, cars, and locomotives on
the road, also the depot in McMinnville, and several cotton mills.
A large amount of supplies was captured, some one hundred animals
picked up.  The command from Carthage failed to aid in the expedition,
and Morgan's command in the main effected their escape.

Colonel Lewis D. Watkins on the 27th made a gallant charge on the
Texas Legion, encamped close to Van Dorn's main command near Spring
Hill.  Dashing in upon the enemy early in the morning, he was among
them before they could rally for defence, capturing one hundred
and twenty-eight prisoners, over three hundred animals, and their
camp equipage without the loss of a man.

It was during the six months waiting at Murfreesboro that the
unfortunate controversy arose between Rosecrans and the authorities
at Washington, represented by General Halleck, as Commander-in-Chief,
and Mr. Secretary Stanton of the War Department.  The Army of
the Cumberland, during the period of the active movements of that
command, congratulated itself that the field of operations was so
far removed from Washington City, that it did not come under the
influence of the authority that seemed to paralyze every effort of
the commands immediately around the seat of war at the East.  But
in this they were mistaken.  The future student of the history of
the war, in the light of the full official records, will wonder most
at the fact that, under the orders from Washington, the commanders
in the field were at all able to finally crush the rebellion.  It
was only when the armies at the East were placed under a general
who was practically untrammeled in the exercise of his power, and
who conducted his campaigns upon military principles, and not as
the result of orders from Washington that the beginning of the end
of the rebellion in the East began to dawn.  In Tennessee we have
seen how Halleck gave Buell orders and then attached such conditions
to them as to render their proper execution absolutely impossible.
There was nothing to prevent Buell from occupying Chattanooga in
June, 1862, as he was directed, while Bragg with his command was in
Northern Mississippi, except the utterly useless condition attached
to his orders, that he should repair the Memphis and Charleston
Railroad as he moved east.  Buell urged, in forcible terms, the
foolishness and even impropriety of this delay, but Halleck, who knew
much of the theory of war as learned from books, and in a general
way wished to apply these principles to the practical movements
of troops, overruled Buell.  The latter knew that the enemy in
his front always resolutely refused to be bound in his operations
by such rules in conducting campaigns.  The result of Halleck's
wisdom soon became manifest when Bragg started for Kentucky, after
the waste of Buell's time in repairing this railroad, which, when
completed, was at once turned over to the enemy in good condition
for immediate use against our own forces.  On Buell fell the force
of the blow that some one had to bear for this failure to take
advantage of a patent opportunity.  Buell's obedience to Halleck's
orders rendered Bragg's advance into Kentucky possible, while Buell's
failure to bring Bragg to a decisive action in Kentucky, and his
refusal to follow Bragg into the mountains of Eastern Kentucky
and Tennessee, was deemed sufficient cause by Halleck to issue the
order removing him from his command.  If Halleck's order to Buell
to repair this railroad had never been issued, Bragg's campaign in
Kentucky would never have been made.  Halleck's removal of Buell
was the direct result of the latter's obedience to orders received
from the former.  On Rosecrans assuming command, almost the first
order he received from Halleck was one directing him to advance into
East Tennessee after Bragg.  With a full knowledge of the military
situation obtained from Buell, Rosecrans proceeded at once to protect
the line established by Buell, and await the advance of Bragg in
the vicinity of Nashville.  The battle of Stone's River was for the
time sufficient to prove, even to Halleck, that Buell and Rosecrans
were correct, and Rosecrans was allowed for the time to attend to
his command without being interfered with.  During the encampment
at Murfreesboro, the first object of Rosecrans was to properly
mount and equip his cavalry.  In this he received at first faint
encouragement, which soon ceased altogether.

On March 1st Halleck, as Commander-in-Chief of the Armies of the
United States, wrote a letter, sending a copy to Rosecrans and
Grant, offering the position of the then vacant major-generalship
in the regular army, to the general in the field who should first
achieve an important and decisive victory.  Grant very quietly folded
up the letter, put it by for future reference, and proceeded with
the plans of his campaign, saying nothing.  To Rosecrans's open,
impulsive, and honorable nature, engaged with all his powers in
furthering the interests of the Government and the general welfare
of his command, this letter was an insult, and he treated it
accordingly.  On March 6th he prepared his reply, and forwarded
it to Washington.  In this letter he informs the General-in-Chief
that, "as an officer and as a citizen," he felt "degraded at such
an auctioneering of honors," and then adds:  "Have we a general
who would fight for his own personal benefit when he would not for
honor and for his country?  He would come by his commission basely
in that case, and deserve to be despised by men of honor.  But are
all the brave and honorable generals on an equality as to chances?
If not, it is unjust to those who probably deserve most."

The effect of this letter was to widen the breach between the
authorities at Washington and Rosecrans.  Halleck's letter and
Rosecrans's reply were both characteristic of the men.  Halleck, fresh
from the results of a large law practice in California--principally
devoted to the establishment of the validity of land grants in favor
of his clients, in the success of which large contingent fees were
gained--saw nothing improper in such an offer to an officer of
sufficient ability and standing to be in command of one of the armies
of the United States.  With Rosecrans, all the honest, generous
impulses of a high-principled, honorable gentleman, who had
imperiled his life on many a battlefield, fighting solely from a
sense of duty to his country, led to the expression of his contempt
for the author of such an offer.  The mistake that Halleck made was
in thinking that what would prove a tempting offer to a man like
himself, would be so to Rosecrans.  No one will attempt to maintain
the wisdom of Rosecrans's course as a matter of policy, however
much they may sympathize with and admire the spirit of his letter.
It was an impolitic letter, and one that aided in drawing the ill-will
and resentment of Halleck and Stanton upon him in full force later.

From this time forward, all the requests of Rosecrans for the
improvement of the efficiency of his army were treated with great
coolness, and in many instances it was only after the greatest
importunity that he was able to secure the least attention to his
recommendations for the increased usefulness of his command.  His
repeated applications for more cavalry, and that they be armed
with revolving rifles, were treated with little attention.  In the
meantime nearly every communication from Washington intimated that
he was unnecessarily delaying his advance upon Bragg in his works
at Shelbyville and Tullahoma.  Grant, on his Vicksburg campaign,
became very anxious for the advance of the Army of the Cumberland,
to engage Bragg and prevent reinforcements being sent from him to
Pemberton or Johnston, operating on his front and rear; and urged
Rosecrans to move, and wrote to Halleck, requesting him to direct
an advance of the Army of the Cumberland on Bragg's position.
Rosecrans regarded it for the best interest of the country for his
army to remain constantly threatening Bragg, in order to hold the
entire army of the latter in his immediate front, and also in the
event of the defeat of Grant, and a concentration of the enemy on
Rosecrans's position, that he should be close to his base, his army
being then the reserve.  If an advance succeeded in driving Bragg
from Tullahoma, a greater danger than his remaining inactive on
our front might ensue.  To Bragg, the occupancy of Middle Tennessee
was of sufficient importance to justify him in remaining inactive
with his entire command, waiting for the advance of Rosecrans some
six months.  If driven from Tennessee, his troops were ready to
unite with the command in Mississippi and defeat Grant's movements.
If Bragg could be held in Tennessee after until after Grant's success
was assured, then, by waiting at Murfreesboro with his army quiet,
Rosecrans could render better service than by moving on the enemy.
This was a matter of military judgment, on one side espoused by
Rosecrans and all his corps and division commanders, who were on
the ground, and on the other by Halleck, Stanton, and Grant; and
this question served to increase the feeling against Rosecrans in
those quarters.  Bragg also considered that his presence on the
front of the Federal army would prevent any troops from it being
sent to aid Grant.  And thus the year wore away until early summer.
Still another consideration with Rosecrans, was the character of
the soil in Tennessee from a short distance south of Murfreesboro
to the foot of the Cumberland Mountains.  This was a light sandy
loam, that in winter and spring, during the rains of those seasons,
became like quicksand, allowing the artillery and wagon to sink
almost to the hub, and rendering the rapid movement of a large army
absolutely impossible.

During the early part of June, Rosecrans commenced placing his
troops in position, preparatory to a general advance.  He ordered
the brigade that had been encamped at Gallatin, under General Ward,
to Lavergne, and despatched Gordon Granger to take post at Triune,
moving his command from Franklin up to that place.  Crook was
ordered from Carthage to report to Murfreesboro, and on his arrival,
was placed in Reynolds's division.  Rosecrans organized a reserve
corps, consisting of three divisions designated as First, Second,
and Third, under Baird, J. D. Morgan, and R. S. Granger, respectively,
and he assigned Gordon Granger to the command of this corps.

Early in June, Garfield, then Chief-of-Staff of the General
commanding, urged Rosecrans to make an advance movement, both as a
military and political measure with reference to the sentiment of
the North.  General Rosecrans had matured his plans for an advance,
but decided to refer the question to his general officers in command
of corps and divisions.  The matter being submitted to them, the
universal sentiment of these officers was that the movement should
be further delayed.  However, on the 23rd of June, Rosecrans having
made all necessary arrangements for his command, according to his
plans, and learning of the favorable prospects at Vicksburg, and
of the movement of the force under Burnside into East Tennessee
to take and hold Knoxville, issued the necessary orders for the
advance of his army on that of the enemy.





Chapter X.




The Advance on Tullahoma.

At the time of the advance of the Army of the Cumberland, Polk's
corps of Bragg's army occupied the main position at Shelbyville,
strongly intrenched behind heavy works thrown up during the six
months of waiting.  These added to the natural strength of the
position, and extended from Horse Mountain on the east, to Duck River
on the west, and were covered by a line of abattis.  The town was
noted for the strong Union sentiment of its inhabitants, of which
fact the rebels took full advantage to the loss and distress
of the people.  It is situated about twenty-five miles south of
Murfreesboro, and some twenty miles North of Tullahoma, on a branch
railroad from the main Nashville line, starting west from Wartrace.
Bragg's right was posted at Wartrace, with Hardee's corps occupying
the passes at Liberty, Hoover, and Bellbuckle Gaps.  These gaps
were all held by strong forces of the enemy, supported by the main
command.  Polk had an advance in Guy's Gap with his entire command
in supporting distance.  Bragg's extreme right was protected
by cavalry with headquarters at McMinnville, while his cavalry on
the left, under Forrest, had headquarters at Columbia, threatening
Franklin.

At this time the main base of supplies of the enemy was at
Chattanooga, to which the entire country south of Duck River had
been made tributary.  From Duck River, south, the country is rough,
with rocky ranges of hills, which divide the "barrens" from the
fertile parts of Middle Tennessee.  These "barrens" constitute a
high rolling plateau of ground between the ranges of hills at Duck
River and the Cumberland Mountains.  It is here that the soil during
a rainy season offers the greatest obstacle to active campaigning.
Situated on the "barrens," at the junction of the McMinnville
branch with the Nashville and Chattanooga Railroad, was Tullahoma,
a small straggling village, where Bragg had established his main
depot and made a large intrenched camp.  The defiles of Duck River,
a deep, narrow stream with but few fords or bridges, covered its
front, with a rough rocky range of hills immediately south of the
river.  The principal roads as they passed through these hills
bore southwardly toward the line of the enemy's communications and
Tullahoma.  The Manchester pike passed through Hoover's Gap and
reached the "barrens" by ascending a long, difficult canon called
Matt's Hollow.  The Wartrace road passed through Liberty Gap, and
from there it ran into the road along the railroad through Bellbuckle
Gap.  The direct road to Shelbyville goes through Guy's Gap.

Rosecrans was satisfied from the information he had received that
Bragg intended to fight in his intrenchments at Shelbyville, in
the event of the army advancing in that direction.  The "effective
total present," as reported by Bragg as the strength of his army
on June 20, 1863, at Shelbyville, was 43,089, of all arms.  If he
were attacked at Shelbyville and beaten, he would then be in good
position to retreat to his strong intrenchments at Tullahoma, and
on his retreat could so retard Rosecrans's advance through the narrow
winding roads leading up to the "barrens," as to fully protect his
own line of retreat and inflict severe loss on the advancing force
without exposing his own troops.  Rosecrans's plan of campaign was
to render useless Bragg's intrenchments by turning his right, and
then if possible secure his line of retreat by moving on the railroad
bridge at Elk River.  Bragg by this means would either be forced
to accept battle on ground chose by Rosecrans, or be compelled to
beat a retreat on a disadvantageous line, neither as direct nor by
as good roads as he would have from Shelbyville and Tullahoma due
south.  To carry out this plan it was necessary to impress Bragg
with the idea that our advance would be in force on Shelbyville,
and, if possible, to keep up this impression until the main body
of our army reached Manchester.  The success of this would keep
Bragg's attention on the movement on his front at Shelbyville, and
enable our army to pass through the dangerous defile of Hoover's
Gap, a narrow passage-way three miles long, between two hills, and
so on through Matt's Hollow, an equally dangerous defile, being a
gorge two miles long with hardly room anywhere for wagons to pass
each other.  These passes were only eight miles from Hardee's
headquarters and sixteen from Shelbyville.

The plan then of Rosecrans in the advance on Tullahoma, was to make
a feint with Granger's corps and the main portion of the cavalry,
on Polk's command in his strong position at Shelbyville, and to
mass the three main corps on Bragg's right at Wartrace.  The army
being all ready for the opening campaign, on the 23d of June General
R. B. Mitchell with his command--the First Cavalry Division--commenced
the advance from Triune on the Eaglesville and Shelbyville pike,
in the feint on Polk's command, made a furious attack on Bragg's
cavalry and drove in his infantry guards on their main force,
pressing the whole line on that front.  Granger with the three
divisions of his corps and Brannan's division of Thomas's corps,
on that day moved with three days' rations from Triune to Salem.

On the same day, Palmer's division and a brigade of cavalry marched
to the vicinity of Bradyville, for the purpose of seizing with
his advance the head of the defile leading over an obscure road by
Lumley's Station to Manchester, and so up to the "barrens."  All
the other troops were supplied with twelve days' rations of bread,
coffee, sugar, and salt, with six days' pork and bacon, and six
days' meat on hoof, and were held in readiness to move southward.
These movements being made, the next day the entire army pressed
forward on the advance.

In the evening of the 23d, the corps commanders met at army
headquarters.  The plan of the campaign was fully explained to them,
and each one received in writing his orders as to his part in the
movement.


"Major-General McCook's corps to advance on the Shelbyville road,
turn to the left, move two divisions by Millersburg, and advancing
on the Wartrace road seize and hold Liberty Gap.  The third division
to advance on Fosterville and cover the crossing of General Granger's
command from the Middleton road, and then move by Christiana to
join the rest of the corps.

"General Granger to advance on the Middleton road, threatening that
place, and cover the passing of General Brannan's division of the
Fourteenth Corps, which was to pass by Christiana and bivouac with
the rear division of the Twentieth Corps.

"The Fourteenth Corps, Major-General Thomas, to advance on the
Manchester pike, seize and hold with its advance, if practicable,
Hoover's Gap, and bivouac so as to command and cover that and
the Millersburg road, so that McCook and himself could be within
supporting distances of each other.

"Major-General Crittenden to leave Van Cleve's division of the
Twenty-first Army Corps at Murfreesboro, concentrate at Bradyville
with the other two, and await orders."


One brigade of cavalry under Turchin was sent with Crittenden to
establish a lookout toward McMinnville.  All the remaining cavalry
under Stanley was to meet Mitchell as he came in from Versailles
and at once attack the rebel cavalry at Middleton.

These movements were all promptly executed in the midst of heavy
drenching rains, as it only could rain in the mountains and hills
of Tennessee, whenever the Army of the Cumberland made a forward
movement.  The ground was so softened on all the dirt roads as to
render them next to impassable.

The Twentieth Corps, consisting of Johnson's, Davis's, and Sheridan's
divisions, started on the Shelbyville pike, and by different cross
roads moved to the left to Millersburg, where Davis's and Sheridan's
divisions encamped for the night.  Johnson's division was advanced
up to Liberty Gap, with the Thirty-ninth Indiana, under Colonel
Harrison, thrown forward to skirmish.  Harrison developed the
enemy in front of the Gap.  Willich's brigade was moved forward,
and drove the skirmishers in the rebel front back upon their main
line, placed on the crest of the hills, on each side of the entrance
to the gap.  Here the enemy was too strongly posted to attack his
front.  Another brigade under Colonel John F. Miller, who had been
transferred from Negley's division to Johnson's, was then brought
forward.  These two brigades were at once deployed in line, making
a front of such length as to envelop both flanks of the enemy's
line, and advancing, these brigades gallantly drove the rebels
through the defile, a distance of two miles.  After clearing the
gap, the troops returned to the north end of it and there bivouacked.
On the following day, late in the afternoon, an attack was made
on Willich's and Miller's brigades, to drive them out of the north
end of the gap.  Johnson's failure to hold the southern entrance
enabled the enemy again to enter it, and to secure it entirely they
made this attack.  The engagement opened with a heavy fire on the
centre of the command, the enemy attacking in force.  They were
handsomely repulsed.  Renewing the attack, Hardee then endeavored
to secure positions on the hills to the right and left, so as
to command Johnson's flanks with his fire, but each movement was
met by Johnson's troops, supported by Carlin's brigade of Davis's
division, and every attack was repulsed.  Beaten at every point,
late in the evening the enemy withdrew entirely, taking position
at Bellbuckle.  The fighting at Liberty Gap was the most severe
of the campaign, and in this attack Johnson's command, including
Carlin's brigade, lost two hundred and thirty-one killed and
wounded.  The enemy's loss was still greater.  It was in repelling
one of the attacks on the left that Colonel Miller fell severely
wounded with a minie ball through his left eye while leading his
brigade.

On the 24th, General Thomas moved direct on the Manchester pike
from Murfreesboro, Reynold's division in advance, starting at
4 o'clock in the morning, under orders, if possible, to seize and
hold Hoover's Gap.  At 7 A.M., Rousseau's division followed in support
of Reynold's division, which encountered the mounted videttes of
the enemy a few miles beyond our picket station, forced them upon
their reserve, and then resolutely pressing on drove the entire
force on the run, through Hoover's Gap and beyond McBride's Creek.
Wilder, finding the enemy about to attack him with two brigades
from the division of Fairfield, occupied a strong position on the
hills at the southern entrance of the gap.  Reynolds at once moved
his two infantry brigades forward and occupied the gap in the rear
of Wilder's command, prepared to resist the enemy on the front.
Wilder's brigade was immediately attacked by the enemy's force.
Reynolds supported him at once with his other brigades, which were
posted on the ridge of woods on the extreme right to prevent the
enemy turning our right flank, then heavily engaged by a superior
force.  With these reinforcements the enemy was driven back out
of the woods, and three regiments were posted on the right, making
that position secure.  Major Coolidge, commanding the brigade of
regulars of Rousseau's division, was ordered to reinforce Reynolds,
and every preparation was made for an attack on the following
morning.  The other brigades of Rousseau's command, with Negley's
division, occupied the gap in the rear of Reynolds during the night.
Early on the morning of the 25th, Scribner was ordered with his
brigade to the front, in support of the batteries and to form a
picket line on the extreme left.

On the 24th, Crittenden, with Wood's and Palmer's divisions,
marched to Bradyville, leaving Van Cleve's division to garrison
Murfreesboro.  Granger, with his three divisions and Brannan's,
advanced from Salem to Christiana.  Turchin's division of cavalry
under Stanley moved on the Woodbury pike to Cripple Creek, and
thence through Salem.  During the day Mitchell advanced from Rover
through Versailles to Middleton, where he had a sharp engagement
with the enemy's cavalry.

The plans of the enemy not being yet fully developed, and in view
of the uncertainty that existed whether he would fall on McCook's
front, or mass on Thomas near Fairfield, Rosecrans issued the
following orders for the 25th:


"Major-General Crittenden to advance to Lannon's Stand, six miles
east of Beech Grove, and open communications with General Thomas.

"General Thomas to attack the rebels on the flank of his advance
position at the forks of the road, and drive the rebels toward
Fairfield.

"General McCook to feign and advance, as if in force, on the Wartrace
road by the Liberty Gap passes.

"General Stanley, with his cavalry, to occupy their attention at
Forsterville, and General Granger to support him with his infantry
at Christiana."


In the event that Thomas succeeded in his attack and drove the enemy
toward Wartrace, he was then to cover that road with a division,
and taking the remainder of his troops was to move rapidly on
Manchester.  McCook was then to move in and take Thomas's place at
Beech Grove, holding Liberty Gap with a division, and was finally to
withdraw that and follow Thomas with his entire command to Manchester.

The same day that Crittenden's command marched to Holly Springs,
Brannan's division reached the main command of Thomas, and went
into camp with Rousseau at Hoover's Mills.  Reynolds had a slight
skirmish with the enemy on his front.  On the night of the 25th,
Rousseau was ordered up with his division to take position immediately
in the rear of Reynolds, preparatory to an attack on the enemy's
position at Beech Grove the next morning.  Minty's brigade of
cavalry pressed forward at all points and drove the enemy to Guy's
Gap.  Long took position at Lumley's Station.  The remainder of
Turchin's division moved in the advance with General Crittenden.

The incessant rains that had fallen since the opening of the campaign
delayed the advance, by preventing Brannan joining the Fourteenth
Corps as soon as was expected.  During the night of the 25th
it rained so continuously that it was almost impossible for the
troops to move, but by extraordinary exertions the divisions were
all in position by 10.30 A. M.  At 4 o'clock in the morning Brannan's
division moved up to take part in the attack.  At 8 A. M. Negley's
division took position to support the attack of the other divisions.
If the enemy's position at Beech Grove was carried, then Rousseau
and Brannon were to push on to Manchester that night if possible.
At 10.30 A.M. the advance was ordered.  Moving forward on the
rebels in force on the heights north of Garrison Creek, our army
drove them steadily and rapidly toward Fairfield, Rousseau and
Brannan operating on their left flank from the hills north of the
Fairfield road, while Reynolds advanced against their front and right.
The enemy had prepared for an obstinate resistance, and attempted
to enfilade Thomas's troops from the high ground on his right.  This
was effectually prevented by a gallant charge of Walker's brigade
and the regulars under Major Coolidge, who drove the enemy from
this position.  Thomas pushed forward his troops, driving the rebels
in the direction of Fairfield, who covered their retreat with two
batteries of artillery, occupying positions behind strong lines
of skirmishers flanked by heavy cavalry force.  The rebels thus
retired to Fairfield, near to which place our pickets were advanced.
Reynold's division and the baggage moved forward during the night
toward Manchester.  Late in the afternoon Wilander's brigade
seized Matt's Hollow, and thus secured that passage.  Thomas placed
his divisions in line of battle extending from the Fairfield road
to within five miles of Manchester.  McCook remained in camp at
Liberty Gap during the day, while Granger rested at Christiana.
Crittenden's command pressed forward as rapidly as possible on
toward Manchester, struggling over almost impassable roads.

Rosecrans's headquarters, on the 27th, reached Manchester.  The advanced
position secured by Thomas's command rendered the concentration of
the whole army on the enemy's left, through Hoover's Gap, at this
time an easy matter.  With this done, Bragg would either be forced to
fight in resisting the further advance of the army under Rosecrans,
or abandon Middle Tennessee altogether.  Early on the morning of the
27th, Reynolds's advance brigade--Wilder's mounted infantry--took
possession of Manchester, capturing forty prisoners, a guard at
the railroad depot, and taking the town completely by surprise.
Reynolds's entire division reached Manchester during the morning.
General Thomas then moved Rousseau's and Brannan's divisions
in pursuit of the enemy, driving him as far as Fairfield, and
ascertained at that place that the rebels had retreated entirely.
These two divisions then turned into the Fairfield and Manchester
road, Brannan's reaching the latter place at 10 P.M. and Rousseau's
at midnight.  Negley's division had, during the day, been moving
in support of these two divisions toward the Fairfield road, by
way of Noale Fork, and arrived at Manchester at 8 P.M.  Thomas's
corps being now together, it was manifest that the enemy must leave
his intrenchment at Shelbyville, and that our army must be prepared
to meet him at Tullahoma, only twelve miles distant.  Rosecrans
gave the necessary orders at once to the other corps commanders
to close up their columns on Manchester, and be prepared for the
contest.

On the extreme right our cavalry, on the 27th, did brilliant work.
Supported by the reserve corps under Granger, Stanley advanced
from Christiana to Guy's Gap, where the advance of the rebel army
under Wheeler, with Martin's and a portion of Wharton's divisions,
was encountered.  Charging down on them with Minty's brigade, closely
followed by Mitchell's division, Stanley routed and drove them
out of the gap into their intrenchments just north of Shelbyville.
Here they again made a stand.  Dashing ahead, Minty encountered them
in their works, and drove them in disorder from their intrenchments
into Shelbyville.  While Minty was pushing them on the front,
Mitchell came up, turned their right, cutting off their direct
line of retreat, and both forces united in driving them beyond the
town, completely defeated.  Wheeler lost all his artillery and some
five hundred prisoners.  A large number of the rebels were driven
into Duck River and drowned while attempting to cross.  The flight
was so hurried that Wheeler himself only escaped by swimming the
river.  This successful movement established the fact that Bragg
had abandoned his strong line of defence at Shelbyville, and the
question now to be answered was whether he would accept battle at
Tullahoma, or retire with his entire command across the Cumberland
Mountains and the Tennessee River, fighting as he fell back.

While the concentration of his command at Manchester was being
effected, Rosecrans determined to break the line of railroad in
the rear of Bragg's army, if possible.  On the morning of the 28th
Wilder, with his brigade of mounted infantry, started at reveille
by way of Hillsboro, to burn Elk River bridge, and to destroy the
railroad between Dechard and Cowan.  John Beatty, with his brigade
of infantry marched to Hillsboro for the purpose of covering and
supporting Wilder's movement.  The latter reached Elk River and
crossed his command, floating his mountain howitzers on a raft made
of an old saw-mill.  He then moved on to Dechard, where, after a
slight skirmish with a detachment of the enemy, he destroyed the
depot full of commissary goods, the water tanks, the railroad bridge
over the Winchester road, and tore up some three hundred yards of
the railroad.  Earlier in the day Wilder sent part of his command,
under Colonel Munroe, to destroy the railroad bridge over Elk River.
Withers's division of Bragg's army reached this point only a few
moments ahead of Munroe, and prevented the burning of the bridge.
Finding that the enemy was in pursuit of him at all points, Wilder
next moved to Tantalon and Anderson with detachments of his command,
but was compelled to retire, as these points were strongly guarded
by heavy forces of the enemy's infantry.  Crossing the mountains
that night on his return over the Tracy City road, and so on to
Pelham, the troops slept at the foot of the mountains, and started
the next morning just in time to escape Forrest, who was in pursuit
with ten regiments of cavalry.  Wilder reached Manchester at 1 P.M.
of the 30th.

Sheridan's division of McCook's corps reached Manchester on the
29th.  The command--troops and animals--suffered severely on their
march over the heavy roads.  Crittenden's command, which had been on
the road since the 26th, reached Manchester also on the 29th, after
marching with all speed, badly worn, by reason of the terrible rains
and fearful roads.  The condition of the latter may be inferred from
the fact that it required four days of incessant labor for Crittenden
to advance the distance of twenty-one miles.  The concentration
of the entire army being effected, orders were given for the final
movement on the 30th, as follows:


"The Fourteenth Corps to occupy the centre at Concord Church and
Bobo Cross Roads, with a division in reserve.

"The Twentieth Corps to take the right on Crumpton's Creek, two
divisions in echelon retired, one in reserve.

"The Twenty-first Corps to come up on the left near Hall's Chapel,
one division in front and one in reserve."


The rain had rendered the roads over which this movement was to be
made as soft and spongy as a swamp, into which the wagons cut to
the hubs, and even horses could only pass over with the greatest
exertion.  The troops on the 30th were compelled to drag along the
artillery through the mud into position.  While the orders for the
movements of the troops were being executed on the 30th, Thomas
sent Steedman's brigade of Brannan's division, and two regiments
of Negley's division on separate roads to reconnoitre the enemy's
position, and Sheridan sent Bradley's brigade of his own division
on another road, for the same purpose.  These reconnoissances all
returned, and reported having found the enemy in force within a
mile or two of Tullahoma, on all roads except the one leading to
Estill Springs.  Scouts coming in confirmed this, adding that it
was the general belief that Bragg would not leave his intrenchments
at Tullahoma without a fight.

On the same day Rosecrans ordered his topographical engineers
to ascertain the nature of the ground, in order to determine the
practicability of moving by columns in mass in line of battle from
the position in front, to gain the rear of the rebel position.
Their report being favorable, all arrangements were completed, and
the second division of Crittenden's corps was moved into position.

On July 1st, Thomas, hearing from a citizen that the enemy were
evacuating Tullahoma, ordered Steedman with his brigade, supported
by two regiments of Reynolds's division on the left, to advance
cautiously and ascertain if the report was true.  Pushing forward his
advance, Steedman, meeting with no opposition, entered the place at
noon, capturing a few prisoners.  Rosecrans being at once notified
of this, immediately ordered Rousseau's and Negley's divisions in
pursuit.  Pressing forward with all possible haste by Spring Creek,
these divisions overtook the rear guard of the enemy late in the
afternoon at Bethpage Bridge, two miles above the railroad crossing,
where, after a sharp skirmish, in which a good many of our men
were wounded, the rebels were driven steadily back, until darkness
prevented further pursuit.  The enemy, occupying the heights south
of the river, commanded the bridge with their artillery, which they
had placed behind epaulements.

On the 2d, the ammunition was brought forward, and McCook, with
Sheridan's and Davis's divisions, was ordered in pursuit on the
roads west of the railroad.  Sheridan, on arriving at Rock Creek
Ford, found Elk River so swollen with the heavy rains of the past
week as to be barely fordable for cavalry.  On the south bank of
the river the enemy had posted a force of cavalry to resist the
crossing.  Sheridan opened fire at once on them, drove them away,
and occupied the ford.  During the night the enemy burned the bridge
on the line of advance of Thomas, who found equal difficulty in
crossing.  Here the river was very deep, and he ordered Rousseau's,
Brannan's, and Reynolds's divisions up the river to Jones's Ford.
Hambright's brigade was thrown across the river, and the other
troops went into camp on the north bank.  Hambright captured several
rebel prisoners, who told him that Bragg's army was in full retreat
by way of Pelham and Cowan, across the Cumberland Mountains.  Turchin,
with a small brigade of cavalry, moved forward from Hillsboro on
the Dechard road.  On reaching the fords of Elk River at Morris
Ferry he found the rebel cavalry strongly posted.  He attacked them
at once, re-enforced by Mitchell's command, and forced a passage
of the river after a sharp fight.  Night closed the pursuit.

On the 3d, Sheridan succeeded in crossing Elk River, supported by
Davis's division, and pursued the enemy to Cowan, where he learned
that Bragg had crossed the mountains with part of his artillery
and infantry by the University and Sweden's Cove, sending Hardee's
corps into Sequatchie Valley, and covering his retreat with his
cavalry.  Thomas crossed Rousseau's and Brannan's divisions at
Jones's Ford and ordered them to take position on the Winchester
and Hillsboro road.  He directed Negley and Reynolds to cross their
divisions at the ford on the Winchester and Manchester pike.  On
the 4th, Rousseau was ordered to march to the Dechard and Pelham
roads, and to take up position at Brackenfield's Point toward
the University.  Reynolds encamped at Penningtown, and Brannan's
division at Taite's.  The cavalry sent from Sheridan's position,
and by Stanley from the main column, developed the fact that the
enemy was entirely across the mountains, and the troops were now
ordered into camp to await supplies from the depot at Murfreesboro.

Bragg's army reached Chattanooga the first week in July.  Here
he established his headquarters with Polk's corps retained in and
around town for the purposes of observation, with the exception
of Anderson's brigade of Withers's division, which was ordered
to Bridgeport, at the crossing of the Nashville and Chattanooga
Railroad over the Tennessee River.  Hardee's corps was distributed
along the line of the Knoxville Railroad, with Tyner's Station as
the centre.  At Chattanooga Bragg at once commenced fortifying his
position, which work he steadily prosecuted for some weeks, awaiting
the development of Rosecrans's plans.  He also threw up defensive
works at each of the crossings of the Tennessee as far north as
Blyth's Ferry.  Forrest was sent to Kingston, on the north bank of
the Tennessee River, with orders to picket the approaches to the
river from Sequatchie Valley, as well as the various crossings of
the river, and to maintain a watchful observation of Burnside's
movements in East Tennessee.

The Tullahoma campaign, with the exception of the one immediately
following, which placed the Army of the Cumberland across the
Tennessee and terminated in the battle of Chickamauga, was the most
brilliant of the great strategic campaigns carried to a successful
issue by General Rosecrans.  The movements of the army occupied
nine days, during which time the enemy was driven from two strongly
fortified positions, with a loss in prisoners captured of 1,634,
eleven pieces of artillery, and a large amount of stores and supplies.
The result of this campaign gave to Rosecrans possession of Middle
Tennessee, and placed the armies back in the relative positions
occupied by them prior to Bragg's advance into Kentucky, a little
less than one year previous.  The campaign was conducted throughout,
in one of the most extraordinary series of rain-storms ever known
in Tennessee at that season of the year.  This, with the resistance
interposed by Bragg at our advance at Hoover's Gap, retarded operations
thirty-six hours, and in front of Manchester a detention of sixty
hours occurred.  These delays and the storms prevented us getting
possession of Bragg's communication and forcing him to a very
disastrous battle.  General Rosecrans in his official report of
this campaign says:  "These results were far more successful than
were anticipated, and could only have been obtained by a surprise
as to the direction and force of our movements."

Bragg made no official report of the Tullahoma campaign, but in a
statement to General J. E. Johnston of his operations at that time,
he says that he offered battle behind his works at Shelbyville to
Rosecrans, which was refused; that the latter passed to his, Bragg's,
right on two occasions, threatening his rear.  He being not able
to cope with the Federal army retreated to the Tennessee.  Bragg
adds:  "The Tennessee will be taken as our line."

During these nine days of active campaigning the Army of the
Cumberland, numbering less than sixty thousand effective men, with
a loss of 560 killed, wounded, and missing, compelled the army under
Bragg, numbering something less than forty-five thousand effective
men, to retreat a greater distance and out of far stronger positions
than the united armies under Sherman were able to compel the same
army with but slight additional strength under General Joe Johnston,
to fall back, in four months of active field campaigning, with a
very much larger relative loss.  The proportion of the forces of
the opposing armies during the Tullahoma campaign was far nearer
equal than that on to Atlanta, while the natural and military
obstacles to be overcome were largely the greater in the Tullahoma
campaign.  To Bragg the forward movement of the Federal army in
full strength was a surprise, but to find that army so far in his
rear and so near to cutting his line of communications was a much
greater surprise.  These might not have been guarded against, but
nothing displayed the marked superiority of Rosecrans over his
opponent, as a great strategist, so much as the grand success of
the final movement of the campaign, from Manchester south.  The
general who--as even the rebels, in their worship of their leader
General Lee, admitted--was able in Western Virginia to completely
outgeneral Lee, on the Tullahoma campaign again demonstrated his
ability as the greatest strategic general of the war.

Brilliant campaigns, however, without battles, do not accomplish the
destruction of an army.  A campaign like that of Tullahoma always
means a battle at some other point.  This was true after the Atlanta
campaign, where Sherman got the glory and Thomas did the fighting.
This was equally true as to the Tullahoma, and the fact that these
two armies were yet somewhere to meet and engage in deadly strife,
was apparent to the commanders of both armies.  Where and when that
meeting was to be was the problem that engaged the minds of both
these commanders.  In the Tullahoma campaign the elements were on
the side of Bragg's army, both in preventing the rapid movements of
the Federal army, and in furnishing a perfect barrier to a successful
pursuit when the retreat was under way, by the high water in the
swollen streams, the bridges over which Bragg destroyed as he fell
back.

The concluding line of Bragg's letter to Johnston, that "The
Tennessee will be taken as our line," demonstrated that, to his
mind at least, his Kentucky movement of the year before did not
meet with the success he anticipated.  Here now he was waiting his
opportunity to contest his last foothold on the State of Tennessee
at the far corner in Chattanooga.  With Rosecrans, his army required
after these days of hard campaigning a rest to repair the wear
and tear of the heavy marching, and the resupplying of his entire
command.  The railroads in his rear required his attention first.
These were placed in order up to his army, and the repairs on the
road to the front were then to be pushed to the Tennessee River.  In
three weeks time these were completed, and on the 25th, the first
supply train was pushed through to the Tennessee River.  Then Rosecrans
established his new depot of supplies at Stevenson, Alabama, and
hastened, as rapidly as he could, the accumulation of supplies at
that point.





Chapter XI.




The Movement to Chickamauga.


The withdrawal of the army under Bragg to Chattanooga again made
that point the objective of a campaign.  But several things had to
be taken into consideration before this was entered into.  Burnside
had been ordered from Cincinnati to East Tennessee through Kentucky,
and it was necessary to know the force and position of his command.
If Knoxville and Cumberland Gap were under his control, then it
would be reasonably safe to follow out a plan of operations looking
to flank Bragg's left by a movement across the Tennessee over the
ranges of mountains of Northern Georgia.  But to do this, part
of the force under Grant, now inactive after Vicksburg, should be
ordered up at least as far east as the Tennessee, to protect the
line of supplies and prevent any movement of the enemy to the rear
on that flank of Rosecrans's army.  Another weighty consideration
was that of forage for the animals of the command.  By the middle
of August, corn in the valleys of Southern Tennessee and Northern
Alabama would be ripe, and subject to the wants of the army.  It
was General Rosecrans's plan to wait until these movements could
be accomplished and until the corn had ripened, and knowing the
difficulties in the way at the best, of his successfully accomplishing
his plans for the campaign, he wished at least to have that best
in his favor.

In making his final preparations for his operations against
Chattanooga, General Rosecrans considered two plans.  One was to
appear on the front of Chattanooga and attempt a direct attack on
the town and reduce it by a lengthy siege.  The other was to flank
Bragg out of Chattanooga, as he had been compelled by the movement
on the Tullahoma campaign to abandon his strongholds one by one.

The first plan could hardly be entertained, as Bragg was at his
base, with but short lines to all important points under control
of the rebel government, and at a place where in a very short time
heavy reinforcements could be sent him, while Rosecrans in front
of Chattanooga would be in a rough, sterile country, far away from
his base of supplies, with a long wagon-haul over rocky mountain
ranges from his nearest depot.  To attempt the movement on the left,
or through Sequatchie Valley, would concentrate Bragg's entire
army at the contemplated point of crossing the Tennessee.  This
plan Bragg was prepared for, and was resting, quietly awaiting the
movements of our army carrying it into effect.  But it was not the
purpose of Rosecrans to meet this expectation of his opponent.  The
genius of Rosecrans contemplated one of the most brilliant military
movements of the war to obtain possession of this great stronghold
of Nature, the gateway to East Tennessee and Northern Georgia,
Chattanooga.  At that time this place was of the utmost importance
to each of the contending forces, and the highest prize in a military
point of view that the Army of the Cumberland ever contended for.

To properly understand the magnitude and importance of the
campaign that Rosecrans was now entering on, it is necessary that
the topography of the country should be considered.  The position
of our army after the Tullahoma campaign was on the northwester base
of the Cumberland range, in camp occupying McMinnville, Tullahoma,
Dechard, and Winchester, with Chattanooga south of east.  Immediately
in front was the first great barrier in the advance movement--the
Cumberland Mountains--a lofty range of rocks dividing the waters
flowing into the Cumberland and Tennessee Rivers.  The range rises
far to the north and extends to the southwest into Alabama.  North
of Chattanooga the mountains are much bolder, more difficult to
cross, with almost sheer declivities on each of the sides.

Beyond the main range, in the direct road to Chattanooga, running
south, flows the Sequatchie River through the valley of that name,
formed by another range jutting off slightly to the east from the
main range, and between it and the Tennessee River.  This spur
is known by the name of Walling's Ridge [NOTE from Brett and Bob:
This is probably what is now known as Walden's Ridge which was
named after a Mr. Walling or Wallen as subsequently described.  This
Ridge was quite sparsely populated with an estimate of 11 families
at the time of the civil war, so it's history is not exactly
well documented.  Subsequent references use Walling's Ridge to be
consistent with the original text.], after an early settler and
Indian hunter.  It abuts close on the Tennessee in precipitous
rocky bluffs.

South of the Tennessee, and separated from the mountain ranges
north by this river, are the two ranges known as Sand and Lookout
Mountains.  The northern extremity of the former is called Raccoon
Mountain.  Here the river cuts its channel as a great chasm through
these mountain ranges, so sharply defined that the masses abut
directly upon the water in heavy palisades of rock.

The tops of all these mountain ranges are of poor soil but generally
with considerable timber; rough, with but few roads, and these
almost impassable for wagons and nearly destitute of water.  The
western slope of Sand Mountain reaches nearly to the Tennessee
River.  Between this latter range and Lookout Mountain is Lookout
Valley with the creek of that name flowing through it into the
Tennessee a short distance below Chattanooga.  This valley is also
known as Wills Valley, and at that time was traversed by a railroad
branching from the Nashville road at Wauhatchie, terminating at
Trenton.

Beyond this was Lookout range, 2,400 feet above the sea, with
almost perpendicular sides, heavily wooded and with little water,
abutting abruptly on the Tennessee, some two miles south of the
town, with only three practical wagon roads over it--one close to
the river, one at Johnson's Crook, and the third at Winston's Gap,
twenty-six and forty-two miles respectively south of Chattanooga.

To the east of Lookout Mountain is Chattanooga Valley with the town
at the head of it and the creek of that name flowing through, with
Dry Creek as a branch emptying its waters into the Tennessee just
south of the town.  Beyond this to the east is Missionary Ridge,
and parallel to it and just beyond is Chickamauga Valley, with
the creek of that name running through it emptying into the river
above Chattanooga, formed by East, Middle, and West Chickamauga
Creeks, uniting with Pea Vine Creek between the latter two as a
tributary.  Chattanooga and West Chickamauga Creeks have a common
source in McLemore's Cove, which is formed by Pigeon Mountain on
the east, jutting to the north as a spur of Lookout Mountain, with
the latter on the west, Missionary ridge running out as it enters
this cove.  The wagon road from Chattanooga to Rome, known as the
La Fayette road, crosses Missionary Ridge into Chickamauga Valley
at Rossville and proceeds thence nearly due south, crossing
Chickamauga Creek at Lee and Gordon Mills, thence to the east of
Pigeon Mountain, passing through La Fayette some twenty-two miles
south of Chattanooga; it then continues on to Summerville, within
twenty-five miles of Rome, and so on to the latter place.

Beyond these ranges is Taylor's ridge, with a number of lesser
ranges between it and the Atlanta Railroad, running through Dalton.
Both Pigeon Mountain and Taylor's Ridge are very rough mountain
ranges, with but few roads, and these only through gaps.  At Dalton
is the junction of the East Tennessee with the Atlanta Railroad,
in the valley of the head waters of the Coosa River, which valley
is here some ten miles wide and is the great natural passage-way
into East Tennessee from the south.

To follow Bragg to Chattanooga and to cross the Tennessee above
that place involved moving the army either to the north of the
Sequatchie Valley by Dunlap or by Therman and Walling's Ridge, some
sixty-five to seventy miles through a country poorly supplied with
water, with no forage, and by narrow and difficult wagon roads.  This
route would take Rosecrans further away from his base of supplies
and line of communication than that south of the river.  It was
over this northern route that Bragg anticipated the onward movement
of the Army of the Cumberland.  This would enable him to make a
protracted defence of the town and retard the advance for weeks,
if not months.  But Rosecrans's plan of the campaign contemplated a
much more hazardous movement and a far speedier one for the possession
of Chattanooga.  To accomplish this, however, it was necessary
to cross the Cumberland Mountains with subsistence, ammunition,
a limited supply of forage, and a bridge train; then to cross his
army over the Tennessee River, after that over Sand or Raccoon
Mountain into Lookout Valley, and from there to cross Lookout
Mountain, and finally the lesser ranges--Missionary Ridge--if he
went directly to Chattanooga, or to cross Missionary Ridge, Pigeon
Mountain, and Taylor's Ridge, if he struck the railroad at Dalton
or south of it.  This involved the carrying by his army of ammunition
for two great battles and twenty-five days' subsistence.

As soon as the repairs were made on the main line to Stevenson,
Rosecrans ordered Sheridan's division to make an advance movement
with two brigades to Bridgeport and one to Stevenson.  Van Cleve
had been ordered up with his divisions from Murfreesboro and was
posted at McMinnville.  On August 8th, stores being accumulated at
the front, orders were issued to corps commanders to supply their
troops, as soon as possible, with rations and forage sufficient
for the general advance.

The movement over the Cumberland Mountains began on August 16th,
and the troops were ordered to move as follows:


"Crittenden's corps in three columns to move through the Sequatchie
Valley.  Minty's cavalry to move on the left by Sparta, and after
covering the left flank of Van Cleve to proceed to Pikesville.

"Thomas to move Reynolds and Brannan from University by way
of Battle Creek, where they were to take post, concealed near its
mouth.  Negley and Baird to go by way of Tantallon and halt on Crow
Creek between Anderson and Stevenson.

"McCook to move Johnson by Salem and Larkin's Ford to Bellefont.
Davis by Mount Top and Crow Creek to near Stevenson.  The three
brigades of cavalry by Fayetteville and Athens to cover the line
of the Tennessee from Whitesburg up."


These orders were complied with, and the movements completed by
the evening of August 20th.  Crittenden sent Hazen's brigade on
a reconnoissance to Harrison's Landing, where he found the enemy
throwing up works.  On the next day Hazen took post at Poe's
cross-roads.  Wilder was sent to reconnoitre from Harrison's
Landing to Chattanooga.  On reaching Chattanooga, he was supported
by Wagner's brigade, and both commands opened fire on the next day,
shelling the town from across the river.  This bombardment of the
place caused it to be evacuated by the rebel troops, to points
beyond range outside, and the withdrawal by Bragg of his stores
to points of convenience on the railroad to the rear.  Bragg then
ordered Anderson's brigade to withdraw from Bridgeport.

The feint under Crittenden was so well timed that Bragg concentrated
his immediate command at and above Chattanooga, leaving the crossing
of the river by the main portion of our army later, unobstructed.
Rosecrans had posted his army so that demonstrations were made
simultaneously from Whitesburg to Blythe's Ferry, a distance of
one hundred and fifty miles, and Bragg did not know just where to
look for his real advance, but definitely concluded that it would
NOT be made anywhere in the vicinity of Bridgeport.  On the 26th,
five days after the surprise at Chattanooga, Burnside's advance
into East Tennessee was announced by the presence of his cavalry in
the vicinity of Knoxville.  Bragg then ordered Buckner to evacuate
Knoxville, and occupy Loudon.  The demonstration at Blythe's Ferry
on the Tennessee, opposite the mouth of the Hiawasse, caused Bragg
to order him to retire to Charleston, and soon thereafter to
Chattanooga.  On the 30th, information was given General Thomas
that Johnston, with 15,000 men from Mississippi, had re-enforced
Bragg.

Under cover of the apparent activity of the left of our army in front
of and above Chattanooga, Rosecrans effected safely the crossing
of the first great barrier to the objective point, and reached the
banks of the Tennessee opposite the enemy, concealing as far as he
could the movements of his troops, and the position of his pontoons
and trains.  He then had the river reconnoitered, that the best
points might be selected and the means at once provided for the
crossing.  As soon as the crossings had been determined on, the
proper dispositions were made to begin the movement.

The Tennessee River, at the various points where our army was to
cross, is very wide; and, swollen by recent rains, was quite high
for that season of the year.  The troops crossed the river at four
points.  As there were not enough pontoons for two bridges, Sheridan
had commenced trestlework for part of one at Bridgeport.  Reynolds
advanced to Shellmound, seizing the place.  Here he captured a
number of boats, and with these and other material picked up, he was
enabled to cross at that point, while Brannan crossed his division
from the mouth of Battle Creek on rafts.  The main crossing of
McCook's corps was at Caperton's Ferry, about forty miles below
Chattanooga, where the pontoon bridge was laid by Davis's division,
after driving a detachment of rebel cavalry from the opposite side.

The movement across the river was commenced on August 29th, and
completed on September 4th.  Baird, in command of a division of
Thomas's corps, crossed the river at Bridgeport after the repairs
were completed to the bridge.  Negley's division crossed at Caperton's
Ferry.  The four divisions of Thomas's corps with great difficulty
crossed Sand Mountain, and concentrated near Trenton in Will's
Valley, east of Sand Mountain.  On September 6th Negley's division,
being in the advance, reached Johnson's Crook where Beatty's brigade
was sent at once up the mountain to seize Steven's Gap.  Before
proceeding far he met the enemy's pickets, and, night coming on,
he went into camp just west of the gap.  The Eighteenth Ohio went
a short distance on the road to the top of Lookout Mountain, met
the enemy's pickets and withdrew.  The next day, Baird's division
supporting Negley, the latter with two brigades, moved forward,
and with his advance gained possession of the top of the mountain,
and secured the forks of the road.  The entire of Negley's division
reached this point on the 9th, at the head of Johnson's Crook,
and with one brigade held the pass while another was sent a short
distance north on the mountain to seize Cooper's Gap, with a regiment
in the advance to occupy and hold the entrance on the east.  Another
regiment was sent forward to hold Stevens's Gap, which was found
heavily obstructed with fallen timber.  Negley still being in the
advance, moved the day following across Missionary Ridge, and took
up a position in McLemore's Cove on the road through Dug Gap.  Here
he found the enemy's cavalry drawn up in line, and learned from
citizens that the rebels were in strong force concentrated in his
front in Dug Gap, with infantry, artillery, and cavalry.  Baird's
division was in supporting distance of Negley.

Early in the morning of the 9th Reynolds sent the Ninety-second
Illinois (mounted infantry) to make a reconnoissance along the
top of Lookout Mountain, to discover the enemy's movements and to
determine the rumors in regard to the evacuation of Chattanooga.
At 11 A.M. the regiment entered the town as the rear of the enemy's
column was leaving the place.  The next day the four divisions of
the Fourteenth Corps were in supporting distance of each other,
with Negley still in front of Dug Gap, the enemy holding the east
entrance with a heavy force, and the Gap full of obstructions.
Negley discovered early on the following day that his situation
was critical, and that he was in danger of losing his train.  He
determined to fall back to a strong position in front of Stevens's
Gap, which movement he proceeded to execute, and succeeded in the
face of the enemy by his energy and skill, with the prompt co-operation
of Baird, in securing his position in front of the gap without the
loss of a single wagon.  The next day the location of Bragg's army
at La Fayette with Johnston's reinforcements was fully determined,
and Thomas's corps now awaited the movements of the other troops
with reference to the concentration of the army.

In the meantime Davis's and Johnson's divisions of McCook's corps,
crossing the river at Caperton's Ferry, moved over Sand Mountain
into Will's Valley, and thence--Davis being in the advance--moved
into and seized Winston's Gap, some twenty-five miles from Caperton's
Ferry, and about forty-two from Chattanooga.  Sheridan's division
crossed the river at the railroad bridge, moved through Trenton,
and on the 6th encamped twelve miles from Winston's Gap.  McCook
sent several detachments on the 8th and 9th to different points,
reconnoitering the enemy.  One went to Alpine and two into Broomtown
Valley, but nothing was discovered of Bragg's whereabouts.  On the
evening of the 9th Rosecrans sent orders to McCook, stating that
the enemy had evacuated Chattanooga and were retreating southward,
and directing him to move rapidly upon Alpine and Summerville in
pursuit, to intercept his line of retreat, and to attack on his
flank.  The day following McCook reached Alpine, where he discovered
the situation.  The enemy had not retreated very far from Chattanooga,
the exact location as yet unknown.  McCook learned that he could
not communicate with Thomas, as his couriers could not pass through
the valley, occupied as it was by the enemy in force, and that
his corps was entirely isolated at Alpine.  That, had he gone
to Summerville, he would have been exposed to an attack from the
entire rebel army, which his reconnoissance later determined was
concentrated in force near La Fayette.  On the following day McCook
remained in camp waiting for Thomas to move up on him.  He, however,
sent his wagon-train back to the summit of Lookout Mountain.  On
the 12th McCook waited in camp for reports from the cavalry as to
the position and movements of the enemy.

Crittenden's corps had during the time moved down the Sequatchie
Valley, in readiness for an active campaign.  He then crossed the
river at Bridgeport, Shell Mound, and Battle Creek, and on September
4th his entire corps was across the river.  He was ordered to move
up the valley of Running Water Creek and Whiteside, leaving one
division on the line of the Nashville and Chattanooga Railroad,
and to push forward as near as possible to Chattanooga, threatening
the enemy in that direction.  At 6 A.M. on the 9th Crittenden was
informed by a despatch from Rosecrans that Chattanooga had been
abandoned by the enemy, and that he was to push forward at once
with five day's rations and make a vigorous pursuit.  During the
morning Crittenden with Wood's division occupied the town, and
Wood was placed in command.  Palmer's and Van Cleve's were turned
off south after they passed the spur of Lookout Mountain, and
encamped at Rossville, five miles south of Chattanooga.  In the
afternoon of the same day Crittenden was ordered to leave a brigade
at Chattanooga, and with the balance of his command to pursue the
enemy with the utmost vigor, the line of march to be through Ringgold
and on to Dalton.  The next day Crittenden left Wagner--who had
crossed the river from the front of the town during the night--in
command, and ordered forward Palmer's, Van Cleve's, and the two
brigades of Wood's division in pursuit, marching on the Rossville
and Riggold road.  During the afternoon Palmer reported the enemy's
cavalry strong on his front, that he had only been able to march
six miles, had encamped at Chickamauga Creek, and that his advance
had been checked by a charge of the rebel cavalry.  That night
Crittenden received several reports from his front that the enemy
was in force near La Fayette, and threatening to retake Chattanooga.

During the 11th, Wood, with his two brigades, was on a reconnoissance
at Gordon's Mills, and Crittenden was ordered to occupy Ringgold
and report.  These movements determined to Rosecrans's satisfaction
the position of the enemy in force in the vicinity of La Fayette.
He immediately ordered Crittenden to close his entire command
upon Wood, crossing as quickly as possible to the Rossville and La
Fayette road, to some point near Lee and Gordon's Mills.  Early on
the morning of the 12th, Wilder was ordered back to Ringgold and
directed to follow on the line of march of the infantry, covering
the left flank.  Crittenden succeeded during the day in effecting
a concentration of his command at Lee and Gordon's Mills, which
point Wilder's brigade reached after a severe skirmish during the
day near Leet's tanyard, where he lost thirty men killed and wounded.
With the knowledge that Bragg was concentrating his forces awaiting
reinforcements behind Pigeon Mountain, in the vicinity of La Fayette,
and that his own army was scattered a distance of thirty miles from
flank to flank--from Lee and Gordon's Mills to Alpine--Rosecrans felt
that it was a matter of life and death to effect the concentration
of his army in the shortest possible space of time.

During these movements of the army under Rosecrans, what was Bragg
doing?  On August 20th, the movement of our army over the Cumberland
Mountains was reported to Bragg, and he then knew that he might
look for an immediate advance.  The movement of our army across the
Tennessee was also reported to Bragg by his scouts, but was regarded
by him as incredible.  These reports were soon after confirmed by
the news that our cavalry had occupied Trenton and had advanced
up the Will's Valley Railroad as far as Wauhatchie, within seven
miles of Chattanooga, as a covering force under which Rosecrans's
columns of infantry were advancing.  Our army was now as near the
line of communication of the rebel army, as the latter was to the
line to Nashville, and with less risk in its advance movements
should Bragg commence operations to the north.  Bringing his cavalry
forward at once, Bragg soon ascertained that the general movement
of our army was toward his left and rear in the direction of Dalton
and Rome, keeping Lookout Mountain between the armies.  He then
determined to meet our army as its columns debouched from the defiles
of the mountains.  To hold Chattanooga would require at least two
strong divisions, and he felt that his force would not permit this
and make a successful attack also.  Bragg put his army in motion on
September 7th and 8th, and took up position from Lee and Gordon's
Mills to La Fayette, on the road running south from Chattanooga,
with the front to the east side of Lookout Mountain, and on the
east bank of Chickamauga Creek, establishing his headquarters at
the former place.

The positions of our detached corps was fully known to Bragg on
the 8th.  Learning of Negley's movement of the 9th into McLemore's
cove, Bragg rightly interpreted it to mean that a hurried pursuit
was being made after his force, under the idea that he was in full
retreat.  With his own force concentrated in front of the centre,
Bragg at once saw how Rosecrans had exposed the corps of his army
to be attacked and defeated in detail, and that evening he gave
order to Hindman to prepare his division to move against Negley,
and ordered Hill to send or take Cleburne's division, join Hindman,
and immediately move upon Negley.  On receipt of these orders,
Hill replied that his part of the movement was impracticable, as
Cleburne was sick, and that both gaps--Dug and Catlett's--had been
closed by felling timber which would require twenty-four hours to
remove.  Hindman having marched during the night of the 9th some
ten miles, was now in position, some three miles from Negley in
the cove.  Bragg not wishing to lose so favorable an opportunity
of striking his opponent's force, ordered Buckner with his command
to move from Anderson and join Hindman in the cove, which he did
during the afternoon of the 10th.  After these commands had united,
the commanders held a consultation and determined that a change in
the plan of operations should be made.  Bragg having removed his
headquarters to La Fayette, "so as to secure more prompt and decided
action in the movements ordered against the enemy's centre," now
directed Polk to send his remaining division to support Hindman
during the operations in the cove.  Despatching an officer to Bragg
with a report as to this change of plans, Hindman and Cleburne
waited his return.  Bragg refused to make any change, and sent a
verbal order to Hindman to proceed at once to carry out his previous
instruction.  Bragg at the same time sent written orders by courier
to Hindman, notifying him of the movements of our forces, that Polk
had been directed to cover his rear, and ordered him to attack and
force his way through Negley to La Fayette at the earliest hour
in the morning, and adds "Cleburne will attack in front the moment
your guns are heard."  Walker's reserve corps was also ordered to
move promptly, join Cleburne's division at Dug Gap and unite in
the attack.  All obstructions were removed from Dug and Catlett's
Gaps, and Breckenridge's division of Hill's corps was kept in
position south of La Fayette to check any movement of our troops
from that direction, thus putting 30,000 troops in position to crush
Negley and Baird.  Bragg shortly after daylight joined Cleburne,
where they waited nearly all day for Hindman's guns to open--when
Cleburne was to attack--on the flank and rear of Negley and
Baird's divisions.  After waiting long past noon in great anxiety
for Hindman's attack, about the middle of the afternoon his first
gun was heard.  Cleburne at once pressed forward and discovered
that Negley had fallen back to Steven's Gap.

Bragg, finding his attempt against Thomas's corps a failure, then
determined to hurl his columns upon Crittenden's divided corps,
approaching from Chattanooga, by withdrawing the troops engaged
in the movement on Thomas's command to La Fayette, and directing
Polk's and Walker's corps to move immediately in the direction of
Lee and Gordon's Mills.  Bragg knew Crittenden's corps was divided,
but supposed only one division had been sent to Ringgold.  At six
o'clock on the evening of the 12th, Bragg wrote again to Polk,
notifying him of Crittenden's position of the 11th, and stated:  "This
presents you a fine opportunity of striking Crittenden in detail,
and I hope you will avail yourself of it at daylight to-morrow.
This division crushed, and the others are yours.  We can then turn
on the force in the cove.  Wheeler's cavalry will move on Wilder
so as to cover your right.  I shall be delighted to hear of your
success."  Later in the evening two additional orders were issued
to Polk, urging him to attack promptly at "day-dawn," on the 13th;
that our army was concentrating, and that it should be quick and
decided."  At eleven o'clock that night Polk sent a dispatch stating
that he had taken a strong position for defense and asked that he
be heavily re-enforced.  Bragg sent him an immediate order not to
defer his attack, as his command was numerically superior to the
opposing force, and told him that to secure success, prompt and
rapid movements on his part were necessary.  Early on the morning
of the 13th, Bragg, at the head of Buckner's command, went to the
front, and found no advance had been made by Polk as ordered, and
that Crittenden had united his forces and recrossed the Chickamauga.

Again the attempt to strike our army in detail had failed, and now
Bragg gave orders to his commanders to concentrate along the east
bank of Chickamauga in position for battle, and as soon as his
reinforcements under Longstreet from Virginia were up to attack
with the entire command.  Wheeler, with two divisions of cavalry
on the extreme left, was ordered to engage the attention of Thomas
in McLemore's Cove, covering the main movement of the rebel army;
Forrest with his own and Pegram's divisions of cavalry covered
the right and front.  Bragg ordered B. R. Johnson's brigade from
Ringgold, where he had been stationed protecting the railroad,
to take position near Reed's bridge on the extreme right of his
line.  Walker's corps was then formed on Johnson's left, opposite
Alexander's Bridge.  Buckner's corps was formed on the left
of Walker, near Ledford's Ford.  Polk's corps was placed in line
opposite Lee and Gordon's Mills on Buckner's left, with Hill on the
extreme left.  Two brigades that had just arrived from Mississippi
were placed under Johnson on the right, making his command a
division of three brigades strong.  To this division in the earlier
movements three brigades of Longstreet's corps from Virginia were
temporarily attached.  On the 18th, Hood reporting, was placed in
command of this column on the right.

The rebel army on the 17th were in position, and that evening
Bragg issued his orders for his forces to cross the Chickamauga,
commencing the movement at six o'clock on the morning of the 18th.
Bragg's plan of battle for the 18th was for the column under
Johnson--later under Hood--to cross in force at Reed's Bridge,
rapidly turn to the left by the most practicable route, and sweep
up the Chickamauga toward Lee and Gordon's Mills.  Walker's corps
next on the left, crossing at Alexandria Bridge, was to unite in
the movement, pressing our army vigorously on flank and rear, in
the same direction.  Buckner, crossing at Ledford's Ford, was to
join in the movement to the left, pressing our army back up the
stream from Polk's front.  The latter to push forward to the front
at Lee and Gordon's Mills, and if not able to cross there, to bear
to the right and cross at Dalton's Ford or Alexander's Bridge,
and unite in the attack wherever he could find an opposing force.
Hill, to cover the left flank of the rebel army from an advance by
our forces in the cove, to ascertain by pressing his cavalry to the
front if we were reinforcing our corps at Lee and Gordon's Mills,
and if so to attack on the flank.  This plan contemplated the
destruction of the left of our army, the seizing of the La Fayette
road, and, if possible, occupying and holding the roads in Chattanooga
Valley, cutting off all access from Chattanooga.  These movements
were not executed as rapidly as was contemplated by Bragg, owing to
the resistance made by our cavalry and Wilder's mounted infantry,
and the difficulties arising from bad and narrow roads.  Johnson
was repeatedly urged to commence the movement on the right, but he
delayed his advance until late in the afternoon, when Hood arrived
and effected the crossing.  Walker moved up to Alexander's Bridge,
at which point Wilder hotly contested his crossing, and finally
broke up the bridge.  Walker moved down the creek to Byron's Ford,
where he crossed and joined Hood on the right during the night.
On Walker's crossing, Wilder was compelled to fall back.

The concentration of our army continued on the 13th, Thomas held
his position of the 12th, with Negley's, Baird's, and Brannan's
divisions remaining in camp, waiting the arrival of McCook, who
had been ordered to close up to the left.  Reynolds's division was
concentrated on the road from Cooper's or Frick's Gap to Catlett's
Gap, and the next day moved forward and took position at Pond
Spring, with his two infantry brigades, and was joined here by
Wilder.  Reynolds sent Turchin to make a reconnoissance with the
Ninety-second Illinois mounted infantry, to the mouth of Catlett's
Gap, driving the rebel cavalry pickets from Chickamauga Creek
to the gap, where he found the enemy posted with strong reserves.
Brannan on the same day reconnoitered the position of the enemy
toward Dug Gap, sending a brigade to Chickamauga Creek, east of
Lee's Mills, one mile to the right and south of Reynolds, at Pond
Spring.  Turchin made another reconnoissance on the 16th toward
Catlett's Gap, and found the enemy strongly posted there with
infantry and artillery.  The next day Thomas moved his entire
corps and closed upon Crittenden's right along Chickamauga Creek,
and was joined at night by McCook on his right.  The four divisions
of Thomas's command on the afternoon of the 18h moved to the left
to Crawfish Springs.  Here Rosecrans, anticipating the movement
of Bragg to secure the road to Chattanooga, and recognizing the
importance of holding it, ordered Thomas with his corps to march
on the cross-road leading by the Widow Glenn's to the Chattanooga
and La Fayette road, and take position on that road near Kelly's
farm, connecting with Crittenden's corps on his right at Gordon's
Mills.  During the entire night of the 18th the troops of Thomas's
corps were moving to the left, and at daylight on the 19th the
head of the column reached Kelly's farm; Baird's division in the
advance, taking position at the forks of the road, facing toward
Reed's and Alexander's Bridges over the Chickamauga.  Wilder had
been driven across the State road to the heights east of Widow
Glenn's house the evening before, by the advance in force of the
enemy over these bridges, and Baird's right rested close to Wilder's
brigade.  Baird's division was closely followed by Brannan, who was
placed in position on the left of Baird, on the two roads leading
to the bridges.

Orders were received by McCook at midnight on the 13th, directing
two divisions of his corps to move to Thomas's support, and that he
send his train back under guard of his remaining division.  McCook
moved his command, by way of Valley Head, up the mountain at Alpine
on the night of the 13th, and down on the 14th into Lookout Valley,
except one brigade from each division forming his train guard
under command of Lytle, encamped at Little River in the mountains.
Sheridan's marched down Lookout Valley to Johnson's Crook, while
Johnson's and Davis's divisions were sent from Valley head on the
direct road to Stevens's Gap.  General Lytle was ordered to make
a reconnoissance with two brigades toward Dougherty's Gap at the
head of McLemore's Cove, and on the night of the 18th General Lytle
joining the corps with two of his brigades, McCook's command was
closed up on the Fourteenth Corps, except Post's brigade of Davis's
division, ordered by General Rosecrans to hold Stevens's Gap at
all hazards.

Crittenden on the 13th, under orders from headquarters, posted
Wood's division in a strong position at Lee and Gordon's Mills, under
orders to resist any advance of the enemy to last, and in case of
extremity, if Granger was not in position to support, then to fall
back to some point where he could guard the road to Chattanooga and
the one around the point of Lookout Mountain, and hold both roads,
as long as he had a man under him.  The next day Crittenden moved
the two remaining divisions of his corps to a position on the
southern spur of Missionary Ridge, his right communicating with
Thomas, where he was to remain, covering the road in Chattanooga
Valley.  Finding no movement of the enemy on his front, on the 15th
Crittenden was ordered to return with his command and take position
near Crawfish Spring, with Van Cleve on the left and Palmer on
the right.  During the day Minty with the cavalry made an extended
reconnoissance on the front, finding the enemy in force at all points.
Wood, holding position on Chickamauga Creek, at Lee and Gordon's
Mills, on the morning of the 18th reported the enemy advancing with
strong line of skirmishers on his left and asked for supports.  Van
Cleve was placed on Wood's left and Palmer then took Van Cleve's
position on Wood's right.  Wilder in the afternoon reported
Minty's cavalry driven back after being re-enforced with two of his
regiments; that the enemy was flanking him and that he would fall
back on Wood.  Palmer later in the day was placed on the left
of Van Cleve's new position on the line of Chickamauga Creek, his
last brigade reaching its position at four o'clock on the morning
of the 19th; Wood holding his position on the creek at Lee and
Gordon's Mills, which at this point runs between steep rocky bluffs
in an eastwardly course, with the road to Chattanooga via Rossville
crossing it at right angles; Van Cleve on his left and Palmer
on the left of Van Cleve; the general course of the line being
northeasterly along the Chickamauga and Rossville road.





Chapter XII.




The Battle of Chickamauga.


Colonel Dan. McCook, of Granger's reserve corps, who had been posted
on the road leading to Reed's Bridge, on the evening of the 18th,
made a reconnoissance to Chickamauga Creek as far as Reed's Bridge,
which he burned.  On the 19th, meeting Thomas, he reported that an
isolated brigade of the enemy was on the west side of the creek,
and as the bridge was destroyed a prompt movement in that direction
might succeed in capturing the entire force.  Thomas ordered Brannan
to post a brigade on the road to Alexander's Bridge as support
to Baird, and with his other brigades to reconnoitre the road
to Reed's Bridge in search of this brigade of the enemy.  Brannan
moved at nine o'clock A.M., and Baird, under orders from Thomas,
threw forward his right wing so as to get into line with Brannan.
Baird was also ordered to keep a sharp outlook on his right flank
and watch the movements of the enemy in that quarter.  Shortly after
these movements a part of Palmer's division reported to Thomas and
was placed in position on the right of Baird.  Rosecrans, when he
sent Thomas to the left--the critical point--told him that he was
to hold the road to Rossville, and if hard pressed, that he should
be re-enforced with the entire army.

Under Bragg's orders, Walker's corps on the 18th crossed the west
side of Chickamauga a little below Alexander's Bridge and then moved
up the stream opposite this point.  Bushrod Johnson's command the
same day crossed at Reed's bridge, and then marched up the stream
some three miles and took position on the morning of the 19th.
Walker resumed his movement to his left up the stream, under the
impression that our centre was still at Lee and Gordon's Mills,
Bragg's plan being to mass Walker's and Johnson's commands and
attack our left flank.  The advance movement of Brannan's division,
Croxton's brigade in front, about ten o'clock encountered the enemy,
being the cavalry under Forrest with Wilson's and Ector's brigades
of infantry, and drove them nearly half a mile, when it met with
obstinate resistance.  This reconnoissance of Brannan in pursuit
of the brigade reported by Dan. McCook developed the relative
position of the opposing contending forces, which up to this time
was unknown to the respective commanders of each.  It gave to Bragg
the knowledge that his right was greatly overlapped by Thomas on
our left, and that his flank was in danger of being turned.  It
compelled him at once to halt Walker's command on its march, and to
direct it to retrace its steps and reinforce Forrest, now engaged
with Croxton, whose movement brought on the battle of Chickamauga
before Bragg had his troops in the position ordered.

Thomas then ordered Baird's division forward to Croxton's support.
Moving at once with two brigades on the front, with Starkweather's
in reserve, Baird and Croxton drove the enemy steadily for some
distance with great loss, capturing many prisoners.  Croxton's
brigade having exhausted its ammunition in the severe fighting of
over an hour, was then moved to the rear, and Brannan's and Baird's
divisions with united forces drove the enemy from their immediate
front.  Here the line was halted and readjusted.  Baird learning
from his prisoners that the rebel army was in heavy force on his
immediate front, gathering for an attack in mass, drew back his
right wing and waited the assault of Bragg's right on his line,
which was made in heavy force by Walker, who had reached his new
position.  Before Baird had completed the reforming of his line,
Walker's corps, in overwhelming numbers was upon him, assaulting
Scribner's and King's brigades, and driving them back in disorder.

McCook, early on the morning of the 19th, had taken position with
his corps at Crawfish Spring, and was now beyond the extreme left
of the rebel army, massing his troops at this point and waiting
for orders.  At a little after ten o'clock in the morning he was
directed to take command of the right and the cavalry on that flank.
This included Negley's division of the Fourteenth Corps, which was
watching the fords of Chickamauga near Crawfish Spring, one brigade
of his command being then engaged with the enemy.  The same order
directed McCook to send Johnson's divisions to the left to report
to Thomas, and following this came another one from Rosecrans
directing McCook to send Davis's division also to Thomas.  On Baird
being driven back, General Thomas ordered Johnson's and Reynolds's
division of his own corps--both of whom had opportunely arrived by
this time--immediately to advance and drive the enemy back.  Johnson
arriving first was ordered at once to advance his left, connecting
with Baird's right, Palmer was immediately placed on Johnson's
right and Reynolds still to the right of Palmer, with one brigade
of his division in reserve.  As soon as the line was thus formed
the troops advanced, attacking Walker's corps on the flank with
great vigor, driving it in confusion back to its first position,
while Brannan's division, fighting them on the front, drove back
the head of the column and retook the artillery which had been
captured from Baird when he was driven back.  Bragg then ordered
up Cheatham's division, which had been in reserve, reinforcing
Walker.  With these two commands united, the rebels pressed forward
with loud yells, determined on the destruction of our left.  As
these two commands advanced, a gap was made in their lines, into
which Bragg threw Stewart's division.  As they encountered our
line, these troops moved forward.  Striking Johnson first, they
drove him from his position in disorder, then Palmer was compelled
to retire, when Van Cleve coming to his support was also beaten
back.  Reynolds then in turn was overpowered and the rebels seemed
to be sweeping every thing before them as at Stone's River.  By
this time Davis had reported with his division, and moving at once
to the front checked the rebel advance, when Wood coming up to his
assistance, our lines were reformed, and Cheatham's, Stewart's, and
Walker's troops were driven in rapid retreat back to their original
line.  Sheridan, under orders, had left Lytle's brigade to hold
Lee and Gordon's Mills on our extreme right, and moved to our left
in support of the new line near Wood's and Davis's divisions.  He
reached the position opportunely and aided in driving back the
rebels, Bradley's brigade recapturing the Eighth Indiana battery
previously taken by the enemy.  A large number of prisoners were
captured belonging to Longstreet's corps.

Bragg, finding that his plan of battle was discovered by his
opponent, and that the latter intended to dispute to the end for
the possession of the Rossville and Chattanooga road, ordered Polk
to cross the creek with his remaining division at the nearest ford
and to assume command in person on their right.  Hill with his
corps was also ordered to move across the Chickamauga below Lee
and Gordon's Mills and to join the line on the right.

The rebels made another desperate assault at about half past two
o'clock on our right.  Hood's corps, with Bushrod Johnson's division
from the enemy's centre, moved forward in heavy masses, assaulting
furiously Reynolds's and Van Cleve's divisions.  Here they met with
fearful loss from the heavy infantry and artillery fire, portions
of six batteries opening with canister on their advancing columns,
but still on they came.  Soon the roar of battle was heard approaching
near to the Widow Glenn's house, where Rosecrans's headquarters
were.  Our right centre now was pierced and the enemy was on the La
Fayette road.  Negley, from the right under McCook, was immediately
ordered up with his division, Brannan from Thomas's left joining
him.  These two divisions were at once sent in to the fight.  Moving
rapidly forward to the attack, with cheer on cheer, they hurled
back Hood and Johnson, steadily driving them until darkness ended
the combat, our troops re-occupying their old positions.

Thomas, wishing to reform his lines--which had become greatly extended
in driving the rebels--and concentrate them on more commanding
ground in the rear preparatory to the engagement to be renewed
on the morrow, selected a new position for Baird's and Johnson's
divisions, the former on the extreme left.  These positions were
designated to them and were occupied at once.  Palmer and Reynolds
were ordered into position in line on the right of Johnson, with
Brannan to the rear and right of Reynolds as reserve.  While these
movements were being made, Cleburne with his fresh division of
Hill's corps, who had been ordered to the extreme right by Bragg,
under orders to attack immediately, advancing in full force,
supported by Cheatham, assaulted Johnson first and then Baird with
tremendous force.  The onset was so determined that some confusion
in the line resulted, but in a few minutes our troops rallied and
the enemy was repulsed in fine style.  This conflict lasted for some
time after dark with heavy losses on both sides, the heavy firing
lighting up the struggle.  At this point our artillery was again
used with good effect.  Wilder's brigade had occupied a position
during the day on the La Fayette road about a mile north of Lee and
Gordon's Mills, with Minty close by.  The latter was now ordered
to report to Granger at Rossville, to hold in check the enemy's
cavalry operating on their right.  Granger, with his reserves
protected the roads to the rear toward Rossville and covered our
left flank.

With night the fighting ceased, and the troops, worn out after the
marching of the night before--moving from the right to the extreme
left--and the heavy fighting of the day, slept on their arms, awaiting
the heavier conflict of the morrow.  Though weary, the troops were
in most excellent spirits, and confident of final victory.  It was
known throughout the army that we had been fighting during the day
largely superior forces.  That Bragg had been heavily re-enforced
from Mississippi and East Tennessee, and by Longstreet's command
from Virginia, and that the enemy was fighting most desperately.
Bragg's great aim had been to conceal his main attack on our left
by the feint on the centre, and supposed that our centre on the
morning of the 19th was still at Lee and Gordon's Mills.  Presuming
this to be the case, Bragg had massed heavily on our left, intending
to repeat his movement made on our right at Murfreesboro.  His plan
contemplated the breaking of our left, sweeping it before him in
broken masses, crushing our centre, and destroying our right, and
then occupying the road to Chattanooga in force he would have the
Federal army completely in his power.  The movement made by Croxton
compelled Bragg to open the battle in heavy force on the left,
before his troops had secured the positions assigned them, and then,
to his surprise, he found that during the night our left had been
greatly prolonged, and that Rosecrans was in force, occupying a
position far to the north of what he had been led to expect.  During
the night Bragg ordered up by forced marches all reinforcements
arriving by railroad.  Three brigades of fresh troops reached the
enemy during the night, and were placed in line early in the morning
of the 20th.  These, with the troops ordered late the day before
from the east bank of the Chickamauga, gave Bragg a large number
of fresh troops, which he placed in line of battle on the 20th.
During the night Bragg summoned his generals to meet him at his
camp fire, and there gave them orders for the following day.  He
divided his entire force into two commands, to which he assigned
his senior Lieutenant-Generals Longstreet and Polk.  The former--who
had reported during the night--to the left, composed of six divisions
where his own troops were stationed, and the latter continuing in
his command of five divisions on the right.  Bragg's plan of battle
for the 20th was for Polk to assault in force, with Breckinridge's
division on his extreme right at day-dawn, when the attack was to
be taken up rapidly in succession by the divisions to his left.
The left wing was to await the movement on the right, and when the
attack was made there to take it up promptly.  When the entire line
became engaged it was to move forward vigorously and persistently
throughout its entire length, the whole army wheeling on Longstreet's
left as a pivot, but constantly pressing our left to get possession
of the road to Chattanooga.

The battle of the 19th was a series of brilliant charges and
counter-charges, in favor of first one side and then the other.
During the day our troops, at times broken and driven by the enemy,
always promptly rallied and drove the rebels in disorder to their
lines by brilliant and effective dashes, moving to the attack with
vigor and determination.  In the main the results of the day were
in our favor.  Bragg had been forced to fight before he was in
position, and had been foiled in his attempt to secure the roads,
which on the evening of the 19th remained even more securely in
our possession than before, fully protected on both flanks by our
cavalry.  As this was the object of the severe conflict of the 19th,
that day's fighting was a success for our arms, both the Rossville
and the Dry Valley roads being firmly held by our troops that night.

But the battle was not yet over.  During the night Rosecrans
assembled his corps commanders at his headquarters at the Widow
Glenn's house, and after a consultation with them on the state and
condition of their commands, gave orders for the disposition and
movements of the troops for the next day.  The divisions of Thomas's
corps, with those which had re-enforced him, to hold the road to
Rossville, in the same position as then occupied by them in line
of battle, with Brannan in reserve.  McCook, with Sheridan's and
Davis's divisions was to maintain his picket line until it was
attacked and driven back.  His left division--Davis's--was to close
on Thomas, and to have his right refused covering the position at
Widow Glenn's house.  Crittenden was to hold two divisions, Wood's
and Van Cleve's, in reserve near where the line of McCook and Thomas
joined to reinforce the front line as needed.

During the night Thomas received word from Baird on the extreme
left, that the left of his division did not reach the road to Reed's
Ridge, as had been anticipated.  Thomas immediately requested that
Negley's division be ordered to report to him to take position on
Baird's left and rear, securing this flank from assault.  At daylight
Rosecrans, riding the line, ordered Negley to join Thomas at once,
and directed McCook to relieve Negley, who was on the front line.
He also ordered McCook to adjust his right, as it was too far out
on the crest, and to move Davis's division to the left, and close
it up compactly.  Crittenden was also directed to move his two
divisions to the left and Palmer, on Thomas's line, was instructed
to close up his front.  On reaching the left Rosecrans was convinced
that the first attack would be made on that flank, and returned at
once to the right to hurry Negley over to Thomas.  Arriving there
he found that this division had not moved, and that McCook's troops
were not ready to relieve him.  Negley was then ordered to send
his reserve brigade under John Beatty, and to follow with the other
two when relieved from the front.  Impatient at McCook's delay in
relieving Negley, and anticipating momentarily the attack of the
enemy on our left, Rosecrans ordered Crittenden to move Wood's
division to the front, to fill the position occupied by Negley of
which McCook was notified by Rosecrans in person.  Rosecrans, when
first at McCook's line, was greatly dissatisfied with McCook's
position.  He now called McCook's attention to the defects in his
line, that it was too light, and that it was weakened by being
too much strung out, and charged him to keep well closed up on the
left at all hazards.  Leaving McCook, Rosecrans then returned to
Negley, and found to his surprise that the brigades in front had
not yet been relieved and started to Thomas after his repeated
orders, as Wood's division had only reached the position of Negley's
reserve.  Greatly irritated at this, Rosecrans gave preemptory
orders and Wood's division was at once placed in front, closed up
on the right of Brannan.

A heavy fog hung over the battlefield during the early morning.
Bragg, before daylight with his staff, took position immediately
in the rear of the centre of his line, and waited for Polk to begin
the attack, waiting until after sunrise with increasing anxiety and
disappointment.  Bragg then sent a staff officer to Polk to ascertain
and report as to the cause of the delay, with orders urging him to
a prompt and speedy attack.  Polk was not found with his troops,
and the staff officer learning that he had spent the night on the
east side of Chickamauga Creek, rode over there and delivered his
message.  Bragg, impatient at the delay, proceeded in person to
his right wing and there found the troops wholly unprepared for
the movement.  Messengers were sent for Polk in hot haste, and on
his reporting he was urged to a prompt execution of his orders and
to make a vigorous attack at once.

During the night our troops threw up temporary breastworks of logs
and rails.  Behind these Thomas's command awaited the attack.  After
Bragg had sent for Polk, he ordered a reconnoissance in his front
on the extreme left of our line, and crossing the main road to
Chattanooga developed the fact that this position so greatly desired
by him was thus feebly held.  At half past eight o'clock the rebel
attack opened on our left with skirmish firing.  Pushing forward
with a heavy line of skirmishers to develop Baird's position, with
Breckenridge's division on the right and Cleburne to his left, the
rebels made, about an hour late, a tremendous assault.  Beatty's
brigade of Negley's division being now in line on Baird's left,
received the full force of the blow from the brigades of Adams and
Stovall on the right of Breckinridge's division, and was driven back
in disorder.  Helm's brigade and Cleburne's division, advancing on
the front of Baird, encountered the troops behind their breastworks
but were here met with a terrific fire of canister and musketry,
and their advance checked so thoroughly that it was not regarded
as safe to send the two brigades now overlapping Baird to attack
his rear.  These brigades, however, had reached and crossed the
La Fayette road.  Beatty in falling back was relieved by several
regiments of Johnson's division, which were placed in position by
Baird.  These regiments were joined by Van Derveer's brigade of
Brannan's division and a portion of Stanley's brigade of Negley's
division, which had been hurried to the left and thrown into action.
These forces advancing checked the assault of the enemy and then
drove him entirely from Baird's left and rear.  Immediately following
the attack on Baird, the enemy's assault, being taken up by the
divisions on Breckinridge's left, pressed on and struck Johnson, then
Palmer and Reynolds successively with equal fierceness, maintaining
the attack for two hours, the enemy in repeated assaults bringing
fresh troops constantly to the front was each time met and hurled
back by the splendid fighting of our troops.  Here Bragg exhausted
his utmost energies to drive in the centre and to dislodge Thomas's
right, and failing in this after repeated attacks fell back and
occupied his old position.

McCook, early in the morning, on going to the front found that Wood's
division, not having the battle-front of Negley's, did not occupy
the entire of the rude barricade thrown up by Negley's troops, and
that portion of it on Wood's right was not occupied by any of our
forces.  Wood, on meeting McCook, explained to him that his left
was well protected, resting on Brannan's right, and that his orders
were to keep well closed up on Brannan.  On the right of this gap
to the right of Wood, McCook had posted Wilder with his brigade,
who had been ordered to report to McCook and receive orders from
him.  McCook then directed Sheridan to bring forward one of his
brigades and occupy with it the space between Wood's right and
Wilder.  As McCook started to leave this portion of the line, he
met Davis's division marching toward this vacant space.  Davis was
directed at once to post one of his brigades in this part of the
line, holding the other in reserve.  When the brigade Sheridan
sent arrived, McCook placed it in column as support to Davis on his
right and rear.  At this time Thomas again reporting that he needed
reinforcements and the right as yet not being actively engaged,
Rosecrans concluded that Bragg's efforts were still looking to the
possession of the roads on our left, and that he was massing his
troops on his right, thus prolonging his line on that flank.  He
then, at 10.10 A.M., ordered McCook to withdraw as far as possible
the force on the right and reinforce Thomas, stating that "the left
must be held at all hazards, even if the right is withdrawn wholly
back to the present left."  Five minutes after the receipt of this
order McCook received one dated 10.30 A.M., directing him to send
two brigades of Sheridan's division at once with all possible
dispatch to support Thomas and to send the third brigade as soon
as it could safely be withdrawn.  McCook immediately sent Lytle's
and Walworth's brigades of Sheridan's division on the double quick
to the support of Thomas.

The battle increasing in fury and volume was gradually approaching
the centre from the left, but Thomas still sustaining the brunt of
the fight was compelled to send again and again for reinforcements.
Beatty's and Stanley's brigades of Negley's division had been sent
from the right.  Van Derveer with his brigade of Brannan's division
also reported.  Barnes's brigade of Van Cleve's division had also
been ordered to Thomas, and now the two of Sheridan's divisions
were under orders to proceed to the left.  About this time
Lieutenant-Colonel Von Schrader of Thomas's staff, who had been
riding the lines, reported to Thomas that there were no troops on
Reynolds's right, and a long gap existed between Reynolds and Wood;
not aware that Brannan's division although not in front line was
still in position, retired in the woods a short distance back, but
not out of line.  This information was at once sent by Thomas to
Rosecrans, who immediately directed Wood to close up the line on
Reynolds and support him, and sent word to Thomas that he would be
supported if it required all of McCook's and Crittenden's corps to
do so.

On receipt of this order--impossible for him to execute literally--Wood
undertook to carry it out by withdrawing his entire command from
the front, leaving a gap of two brigades in the line of battle,
moving to the rear past Brannan's division, to where Reynolds was
posted in line.  Into the gap thus made by Wood, Davis attempted
to throw sufficient force to hold that portion of the line thus
vacated, by posting his reserve brigade.

Just at this time the order of battle on the enemy's lines had
reached Longstreet's command, who, seeing this gap, ordered his
troops, formed in heavy columns, to advance.  Into this gap there
poured Stewart's, Hood's, Kershaw's, Johnson's, and Hindman's
divisions, dashing impetuously forward, with Preston's large division
as supports.  Our right, disabled as it was, was speedily turned,
the line of battle on the enemy's front extending nearly from
Brannan's centre to a point far to the right of the Widow Glenn's
house, and from the front of that portion of the line Sheridan's
brigades had just been taken.  McCook, to resist this fierce
assault, had only Carlin's and Heg's brigades of Davis's division
and Laibold's brigade of Sheridan's division.  On finding the rebel
troops pressing through the space vacated by Wood, McCook ordered
Lytle and Walworth to change front and return to assist in repelling
the enemy.  Wilder and Harrison closed in on Sheridan with their
commands as speedily as possible, and aided in resisting the enemy's
attack.  Davis, being overpowered by the immense numbers of the
rebels, was compelled to retire to save his command.  Laibold was
in turn driven back in confusion, and the tide of battle then struck
Lytle and Walworth, who contended nobly against the overpowering
columns, and for a time checked the advance of the enemy on their
immediate front.  The rebel troops swarming in, turned the left
of these brigades, and they were compelled to withdraw to escape
being surrounded.  At this point the gallant Lytle was killed.  Here
our army lost several thousand prisoners, forty guns, and a large
number of wagon-trains.

Once more the right of the army was broken all to pieces, and five
brigades of that wing cut off entirely from the rest of the command.
In the meantime Bragg, determined to turn Thomas's left, and cut
him off from Chattanooga, was making his preparations for a second
assault on his right in heavier force.  Bragg directed this movement
in person.  Extending his right by moving Breckinridge's division
beyond its former position, he ordered Walker's corps in line on
Breckinridge's left, and connected to Cleburne's right on the left
of Walker.  Bragg's plan was for Breckenridge to advance, wheeling
to the left, and thus envelop Thomas's exposed left flank, striking
it in the rear.  Breckinridge, advancing, was soon in position on
the Chattanooga road, partly in rear of Thomas.  But he was now
detached from the main body of the rebel troops engaged in the
movement, and, making a bold assault on the rear, he was here met
by the three reserve brigades under Van Deveer, Willich, and Grose,
and hurled in rout back on his original line.  On reaching it he
there found the other troops that had taken part in this charge, and
that they had been repulsed at every point by Baird's, Johnson's,
and Palmer's divisions.

Beatty, just prior to the repulse of the enemy on the left by Thomas,
applied in person to the latter for at least a brigade to support
him in the attack of the rebels he was then expecting.  Thomas sent
an aid to hurry Sheridan up.  This officer returned soon afterward,
and reported that he had encountered a heavy force of the enemy in
the rear of Reynolds's position, which was advancing slowly, with
a strong line of skirmishers thrown out; that he had met Harker, who,
with his brigade posted on a ridge a short distance to Reynolds's
rear, was watching this force approaching, and was of the opinion
that these troops were Sheridan's coming to Thomas's assistance.
Thomas then rode forward to determine the character of the advancing
troops, which he soon did, and ordered Harker to open fire upon them,
resisting their farther advance.  Thomas then selected the crest
of the commanding ridge, known as "Horseshoe Ridge," on which to
place Brannan's division in line, which--on Longstreet's sweeping
McCook's lines from the right--had been struck in the flank on the
line of battle.  On the spurs to the rear he posted his artillery.
On Thomas leaving Harker, the latter opening fire with skirmishers,
then posted his right to connect with Brannan's division and
portions of Beatty's and Stanley's brigades of Negley's division,
which had been ordered over to his point from the extreme left.
Thomas then went to the crest of the hill on the front, where he
met Wood with his division, who confirmed him in the opinion that
the troops advancing were those of the enemy.  Thomas was not
aware at that time of the extent of the disaster to the right.  He
ordered Wood to place his division in line with Brannan's, and to
resist as long as possible the advance of the enemy.  On receipt
of this order Wood immediately threw his troops on the left of
Brannan, and had barely time to form his lines when the enemy was
upon them in a heavy, fierce assault like those early in the day.
This, however, was handsomely repulsed, the enemy charging again
and again with fresh troops, but their efforts were successfully
resisted.  These were Bushrod Johnson's men, with Patton Anderson's
brigade on his right, which had been formed on the brow of the
secondary spur of the ridge, and at about two o'clock moved forward,
making a most determined assault on our forces.  Part of his line
reached the crest held by Wood, but was hurled back to its original
position under as determined a counter-charge.

Away off at Rossville Gordon Granger with three brigades of reserve
corps was stationed.  He had heard during the morning heavy firing
from the front, in the direction of Thomas, and as the firing
increased in volume and intensity on the right, he judged that the
enemy were pressing him hard.  He then determined, although contrary
to his orders, to gather what troops he could and go to Thomas's
assistance.  Ordering Whittaker's and Mitchell's brigades under
the immediate command of Steedman to move to his front, he placed
Dan McCook's brigade at the McAfee church, to cover the Ringgold
road.  Thomas was at this time heavily engaged on "Horseshoe
Ridge," between the La Fayette and the Dry Valley roads, about three
miles and a half from Granger's headquarters.  Pushing forward his
troops rapidly, Granger moved past a detachment of the enemy some
two miles out, and ordered Dan McCook forward to watch the movements
of the rebels, to keep open the La Fayette road, and to cover the
open fields on the right of the road intervening between this point
and Thomas's position.  McCook brought up his brigade as rapidly
as possible, took and held his position until late that night.
Granger moving to the front arrived with his command about three
o'clock, and reported at once to Thomas, who was then with this part
of his command on "Horseshoe Ridge," where the enemy was pressing
him hard on front and endeavoring to turn both of his flanks.  To
the right of this position was a ridge running east and west nearly
at right angles with it.  On this Bushrod Johnson had reformed his
command, so severely repulsed by Wood.  Longstreet now strengthened
it with Hindman's division and that of Kershaw, all under the
command of Hindman, who formed it in heavy columns for an attack
on the right flank and rear of Thomas's troops.  Kershaw's division
had possession of a gorge in this ridge through which his division
was moving in heavy masses, with the design of making an attack in
the rear.  This was the most critical hour of this eventful day.
Granger promptly ordered Whittaker and Mitchell to hurl themselves
against this threatening force.  Steedman gallantly seizing the
colors of a regiment, led his command to the charge.  Rushing upon
the enemy with loud cheers, after a terrific conflict, only of some
twenty minutes' duration, with a hot infantry and artillery fire,
Steedman drove them from their position and occupied both the
ridge and gorge.  Here the slaughter was frightful.  The victory
was won at a fearful cost, but the army was saved.  After Hindman
was driven back, Longstreet about four o'clock, determined to
re-take the ridge.  Asking Bragg for reinforcements from the right,
he was informed by him "that they had been beaten back so badly
that they could be of no service to me."  Longstreet then ordered
up his reserve division of fresh troops under Preston, four brigades
strong, supported by Stewart's corps, and directed him to attack
the troops on the ridge.  Advancing with wild yells, confident of
success, Preston dashed boldly up the hill, supported by Kershaw's
troops with Johnson's--part of Hindman's--and later on by those of
Stewart's.  But once more the enemy was driven back with frightful
slaughter, and thus was charge and counter-charge at this part of
the field, lasting for nearly two hours, the day wore away until
darkness settled down, night finding Thomas's command--the troops
under Brannan, Wood, and Granger--still holding the ridge.  Some
unauthorized person had ordered Thomas's ammunition train back
to Chattanooga, and the supply with the troops on the field was
running very low.  The ammunition that ranger brought up with him
was divided with the troops on that part of the field where his
command fought--Brannan's and Wood's divisions--but this supply
was soon exhausted.  The troops then gathered what could be found
in the cartridge-boxes of the slain, friend and foe being alike
examined.  With the fresh charges of the enemy, the troops were
ordered to use their bayonets and give the rebels cold steel, and
in the final charges the enemy was met and repulsed in this way.

In the breaking up of our right, two brigades of Davis's division,
one of Van Cleve's, and the entire of Sheridan's division was caught
in the whirl and sent adrift from the main command, the enemy in
heavy columns completely controlling all access to Thomas and the
remaining divisions with him, except by way of the Dry Valley road
across the ridge and on to Rossville, thence back on the La Fayette
road to Thomas's left.  The troops of Sheridan's and Davis's divisions
were rallied a short distance in the rear of the line, and taking
the Dry Valley road, endeavored to unite with Thomas's command.
They were placed in position on the Rossville road leading to
the battlefield.  [Note from Bob:  In fact, Sheridan continued to
withdraw his division away from the battlefield.]

Rosecrans was watching on the rear of Davis's right for McCook to
close up his line to the left when Longstreet's men poured through
the gap left by Wood's withdrawal.  Seeing that some disaster had
occurred, Rosecrans hurried in person to the extreme right, to
direct Sheridan's movements on the flank of the advancing rebels.
But it was simply impossible to stem the tide and our men were
driven back as the enemy advanced.  Leaving orders for the troops
to be rallied behind the ridges west of the Dry Valley road,
Rosecrans endeavored with Garfield, his chief of staff, and a few
others of his staff, to rejoin Thomas by passing to the rear of
the broken portions of the right.  Riding down in this direction,
some two or three hundred yards under a heavy fire, he found the
troops that had been driven from the right far over toward the left,
and from all indications it appeared doubtful if the left had been
able to maintain its position.  He then concluded to go to Rossville
and there determine whether to join Thomas on the battlefield
or whether his duty called him to Chattanooga, to prepare for his
broken army if his worst fears should be realized.  On reaching
Rossville it was determined that Garfield should go to the front
to Thomas and report, and that Rosecrans should go to Chattanooga
and make the necessary dispositions for the troops as they came
back in rout.

Rosecrans on arriving at Chattanooga at once sent out orders
to Thomas to assume command of all the troops at the front, and
with Crittenden and McCook to take a strong position and assume
a threatening attitude at Rossville, where ammunition and rations
would be sent to meet him.  Thomas determined to hold his position
until nightfall, if possible, before withdrawing.  He then distributed
ammunition to the commands and ordered the division commanders
to hold themselves in readiness to fall back as soon as ordered.
Reynolds at half-past five was notified to commence the movement.
Leaving the position he had held near Wood, Thomas started to meet
Reynolds and show him the position he wanted him to occupy, forming
the line covering the retirement of the troops on the La Fayette road
on the left.  Just before meeting Reynolds, Thomas was informed of
a large rebel force in the woods ahead of him, drawn up in line and
advancing toward him.  This was Liddell's division on the extreme
rebel right, under orders from Bragg, moving to a third attack on
Thomas's left.  Reynolds arriving at this time, Thomas ordered him
to at once change the head of the column to the left, form lines
perpendicular to the road and to charge the enemy then in his
immediate front, while the artillery opened a converging fire from
the right and left.  Turchin charged with his brigade upon the
rebel force and drove them in complete rout far beyond Baird's left.
Robinson's command--King's brigade--closely supporting Turchin, was
posted on the road leading through the ridge to hold the ground,
while the troops on our right and left retired.

Shortly after this Willich with his brigade was placed in position
on commanding ground to the right of the ridge road, and assisted in
covering the withdrawal of our troops.  Turchin's brigade, having
cleared the front, returned and took position on this road with
Robinson and Willich.

Thomas having made this disposition of the troops, ordered Wood,
Brannan, and Granger, to fall back from their positions.  These
troops were not molested, but Baird and Johnson as they were retiring
were attacked.  By the exercise of care and foresight they retired
without confusion and with but slight loss.  This attack was led
by L. E. Polk's brigade, but the rebel lines had become so changed
that they formed an acute angle and their troops were firing into
each other in the dark.  So quietly was the army withdrawn that it
was not until after sunrise on the 21st that Bragg discovered that
Thomas had retired.  Having effected the withdrawal of his troops,
General Thomas, accompanied by Granger and Garfield, proceeded to
Rossville and placed the command in position at that place, ordering
one brigade of Negley's division to hold the gap on the Ringgold
road with the other two brigades posted on the top of the ridge to
the right, joining on the brigades in the road, with Dan McCook's
brigade in reserve.  On the right of Negley Reynold's division took
position, reaching to the Dry Valley road, with Brannan's division
as a reserve in rear of Reynolds's right.  On the right of the Dry
Valley road, extending to the west, McCook's corps was placed, his
right extending to Chattanooga Creek.  Upon the high ground to
the left of the Ringgold road the entire of Crittenden's corps was
placed.  As a reserve Steedman's division of Granger's corps was
posted on his left, while Baird's division was also in reserve and
in support of the brigade of Negley's division holding the gap.
Thrown out on the Ringgold road, a mile and a half in advance of
the gap, Minty's brigade of cavalry held the road at that point
during the night.  Here the weary troops rested undisturbed the
night after the heavy fighting and nothing was seen of the enemy
until about nine o'clock of the 21st, when their advance appeared
in heavy force of infantry and cavalry on Minty's front.  Thomas,
withdrawing Minty through the gap, posted his command on our left
flank and directed him to throw out strong reconnoitering parties
across the ridge, watching the enemy's movements on our left and
front.  There was no object in attempting to hold the position
at Rossville Gap, beyond the gaining of a day to select the final
position for the troops at Chattanooga on their retirement to that
place, the location of the lines, and the preparation for throwing up
earthworks.  This was all accomplished on the 21st and preparations
made to fall back.  All wagons, ambulances, and surplus
artillery-carriages were sent to the rear before night and the
troops were held in readiness to move at a moment's notice.  The
orders to withdraw reached Thomas about six o'clock P.M., and the
movement commenced about nine P.M.

Brannan's division was posted at six P.M. on the road about half
way from Rossville to Chattanooga, covering the movement.  Orders
were sent by Thomas for each division commander to throw out a
strong skirmish line, to be withdrawn at daylight, concealing the
movement to the rear.  This line was to be supported by Baird's
division and Minty's brigade of cavalry, which was to retire after
the skirmishers were withdrawn.  During the night the movement was
completed without the loss of a single man, and at seven o'clock on
the morning of the 22d, the Army of the Cumberland, again united,
was in position, holding the coveted prize, still strong enough to
prevent the enemy from attempting further to dispute our possession
of the town.  The temporary works were strengthened from day to
day until all apprehension of an attack from the enemy on the front
was at an end.

Taking all the surroundings into consideration, the campaign from
the western slopes of the Cumberland Mountains, ending in the battle
of Chickamauga, was the most brilliant one of the war, made as it
was, in the face of the strong column of the enemy, whose business
it was to watch every movement, and as far as possible to retard
and cripple the advance.  Rosecrans, with his masterly manevering,
in every instance deceived his opponent down to the withdrawal
of Bragg from Chattanooga.  While recognizing the genius of the
military leader who could plan the campaign that was made from the
time of the crossing of the Cumberland Mountains, Bragg regarded
the obstacles to be overcome on such a campaign so stupendous that
he was incredulous that any movement south of the Tennessee was
contemplated by the Federal leader.  Every preparation was made by
Bragg to meet the crossing of our army over the Tennessee north of
Chattanooga on the advance of Crittenden, he threw open the gateway
for Rosecrans's advance.  When the full scope of the movement
dawned upon him, Bragg abandoned Chattanooga and gathered his troops
wherever he could reach them from all quarters to concentrate for
the destruction of our army.  Bragg never intended his withdrawal
from Chattanooga to be permanent; all the indications he left behind
him pointed that way.  None of the bridges were destroyed as he
retired.  All storehouses, hospitals, and other buildings used by
his army were left standing, and Rosecrans's mistake was in construing
Bragg's withdrawal to be a demoralized retreat and in ordering his
army to pursue before this was definitely determined.  However,
all advices that Rosecrans had were to the effect that the rebels
were in hasty flight and would not stop anywhere north of Dalton,
and that their probable destination was Rome.  This information
was sent to him from Washington, and Bragg aided in confirming this
belief by sending numbers of his soldiers as "deserters" into the
Federal lines with the same report.

As late as the 11th, Halleck telegraphed Rosecrans that after he
occupied "the mountain passes to the west of Dalton" it would be
determined what his future movements would be; and on the 13th,
Halleck telegraphed Rosecrans that if Bragg should go to Alabama
he must not be allowed to re-enter Middle Tennessee.  On the 13th,
Foster, at Fortress Monroe, telegraphed Halleck that trains of cars
had been running day and night southward for the past thirty-six
hours.  On the following day Foster sent Halleck another despatch,
that Longstreet's corps was reported going south, which Meade on the
same day confirmed.  Then Halleck sent urgent messages to Hurlbut
and Burnside to move to Rosecrans's support.  But it was too late.
These commands were many days' marches away, and at that moment
the Army of the Cumberland was engaged in the earlier movements of
the life and death struggle it was peremptorily ordered by Halleck
to encounter alone with its old enemy, under Bragg, heavily
re-enforced, while large numbers of Federal troops which might have
been within helping distance, had orders been given in due season,
as asked for by Rosecrans, remained inactive.

It was not until McCook had received and partly executed his orders
to occupy Alpine that the actual facts as to Bragg's movements
were developed, and that he was concentrated at La Fayette, there
waiting for reinforcements, but strong enough without them to
crush the Army of the Cumberland in detail.  Rosecrans, when aware
of Bragg's movements, grasped the situation at once.  Bending
every energy to the concentration of his army before Bragg should
strike, on the 12th he issued orders for McCook's immediate return,
and despatched the same in all haste by courier.  Hearing nothing
definite from McCook, on the next day Rosecrans repeated his orders
and duplicated them in the afternoon of that day.  Still learning
nothing positive as to McCook's movements, on the 14th repeated
orders were sent to him urging him to consummate his rearward movement
with all possible haste.  After a sleepless night, Rosecrans on
the 15th left Chattanooga for the front, to hasten, if possible,
McCook's movements.  After another sleepless night, information
was had from McCook as to the position of his command, and on the
17th the concentration of the army was effected in McLemore's Cove,
five days after McCook's first orders were dated.

The delay attending McCook's movements was almost fatal to the Army
of the Cumberland.  Had Bragg received his promised reinforcements
at the date he expected them, our army would in all probability
have been completely annihilated in detail.  McCook claims that his
delay was only incident to the route he was compelled to take to
join Thomas.  This took him back over Lookout Mountain, to Valley
Head, then down that valley, crossing the mountain again at Cooper's
Gap, and then up and down Missionary Ridge into McLemore's Cove, a
long, difficult road, nearly all of it over rough mountains.  This
route, McCook from the information received, regarded as the better
one to take, as between it and the one on which he was ordered to
move, which was a road on the mountain into the head of McLemore's
Cove, through Dougherty's Gap.

The battle for Chattanooga would never have been fought at Chickamauga
had not the safety of McCook's corps demanded it.  Could the Army
of the Cumberland have been withdrawn in safety to Chattanooga and
there concentrated behind earthworks, as it was later, while Bragg
doubtless would have made his attack there, yet the surroundings
would have been far more favorable for our army, especially as the
troops afterward sent might have reached Rosecrans in time to have
defeated Bragg, as he was later at the battle of Missionary Ridge.
But the reinforcements that were hurried from all points AFTER
the disaster, by the officials at Washington were not to benefit
Rosecrans.

While the battle of the 19th was severe at times, and some slight
advantages were gained by the enemy, still nothing had been
accomplished to mark that day's fighting as a great, distinctive
battle.  The delay on the part of Negley in reporting as ordered,
to Thomas on the left, placed that position in extreme peril, had
Polk made his attack as ordered at day-dawn on the 20th.  Fortunately,
Polk slept outside of his lines that night--not as he was accustomed
to--and was not awakened as early as he would have been had he
remained in camp.  For this reason the attack, was not made until
after Beatty's brigade had reached Baird's left.  While this was
too weak to successfully resist the attack, still with this command
rallied after it was driven back and aided by the troops sent to
its support, Thomas was able to repulse Breckinridge's first charge
of the morning.  The delay from six o'clock until after nine was
of great service to the Army of the Cumberland.  Negley's delay in
reporting at an early hour with his entire division was owing to
Wood's failure to relieve him.  Sheridan had at an earlier hour been
ordered to Negley's position on his front, but Thomas representing
the urgency of the movement, Crittenden was ordered to send Wood,
who was only a short distance from Negley.  Wood, on receiving his
orders to relieve Negley, simply moved forward and occupied the
position that had been vacated by Negley's reserve brigade, already
started for Thomas's left.  On Rosecrans's return from the extreme
right, he found that Negley had not yet reported to Thomas,
although more than an hour had elapsed since he was so ordered and
then discovered that Wood had failed to relieve him on the front.
Repeating his orders in such plain English that there could be no
further misapprehension of them, Rosecrans moved Wood's division
into position, relieved Negley at once, and started him in all haste
to Thomas.  Negley did not reach the left until after ten o'clock.
Rosecrans, impatient at the delay that occurred in the execution
of his order, expressed himself very forcibly to Wood, much to the
dissatisfaction of the latter.  After seeing Negley was at last en
route to Thomas, Rosecrans then went to the right and was watching
the movements of the troops when the word reached him of the supposed
gap to the right of Reynolds, on the left of Wood.  Rosecrans's
plan of battle being to keep his line well closed up on the left,
he directed an aid to send Wood an order to close up on Reynolds,
which he did as follows.


Headquarters of the Army of the Cumberland.

Brigadier-General Wood, Commanding Division:

The General Commanding directs that you close up on Reynolds as
fast as possible, and support him,

Respectfully, etc.,

FRANK S. BOND,
Major and Aid-de-Camp.


This order was written by an officer who had no military experience
prior to the war, and, as the order shows on its face, embraced much
more than the General Commanding intended it should.  The orderly
who carried this order to Wood reported on his return that "General
Wood on receipt of the order remarked that he 'was glad the order
was in writing, as it was a good thing to have for future reference.'
That he carefully took out his note-book, safely deposited the order
in it, and then proceeded to execute it."  Wood's official report
contains the order written out in full.  He says that it was eleven
o'clock when it reached him.  "General McCook was with me when
I received it.  I informed him that I would immediately carry it
into execution, and suggested to him that he should close up his
command rapidly on my right, to prevent the occurrence of a gap in
the line.  He said he would do so, and immediately rode away."

McCook says, in reference to the movement of Sheridan to the aid of
Thomas, which he had just ordered, "Simultaneously with this movement,
and much to my surprise, Wood's division left the position it had
in line of battle on Davis's left, marching by the left flank,
leaving a wide gap in the line."  Wood also says in his official
report that when he started to execute the order he met Thomas,
and told him of his order.  He says, "I exhibited my order to him,
and asked him whether he would take the responsibility of changing
it.  He replied he would, and I then informed him that I would move
my command to the support of General Baird."  The first mention
Thomas makes in his official report of seeing Wood is when in riding
"toward the crest of the hill," coming from the left, he met Wood
on the way, and directed him to take position on Brannan's right.
Later, he says, "About the time that Wood took up his position,
General Gordon Granger appeared," etc.  This was over three hours
after what General Wood styles "the disastrous event of the right"
occurred.  It seems strange, if Wood was properly executing an order
from the Commanding General, that he should try so hard to shield
his action by the authority of these two corps commanders, especially
when he was under the direct command of neither of them.

General Wood was a graduate of West Point, had been in the army all
his life, and knew the full meaning of all technical terms used to
describe military movements.  The order bore on its face a direction
to him to make a movement with his front in line of battle, and
at the same time to occupy a position in the rear of the division,
on which he was ordered to join his left in line on the immediate
battle-front.  He knew he could not execute the order literally as
given, and from the wording of it must have known that there was
some mistake about it.  Instead of sending a short distance to
the rear, or going himself to Rosecrans and finding out just what
was meant by the order, he chose to give it a meaning that it was
never intended to convey, and moved to the rear from the front of
battle, when he knew, as he says in his report, "although I had not
been seriously engaged at any time during the morning, I was well
satisfied the enemy was in considerable force in my immediate front."
Wood says in his official report, "Reynolds's division was posted
on the left of Brannan's division, which in turn was on the left
of the position I was just quitting;  I had consequently to pass
my command in the rear of Brannan's division to close up on and go
into the support of Reynolds."  If "Reynolds's, division was posted
on the left of Brannan's division," then there was no gap, and no
place for Wood to place his division as ordered, and he knew it.  He
could support Reynolds, but to do this he was compelled to disobey
the first part of his order, which IN ITS SPIRIT AND INTENT WAS TO
KEEP HIM ON THE LINE OF BATTLE, simply moving his division to the
left.  This space by his own official report he shows was occupied
by Brannan's division, and with this knowledge he undertook to
execute an order that directed him to make an impossible movement
rather than ask an explanation of it from his commanding officer.
No wonder he wanted to keep his order safe where he could produce
it if occasion required.  Wood, irritated at the reprimand of
Rosecrans earlier in the day, intent on maintaining his dignity,
chose rather to undertake to carry out an order in the execution
of which he felt safe, so long as he had it in writing and where
he could produce it if occasion demanded it, than to suspend its
execution long enough to ride a short distance to the rear, and find
out just what the order meant; AND TO THIS EXTENT HE IS RESPONSIBLE
for the great disaster which swept the right wing of the Army of
the Cumberland from the field of battle on the 20th.  That Wood
must have known that there was a mistake in regard to the order is
plain, from the fact that he himself says that his troops had not
been seriously engaged that morning.  It was hardly possible that
Reynolds's division, which was only a division front from his, could
be so hardly pressed as to need supports, and that his division
should "not be seriously engaged."  In fact, when Wood undertook
to carry out this order, he says he met Thomas and was told by him
that Reynolds did not need supports, and that he, Wood, "had better
move to the support of General Baird, posted on the extreme left,
who needed assistance," showing that the conflict had as yet not
reached down the line to Reynolds.  The spirit in which General
Wood fought the battle of Chickamauga is shown by the following
extract from his official report, where, in speaking of Garfield's
arrival on the battlefield later in the afternoon of the 20th, he
says, "After the disastrous event of the right, General Garfield
made his way back to the battlefield, showing thereby that the road
was open to all who might choose to follow it where duty called."
After Wood reported to Thomas there was no more splendid fighting
done on that field of terrific conflict on the 20th than was done
by Thomas J. Wood and his division.  To the last he aided Thomas
in holding Horseshoe Ridge, and was one of the last divisions to
retire.

In the tide that swept down the Dry Valley road, Rosecrans was caught
with the members of his staff.  He breasted this for a while, and
endeavored to join his left and centre under Thomas by a direct
route.  After riding along a short distance, under the heavy fire
of the rebels with both artillery and musketry, he discovered that
the road was effectually closed by the enemy in strong force.  He
then started over the ridge to the Dry Valley road, and made his
way as rapidly as possible through the swarming masses of broken
troops from the right of the battlefield to Rossville, with the
intention of joining Thomas from that place down the La Fayette
road if the left and centre were not also in rout, and on the road
to Chattanooga.  On reaching Rossville, Rosecrans and Garfield
halted in the midst of the driving masses of teamsters, stragglers,
and fugitives from Thomas's command, all striving in hot haste to
be among the first to reach Chattanooga.  Making inquiry of these
men as to the condition of affairs at the front, they were informed
"that the entire army was defeated, and in retreat to Chattanooga."
"That Rosecrans and Thomas were both killed, and that McCook and
Crittenden were prisoners."  Asking a small detachment of troops
the command they belonged to, Rosecrans was informed Negley's
division.  He then asked as to the whereabouts of Negley.  He was
informed that he was a short distance from Rossville, though some
distance from the battlefield, "rallying stragglers," and that the
entire division "was knocked all to pieces."  Knowing that one of
the last orders he had given on the battlefield was for Negley's
division to report to Thomas to take position on his extreme left,
Rosecrans was satisfied that if these soldiers reported truly the
left and centre were routed and that the whole army as a broken
mass would be back in Chattanooga very shortly.  At this time there
was a lull in the firing at the front.  Dismounting from their
horses, Rosecrans and Garfield placing their ears to the ground,
endeavored to determine from the sound as it reached them the truth
of the reported rout.  Hearing no artillery firing, and detecting
only what appeared to be a scattering fire of musketry, the conclusion
was forced on Rosecrans that his army was entirely broken.  His
information prior to the battle led him to believe that the rebels
outnumbered him two to one, and if this proved true, the disaster
in part could be accounted for.  Conferring with Garfield as to
what was the best thing to be done under the circumstances, Garfield
told him that if these reports were true that then his, Rosecrans's,
place was in Chattanooga, where he could receive and reorganize,
if possible, his army on its reaching that place.  That he, of all
persons, had more influence with the army, and if it was broken
that his duty was to go to that place and make such disposition of
the troops as might possibly save the army from complete destruction.
That he, Garfield, would ride to the front, try and find Thomas,
if alive, and would report immediately to Rosecrans at Chattanooga
as to the condition of affairs at the front.  Unfortunately, this
plan was carried out.  The reverse of this should have been done.
Rosecrans should at once have gone to the front, and by his
presence there aided, as he did at Stone's River, more than any
other thing to retrieve the fortunes of the day, and pluck victory
from disaster.  Had Rosecrans gone to the front, and discovered
from a personal observation the true condition of affairs, and
the spirit and morale of the troops there, the chances are that he
never would have ordered their retirement to Rossville the night
of the 20th.  That was the turning-point, and his hour had arrived.

On reaching Chattanooga, General Rosecrans rode up to Department
Headquarters there, and was helped from his horse into the house.
He had the appearance of one broken in spirit, and as if he were
bearing up as best he could under terrible blow, the full force and
effect of which he himself did not at that time clearly perceive
and only partly felt.  This was about four o'clock in the afternoon.
He had been in the saddle all day from before daylight, with nothing
to eat since then.  Rarely has mortal man been called on to undergo
the terrible mental strain that had been on him during the week
just past, of which for two nights in succession his anxiety for
McCook was so great as to prevent his sleeping.  During the past
week the peril of his army had weighed on him to the extent that
his nervous system was stretched to its utmost tension.  When he
saw the rout of his right, supposing that it extended to his entire
army, the blow was so strong that it staggered him.  A short time
after Rosecrans arrived, McCook and Crittenden, also caught in the
drift from the right, reached headquarters.  While seated in the
adjutant-general's office comparing notes with each other as to
the events of the day, Rosecrans received a despatch from Garfield,
who had reached the front.  Hastily reading it over he exclaimed,
"Thank God!" and read the despatch aloud.  In it Garfield announced
his safe arrival at the front, that he was then with Thomas, who had
seven divisions intact with a number of detachments, that Thomas
had just repulsed a heavy assault of the rebels, and felt confident
that he could successfully resist all attacks against his position.
Waving this over his head Rosecrans said, "This is good enough,
the day isn't lost yet."  Turning to McCook and Crittenden he said,
"Gentlemen, this is no place for you.  Go at once to your commands
at the front."  He then directed Wagner, in command of the post,
to take his entire brigade, stop the stragglers and all others
from the front on the edge of the town, and ordered rations and
ammunition for his troops to be at once sent out to meet them at
Rossville.

During the heavy fighting of the 20th, Thomas was the only general
officer on the field of rank above a division commander.  Learning
some time later in the day of the disaster on our right, he gathered
his troops together from all parts of the field to the position
selected by himself after the break on the right.  Here in a more
marked degree even then Stone's River, he displayed his great staying
qualities.  Posting his troops on the lines he designated, he, so
to speak, placed himself with his back against a rock and refused
to be driven from the field.  Here he stayed, despite the fierce
and prolonged assaults of the enemy, repulsing every attack.  And
when the sun went down he was still there.  Well was he called the
"Rock of Chickamauga," and trebly well for the army of the Cumberland
that George H. Thomas was in command of the left at that battle.
On the 20th, when the hour of supreme trial came and he was left
on the field with less than one half of the strength of the army
that the day before had been barely able to hold its own against the
rebel assaults, he formed his 25,000 troops on "Horseshoe Ridge,"
and successfully resisted for nearly six long hours the repeated
attacks of that same rebel army, largely re-enforced until it
numbered twice his command, when it was flushed with victory and
determined on his utter destruction.  There is nothing finer in
history than Thomas at Chickamauga.

All things considered, the battle of Chickamauga for the forces
engaged was the hardest fought and the bloodiest battle of the
Rebellion.  Hindman, who fought our right at Horseshoe Ridge, says
in his official report that he had "never known Federal troops to
fight so well," and that he "never saw Confederate soldiers fight
better."  The largest number of troops Rosecrans had of all arms on
the field during the two days' fighting was 55,000 effective men.
While the return of the Army of the Cumberland for September 20,
1863, shows 67,548 "present for duty equipped," still taking out the
troops guarding important points within the Department, the actual
force was reduced to the figure just given.  Of Gordon Granger's
nine brigades, only two were on the battlefield.  Wagner, of Wood's
division, was in Chattanooga, and Dan McCook was holding Rossville.
Post's brigade was guarding the wagon trains and was not in the
action.  Rosecrans's losses aggregated killed, 1,687; wounded, 9,394;
missing 5,255.  Total loss, 16,336.  Bragg during the battle, when
his entire five corps were engaged, had about 70,000 effective troops
in line.  Among Bragg's troops were large numbers of prisoners of
war captured at Vicksburg and Port Hudson, who had been falsely
declared by the rebel authorities as exchanged and released from
their parole, and in violation of the cartel were again placed in
battle.  His losses, in part estimated, were 2,673 killed, 16,274
wounded, and 2,003 missing, a total of 20,950.  A full report of
the rebel losses was never made.

To the enemy the results of the engagement proved a victory barren
of any lasting benefits, and produced no adequate results to the
immense drain on the resources of his army.  In a number of places
Bragg's official report shows that his army was so crippled that
he was not able to strengthen on portion of his line, when needed,
with troops from another part of the field, and after the conflict
was over his army was so cut up that it was impossible for him
to follow up his apparent success and secure possession of the
objective point of the campaign--Chattanooga.  This great gateway
of the mountains remaining in possession of the Army of the Cumberland,
after Bragg had paid the heavy price he did at Chickamauga, proves
that his battle was a victory only in name, and a careful examination
of the results and their cost will show how exceedingly small it
was to the enemy.





Chapter XIII.




The Siege of Chattanooga.


On taking position at Chattanooga, after the battle, the Army of
the Cumberland, between the rebel troops in front and the forces
of Nature in the rear, was practically in a state of siege.  The
lines around the town were held by our troops behind extensive
rifle-pits, strengthened with heavy earthworks covering all
approaches on the front.  Bragg's army moved up immediately, and
invested our lines, throwing up rifle-pits within a short distance
of those of our army.  To the rear of these Bragg threw up two other
lines of intrenchments and on the right of his command erected a
more permanent line of earthworks on the crest of Missionary Ridge,
massing however, the bulk of his troops in Chattanooga Valley
on our immediate front.  As our army retired within its works at
Chattanooga, the troops holding the road over Lookout Mountain were
withdrawn, and this point was immediately occupied by the enemy and
strengthened by extensive works, Bragg sending Longstreet's corps
into Lookout Valley to occupy the extreme left of the besieging
line, and to cut off all communication with Bridgeport, on the south
bank of the Tennessee River.  The lines were now fully occupied
from the river on the north to the bank south of the town, and the
rebel army in force on our front.  To the rear the only road that
was open was over Walling's Ridge, through Sequatchie Valley, down
to Bridgeport, a distance of sixty miles; the short road on the
north side down to Bridgeport being closed by the rebel batteries
and sharp-shooters, while their troops holding the road to the south
of the river compelled all supplies of every kind to be hauled over
these sixty miles of road.  To thus supply the army during good
weather was a very great undertaking, even with the teams of the
various commands in good condition, but with the rainy season that
soon set in, and the incessant hauling wearing out the mules, the
daily rations for the army were constantly growing less and less.
On October 1st, Wheeler crossing the Tennessee with Martin's and
Wharton's divisions of cavalry moved up the Sequatchie Valley upon
our line of supplies at Anderson cross-roads.  Here he captured a
large number of trains loaded with rations for the front, burned
over three hundred wagons, and killed a large number of animals.
Colonel E. M. McCook with his cavalry division, moving rapidly
from Bridgeport, overtook Wheeler on the 2d, and drove him with
great loss in a sabre charge from the trains, recapturing some
eight hundred mules.  After this Wheeler was driven from Shelbyville
on the 6th by Mitchell's cavalry, and on the 8th from Farmington
by Crook, and from here he re-crossed the Tennessee with a small
portion of his command, the rest having been killed or captured.
This loss in wagons, with the roads becoming almost impassable by
reason of the heavy rains and the growing weakness of the animals,
lessened daily the amount of supplies brought into the town,
so that our troops were suffering for food and were in danger of
being starved out of Chattanooga.  This was what Bragg was quietly
waiting for.  To supply an army some forty thousand strong, by
wagon transportation over rough mountain roads a distance of sixty
miles, Bragg knew was an impossibility, and that unless other lines
were opened up, the evacuation of the place was only a question of
time, and he could then walk in and take undisturbed possession.
As the forage became reduced, the artillery horses, for which there
was no immediate need, had their rations cut off, and they died in
large numbers, starved to death.  The supplies grew so small that
parts of crackers and corn dropped in handling packages were eagerly
seized and eaten to stay the demands of hunger, and still the pressure
was growing daily, and no one knew how it would ultimately end.
However, not for an instant was the idea entertained of abandoning
the town, to say nothing of the extreme hazard of attempting that,
in the face of the strong force of the enemy on our front.  The
Army of the Cumberland had won Chattanooga and there they proposed
remaining.

Immediately after the battle of Chickamauga, the authorities at
Washington sent hurried orders to Burnside, Hurlbut, and Sherman
to move forward without delay to Rosecrans's assistance, and
on September 24th the latter was informed that "Hooker, with some
fifteen thousand men," was en route from the East as fast as rails
could take him, and that he would be in Nashville in about seven
days.  While reinforcements were the thing needed before the battle,
now the pressing demand of the hour was the opening of the line of
communication to the rear, over which adequate supplies could be
forwarded to the troops at the front.  To add to the number of men
there simply increased the difficulties of the situation.

On the arrival of Hooker with the Eleventh and Twelfth Army Corps
at Nashville, Rosecrans directed him to take position on the line
of the Chattanooga Railroad, securing that road from the attacks
of the rebel cavalry while supplies were being accumulated at
Stevenson awaiting the opening of communication with the army at
Chattanooga.  Without driving back the entire of Bragg's army in
Lookout and Chattanooga Valleys, it was impossible to use the railroad
from Bridgeport east in bringing up supplies.  The wagon-trains
could no longer be depended on, and, under the spur of necessity,
Rosecrans was preparing a plan to utilize the river with boats.
A new one had been built at Bridgeport and another captured at
Chattanooga had been repaired.  By thus using the river he could
secure his supplies over a wagon-road of only eight miles from
Kelley's Ferry, via Brown's Ferry.  The course of the Tennessee
River at Chattanooga is due west; after passing the town it flows
south to the foot of Lookout Mountain, from which point it then
sweeps, after a short curve to the northwest, due north, forming
here what is known as "Moccasin Point."  Crossing the river at
the town, a road leads southwest across this point on to the other
side, where the river, as it sweeps north, is reached at Brown's
Ferry.  Shortly after passing Brown's Ferry, the river again makes
a sharp bend to the south, forming another point of land running
northwardly.  Across this point on the east bank, as the river passes
south, is Kelley's Ferry.  At the extreme angle of this bend the
river rushes through the mountains, which here crowd down closely,
forming a narrow channel through which the waters rush headlong.
This chasm is known as the "Suck."  The velocity of the water is so
great that steamers in high water cannot stem the current at this
point, which necessitated the landing of supplies at Kelley's Ferry,
and then hauling them over land across the bridge at Brown's Ferry
to Chattanooga.

Immediately after the battle, under orders from the War Department,
the Twentieth and Twenty-first Army Corps were consolidated and
designated the Fourth Army Corps and Gordon Granger was placed in
command.  McCook and Crittenden were relieved from the command of
these corps and ordered North to await a "Court of Inquiry," "upon
their conduct on September 19th and 20th."

By War Department order of October 16th, the Departments of the Ohio,
the Cumberland, and the Tennessee were constituted "The Military
Division of the Mississippi," under the command of Grant.  By the
same order Rosecrans was relieved of the command of the Department
and Army of the Cumberland, and Thomas was assigned to that command.
Halleck, in his report of operations for the year 1863, says this
change was made on the recommendation of General Grant.  These
orders were promulgated on the 19th.

On Rosecrans's return from a visit to Brown's Ferry and Williams's
Island on the 19th, where he had been with William F. Smith, his
chief engineer, making his plans for bringing supplies to that
point, he found the order awaiting him relieving him of his command.
Quietly making his preparations for his departure that night over
the mountains to Stevenson, he wrote out his farewell order, to
be printed and issued the next day, and, without even bidding his
staff good-bye, placed Thomas in command and started for his home
in Cincinnati.  Rosecrans, in the summer of 1862, was under Grant
at Iuka and Corinth.  Here some hasty criticism made by him brought
him into collision with Grant, which now bore fruit.

When it was known that Rosecrans had been relieved, and that he
had left the army for the north, there was universal regret that
the troops that had loved and trusted him should no longer follow
his skillful leadership.  Every soldier in his army felt that he
had a personal friend in "Old Rosy."  His troops never for a moment
faltered in their devotion to him or confidence in him.  They felt
that he had been made the victim of a foolish interpretation of an
order that brought ruin and disaster upon his army, for which he
was not responsible, but for which he was made to suffer.

General Rosecrans, to his subordinates, was one of the most genial
of men.  Kind and good-natured, he at times failed to act as
decisively as occasion required, deterred by the fact that, should
he do so, some of his subordinates would suffer.  His restless
activity led him to give attention to details that he should have
been entirely relieved of by his subordinates.  But no amount of
work daunted him.  He lived almost without rest and sleep, and would
wear out two sets of staff officers nightly, and then, if occasion
required it, be up and out before daylight.  To his superiors
he unfortunately allowed his high spirit to get the better of his
judgment, and many times when he was in the right he ruined his
position by his hasty temper.  His fame, despite his enemies--and
no general in the field had stronger nor more unscrupulous ones--as
the greatest strategist of the war, is permanently fixed in history.
What it might have been had he not been hampered, annoyed, and
insulted as no other commanding general was at any time by both the
Secretary of War and the General-in-Chief, is merely problematical.
Personally, he regarded all this as mere "incidents of the service,"
and strove to the best of his ability to do his whole duty to his
country.  His combination with Thomas--Rosecrans to plan brilliant
campaigns, with Thomas's great abilities to aid him in carrying
them out--made the Army of the Cumberland the great aggressive force
moving on the centre, gaining territory after each campaign.  But
it was as well for Rosecrans and the service that he was relieved
when he was, with the combination of the armies under Grant.  He
had faithfully performed his duty up to this time, but now the
surroundings were so changed that both for his sake and the good
of the service the change was a fitting one to be made.  Rosecrans
could never again serve as a subordinate, and as the change was
determined on, when Grant arrived it was as well for Rosecrans to
retire.

When Anderson in 1861 applied for George H. Thomas to be one of
the brigadier-generals to accompany him to Kentucky, to help him
in the task he was set to accomplish there, Mr. Lincoln told him
he was afraid to give the order for Thomas, as he was a Southerner,
and from Virginia.  Anderson and Sherman, who were present, both
responded in the strongest terms, vouching for Thomas's earnest
patriotism and deep devotion to the Union, and the order was given.
And now it bore full fruit.  The quiet, patient soldier, who from
his first day's service in Kentucky had never swerved a line from
the strict performance of his duty to his Government, according to
his oath, without reference to self, had now met his reward.  His
fame had steadily grown and rounded from the time he gained the
first Federal victory in the West, at Mill Springs, up to the battle
of Chickamauga, where he saved the Army of the Cumberland to the
nation.  He had always been the main stay of that army, holding the
command of the centre--either nominally or actually the second in
command.  Upon his judgment and military skill every commander of
that army depended, and no movement was made without his approbation.
Yet so modest was he that his face would color with blushes when
his troops cheered him, which they did at every opportunity; and
so diffident, that, prior to the battle of Chickamauga, he doubted
his ability to handle large bodies of troops upon the battlefield,
and for this reason refused to accept the command of that army,
just prior to Perryville, when tendered him.  His kind consideration
for the feelings of others was one of his marked characteristics.
With a pure mind and large heart, his noble soul made him one of
the greatest of Nature's noblemen--a true gentleman.  The experience
of Chickamauga ripened his powers and developed him to his full
height.  As the General who won the first victory in the West, who
saved an army by his skill and valor, and who was the only General
of the war on either side able to crush an army on the battlefield,
George H. Thomas, "the true soldier, the prudent and undaunted
commander, the modest and incorruptible patriot," stands as the model
American soldier, the grandest figure of the War of the Rebellion.

One of Grant's first acts on taking command was to telegraph Thomas
to hold Chattanooga at all hazards.  The commander who had seen his
troops on less than half rations for nearly a month, with steadily
approaching signs of starvation, hardly needed an intimation that
what had been gained by the sacrifice on Chickamauga's field was
not to be yielded up without a struggle.  Thomas replied "We will
hold the town till we starve."  On the 24th, Grant, in company
with Thomas and W. F. Smith, made a personal inspection across the
river of the situation, with reference to carrying out the plan
of Rosecrans for the opening of the road by Brown's Ferry, and
approving of it, Thomas was directed to proceed to execute it.
This plan required the greatest secrecy of movement, otherwise
Longstreet's entire command would resist the landing, and contemplated
the co-operation of Hooker's moving up from Bridgeport, holding the
road to Kelley's Ferry.  The latter was to meet a force sent from
the town down the river in pontoons under cover of night, which was
to seize the landing on the left bank of the river, driving back
the rebel pickets and fortifying their position, and then swinging
the bridge across the river.  Thomas says in his official report
of the battle of Wauhatchie, that "preliminary steps had already
been taken to execute this vitally important movement before the
command of the Department devolved on me."  Thomas on the 23d ordered
Hooker to concentrate the Eleventh Corps, and Geary's division of
the Twelfth Corps at Bridgeport and sent him instructions as to
his movements, and directed him to advance as soon as possible,
co-operating with the force from Chattanooga.  Hooker was also
ordered to move into Lookout Valley, and to protect the bridge when
laid from any attack by Longstreet in that direction.  Thomas also
sent two brigades under Palmer to co-operate with Hooker.  Palmer
moved across the river to Brown's Ferry, and then took the road
through Whitesides to Rankin's Ferry, establishing himself securely
at these points, protecting the river communication from attack from
the south.  Thomas placed W. F. Smith in charge of the expedition,
and detached Turchin's and Hazen's brigades, with three batteries
under Major John Mendenhall.  Smith was directed to organize a
picked force, armed from these brigades, to be divided into fifty
squads of twenty-four men each, under the command of an officer,
who were to float down the river in pontoons that night--a distance
by the bends of the river of some nine miles.  The boats were placed
under the charge of Colonel T. R. Stanley of the Eighteenth Ohio,
the bridge to be placed in position under direction of Captain P.
V. Fox, First Michigan Engineers.  The troops under Hazen were to
take the gorge and hills to the left, and Turchin was to extend from
the gorge down the river.  Turchin in command of the remainder of
the troops marched across Moccasin Point to the ferry, where they
were to cross in the same boats, supporting the troops already
landed, when the position was to be strongly fortified and held by
them until the arrival of Hooker.

At midnight the troops who were to take part in the expedition were
marched to the river and placed in the boats manned by crews with
oars, and on two flat boats.  The force that marched under Turchin
moved out under cover of dense woods over the point to the ferry,
where they remained in readiness to cover the landing of the troops
coming down the river.  The artillery accompanied this part of the
command and remained under cover.

At 3 o'clock A.M. of the 27th, the boats moved out into the stream
under cover of a slight fog.  On arriving at a point some two miles
below the town, these troops reached the rebel picket line posted
on the left bank of the river.  The boats passed on unobserved by
keeping close to the right hand shore until just at the landing,
when the troops in the first boat were greeted with a volley from
the rebel pickets, a station being at this landing.  In perfect
order, as previously planned, the troops hastily disembarked, moved
forward, occupying the crest of the hill immediately in front and
commenced the work of intrenching.  Before this was completed the
enemy, heavily re-enforced, just beyond the crest, moved forward
to drive Hazen back.  Here a stubborn little fight was had, the
rebels making a gallant charge with partial success on the right of
Hazen, when they were met with the remainder of the brigade under
Colonel Langdon, who charged at once on their lines and after a
short engagement drove them from the hill into the valley beyond.
Turchin's brigade having crossed the river was placed in position on
Hazen's right, when the enemy moved from the front up the valley.
The rebel force here was a thousand infantry, three pieces of
artillery, and a squadron of cavalry.

As soon as the last of the troops were over, work on the bridge
was commenced and finished at a little after four o'clock in the
afternoon.  For an hour or so in the morning the work progressed
under an artillery fire from the rebel batteries on Lookout Mountain.
Our losses were six killed, twenty-three wounded, and nine missing.
The rebels lost six men captured and six of their dead were buried
by our men.  Our forces captured twenty beeves, six pontoons and
some two thousand bushels of corn.  The bridge was completed and
the position held until the 28th, when Hooker's command arrived.  No
attempt was made by Bragg to dislodge this force or to destroy the
bridge.  Hooker moved on the road by the base of Raccoon Mountain
into Lookout Valley, driving the rebel pickets before him, and
occupied the roads to Kelley's and Brown's Ferries through the
valley.  Later in the afternoon of the 28th, as Hooker's troops
pushed down the valley, Howard's corps in the advance was met with a
sharp volley of musketry from a wooded ridge near the Wills Valley
Railroad.  Two brigades of Howard's command were deployed, and
advancing, drove the rebels from their cover with the loss of a
few of our men.  As the enemy retreated they burned the railroad
bridge over Lookout Creek.  Hooker then went into camp with Howard's
corps at six o'clock in the afternoon about a mile up the valley
from Brown's Ferry.  Here he learned of the movement to this place
and of the building of the bridge.

With the object of holding the road to Kelley's Ferry, Geary's
division was ordered to encamp near Wauhatchie, some three miles
up the valley from Howard's position.  This created two camps--the
latter holding the Brown Ferry road--each camp separate and picketed
by its own command, as the numbers of the troops would not admit
of communication being kept up between them or of their forming
one line.

About midnight a regiment that had been ordered by Howard to hold
the Chattanooga road across Lookout Creek, had a slight skirmish
with the advance of the enemy.  This was a portion of Longstreet's
corps getting into position for a night attack on the two encampments.
Dividing his command into two detachments, Longstreet, about an
hour later, with his strong one on his left, assaulted Geary's camp
with a fierce attack, driving in his pickets and then charging on
the main command.  Geary immediately formed his men in line, and for
three hours with heavy fighting maintained his position, although
enveloped on three sides by the enemy, repelling every attack, and
finally charged on the rebels and drove them from beyond his front.
The enemy here attacked in greatly superior numbers, and were only
defeated by the skill and coolness of Geary, aided by the bravery
of his troops.  As the sound of the heavy fire which the enemy
opened on Gary rolled down the valley, Hooker ordered Howard to
double-quick his nearest division, Schurz's, to Geary's assistance.
The division was started at once, but before it had proceeded
far it encountered the other detachments of Longstreet's command,
which opened on our troops with a volley of musketry.  Hooker now
determined that he had two fights on his hands.  At once detaching
Tyndale's brigade, Howard charged the rebel lines on the hill to
the left with it, pushing on the other brigade to Geary.  By this
time Steinwehr's division of Howard's corps had arrived on the
ground, and it was then discovered that the rebels were trying to
surround Howard's camp and that they occupied a hill to the rear
of Tyndale's brigade.  Hooker ordered Colonel Orland Smith with
his brigade to charge this hill, which he did up the steep side,
almost inaccessible by daylight, reached the rebel intrenchments
under a heavy fire and drove the troops with the bayonet, after a
severe engagement, in rout from the hill and capturing a number of
prisoners.  Here General Greene and Colonel Underwood were severely
wounded.  Tyndale also pressing forward occupied the rebel line in
his front and drove their forces beyond his lines.  The attack on
Howard was intended to hold that command from reinforcing Geary
until he was routed, and then in turn Howard was to be driven from
the field.

During the engagement the enemy opened with artillery fire in
the valley, aided by that from the batteries on Lookout Mountain,
sending the shells crashing among our troops.  Their forces in the
valley were repulsed in every charge and our troops occupied the
field at all points.  Our losses in the attack were 76 killed, 339
wounded, and 22 missing, making a total of 437.  The rebel loss is
unknown.  Geary buried 153 of the enemy on his front alone.  One
hundred prisoners were captured, with a large number of small arms.
Thomas congratulated Hooker's troops for the gallant repulse given
to their old enemy, Longstreet, and adds:  "The bayonet charge of
Howard's troops, made up the side of a steep and difficult hill
over two hundred feet high, completely routing the enemy from his
barricades on its top, and the repulse by Geary of greatly superior
number who attempted to surprise him, will rank among the most
distinguished feats of arms of this war."  Reinforcements were sent
Hooker by Thomas from Chattanooga of two brigades under Whittaker
and John G. Mitchell, but the fighting was over before they reached
the valley.

Work was now pushed rapidly forward on the road from Brown's to
Kelley's Ferry, and this being successfully accomplished by the 1st
of November, the forces of Nature were overcome and the siege of
Chattanooga was at an end as to them.  It now remained to raise it
on the front, driving Bragg from his strongholds, Lookout Mountain,
Chattanooga Valley, and Missionary Ridge.





Chapter XIV




Chattanooga, Lookout Mountain, and Missionary Ridge Battles.


These three detached actions, fought by different portions of our
troops, were parts of a series of operations for securing our front
and driving the enemy from his position, and are known properly as
the Battle of Chattanooga.  Grant, late in October, ordered Sherman
with the Fifteenth Army Corps to press forward to the Tennessee
River, cross at Bridgeport and push rapidly on to Chattanooga.
Early in November, learning that Bragg had weakened his forces on
our front by sending Longstreet's command into East Tennessee to
attack Burnside, Grant was very desirous of making an attack at once
on the rebel forces on Lookout and Missionary Ridge, but examining
the strong position occupied by Bragg at these points and the length
of his lines, Grant became convinced that to successfully operate
against the enemy it was necessary to wait until Sherman with
his command came up.  While this force moved eastward, Grant was
maturing his plans for the engagement.  He directed Sherman to report
in person, which he did on the 15th, and on consultation with him
and Thomas the general plan of battle was submitted to them.  The
main attack was to be made on the 21st at daylight, by Sherman's
troops, on the north end of Missionary Ridge.  To accomplish this
his command was to be re-enforced with one division of the Army
of the Cumberland under Jeff C. Davis.  Sherman's troops--four
divisions--were to move from Brown's Ferry through the woods to
the north of the town up to the Tennessee River, opposite the mouth
of Chickamauga Creek, where they were to cross on a pontoon bridge
to be swung there under the supervision of W. F. Smith, and the
crossing of the troops to be protected by batteries under Brannon,
Thomas's Chief of Artillery.  After crossing the river, Sherman
was to move rapidly forward, carrying the heights on the north end
of Missionary Ridge as far as the tunnel, if possible, before the
enemy could concentrate on his front, Thomas was to concentrate
all his troops in Chattanooga Valley on his left flank, leaving on
the necessary force to defend the fortifications on his right and
centre and to hold a movable column of one division to move wherever
needed.  This division was to make a show of threatening Bragg's
forces up the valley.  Thomas was then to effect a junction with
Sherman, co-operate with him, advancing his left and moving forward
as nearly simultaneously as possible, and support him.  Hooker on
the right in Lookout Valley, was to hold that position with Geary's
division and two brigades under Cruft from the Fourth Army Corps,
ordered to report to him.  Howard, on Friday, the 20th, was ordered
with his corps to take position on the north side of the Tennessee,
opposite Chattanooga, near the pontoon bridge, and hold himself in
readiness to move to Thomas's front or to co-operate with Sherman
as needed.  Colonel Eli Long with his brigade of cavalry was directed
to report by noon on Saturday, the 21st, at Chattanooga, to cover
Sherman's left flank, and if not further required by Sherman he was
then to cross the Chickamauga, make a raid on the enemy's line of
communication in the rear, doing as much damage as he could.

Sherman made his movement with his troops from Bridgeport though
Whitesides.  Sending his leading division under Ewing up Lookout
Valley, to make a feint on the left flank of the rebel army in
the direction of Trenton, he crossed his others at Brown's Ferry
and marched up the north bank of the river to the mouth of South
Chickamauga Creek.  Here they kept concealed in the woods from the
enemy until they were ready to effect their crossing.  Owing to
heavy rains and the state of the roads, Sherman was able to have
but one division, under John E. Smith, in position by the 21st and
Grant delayed his plans of battle to give him additional time.
Sherman on the 21st moved his second division under Morgan L.
Smith over the bridge at Brown's Ferry, and on the 23d, after many
repairs to the bridge, rendered necessary by the swollen stream
and the raft of logs sent down the river by the rebels, Ewing's
division also got safely across.  Sherman's fourth division under
Osterhaus was not able on the 23d to cross, and this division was
then ordered, in the event of not being able to cross by eight A.M.
the 24th, to report to Hooker on the south bank of the Tennessee.
Davis had reported with his division to Sherman, and on the 23d,
the boats of the pontoon bridge were used to effect a landing at
the mouth of South Chickamauga Creek by Giles A. Smith's brigade,
who captured the rebel pickets at this place, landed his entire
brigade, and then sent the boats back for additional troops.  By
daylight of the 24th, Sherman with two divisions of some 8,000
men was intrenched on the east bank of the Tennessee.  A pontoon
bridge, 1,350 feet long, was then built over this river, and another
over Chickamauga Creek under the direction of W. F. Smith.

Thomas, learning that Sherman's movements across Lookout Valley
had been discovered by Bragg, on Sunday, the 22d, directed Howard
to cross into Chattanooga to give Bragg the idea that these were
Sherman's troops coming to reinforce Chattanooga.  Howard made the
crossing on Sunday and took position in rear of our front line in
full view of the enemy.  On the 20th, Bragg notified Grant that it
would be well for him to withdraw all non-combatants from Chattanooga.
This the latter regarded as a cover for Bragg's withdrawal of
his own command, which he was confirmed in by deserters and spies
reporting a large number of Bragg's troops as marching to the north.
These were two divisions of Buckner's corps sent to strengthen
Longstreet in East Tennessee; that last sent, however, was recalled.
To determine the truth of these reports, early on the morning of
the 23d, Grant directed Thomas to develop the enemy's lines, driving
in his pickets, and determine if he still held his force on our
front.  Thomas ordered Granger in command of the Fourth Corps to
form with Sheridan's and Wood's divisions--Sheridan on the right,
Wood on the left--with his left extended nearly to Citico Creek,
and advance directly in front of Fort Wood, and make this movement.
Palmer, commanding the Fourteenth Corps with Baird's division
refused, was to support Granger's right and was to hold Johnson's
division under arms in the intrenchments in readiness to move as
occasion might require.  The troops were all in position at 2 P.M.
They moved out on the plain as if on parade, and in plain sight of
Bragg and his army on Lookout and Missionary Ridge, formed their
lines as if in review and moved forward to attack the enemy.
Rapidly advancing "in the most gallant style" our troops steadily
pushed in the rebel line.  They first struck the pickets, drove
these on the reserve and then sweeping everything before them they
hurled the rebels out of their first line of rifle-pits and sent
them on the full run in retreat to the rear, except over two hundred
of them captured.  Here Granger's troops made themselves secure by
throwing up temporary breastworks, while he sent a strong picket
line to the front to protect his new line.  In this charge Granger's
line secured "Orchard Knob" which was then occupied by Bridges'
battery.  Howard's corps was placed in position on the left of the
line to Granger's left and also ordered to throw up breastworks.

Sherman after crossing the river on the 23d, about 1 P.M., placed
his command in three columns, following in his advance the general
direction of Chickamauga Creek, with his left under Morgan L. Smith
resting on the creek.  His centre was under John E. Smith and his
right under Ewing, all under the command of Frank P. Blair, Corps
Commander.  In support of these, Davis's division also moved to
the attack.  Grant and Sherman had supposed that Missionary Ridge
was one prolonged even range.  When Sherman left the river he passed
over the foothills and then pressed up what he supposed was the
main portion of the ridge.  When he reached the top of this, after
a lively skirmish with the rebel pickets, he found a deep depression
intervening between this hill and the next, which was the one the
tunnel ran through, where the rebels were heavily intrenched, and
which he had been ordered to take.  On the top of this first hill,
finding he could not take the hill beyond where the tunnel ran
through, he threw up intrenchments and prepared to hold the ground
he had thus far gained.  Here about 4 P.M. he had a heavy engagement.
The enemy's advance with sharp artillery and musketry fire was
gallantly met and repulsed.  Sherman then made preparations for
the night, posting his command to hold all positions.  Howard had
reported with three regiments to him, as he crossed the bridge
which connected him with the main Army of the Cumberland.  Howard
leaving these troops with Sherman, then returned to his corps.
When his command was placed on the front to Granger's left in the
afternoon, he connected with Sherman's right.  Here Sherman rested
all night, and about midnight received orders from Grant to "attack
the enemy at dawn of day," "that General Thomas would attack in
force early in the day."

While the main attack was progressing under Sherman on the left,
Hooker on the right had been pressing the enemy.  On the 23d,
Osterhaus, finding that he could not cross the Tennessee in time
to engage in the movement with Sherman, reported with his division
to Hooker, who was then ordered to take these troops, with Geary's
division and Whittaker's and Grose's brigades of the First Division
of the Fourth Corps under Cruft, and make a strong demonstration on
the northern slope of Lookout Mountain, drawing Bragg's attention
to this point and away from Sherman while crossing the river and
getting into position.  Thomas instructed Hooker if he found he
was able to carry the enemy's position here, to do so.

At 4 A.M. of the 24th, Hooker reported his troops in readiness
to begin the movement.  As he advanced he found Lookout Creek so
swollen with recent rains that he could not cross without building
a temporary bridge at the main road.  He then sent Geary with two
divisions and Whitaker's brigade of Cruft's command up the creek
to effect a crossing at Wauhatchie.  Geary was then to sweep down
the right bank, driving the rebels before him.  The enemy, watching
the construction of the bridge under Hooker, failed to observe the
movement of the troops under Geary, by reason of a heavy mist which
overhung the mountain, until he was on their flank and threatening
their rear.  The enemy's force here and on the top of the mountain
was under Stevenson, with a command of six brigades posted mainly on
the Northern slope midway between the Palisades and the Tennessee
River, on a belt of cultivated land.  A continuous line of earthworks
had been constructed, with redoubts, redans, and pits, lower down
the slope, with reference to an assault from the direction of the
river.  On each flank were rifle-pits, epaulements for batteries,
walls of stone and abatis, as against attack from either Chattanooga
or Lookout Valley.  In these valleys were still more extensive
earthworks.

As Geary moved down on the right bank of the creek, he soon
encountered the enemy's pickets.  These gave the alarm at once,
when their troops formed in the breastworks and rifle-pits.  All
these positions were soon covered by artillery planted by Hooker's
orders.  He then sent Wood's brigade of Osterhaus's division about
eight hundred yards up the creek to build another bridge, and
directed Cruft to leave a small command at the first bridge, to
attract the attention of the enemy, and ordered the rest of Grose's
brigade to cross with Wood's.  This bridge was completed at 11
o'clock, when the troops under Wood and Grose crossed, and joined
Geary on the right bank, who had driven the enemy up to this point.
Under cover of the heavy artillery fire, the entire line advanced,
pressing the enemy steadily back.  At noon Geary's advance drove
the rebels around the peak of the mountain.  Here Geary was ordered
to halt and reform his command, but having the rebels on the run he
pressed forward and drove them in a fleeing, panic-stricken crowd.
Cobham's and Ireland's brigades on the high ground on the right,
near the Palisades, pressed on, rolling their line up on the flank,
closely supported by Whittaker's and Creighton's brigades.  The
enemy had been re-enforced, but he was not able to resist the sweep
of Hooker's troops as they rounded the crest of the mountain at
Craven's house, where the enemy made his last stand, and from here,
with his line all broken and in rout, he was driven over the rocks
and precipices into Chattanooga Valley.  At this time the mist that
had been hanging round the mountain all the day settled still lower
down.  It was now about 2 o'clock, and Hooker in the mist, unable
to see beyond his immediate front, placed his troops in position,
threw up temporary breastworks, with his line on the east side of
the mountain, the right resting at the Palisades and the left near
the mouth of Chattanooga Creek.  He then reported to Thomas, who
ordered Carlin with his brigade to report to him, when he was placed
on the extreme right, relieving Geary's troops.  During the night
the rebels opened a heavy fire on our right as if intending to break
our lines.  This was handsomely repulsed, Carlin's brigade taking
an active part.  Early in the morning, before daylight, several
parties were sent up the mountain, in anticipation of the retreat
of the enemy during the night, to scale the heights.  One from the
Eighth Kentucky was the first that reached the summit, and here at
sunrise the Stars and Stripes were unfurled at the extreme point
amid the cheers of the entire army.  During the night Stevenson
abandoned the top of the mountain, while the Summertown road
remained open, leaving his camp and garrison equipage.  This gave
to our army full possession and control of the river and railroad
up to Chattanooga.

The mist still clung to the mountain in heavy folds early on
the 25th, when Hooker was ordered to press forward on the road to
Rossville, carry the pass, and operate on Bragg's left and rear.
Advancing down the valley, he found the rebel pickets still holding
the right bank of Chattanooga Creek.  Arriving at the creek at about
ten o'clock he found the bridges on the Rossville road destroyed.
Here Hooker was delayed for some three hours, when Osterhaus in the
advance crossed the infantry on the stringers and pressed forward,
driving the enemy's pickets over to Rossville.  Hooker found the
rebels at this place loading up their stores.  Leaving a force on
their front, he sent Wood's brigade to take the ridge on the right,
and Williamson's on the left.  After a severe skirmish the enemy
hastily retreated, abandoning large quantities of stores, wagons,
and ambulances.  The gap now being under our control, Hooker ordered
the advance of our entire line, Osterhaus with his division on
the east of the ridge, Cruft on the ridge, and Geary in the valley
west of the ridge.  This line advancing soon encountered the rebels
under Stewart, occupying the line of breastworks thrown up by our
troops after Chickamauga.  Cruft charged on them, drove them in
all directions out of these works in full retreat.  Part of them
ran into Osterhaus's men and were captured.  Others were captured
by Geary in the valley.  The mass of them fell back to their second
line, from which they were likewise speedily driven, when the fight
became a running one, continuing until sunset.  Part of the enemy
in their endeavors to escape ran into Johnson's division of the
Fourteenth Corps, thrown forward to join the pursuit, and were
captured.  Hooker's command then went into camp.

Early on the morning of the 25th Sherman made his disposition for
his main attack.  Holding his centre with three brigades, he was
then to move along the east and west base of Missionary Ridge with
his right and left flanks.  Corse advancing from the right centre
moved forward, supported by Lightburn on the left and Morgan L.
Smith on his right, and occupied a crest in the woods about eighty
yards from the intrenched line of the enemy.  From this point Corse
assaulted the main rebel line, and for over an hour maintained a
heavy contest, driving the enemy and at times being driven back,
but still holding his crest as first secured.  Here Corse, Loomis,
and Morgan L. Smith fought the rebels under Hardee with Cleburne's,
Gist's, Cheatham's, and Stevenson's divisions in a stubborn struggle
all day up to three o'clock, holding their own, but making little
headway.  About two o'clock John E. Smith's two brigades, while
moving to the support of Ewing, were driven in some disorder by a
charge of the enemy, heavily massed.  They were quickly reformed
and, aided by Corse's troops taking the rebels in the flank with
a hot musketry fire, the enemy was soon driven back into his line
of works.

Here Sherman was fighting the heavy column of the enemy on our
left, and the main part of the battle had been his share.  Grant
was waiting for Hooker to reach the rebel left at Rossville, in the
hope that this would afford some relief to the stubborn fighting
Sherman had encountered.  Finding that Hooker had been delayed
by the destruction of the bridge longer than was anticipated, and
that the diversion was not to come from that quarter, Grant ordered
Thomas to move out the four divisions constituting the centre--Baird
on the left, then Wood with Sheridan on his right, and Johnson on
the extreme right of the line--with a double line of skirmishers to
the front, supported by  the entire force, press forward to carry
the first line of rifle-pits and there halt and await orders, the
movement to commence at three o'clock, at a signal of six guns
fired in rapid succession from Orchard Knob.

There was some little delay attending the preliminaries of
the movement, and it was not until after half-past three that the
commands having moved out and taken the alignment were in position
for the advance, when the guns sounded one, two, three, four, five,
six.  With this the troops, impatient all the day with being kept
in the breastworks while Sherman's men were hard at work, eagerly
pressed onward, divisions, brigades, and regiments striving each
with the other for the advance.  With the first movement Bragg at
once hurried reinforcements from his right and left to strengthen
his troops in his works to resist the advance on his centre.
Here his line was under the command of Breckinridge, who had his
own division under Lewis, Stewart's division, and part of those of
Buckner and Hindman under Patton Anderson.  The enemy had originally
four lines of breastworks.  The first one on our front was captured
by Thomas on the 23d, when Orchard Knob was taken.  This left three
lines of rifle-pits remaining.  The second one was about half a
mile to the rear of the first, near the foot of the ridge.  From
here to the top was a steep ascent of some five hundred yards,
covered with large rocks and fallen timber.  About half way up the
ridge a small line of works had been thrown up.  On the crest of
the hill Bragg's men had constructed their heaviest breastworks,
protected on our front by some fifty pieces of artillery in position.
As our troops advanced, each command cheering and answering back
the cheer of the others, the men broke into a double-quick, all
striving to be the first to reach the rifle-pits at the foot of
the ridge, held by a strong line of the enemy's troops.  The rebels
opened fire with shot and shell from their batteries, as our troops
advanced, changing it soon to grape and canister, which with the
fire from the infantry made it terrifically hot.  Dashing through
this over the open plain, the soldiers of the Army of the Cumberland
swept on, driving the enemy's skirmishers, charging down on the
line of works at the foot of the ridge, capturing it at the point
of the bayonet, and routing the rebels, sending them at full speed
up the ridge, killing and capturing them in large numbers.  These
rifle-pits were reached nearly simultaneously by the several
commands, when the troops, in compliance with their instructions,
laid down at the foot of the ridge awaiting further orders.  Here
they were under a hot, plunging, galling fire from the enemy in
their works on the crest of the ridge.  Without further waiting,
and under no orders from their officers, first one regiment, then
another started with its colors up the ascent, until with loud
hurrahs the entire line, cheered by their officers, advanced over
and around rocks, under and through the fallen timber, charged up
the ridge, each determined to reach the summit first.  The centre
part of Sheridan's division reached the top first, as they were
the nearest to the crest, and crossed it to the right of Bragg's
headquarters.  The rest of the line was soon up, and almost
simultaneously the ridge was carried in six places.  Here the
enemy making a fight for a short time was routed from the last of
his lines, and his centre, panic-stricken, broke in full retreat.
Regiments were captured almost entire, battery after battery along
the ridge was taken.  In some cases the rebels were bayoneted
at their guns, and the cannon that but a moment before was firing
on our troops, were by them captured, turned, and used against
the rebels as they were driven in masses to the rear.  The charge
occupied about one hour from the time of the firing of the guns
on Orchard Knob until the troops occupied the rebel lines on the
ridge.  Sheridan's division reached the ridge a few minutes too
late to capture Bragg, Breckinridge, and a number of the rebel
generals, who left Bragg's headquarters on the charge of our men
up the ridge.

Sheridan advanced with his division, skirmishing with the enemy's
rear-guard, but driving them steadily for about a mile on the
Chickamauga station road.  Here this road runs over a high ridge
on which the enemy had posted eight pieces of artillery supported
by a strong force to cover their retreat.  At this point Sheridan,
with Harker's and Wagner's brigades, had an engagement with these
troops, but after a movement flanking the rebel's right and left,
they hurriedly retreated, leaving two pieces of artillery and a
large number of wagons.  After this ridge was captured, Sheridan's
troops went into bivouac.  During the night the full moon flooded
the surrounding country with its bright light.  At midnight, on
Granger's suggestion, Sheridan in the advance was again ordered with
his division to press the enemy.  He at once advanced his command
to Chickamauga Creek, capturing a large number of prisoners and
quantities of material and stores.

Wood, on reaching the top of the ridge, with Baird on his left,
met with heavy opposition.  The enemy was supported by a division
from Hardee on the right, advancing just as Baird was getting into
position.  Here these two divisions were engaged in a sharp contest
until after dark.  Turchin, with his brigade, which was the left
wing of Baird, had taken possession of a small work constructed
by the enemy on the ridge when he was attacked by the rebels in a
most furious charge, but gallantly repulsed them, when they drew
off in the direction of Tunnel Hill.  Missionary Ridge was now
entirely within our control, with the exception of the point, where
Sherman's advance had been so stoutly resisted.  During the night,
Bragg drew off Hardee's troops from the front of Sherman, where
the latter at once placed his command in position for the pursuit
the next day.

During the night of the 25th, Thomas was directed to send Granger
with his corps, and additional troops to make his command up to
20,000, to march to Burnside's relief at Knoxville, and the other
portion of Thomas's command with Sherman's troops to pursue the
enemy on the 26th.  The latter, on the morning of that day advanced
by the road through Chickamauga Station, while Thomas ordered the
command under Hooker and Palmer to push on by way of the Greysville
and Ringgold road.  At the former place the rearguard of the rebels
was surprised after night, and three cannon and a large number of
prisoners captured.  On the next day another piece of artillery
was captured at Greysville, and later in the day Hooker's advance
again struck the enemy, strongly posted in a pass in Taylor's
Ridge.  Here, after a heavy fight of over an hour, they were driven
from the pass with considerable loss on both sides.  The pursuit
was discontinued on the 28th.  Hooker remained for a few days at
Ringgold, while Palmer returned to his camp at Chattanooga.

Sherman's troops, with Davis's division in the advance, pressed
through Chickamauga Station, and at about dark struck the rear of
the enemy's column, and had a sharp fight.  After leaving Greysville,
Sherman turned his command to the left, to strike the railroad
between Dalton and Cleveland.  Howard was sent to destroy this road,
which he did in a most thorough manner.  On the following day the
Fifteenth Corps destroyed the Atlanta Railroad from below Greysville
back to the State line.  On the 18th, Sherman was ordered to make a
reconnoissance to the Hiawassee with his own corps, together with
Davis's and Howard's troops of Thomas's command.  On reaching
Charleston, Sherman received orders to take command of Granger's
column, moving to Burnside's relief, and to press forward with all
the troops under him in all haste to Knoxville, eighty-four miles
distant.  Advancing rapidly with his command, Sherman reached
Knoxville on the 6th.  Longstreet, however, retreated on the 4th of
December to Virginia.  Leaving Granger's corps to aid in the pursuit
of Longstreet, Sherman by easy marches returned to Chattanooga on
the 16th of the month, where he ordered Howard and Davis to report
with their commands, while he marched west with his own corps to
Northern Alabama and placed them in winter quarters.

Sherman with his two days' fighting reports the losses of his
command, including Howard's command, but not that of Davis, whose
loss he says was small, at 295 killed, 1,402 wounded, and 292
missing--making a total of 1,989.  This, however, includes the losses
in his first division--Osterhaus's, which fought under Hooker on
the right--of 87 killed, 344 wounded, and 66 missing, making 497
to be deducted, which leaves Sherman's loss proper, 208 killed,
1,058 wounded, and 226 missing--a total of 1,492.  Thomas's loss
in the part taken by his troops, also including Howard's command
and not including Davis's division, was 529 killed, 2,281 wounded,
and 141 missing--an aggregate of 3,951.  The large bulk of the
losses under Thomas were in Sheridan's and Wood's divisions.  That
of the former was 135 killed, 1,151 wounded, missing, none--aggregate
1,256; that of the latter, 150 killed, 851 wounded, missing,
none--aggregate 1,001.  These two divisions in their one hour's
work storming Missionary Ridge met with  a loss of 2,287 men,
showing hot work.  There was captured by the Army of the Cumberland
40 pieces of artillery, 58 artillery carriages and caissons, 6,175
stand of small arms, principally English Enfield, and 5,471 prisoners.

During the winter there were nothing but minor movements of the
troops.  The railroads up to Chattanooga were repaired, and the
first "cracker train" that entered the place was greeted with many
hearty cheers by our troops in the town, as the shrill scream of
its whistle woke the echoes among the surrounding mountains, so long
silent to this music.  The roads into and through East Tennessee
were repaired to Knoxville and beyond.

In the early spring the organization of the Army of the Cumberland
was changed by Granger being relieved of the command of the Fourth
Corps, when Howard was assigned to that command.  Palmer was
retained in command of the Fourteenth Corps, and the Eleventh and
Twelfth Corps were consolidated into the Twentieth Corps, with
Hooker in command.  The cavalry was organized in four divisions,
under the command of W. L. Elliott.  The army in the field consisted
of 60,773 effective men.

General Thomas ordered the Fourth Corps to Cleveland.  The Fourteenth
Corps in front of Chattanooga was well thrown forward toward the
enemy's front at Dalton, preparatory to the spring campaign in
Atlanta, under General Sherman.  The Twentieth Corps was stationed
in Lookout Valley.

In the general engagement Grant's plan of battle had been for Sherman
with five divisions to make the main attack, sweep everything before
him down the ridge, and when he had the rebels in full retreat,
the Army of the Cumberland was then to aid in the pursuit, after
patiently waiting until the fighting was over.  Hooker, under Grant's
original plan, was to simply hold Lookout Valley secure, and when
the enemy was driven by Sherman, he too was to join in the pursuit.
All the fighting of the battle was to be done by Sherman and all the
glory thereof was to be his.  In Sherman's memoirs we are favored
with Grant's views of the Army of the Cumberland when Sherman first
reported in person to Grant at Chattanooga, to learn of his plan
and the part he, Sherman, was to take.  Sherman says that Grant told
him "that the men of Thomas's army had been so demoralized by the
battle of Chickamauga that he feared they could not be got out
of their trenches to assume the offensive," and that "the Army of
the Cumberland had so long been in the trenches that he wanted my
troops to hurry up to take the offensive FIRST, after which he had
no doubt the Cumberland Army would fight well."  So, under Grant's
plan, the Army of the Cumberland was to stand by and be taught
a grand object lesson how to fight, as given by Sherman.  During
the course of the engagement the plan was modified twice.  Under
the original plan, Sherman was to make a demonstration up Lookout
Valley, in the expectation that Bragg would strengthen his left at
the expense of his right, thereby making Sherman's part of the plan
so much the lighter as the line on his battle front was weakened.
To carry this out Hugh Ewing's division was sent to Trenton, but
this accomplished nothing.  Grant fearing that Bragg's right might
be too strong for Sherman to give his lesson to the Army of the
Cumberland properly, finding Osterhaus's division cut off from
Sherman, ordered it to report to Hooker, who was directed to take
it and Geary's division with Cruft's division of the Fourth Corps
and make a demonstration on the rebel left at Lookout Mountain,
to attract the attention of Bragg while Sherman was getting into
position to take "the end of Missionary Ridge as far as the tunnel."
Hooker, on the day previous, learning that Howard's corps was going
into Chattanooga, and probably into the fight, asked to be allowed
his right to be with his troops under fire.  Under his original
order he was simply to hold Lookout Valley, which he did not relish
if part of his command should engage the enemy.  When his orders
came to "make a demonstration" he determined he would take Lookout
Mountain and drive Bragg's left out of his works.  With less than
ten thousand troops, over two-thirds of whom were the Army of the
Cumberland, Hooker fought his "Battle above the Clouds," that will
last in history forever, and grow in fancy and song as the years
roll on.  Hooker took Lookout Mountain and drove the rebel left
to Rossville, over five miles, before Sherman reached the tunnel.
He made Sherman's task none the easier, however, because Bragg then
threw the two divisions Hooker had whipped upon Sherman's front.

Then, when Sherman had been fighting for nearly two days, and had
failed to make the headway Grant's plan contemplated, the plan
underwent another modification.  On the 25th, Grant ordered Thomas
to move out his troops from the centre, to make another "demonstration"
in Sherman's behalf, so he could take the tunnel in accordance with
the original plan.  Thomas was ordered to take the first line of
rifle-pits and hold his command there, while Bragg was expected
to draw off part of his troops from Sherman's front and strengthen
his line in front of the "demonstration."  Thomas's orders to his
corps and division generals were given in accordance with Grant's
instructions, and as the orders reached the brigade and regimental
commanders, as far as the officers were concerned the movement was
only to be a "demonstration."  When the troops reached the rebel
line, captured it, and then found themselves under the heavy fire
from the enemy's lines on the heights above, without orders, and
even against orders, the soldiers of the Army of the Cumberland,
who were "so demoralized that they would not fight," pressed up
the face of the ridge under the deadly musketry fire that greeted
them, with cannon in front, to the right and the left, raking with
converging fire, and won for General Grant the battle of Missionary
Ridge, driving Bragg away from Sherman's front and thus enabling him
to take the tunnel as ordered.  Whenever the victory of Missionary
Ridge shall be narrated on history's page, this gallant charge of
the brave men of Wood's and Sheridan's divisions, with those of Baird
and Johnson on their left and right, will always be the prominent
feature of the engagement as told in the coming years, and will be
the last to lose its glory and renown.

No wonder that General Grant failed to appreciate this movement at
the time, not understanding the troops who had it in charge.  When
he found these commands ascending the ridge to capture it when he
ordered a "demonstration" to be made to the foot of the hill and
there to wait, he turned sharply to General Thomas and asked, "By
whose orders are those troops going up the hill?"  General Thomas,
taking in the situation at once, suggested that it was probably
their own.  General Grant remarked that "it was all right if it
turned out all right," and added, "if not, some one would suffer."
But it turned out "all right," and Grant in his official report
compliments the troops for "following closely the retreating enemy
without further orders."  General Thomas, in his official report,
after narrating the events of the 23d 24th, and 25th of November,
quietly says:  "It will be seen by the above report that the original
plan of operations was somewhat modified to meet and take the best
advantage of emergencies which necessitated material modifications
of that plan.  It is believed, however, that the original plan had
it been carried out could not possibly have led to more successful
results."





Appendix A.




Organization of the Fourteenth Army Corps, Dept. of the Cumberland.

Major-General W. S. Rosecrans, Commanding.

December 20, 1862.

CENTRE.

Major-General Geo. H. Thomas.


First Division.

Brigadier-General S. S. Fry.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. M. B. Walker, 82d Ind., 12th Ky., 17th O.,
31st O., 38th O.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. J. M. Harlan, 10th Ind.,
74th Ind., 4th Ky., 10th Ky., 14th O.  THIRD BRIGADE.--Brig.-General
J. B. Steedman, 87th Ind., 2d Minn., 9th O., 35th O., 18th U.S.
ARTILLERY.--4th Mich. Battery, 1st O. Battery "C.," 4th U.S. Battery
"L"

Third Division.

Brigadier-General L. H. Rousseau.

NINTH BRIGADE.--Col. B. F. Scribner, 38th Ind., 2d O., 33d O., 94th
O., 10th Wis.  SEVENTEENTH BRIGADE.--Col. J. G. Jones, 42d Ind.,
88th Ind., 15th Ky., 3d O., 10th O.  TWENTY-EIGHTH BRIGADE.--Col.
H. A. Hambright, 24th Ill., 79th Penn., 1st Wis., 21st Wis.
ARTILLERY.--4th Ind. Battery, 5th Ind. Battery, 1st Ky., 1st Mich.
Battery "A."  CAVALRY.--2d Ky. (Battalion), 11th Ky. (Detachment),
4th Ind. (Detachment).

Eighth Division.

Brigadier-General J. S. Negley.

SEVENTH BRIGADE.--Col. John F. Miller, 37th Ind., 78th Penn., 21st
O., 74th O., Independent Battalion, Capt. Casey.  TWENTY-NINTH
BRIGADE.--Col. T. R. Stanley, 19th Ill., 11th Mich., 18th O., 69th
O.  ARTILLERY.--1st Ky. Battery "B.," 1st O. Battery "G.," 1st O.
Battery "M."  CAVALRY.--7th Penn., 1st Tenn.

Seventh Division.

Brigadier-General J. M. Palmer.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. G. W. Roberts, 22d Ill., 27th Ill., 42d Ill.,
51st Ill.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Brig.-General J. D. Morgan, 10th Ill.,
16th Ill., 60th Ill., 10th Mich., 14th Mich.  ARTILLERY.--1st Ill.
Battery "C.," 10th Wis. Battery.  CAVALRY.--7th Ill. Co. "C."

Twelfth Division.

Brigadier-General E. Dumont.

FORTIETH BRIGADE.--Col. A. O. Miller, 98th Ill., 72d Ind., 75th
Ind.  --- BRIGADE.--Gen. W. T. Ward, 102d Ill., 105th Ill., 70th
Ind., 79th O.  ARTILLERY.--18th Ind. Battery.  CAVALRY.--4th Ind.
(Detachment), 7th Ky., 11 Ky. (Detachment).


RIGHT WING.

Major-General A. McD. McCook.


Second Division.

Brigadier-General J. W. Sill.

FOURTH BRIGADE.--Col. Buckley, 6th Ind., 5th Ky., 1st O., 93d O.,
18th U.S., 19th U.S.  FIFTH BRIGADE.--Col. E. N. Kirk, 34th Ill.,
79th Ill., 29th Ind., 30th Ind., 77th Penn.  SIXTH BRIGADE.--Brig.-General
Willich, 89th Ill., 32d Ind., 39th Ind., 15th O., 49th O.
ARTILLERY.--1st O. Battery "A.," 1st O. Battery "E.," 5th U.S.
Battery "L."  CAVALRY.--2d Ky. (2 Cos).

Ninth Division.

Brigadier-General J. C. Davis.

THIRTIETH BRIGADE.*--59th Ill., 74th Ill., 75th Ill., 22nd Ind.
THIRTY-FIRST BRIGADE.*--21st Ill., 38th Ill., 101st O., 15th Wis.
THIRTY-SECOND BRIGADE.*--25th Ill., 35th Ill., 81st Ind., 8th Kan.
ARTILLERY.--2d Minn. Battery, 5th Wis. Battery, 8th Wis. Battery.

Eleventh Division.

Brigadier-General P. H. Sheridan.

THIRTY-FIFTH BRIGADE.--Col. F. Schaefer, 44th Ill., 72d Ill., 2d
Mo., 15th Mo.  THIRTY-SIXTH BRIGADE.--Col. Moore, 85th Ill., 86th
Ill., 125th Ill., 52d O.  THIRTY-SEVENTH BRIGADE.--Col. N. Grensel,
36th Ill., 88th Ill., 21st Mich., 24th Wis.  ARTILLERY.--2d Ill.
Battery "I.," 1st Mo. Battery "G."  CAVALRY.--2d Ky. Co. "L."


LEFT WING.

Major-General T. L. Crittenden.


Fourth Division.

Brigadier-General W. S. Smith.

TENTH BRIGADE.--Col W. Grose, 84th Ill., 36th Ind., 23d Ky., 6th
O., 24th O.  NINETEENTH BRIGADE.--Col. W. B. Hazen, 110th Ill.,
9th Ind., 6th Ky., 41st O.  TWENTY-SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. Enyart,
31st Ind., 1st Ky., 2d Ky., 20th Ky., 90th O.  ARTILLERY.+--Capt.
Standart.

Fifth Division.

Brigadier-General H. P. Van Cleve.

ELEVENTH BRIGADE.--Col. Sam'l Beatty, 79th Ind., 9th Ky., 19th O.,
59th O.  FOURTEENTH BRIGADE.--Col. J. P. Fyffe, 44th Ind., 86th
Ind., 11th Ky., 18th O.  TWENTY-THIRD BRIGADE.--Col. S. Matthews,
35th Ind., 8th Ky., 21st Ky., 51st O., 99th O.  Artillery.+--Capt.
G. R. Swallow.

Sixth Division.

Brigadier-General M. S. Hascall.

FIFTEENTH BRIGADE.--Col. G. P. Buell, 100th Ill., 17th Ind., 58th
Ind., 3d Ky., 26th O.  TWENTIETH BRIGADE.--Col. C. G. Harker,
51st Ind., 72d Ind., 13th Mich., 64th O., 65th O.  TWENTY-FIRST
BRIGADE.--Col. G. D. Wagner, 15th Ind., 40th Ind., 57th Ind., 97th
O.  ARTILLERY.+--Maj. S. Race.


CAVALRY

Brigadier-General Stanley.


First Division.

Colonel Kennett.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. E. H. Murray, 2d Ind., 1st Ky., 3d Ky., 4th
Ky., 4th Mich., 7th Penn.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. L. Zahm, 5th Ky.,
1st O., 3d O., 4th O., 1st O. Artillery, Batter "D."


UNATTACHED FORCES

1st Mich. Engineers, 9th Mich. (Detach.), 3d E. Tenn., 6th E.
Tenn., 15th Penn. Cavalry, 4th U.S. Cavalry (Detach.), Signal Corps,
Stokes' Ill. Battery.


GARRISONS.

BOWLING GREEN, KY.--Brig.-Gen. Granger, 129th Ill., 26th Ky., 23d
Mich., 102d O., 111th O., 4th Ky. Cavalry.  NASHVILLE, Tenn.--Brig.-Gen.
R. B. Mitchell, 1st Mid. Tenn., 11th Ind. Battery, 12th Ind. Battery,
1st Mich. Artillery, 5th Battery. 3d Ind. Cavalry (1 Co.)

---* Brigade commanders not indicated on return.  + Batteries not
indicated on return.





APPENDIX B.

Organization of Troops in the Dept. of the Cumberland, Commanded
by Major General George H. Thomas, Chattanooga, Tenn., Oct. 20th,
1863.

FOURTH ARMY CORPS.

Maj.-Gen'l G. Granger.


First Division.

Maj.-Gen'l. J. M. Palmer.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Brig. Gen'l Chas. Cruft, 21st Ill., 38th Ill.,
29th Ind., 31st Ind., 81st Ind., 1st Ky., 90th O., 101st O.  SECOND
BRIGADE.--Brig. Gen'l W. C. Whitaker, 96th Ill., 115th Ill.,
35th Ind., 84th Ind., 8th Ky., 40th O., 51st O., 99th O.  THIRD
BRIGADE.--Col. Wm. Grose 59th Ill., 75th Ill., 84th Ill., 9th Ind.,
30th Ind., 36th Ind., 24th O., 77th Penn.  ARTILLERY.--5th Ind.
Battery, 4th U.S. Art., Co. "H;" 4th U.S. Art., Co. "M."

Second Division.

Maj.-Gen'l P. H. Sheridan.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J. B. Steedman, 36th Ill., 44th Ill.,
73d Ill., 74th Ill., 88th Ill., 22d Ind., 21st Mich., 2d Mo., 15th
Mo., 24th Wis.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Brig.Gen'l G. D. Wagner, 100th
Ill., 15th Ind., 40th Ind., 57th Ind., 58th Ind., 13th Mich., 26th
O., 97th O.  THIRD BRIGADE.--Col. C. G. Harker, 22d Ill., 27th Ill.,
42d Ill., 51st Ill., 79th Ill., 3d Ky., 64th O., 65th O., 125th O.
ARTILLERY.--1st Ill. Art., Co. "M," 10th Ind. Battery, 1st Miss.
Art., Co. "G."

Third Division.

Brig.-Gen'l T. J. Wood.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l A Willich, 25th Ill., 35th Ill., 89th
Ill., 32d Ind., 68th Ind., 8th Kan., 15th O., 49th O., 15th Wis.
SECOND BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l W. B. Hazen, 6th Ind., 5th Ky., 6th
Ky., 23d Ky., 1st O., 6th O., 41st O., 93d O., 124th O.  THIRD
BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l S. Beatty, 44th Ind., 79th Ind., 86th Ind.,
9th Ky., 17th Ky., 13th O., 19th O., 59th O.  ARTILLERY.--Bridge's
Battery Ill. Art., 6th O. Battery, 26th Penn. Battery.

ELEVENTH ARMY CORPS.*

Maj.-Gen'l O. O. Howard.


Second Division.

Brig.-Gen'l A. Von Steinwehr.

FIRST BRIGADE.--33d N.J., 134th N.Y., 154th N.Y., 27th Penn., 73d
Penn.  SECOND BRIGADE.--33d Mass., 136th N.Y., 55th O., 73d O.

Third Division.

Maj.-Gen'l C. Schurz.

FIRST BRIGADE.--82d Ill., 45th N.Y., 142nd N.Y., 61st O., 82d O.
SECOND BRIGADE.--58th N.Y., 68th N.Y., 119th N.Y., 141st N.Y.,
75th Penn., 26th Wis.  ARTILLERY--1st New York Art. Co. "I," 13th
New York Battery, Indt. Co. 8th N.Y. Vol. Infty., 1st Ohio Art.,
Co. "I," 1st Ohio Artl, Co. "K," 4th U.S., Co. "G."

TWELFTH ARMY CORPS.*

Maj.-Gen'l H. W. Slocum.


First Division.

Brig.-Gen'l A. S. Williams.

FIRST BRIGADE.--5th Conn., 20th Conn., 3d Md., 123d N.Y., 145th
N.Y., 46th Penn.  SECOND BRIGADE.--27th Ind., 2d Mass., 13th N.J.,
107th N.Y., 150th N.Y., 3d Wis.

Second Division.

Brig.-Gen'l John W. Geary.

FIRST BRIGADE.--5th O., 7th O., 29th O., 66th O., 28th Penn., 147th
Penn.  SECOND BRIGADE.--29th Penn., 109th Penn., 111th Penn., THIRD
BRIGADE.--60th N.Y., 78th N.Y., 102d N.Y., 137th N.Y., 149th N.Y.,
ARTILLERY.--1st Batt'n 10th Maine Vol. Infty., 1st New York Art.
Co. "M," Pennsylvania Batt'y, Co. "E," 4th U.S. Art., Co. "F," 5th
U.S. Art. Co. "K."

(Maj-Gen'l Joseph Hooker, Com'g 11th and 12th Army Corps.)

Lietu.-Col. Hunton, Unassigned Artillery.

2d Ky. Batt'y, 1st Mich. E. and M., 20th Ind. Batt'y., 1st Ky.
Batt'y., 1st O. Art., Co. "E," 10th Wis. Batt'y.

FOURTEENTH ARMY CORPS.

Maj.-Gen'l. George H. Thomas.


First Division.

Brig.-Gen'l. W. P. Carlin.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. O.F. Moore:  104th Ill., 38th Ind., 42d Ind.,
88th Ind., 15th Ky., 2d O., 33d O., 94th O., 10th Wis.  SECOND
BRIGADE.--Col. M. F. Moore:  19th Ill., 11th Mich., 18th O., 69th
O., 15th U.S. Infty., 1st and 2d Batt., 16th U.S. Infty., 1st
Batt., 18th U.S. Infty., 1st and 2d Batt., 19th U.S. Infty., 1st
Batt.  THIRD BRIGADE.--Col. W. Sirwell:  24th Ill., 37th Ind.,
21st O., 74th O., 78th Penn., 79th Penn., 1st Wis., 21st Wis.
ARTILLERY.--1st Ill. Art., Co. "C.," 1st Mich. Art., Co. "A.," 5th
U.S. Art., Co. "H."

Second Division.

Brig.-Gen'l. Jeff. C. Davis.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l. J. D. Morgan:  10th Ill., 16th Ill.,
60th Ill., 10th Mich., 14th Mich.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J.
Beatty:  3d East Tenn., 5th East Tenn., 6th East Tenn., 78th Ill.,
98th O., 113th O., 121st O. THIRD BRIGADE.--Col. D. McCook:  85th
Ill., 86th Ill., 110th Ill., 125th Ill., 52d O., 22d Mich.
ARTILLERY.--2d Ill. Art., Co. "L," 2d Minn. Batt'y, 5th Wis. Batt'y.

Third Division.

Brig.-Gen'l A. Baird.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J.B. Turchin:  82d Ind., 11th O., 17th
O., 31st O., 36th O., 89th O., 92d O.  SECOND BRIGADE--Col. Jas.
George:  75th Ind., 87th Ind., 101st Ind., 2d Minn., 9th O., 35th
O., 105th O.  THIRD BRIGADE--Col. E. H. Phelps:  10th Ind., 74th
Ind., 4th Ky., 10th Ky., 18th Ky., 14th O., 38th O.  ARTILLERY.--7th
Ind. Batt'y., 19th Ind. Batt'y., 4th U.S. Art., Co. "I."

ARTILLERY RESERVE.

Brig.-Gen'l J. M. Brannan, Chf. of Art.


First Division.

Col. J. Barnett.

FIRST BRIGADE.--1st O. Art., Co. "A.," 1st O. Art., Co. "B.," 1st
O. Art., Co. "C.," 1st O. Art., Co. "F."  SECOND BRIGADE.--1st O.
Art., Co. "G.," 1st O. Art., Co. "M.," 18th O. Batt'y., 20th O.
Batt'y.

Second Division.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Capt. Sutermeister:  4th Ind. Batt'y., 8th Ind.
Batt'y, 11th Ind. Batt'y., 21st Ind. Batt'y.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Capt.
Church:  1st Mich Art., Co. "D.," 1st M. Tenn. Art., Co. "A.," 3d
Wis. Batt'y, 8th Wis. Batt'y.  COBURN'S BRIGADE.--33d Ind., 85th
Ind., 19th Mich., 22d Wis., 9th O. Batt'y.  U. S. FORCES, GALLATIN,
TENN.--Brig.-Gen'l. E. A. Paine:  91st Ind. (1st Batt.), 50th O.
(1st Batt.), 71st O., 106th O., 13th Ind. Batt'y.

NASHVILLE, TENN.

Brig.-Gen'l R. S. Granger, Comdg. Post.


WARD'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l W. T. Ward; 105th Ill., 129th Ill.,
70th Ind., 79th O., 1st Mich. Art., Co. "E."  UNASSIGNED.--18th
Mich. Vol. Inft'y., 12th. Ind. Batt'y.  CLARKSVILLE, TENN.--Col
A. A. Smith, Comdg. Post:  83d Ill. (1st Batt.), 2d Ill. Art., Co.
"H."  CHATTANOOGA, TENN.--10th O. Vol. Inft'y, 1st Batt. O. S. S.


FIRST DIVISION CAVALRY.

Brig.-Gen'l R. B. Mitchell.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. A. P. Campbell:  1st E. Tenn. Cav., 2d Mich.
Cav., 9th Penn. Cav.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. E. McCook:  2d E. Tenn.
Cav., 3d E. Tenn. Cav., 2d Ind. Cav., 4th Ind. Cav., 1st Wis. Cav.
THIRD BRIGADE.--Col. L. D. Watkins:  4th Ky. Cav., 5th Ky. Cav.,
6th Ky. Cav., 7th Ky. Cav.  ARTILLERY.--Sec. 1, O. Art., Co. "D."

SECOND DIVISION CAVALRY.

Brig-Gen'l Geo. Crook.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. R. L. Minty:  3d Ind. Cav. (Detachm't), 4th
Mich. Cav., 7th Penn. Cav., 4th U. S. Cav.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col
E. Long:  2d Ky. Cav., 1st O. Cav., 3d O. Cav., 4th O. Cav.  THIRD
BRIGADE.--Col. W. W. Lowe:  5th Ia. Cav., 1st Mid. Tenn. Cav., 19th
O. Cav., Capt. Stokes' Ill Batt'y, 15th Pa. Vol. Cav., Col. W. J.
Palmer.  MILLER'S BRIG. MTD. INFTY.--Col. A. O. Miller:  92d Ill.,
98th Ill., 123d Ill., 17th Ind., 72d Ind., 18th Ind. Batt'y.  U. S.
FORCES, FT. DONELSON.--Lt. Col. E. C. Brott:  83d Ill. (Detachm't),
2d Ill. Art., Co. "C."  UNASSIGNED INFANTRY.--34th Ill., 80th Ill,
102d Ill, 39th Ind., 51st Ind., 73d Ind., 21st Ky., 28th Ky., 3d
O., 102d O., 108th O., 10th Tenn., 31st Wis.

---* Brigade Commanders not given.






Appendix C.




Organization of the Confederate Army at the Battle of Chickamauga,
GA.


RIGHT WING.

Lieut.-Gen'l. Leonidas Polk.


Cheatham's Division.

Maj.-Gen'l B. F. Cheatham.

JACKSON'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J. K. Jackson:  1st Confed. Bat.,
5th Ga., 2d Ga. Bat., 5th Miss., 8th Miss., Scogin's (Ga.) Batt'y.
MANEY'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Geo. Maney:  1st Tenn., 27th Tenn.,
4th Tenn., 6th Tenn., 9th Tenn., Maney's (Tenn.) Batt., Smith's
(Miss.) Batt'y.  SMITH'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Preston Smith, Col. A.
J. Vaughan:  11th Tenn., 12th Tenn., 47th Tenn., 13th Tenn., 29th
Tenn., 154th Tenn., Scott's (Tenn.) Batt'y.  WRIGHT'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
M. J. Wright:  8th Tenn., 16th Tenn., 28th Tenn., 38th Tenn., 51st
Tenn., 52d Tenn., Carnes' (Tenn.) Batt'y.  STRAHL'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
O. F. Strahl:  4th Tenn., 5th Tenn., 19th Tenn., 24th Tenn., 31st
Tenn., 33d Tenn., Stanford's (Miss.) Batt'y.

HILL'S CORPS.

Lieut. Gen'l. D. H. Hill.


Cleburne's Division.

Maj.-Gen'l P. R. Cleburne.

POLK'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l L. E. Polk:  1st Ark., 2d Confed.,
5th Confed., 2d Tenn., 35th Tenn., 48th Tenn., Calvert's (Tenn.)
Batt'y.  WOOD'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l S. A. M. Wood:  16th Ala.,
33d Ala., 45th Ala., 32d Miss., 45th Miss., Hankin's Batt., Semple's
(Ala.) Batt'y.  DESHLER'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l James Deshler,
Col. R. Q. Mills:  19th Ark., 24th Ark., 6th Tex., 10th Tex, 15th
Tex., 17th Tex., 18th Tex., 24th Tex., 25th Tex., Douglas' (Tex.)
Batt'y.

Breckinridge's Division.

HELM'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l B. H. Helms, Col. J. H. Lewis, 41st
Ala., 2d Ky., 4th Ky., 6th Ky., 9th Ky., Cobb's (Ky.) Battery.
ADAMS' BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Dan'l Adams, Col. R. L. Gibson, 32d
Ala., 13th La., 20th La., 16th La., 25th La., 19th La., Austin's
(La.) Batt., Slocomb's (La.) Battery.  STOVALL'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
M. A. Stovall, 1st Fla., 3d Fla., 4th Fla., 47th Ga., 60th No.
Car., Mebane's (Tenn.) Battery.

Walker's Division. [Walker's and Liddel's divisions constituted a
"reserve corps," under Walker's command, Gist commanding Walker's
division.]

Maj.-Gen'l W. H. T. Walker.
Brig.-Gen'l S. R. Gist.

GIST'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l S. R. Gist, Col. P. H. Colquitt,
46th Ga., 8th Ga. Batt., 16th So. Car., 24th So. Car., Ferguson's
(So. Car.) Battery.  ECTOR'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l M. D. Ector,
Ala. Batt. (Stone's), Miss. Batt. (Pound's), 9th Tex., 10th Tex.
Cav. [dismounted], 14th Tex. Cav. [dismounted], 32d Tex. Cav.
[dismounted], Battery [Gen'l Walker reports five batteries, but
those of Ector's and Wilson's brigades are not named in reports].
WILSON'S BRIGADE.--Col. C. C. Wilson, 25th Ga., 29th Ga., 30th Ga.,
1st Ga. Batt., 4th La. Batt., Battery [Gen'l Walker reports five
batteries, but those of Ector's and Wilson's brigades are not named
in reports].

Liddell's Division. [Walker's and Liddel's divisions constituted a
"reserve corps," under Walker's command, Gist commanding Walker's
division.]

Birg.-Gen'l S. J. R. Lidell.

LIDELL'S BRIGADE.--Col. D. C. Govan, 2d Ark., 15th Ark., 5th Ark.,
13th Ark., 6th Ark., 7th Ark., 1st La., Swett's (Miss.) Batt.
WALTHALL'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l E. C. Walthall, 24th Miss., 27th
Miss., 29th Miss., 30th Miss., 34th Miss., Fowler's (Ala.) Battery.


LEFT WING.  [Longstreet's corps, organization of the divisions, and
of the artillery battalion taken from Return of the Army of Northern
Virginia, for August 31, 1863; the artillery is not mentioned in
the reports.]

Lieut.-Gen'l James Longstreet.


McLaw's Division.

Maj.-Gen'l Lafayette McLaw.
Brig.-Gen'l J. B. Kershaw.

KERSHAW'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J. B. Kershaw, 2d So. Car., 7th
So. Car., 8th So. Car., 15th So. Car., 3d So. Car. Batt.  WOFFORD'S
BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l W. T. Wofford, 16th Ga., 18th Ga., 24th
Ga., 3d Ga. Batt., Cobb's (Ga.) Legion, Phillip's (Ga.) Legion.
HUMPHREY'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l B. G. Humphreys, 13th Miss.,
17th Miss., 18th Miss., 21st Miss.  BRYAN'S BRIGADE [not engaged
according to Longstreet's report].--Brig.-Gen'l Goode Bryan, 10th
Ga., 50th Ga., 51st Ga., 53d Ga.

Hood's Division.

Maj.-Gen'l J. B. Hood.
Brig.-Gen'l E. M. Law.

LAW'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l E. M. Law, Col. Sheffield,
4th Ala., 15th Ala., 44th Ala., 47th Ala., 48th Ala.  ROBERTSON'S
BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l J. R. Robertson, 3d Ark., 18th Tex., 4th Tex.,
5th Tex.  ANDERSON'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Geo. T. Anderson, 7th Ga.,
8th Ga., 9th Ga., 11th Ga., 59th Ga.  BENNING'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
H. L. Benning, 2d Ga., 15th Ga., 17th Ga., 20th Ga.  ARTILLERY
[Served in Johnson's division].--Maj. Frank Huger, Ficklin's (Va.)
Bat., Jordan's (Va.) Bat., Moody's (La.) Bat., Parker's (Va.) Bat.,
Taylor's (Va.) Bat., Woolfolk's (Va.) Bat.

Hindman's Division [of Polk's Corps].

Maj.-Gen'l T. C. Hindman.
Brig.-Gen'l Patton Anderson.

ANDERSON'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Patton Anderson, Col. J. H. Sharp,
7th Miss., 9th Miss., 10th Miss., 41st Miss., 44th Miss., 9th Miss.,
Garrity's (Ala.) Bat.  DEAS' BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l Z. C. Deas, 19th
Ala., 22d Ala., 25th Ala., 39th Ala., 50th Ala., 17th Ala. Batt.,
Dent's (Ala.) Bat.  MANIGAULT'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l A. M. Manigault,
24th Ala., 28th Ala., 34th Ala., 10th So. Car. and 19th So. Car.
consol., Water's (Ala.) Bat.

BUCKNER'S CORPS

Maj.-Gen'l S. B. Buckner.


Stewart's Division.

Maj.-Gen'l A. P. Stewart.

JOHNSON'S BRIGADE [see Johnson's Division, following].--Brig.-Gen'l
B. R. Johnson, Col. J. S. Fulton, 17th Tenn., 23d Tenn., 25th Tenn.,
44th Tenn., 9th Ga. Art., Bat. "E."  BROWN'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
J. C. Brown, 18th Tenn., 26th Tenn., 32d Tenn., 45th Tenn., Newman's
(Tenn.) Batt., Dawson's (Ga.) Bat.  BATE'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l W.
B. Bate, 58th Ala., 37th Ga., 4th Ga. Batt., 15th Tenn., 37th Tenn.,
20th Tenn., Oliver's (Ala.) Art.  CLAYTON'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
H. D. Clayton, 18th Ala., 36th Ala., 38th Ala., Humphrey's (Ark.)
Bat.

Preston's Division.

Brig.-Gen'l William Preston.

GRACIE'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l A. Gracie, Jr., 43d Ala., 1st Ala.
Batt. [Hilliard's Legion], 2d Ala. Batt. [Hilliard's Legion], 3d
Ala. Batt. [Hilliard's Legion], 63d tenn., Battery [It appears that
Baxter's (Tenn.) and Jeffress' (Va.) Batteries belonged to this
division, but their assignment is not clearly indicated.].  TRIGG'S
BRIGRADE.--Col. R. C. Trigg, 1st Fla. Cav. [dismounted], 6th Fla.,
7th Fla., 54th Va., Peeple's (Ga.) Bat.  KELLY'S BRIGADE.--Col.
J. H. Kelly, 65th Ga., 5th ky., 58th N. Car., 63d Va., Battery [It
appears that Baxter's (Tenn.) and Jeffress' (Va.) Batteries belonged
to this division, but their assignment is not clearly indicated.].

Johnson's Division [this is a temporary organization, embracing
Benning's, Johnson's, Law's, and Robertson's brigades, as well as
Gregg's and McNair's].

Brig.-Gen'l B. R. Johnson.

GREGG'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l John Gregg, Col. C. A. Sugy, 3d Tenn.,
10th Tenn., 30th Tenn., 41st Tenn., 50th Tenn., 1st [20th] Tenn.
Batt., 7th Texas, Bledsoe's (Mo.) Bat.  MCNAIR'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l
E. McNair, Col. D. Coleman, 1st Ark. Rifles, 2d Ark. Rifles, 4th
Ark., 25th Ark., 35th Ark., Culpeper's (S. C.) Bat.

CAVALRY.

Maj.-Gen'l Joseph Wheeler [This organization taken from return for
August 31st, 1863.].


Wharton's Division.

Brig.-Gen'l John A. Wharton.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. C. C. Crews, 7th Ala., 2d Ga., 3d Ga., 4th
Ga.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. T. Harrison, 3d Confederates, 1st Ky.,
4th Tenn., 8th Texas, 11th Texas, White's (Ga.) Battery.

Martin's Division.

Brig.-Gen'l W. T. Martin.

FIRST BRIGADE.--Col. J. T. Morgan, 1st Ala., 3d Ala., 51st Ala.,
8th Confederate.  SECOND BRIGADE.--Col. A. A. Russell, 4th Ala.
[two regiments of the same designation.  Lt.-Col. Johnson commanded
that in Roddey's brigade.], 1st Confederate, Wiggins' (Ark.) Battery.

Roddey's Brigade.

Brig.-Gen'l P. D. Roddey.

4th Ala. [two regiments of the same designation.  Lt.-Col. Johnson
commanded that in Roddey's brigade.], 5th Ala., 53d Ala., Forrest's
(Tenn.) Regiment, Ferrell's (Ga.) Battery.

Forrest's Corps.

Maj.-Gen'l N. B. Forrest.


Armstrong's Division [Taken from return for August 31, 1863, and
Forrest's report].

Brig.-Gen'l F. C. Armstrong.

ARMSTRONG'S BRIGADE.--3d Ark., 1st Tenn., 2d Tenn., McDonald's
Battalion.  --- BRIGADE.--4th Tenn., 8th Tenn., 9th Tenn., 10th
Tenn., 11th Tenn., Freeman's (Tenn.) Battery, Marion's (Tenn.)
Battery.

Pegram's Division [Taken from Pegram's and Scott's reports and
assignments; but the composition of this division is uncertain.].

Brig.-Gen'l John Pegram.

DAVIDSON'S BRIGADE.--Brig.-Gen'l H. B. Davidson, 1st Ga., 6th Ga.,
65th North Carolina, Rucker's Legion, Huwald's (Tenn.) Battery.
SCOTT'S BRIGADE.--Col. J. L. Scott, 10th Confederate, 1st La.,
5th Tenn., 12th Tenn. Battalion, 16th Tenn. Battalion, Louisiana
Battery (1 section).

RESERVE ARTILLERY [with exception of Darden's battery taken from
return for August 31, 1863; on that return that battery appears as
of Johnson's Brigade.].

Barret's (Mo.) Battery, Darden's (Miss.) Battery, Havis' (Ala.)
Battery, Le Gardewi's (La.) Battery, Lumsden's (Ala.) Battery,
Massenburg's (Ga.) Battery.





PLEASE NOTE that the index has not been included in this version of
the book as references to page numbers that extensive offer little
or no value (as opposed to the table of contents which shows the
book's structure).









Charles Franks, Carlo Traverso and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team.

EDITORIAL NOTES

[page]    page break

_italic_
^small caps^
<greek text>

A paragraph with a margin of two spaces represents a quotation,
represented in the text by a smaller type.

A series of lines indented three or more spaces represent poetry:
spaces, end of lines and empty lines should be preserved.

-----------------------------------------



                                 A WEEK
                                 ON THE
                       CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS.



[page]




                                A WEEK

                                ON THE

                      CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS


                           By HENRY D. THOREAU,

                        AUTHOR OF "WALDEN," ETC.


[page]


     Where'er thou sail'st who sailed with me,
     Though now thou climbest loftier mounts,
     And fairer rivers dost ascend,
     Be thou my Muse, my Brother--.


[page]


     I am bound, I am bound, for a distant shore,
     By a lonely isle, by a far Azore,
     There it is, there it is, the treasure I seek,
     On the barren sands of a desolate creek.


[page]


     I sailed up a river with a pleasant wind,
     New lands, new people, and new thoughts to find;
     Many fair reaches and headlands appeared,
     And many dangers were there to be feared;
     But when I remember where I have been,
     And the fair landscapes that I have seen,
     ^Thou^ seemest the only permanent shore,
     The cape never rounded, nor wandered o'er.


[page]


     Fluminaque obliquis cinxit declivia ripis;
     Quae, diversa locis, partim sorbentur ab ipsa;
     In mare perveniunt partim, campoque recepta
     Liberioris aquae, pro ripis litora pulsant.
                                 ^Ovid^, Met.  I.  39


   He confined the rivers within their sloping banks,
   Which in different places are part absorbed by the earth,
   Part reach the sea, and being received within the plain
   Of its freer waters, beat the shore for banks.



[page]


                 CONCORD RIVER.

     "Beneath low hills, in the broad interval
     Through which at will our Indian rivulet
     Winds mindful still of sannup and of squaw,
     Whose pipe and arrow oft the plough unburies,
     Here, in pine houses, built of new-fallen trees,
     Supplanters of the tribe, the farmers dwell."

                                          ^Emerson^.


The Musketaquid, or Grass-ground River, though probably as old as
the Nile or Euphrates, did not begin to have a place in civilized
history, until the fame of its grassy meadows and its fish
attracted settlers out of England in 1635, when it received the
other but kindred name of ^Concord^ from the first plantation on
its banks, which appears to have been commenced in a spirit of
peace and harmony.  It will be Grass-ground River as long as grass
grows and water runs here; it will be Concord River only while
men lead peaceable lives on its banks.  To an extinct race it was
grass-ground, where they hunted and fished, and it is still
perennial grass-ground to Concord farmers, who own the Great
Meadows, and get the hay from year to year.  "One branch of it,"
according to the historian of Concord, for I love to quote so
good authority, "rises in the south part of Hopkinton, and
another from a pond and a large cedar-swamp in Westborough," and
flowing between Hopkinton and Southborough, through Framingham,
and between Sudbury and Wayland, where it is sometimes called
Sudbury River, it enters Concord at the south part of the town,
and after receiving the North or Assabeth River, which has its
source a little farther to the north and west, goes out at the
northeast angle, and flowing between Bedford and Carlisle, and
through Billerica, empties into the Merrimack at Lowell.  In
Concord it is, in summer, from four to fifteen feet deep, and
from one hundred to three hundred feet wide, but in the spring
freshets, when it overflows its banks, it is in some places
nearly a mile wide.  Between Sudbury and Wayland the meadows
acquire their greatest breadth, and when covered with water, they
form a handsome chain of shallow vernal lakes, resorted to by
numerous gulls and ducks.  Just above Sherman's Bridge, between
these towns, is the largest expanse, and when the wind blows
freshly in a raw March day, heaving up the surface into dark and
sober billows or regular swells, skirted as it is in the distance
with alder-swamps and smoke-like maples, it looks like a smaller
Lake Huron, and is very pleasant and exciting for a landsman to
row or sail over.  The farm-houses along the Sudbury shore, which
rises gently to a considerable height, command fine water
prospects at this season.  The shore is more flat on the Wayland
side, and this town is the greatest loser by the flood.  Its
farmers tell me that thousands of acres are flooded now, since
the dams have been erected, where they remember to have seen the
white honeysuckle or clover growing once, and they could go dry
with shoes only in summer.  Now there is nothing but blue-joint
and sedge and cut-grass there, standing in water all the year
round.  For a long time, they made the most of the driest season
to get their hay, working sometimes till nine o'clock at night,
sedulously paring with their scythes in the twilight round the
hummocks left by the ice; but now it is not worth the getting
when they can come at it, and they look sadly round to their
wood-lots and upland as a last resource.

It is worth the while to make a voyage up this stream, if you go
no farther than Sudbury, only to see how much country there is in
the rear of us; great hills, and a hundred brooks, and
farm-houses, and barns, and haystacks, you never saw before, and
men everywhere, Sudbury, that is Southborough men, and Wayland,
and Nine-Acre-Corner men, and Bound Rock, where four towns bound
on a rock in the river, Lincoln, Wayland, Sudbury, Concord.  Many
waves are there agitated by the wind, keeping nature fresh, the
spray blowing in your face, reeds and rushes waving; ducks by the
hundred, all uneasy in the surf, in the raw wind, just ready to
rise, and now going off with a clatter and a whistling like
riggers straight for Labrador, flying against the stiff gale with
reefed wings, or else circling round first, with all their
paddles briskly moving, just over the surf, to reconnoitre you
before they leave these parts; gulls wheeling overhead, muskrats
swimming for dear life, wet and cold, with no fire to warm them
by that you know of; their labored homes rising here and there
like haystacks; and countless mice and moles and winged titmice
along the sunny windy shore; cranberries tossed on the waves and
heaving up on the beach, their little red skiffs beating about
among the alders;--such healthy natural tumult as proves the last
day is not yet at hand.  And there stand all around the alders,
and birches, and oaks, and maples full of glee and sap, holding
in their buds until the waters subside.  You shall perhaps run
aground on Cranberry Island, only some spires of last year's
pipe-grass above water, to show where the danger is, and get as
good a freezing there as anywhere on the Northwest Coast.  I never
voyaged so far in all my life.  You shall see men you never heard
of before, whose names you don't know, going away down through
the meadows with long ducking-guns, with water-tight boots wading
through the fowl-meadow grass, on bleak, wintry, distant shores,
with guns at half-cock, and they shall see teal, blue-winged,
green-winged, shelldrakes, whistlers, black ducks, ospreys, and
many other wild and noble sights before night, such as they who
sit in parlors never dream of.  You shall see rude and sturdy,
experienced and wise men, keeping their castles, or teaming up
their summer's wood, or chopping alone in the woods, men fuller
of talk and rare adventure in the sun and wind and rain, than a
chestnut is of meat; who were out not only in '75 and 1812, but
have been out every day of their lives; greater men than Homer,
or Chaucer, or Shakespeare, only they never got time to say so;
they never took to the way of writing.  Look at their fields, and
imagine what they might write, if ever they should put pen to
paper.  Or what have they not written on the face of the earth
already, clearing, and burning, and scratching, and harrowing,
and ploughing, and subsoiling, in and in, and out and out, and
over and over, again and again, erasing what they had already
written for want of parchment.

As yesterday and the historical ages are past, as the work of
to-day is present, so some flitting perspectives, and
demi-experiences of the life that is in nature are in time
veritably future, or rather outside to time, perennial, young,
divine, in the wind and rain which never die.

     The respectable folks,--
     Where dwell they?
     They whisper in the oaks,
     And they sigh in the hay;
     Summer and winter, night and day,
     Out on the meadow, there dwell they.
     They never die,
     Nor snivel, nor cry,
     Nor ask our pity
     With a wet eye.
     A sound estate they ever mend
     To every asker readily lend;
     To the ocean wealth,
     To the meadow health,
     To Time his length,
     To the rocks strength,
     To the stars light,
     To the weary night,
     To the busy day,
     To the idle play;
     And so their good cheer never ends,
     For all are their debtors, and all their friends.

Concord River is remarkable for the gentleness of its current,
which is scarcely perceptible, and some have referred to its
influence the proverbial moderation of the inhabitants of
Concord, as exhibited in the Revolution, and on later occasions.
It has been proposed, that the town should adopt for its coat of
arms a field verdant, with the Concord circling nine times round.
I have read that a descent of an eighth of an inch in a mile is
sufficient to produce a flow.  Our river has, probably, very near
the smallest allowance.  The story is current, at any rate,
though I believe that strict history will not bear it out, that
the only bridge ever carried away on the main branch, within the
limits of the town, was driven up stream by the wind.  But
wherever it makes a sudden bend it is shallower and swifter, and
asserts its title to be called a river.  Compared with the other
tributaries of the Merrimack, it appears to have been properly
named Musketaquid, or Meadow River, by the Indians.  For the most
part, it creeps through broad meadows, adorned with scattered
oaks, where the cranberry is found in abundance, covering the
ground like a moss-bed.  A row of sunken dwarf willows borders
the stream on one or both sides, while at a greater distance the
meadow is skirted with maples, alders, and other fluviatile
trees, overrun with the grape-vine, which bears fruit in its
season, purple, red, white, and other grapes.  Still farther from
the stream, on the edge of the firm land, are seen the gray and
white dwellings of the inhabitants.  According to the valuation
of 1831, there were in Concord two thousand one hundred and
eleven acres, or about one seventh of the whole territory in
meadow; this standing next in the list after pasturage and
unimproved lands, and, judging from the returns of previous
years, the meadow is not reclaimed so fast as the woods are
cleared.

Let us here read what old Johnson says of these meadows in his
"Wonder-working Providence," which gives the account of New
England from 1628 to 1652, and see how matters looked to him.  He
says of the Twelfth Church of Christ gathered at Concord: "This
town is seated upon a fair fresh river, whose rivulets are filled
with fresh marsh, and her streams with fish, it being a branch of
that large river of Merrimack.  Allwifes and shad in their season
come up to this town, but salmon and dace cannot come up, by
reason of the rocky falls, which causeth their meadows to lie
much covered with water, the which these people, together with
their neighbor town, have several times essayed to cut through
but cannot, yet it may be turned another way with an hundred
pound charge as it appeared."  As to their farming he says:
"Having laid out their estate upon cattle at 5 to 20 pound a cow,
when they came to winter them with inland hay, and feed upon such
wild fother as was never cut before, they could not hold out the
winter, but, ordinarily the first or second year after their
coming up to a new plantation, many of their cattle died." And
this from the same author "Of the Planting of the 19th Church in
the Mattachusets' Government, called Sudbury": "This year [does
he mean 1654] the town and church of Christ at Sudbury began to
have the first foundation stones laid, taking up her station in
the inland country, as her elder sister Concord had formerly
done, lying further up the same river, being furnished with great
plenty of fresh marsh, but, it lying very low is much indamaged
with land floods, insomuch that when the summer proves wet they
lose part of their hay; yet are they so sufficiently provided
that they take in cattle of other towns to winter."

The sluggish artery of the Concord meadows steals thus unobserved
through the town, without a murmur or a pulse-beat, its general
course from southwest to northeast, and its length about fifty
miles; a huge volume of matter, ceaselessly rolling through the
plains and valleys of the substantial earth with the moccasoned
tread of an Indian warrior, making haste from the high places of
the earth to its ancient reservoir.  The murmurs of many a famous
river on the other side of the globe reach even to us here, as to
more distant dwellers on its banks; many a poet's stream floating
the helms and shields of heroes on its bosom.  The Xanthus or
Scamander is not a mere dry channel and bed of a mountain
torrent, but fed by the everflowing springs of fame;--

    "And thou Simois, that as an arrowe, clere
     Through Troy rennest, aie downward to the sea";--

and I trust that I may be allowed to associate our muddy but much
abused Concord River with the most famous in history.

    "Sure there are poets which did never dream
     Upon Parnassus, nor did taste the stream
     Of Helicon; we therefore may suppose
     Those made not poets, but the poets those."

The Mississippi, the Ganges, and the Nile, those journeying atoms
from the Rocky Mountains, the Himmaleh, and Mountains of the
Moon, have a kind of personal importance in the annals of the
world.  The heavens are not yet drained over their sources, but
the Mountains of the Moon still send their annual tribute to the
Pasha without fail, as they did to the Pharaohs, though he must
collect the rest of his revenue at the point of the sword.
Rivers must have been the guides which conducted the footsteps of
the first travellers.  They are the constant lure, when they flow
by our doors, to distant enterprise and adventure, and, by a
natural impulse, the dwellers on their banks will at length
accompany their currents to the lowlands of the globe, or explore
at their invitation the interior of continents.  They are the
natural highways of all nations, not only levelling the ground
and removing obstacles from the path of the traveller, quenching
his thirst and bearing him on their bosoms, but conducting him
through the most interesting scenery, the most populous portions
of the globe, and where the animal and vegetable kingdoms attain
their greatest perfection.

I had often stood on the banks of the Concord, watching the lapse
of the current, an emblem of all progress, following the same law
with the system, with time, and all that is made; the weeds at
the bottom gently bending down the stream, shaken by the watery
wind, still planted where their seeds had sunk, but erelong to
die and go down likewise; the shining pebbles, not yet anxious to
better their condition, the chips and weeds, and occasional logs
and stems of trees that floated past, fulfilling their fate, were
objects of singular interest to me, and at last I resolved to
launch myself on its bosom and float whither it would bear me.




[page]


                       SATURDAY.


   "Come, come, my lovely fair, and let us try
    Those rural delicacies."
               _Christ's Invitation to the Soul._  ^Quarles^



[page]


                      SATURDAY.

                        --*--


At length, on Saturday, the last day of August, 1839, we two,
brothers, and natives of Concord, weighed anchor in this river
port; for Concord, too, lies under the sun, a port of entry and
departure for the bodies as well as the souls of men; one shore
at least exempted from all duties but such as an honest man will
gladly discharge.  A warm drizzling rain had obscured the
morning, and threatened to delay our voyage, but at length the
leaves and grass were dried, and it came out a mild afternoon, as
serene and fresh as if Nature were maturing some greater scheme
of her own.  After this long dripping and oozing from every pore,
she began to respire again more healthily than ever.  So with a
vigorous shove we launched our boat from the bank, while the
flags and bulrushes courtesied a God-speed, and dropped silently
down the stream.

Our boat, which had cost us a week's labor in the spring, was in
form like a fisherman's dory, fifteen feet long by three and a
half in breadth at the widest part, painted green below, with a
border of blue, with reference to the two elements in which it
was to spend its existence.  It had been loaded the evening before
at our door, half a mile from the river, with potatoes and melons
from a patch which we had cultivated, and a few utensils, and was
provided with wheels in order to be rolled around falls, as well
as with two sets of oars, and several slender poles for shoving
in shallow places, and also two masts, one of which served for a
tent-pole at night; for a buffalo-skin was to be our bed, and a
tent of cotton cloth our roof.  It was strongly built, but heavy,
and hardly of better model than usual.  If rightly made, a boat
would be a sort of amphibious animal, a creature of two elements,
related by one half its structure to some swift and shapely fish,
and by the other to some strong-winged and graceful bird.  The
fish shows where there should be the greatest breadth of beam and
depth in the hold; its fins direct where to set the oars, and the
tail gives some hint for the form and position of the rudder.  The
bird shows how to rig and trim the sails, and what form to give
to the prow that it may balance the boat, and divide the air and
water best.  These hints we had but partially obeyed.  But the
eyes, though they are no sailors, will never be satisfied with
any model, however fashionable, which does not answer all the
requisitions of art.  However, as art is all of a ship but the
wood, and yet the wood alone will rudely serve the purpose of a
ship, so our boat, being of wood, gladly availed itself of the
old law that the heavier shall float the lighter, and though a
dull water-fowl, proved a sufficient buoy for our purpose.

    "Were it the will of Heaven, an osier bough
     Were vessel safe enough the seas to plough."

Some village friends stood upon a promontory lower down the
stream to wave us a last farewell; but we, having already
performed these shore rites, with excusable reserve, as befits
those who are embarked on unusual enterprises, who behold but
speak not, silently glided past the firm lands of Concord, both
peopled cape and lonely summer meadow, with steady sweeps.  And
yet we did unbend so far as to let our guns speak for us, when at
length we had swept out of sight, and thus left the woods to ring
again with their echoes; and it may be many russet-clad children,
lurking in those broad meadows, with the bittern and the woodcock
and the rail, though wholly concealed by brakes and hardhack and
meadow-sweet, heard our salute that afternoon.

We were soon floating past the first regular battle ground of the
Revolution, resting on our oars between the still visible
abutments of that "North Bridge," over which in April, 1775,
rolled the first faint tide of that war, which ceased not, till,
as we read on the stone on our right, it "gave peace to these
United States." As a Concord poet has sung:--

    "By the rude bridge that arched the flood,
      Their flag to April's breeze unfurled,
    Here once the embattled farmers stood,
      And fired the shot heard round the world.

    "The foe long since in silence slept;
      Alike the conqueror silent sleeps;
    And Time the ruined bridge has swept
      Down the dark stream which seaward creeps."

Our reflections had already acquired a historical remoteness from
the scenes we had left, and we ourselves essayed to sing.

    Ah, 't is in vain the peaceful din
      That wakes the ignoble town,
    Not thus did braver spirits win
      A patriot's renown.

    There is one field beside this stream,
      Wherein no foot does fall,
    But yet it beareth in my dream
      A richer crop than all.

    Let me believe a dream so dear,
     Some heart beat high that day,
    Above the petty Province here,
     And Britain far away;

    Some hero of the ancient mould,
     Some arm of knightly worth,
    Of strength unbought, and faith unsold,
     Honored this spot of earth;

    Who sought the prize his heart described,
     And did not ask release,
    Whose free-born valor was not bribed
     By prospect of a peace.

    The men who stood on yonder height
     That day are long since gone;
    Not the same hand directs the fight
     And monumental stone.

    Ye were the Grecian cities then,
     The Romes of modern birth,
    Where the New England husbandmen
     Have shown a Roman worth.

    In vain I search a foreign land
     To find our Bunker Hill,
    And Lexington and Concord stand
     By no Laconian rill.

With such thoughts we swept gently by this now peaceful
pasture-ground, on waves of Concord, in which was long since
drowned the din of war.

    But since we sailed
    Some things have failed,
    And many a dream
    Gone down the stream.

    Here then an aged shepherd dwelt,
    Who to his flock his substance dealt,
    And ruled them with a vigorous crook,
    By precept of the sacred Book;
    But he the pierless bridge passed o'er,
    And solitary left the shore.

    Anon a youthful pastor came,
    Whose crook was not unknown to fame,
    His lambs he viewed with gentle glance,
    Spread o'er the country's wide expanse,
    And fed with "Mosses from the Manse."
    Here was our Hawthorne in the dale,
    And here the shepherd told his tale.

That slight shaft had now sunk behind the hills, and we had
floated round the neighboring bend, and under the new North
Bridge between Ponkawtasset and the Poplar Hill, into the Great
Meadows, which, like a broad moccason print, have levelled a
fertile and juicy place in nature.

     On Ponkawtasset, since, we took our way,
     Down this still stream to far Billericay,
     A poet wise has settled, whose fine ray
     Doth often shine on Concord's twilight day.

     Like those first stars, whose silver beams on high,
     Shining more brightly as the day goes by,
     Most travellers cannot at first descry,
     But eyes that wont to range the evening sky,

     And know celestial lights, do plainly see,
     And gladly hail them, numbering two or three;
     For lore that's deep must deeply studied be,
     As from deep wells men read star-poetry.

     These stars are never paled, though out of sight,
     But like the sun they shine forever bright;
     Ay, _they_ are suns, though earth must in its flight
     Put out its eyes that it may see their light.

     Who would neglect the least celestial sound,
     Or faintest light that falls on earthly ground,
     If he could know it one day would be found
     That star in Cygnus whither we are bound,
     And pale our sun with heavenly radiance round?

Gradually the village murmur subsided, and we seemed to be
embarked on the placid current of our dreams, floating from past
to future as silently as one awakes to fresh morning or evening
thoughts.  We glided noiselessly down the stream, occasionally
driving a pickerel or a bream from the covert of the pads, and
the smaller bittern now and then sailed away on sluggish wings
from some recess in the shore, or the larger lifted itself out of
the long grass at our approach, and carried its precious legs
away to deposit them in a place of safety.  The tortoises also
rapidly dropped into the water, as our boat ruffled the surface
amid the willows, breaking the reflections of the trees.  The
banks had passed the height of their beauty, and some of the
brighter flowers showed by their faded tints that the season was
verging towards the afternoon of the year; but this sombre tinge
enhanced their sincerity, and in the still unabated heats they
seemed like the mossy brink of some cool well.  The narrow-leaved
willow (_Salix Purshiana_) lay along the surface of the water in
masses of light green foliage, interspersed with the large balls
of the button-bush.  The small rose-colored polygonum raised its
head proudly above the water on either hand, and flowering at
this season and in these localities, in front of dense fields of
the white species which skirted the sides of the stream, its
little streak of red looked very rare and precious.  The pure
white blossoms of the arrow-head stood in the shallower parts,
and a few cardinals on the margin still proudly surveyed
themselves reflected in the water, though the latter, as well
as the pickerel-weed, was now nearly out of blossom.  The
snake-head, _Chelone glabra_, grew close to the shore, while a
kind of coreopsis, turning its brazen face to the sun, full and
rank, and a tall dull red flower, _Eupatorium purpureum_, or
trumpet-weed, formed the rear rank of the fluvial array.  The
bright blue flowers of the soap-wort gentian were sprinkled here
and there in the adjacent meadows, like flowers which Proserpine
had dropped, and still farther in the fields or higher on the
bank were seen the purple Gerardia, the Virginian rhexia, and
drooping neottia or ladies'-tresses; while from the more distant
waysides which we occasionally passed, and banks where the sun
had lodged, was reflected still a dull yellow beam from the ranks
of tansy, now past its prime.  In short, Nature seemed to have
adorned herself for our departure with a profusion of fringes and
curls, mingled with the bright tints of flowers, reflected in the
water.  But we missed the white water-lily, which is the queen of
river flowers, its reign being over for this season.  He makes
his voyage too late, perhaps, by a true water clock who delays so
long.  Many of this species inhabit our Concord water.  I have
passed down the river before sunrise on a summer morning between
fields of lilies still shut in sleep; and when, at length, the
flakes of sunlight from over the bank fell on the surface of the
water, whole fields of white blossoms seemed to flash open before
me, as I floated along, like the unfolding of a banner, so
sensible is this flower to the influence of the sun's rays.

As we were floating through the last of these familiar meadows,
we observed the large and conspicuous flowers of the hibiscus,
covering the dwarf willows, and mingled with the leaves of the
grape, and wished that we could inform one of our friends behind
of the locality of this somewhat rare and inaccessible flower
before it was too late to pluck it; but we were just gliding out
of sight of the village spire before it occurred to us that the
farmer in the adjacent meadow would go to church on the morrow,
and would carry this news for us; and so by the Monday, while we
should be floating on the Merrimack, our friend would be reaching
to pluck this blossom on the bank of the Concord.

After a pause at Ball's Hill, the St. Ann's of Concord voyageurs,
not to say any prayer for the success of our voyage, but to
gather the few berries which were still left on the hills,
hanging by very slender threads, we weighed anchor again, and
were soon out of sight of our native village.  The land seemed to
grow fairer as we withdrew from it.  Far away to the southwest
lay the quiet village, left alone under its elms and buttonwoods
in mid afternoon; and the hills, notwithstanding their blue,
ethereal faces, seemed to cast a saddened eye on their old
playfellows; but, turning short to the north, we bade adieu to
their familiar outlines, and addressed ourselves to new scenes
and adventures.  Naught was familiar but the heavens, from under
whose roof the voyageur never passes; but with their countenance,
and the acquaintance we had with river and wood, we trusted to
fare well under any circumstances.

From this point, the river runs perfectly straight for a mile or
more to Carlisle Bridge, which consists of twenty wooden piers,
and when we looked back over it, its surface was reduced to a
line's breadth, and appeared like a cobweb gleaming in the sun.
Here and there might be seen a pole sticking up, to mark the
place where some fisherman had enjoyed unusual luck, and in
return had consecrated his rod to the deities who preside over
these shallows.  It was full twice as broad as before, deep and
tranquil, with a muddy bottom, and bordered with willows, beyond
which spread broad lagoons covered with pads, bulrushes, and
flags.

Late in the afternoon we passed a man on the shore fishing with a
long birch pole, its silvery bark left on, and a dog at his side,
rowing so near as to agitate his cork with our oars, and drive
away luck for a season; and when we had rowed a mile as straight
as an arrow, with our faces turned towards him, and the bubbles
in our wake still visible on the tranquil surface, there stood
the fisher still with his dog, like statues under the other side
of the heavens, the only objects to relieve the eye in the
extended meadow; and there would he stand abiding his luck, till
he took his way home through the fields at evening with his
fish.  Thus, by one bait or another, Nature allures inhabitants
into all her recesses.  This man was the last of our townsmen
whom we saw, and we silently through him bade adieu to our
friends.


The characteristics and pursuits of various ages and races of men
are always existing in epitome in every neighborhood.  The
pleasures of my earliest youth have become the inheritance of
other men.  This man is still a fisher, and belongs to an era in
which I myself have lived.  Perchance he is not confounded by many
knowledges, and has not sought out many inventions, but how to
take many fishes before the sun sets, with his slender birchen
pole and flaxen line, that is invention enough for him.  It is
good even to be a fisherman in summer and in winter.  Some men are
judges these August days, sitting on benches, even till the court
rises; they sit judging there honorably, between the seasons and
between meals, leading a civil politic life, arbitrating in the
case of Spaulding _versus_ Cummings, it may be, from highest noon
till the red vesper sinks into the west.  The fisherman,
meanwhile, stands in three feet of water, under the same summer's
sun, arbitrating in other cases between muckworm and shiner, amid
the fragrance of water-lilies, mint, and pontederia, leading his
life many rods from the dry land, within a pole's length of where
the larger fishes swim.  Human life is to him very much like a
river,

   "renning aie downward to the sea."

This was his observation.  His honor made a great discovery in
bailments.

I can just remember an old brown-coated man who was the Walton of
this stream, who had come over from Newcastle, England, with his
son,--the latter a stout and hearty man who had lifted an anchor
in his day.  A straight old man he was who took his way in silence
through the meadows, having passed the period of communication
with his fellows; his old experienced coat, hanging long and
straight and brown as the yellow-pine bark, glittering with so
much smothered sunlight, if you stood near enough, no work of art
but naturalized at length.  I often discovered him unexpectedly
amid the pads and the gray willows when he moved, fishing in some
old country method,--for youth and age then went a fishing
together,--full of incommunicable thoughts, perchance about his
own Tyne and Northumberland.  He was always to be seen in serene
afternoons haunting the river, and almost rustling with the
sedge; so many sunny hours in an old man's life, entrapping silly
fish; almost grown to be the sun's familiar; what need had he of
hat or raiment any, having served out his time, and seen through
such thin disguises?  I have seen how his coeval fates rewarded
him with the yellow perch, and yet I thought his luck was not in
proportion to his years; and I have seen when, with slow steps
and weighed down with aged thoughts, he disappeared with his fish
under his low-roofed house on the skirts of the village.  I think
nobody else saw him; nobody else remembers him now, for he soon
after died, and migrated to new Tyne streams.  His fishing was
not a sport, nor solely a means of subsistence, but a sort of
solemn sacrament and withdrawal from the world, just as the aged
read their Bibles.


Whether we live by the seaside, or by the lakes and rivers, or on
the prairie, it concerns us to attend to the nature of fishes,
since they are not phenomena confined to certain localities only,
but forms and phases of the life in nature universally dispersed.
The countless shoals which annually coast the shores of Europe
and America are not so interesting to the student of nature, as
the more fertile law itself, which deposits their spawn on the
tops of mountains, and on the interior plains; the fish principle
in nature, from which it results that they may be found in water
in so many places, in greater or less numbers.  The natural
historian is not a fisherman, who prays for cloudy days and good
luck merely, but as fishing has been styled "a contemplative
man's recreation," introducing him profitably to woods and water,
so the fruit of the naturalist's observations is not in new
genera or species, but in new contemplations still, and science
is only a more contemplative man's recreation.  The seeds of the
life of fishes are everywhere disseminated, whether the winds
waft them, or the waters float them, or the deep earth holds
them; wherever a pond is dug, straightway it is stocked with this
vivacious race.  They have a lease of nature, and it is not yet
out.  The Chinese are bribed to carry their ova from province to
province in jars or in hollow reeds, or the water-birds to
transport them to the mountain tarns and interior lakes.  There
are fishes wherever there is a fluid medium, and even in clouds
and in melted metals we detect their semblance.  Think how in
winter you can sink a line down straight in a pasture through
snow and through ice, and pull up a bright, slippery, dumb,
subterranean silver or golden fish!  It is curious, also, to
reflect how they make one family, from the largest to the
smallest.  The least minnow that lies on the ice as bait for
pickerel, looks like a huge sea-fish cast up on the shore.  In
the waters of this town there are about a dozen distinct species,
though the inexperienced would expect many more.


It enhances our sense of the grand security and serenity of
nature, to observe the still undisturbed economy and content of
the fishes of this century, their happiness a regular fruit of
the summer.  The Fresh-Water Sun-Fish, Bream, or Ruff, _Pomotis
vulgaris_, as it were, without ancestry, without posterity, still
represents the Fresh-Water Sun-Fish in nature.  It is the most
common of all, and seen on every urchin's string; a simple and
inoffensive fish, whose nests are visible all along the shore,
hollowed in the sand, over which it is steadily poised through
the summer hours on waving fin.  Sometimes there are twenty or
thirty nests in the space of a few rods, two feet wide by half a
foot in depth, and made with no little labor, the weeds being
removed, and the sand shoved up on the sides, like a bowl.  Here
it may be seen early in summer assiduously brooding, and driving
away minnows and larger fishes, even its own species, which would
disturb its ova, pursuing them a few feet, and circling round
swiftly to its nest again: the minnows, like young sharks,
instantly entering the empty nests, meanwhile, and swallowing the
spawn, which is attached to the weeds and to the bottom, on the
sunny side.  The spawn is exposed to so many dangers, that a very
small proportion can ever become fishes, for beside being the
constant prey of birds and fishes, a great many nests are made so
near the shore, in shallow water, that they are left dry in a few
days, as the river goes down.  These and the lamprey's are the
only fishes' nests that I have observed, though the ova of some
species may be seen floating on the surface.  The breams are so
careful of their charge that you may stand close by in the water
and examine them at your leisure.  I have thus stood over them
half an hour at a time, and stroked them familiarly without
frightening them, suffering them to nibble my fingers harmlessly,
and seen them erect their dorsal fins in anger when my hand
approached their ova, and have even taken them gently out of the
water with my hand; though this cannot be accomplished by a
sudden movement, however dexterous, for instant warning is
conveyed to them through their denser element, but only by
letting the fingers gradually close about them as they are poised
over the palm, and with the utmost gentleness raising them slowly
to the surface.  Though stationary, they keep up a constant
sculling or waving motion with their fins, which is exceedingly
graceful, and expressive of their humble happiness; for unlike
ours, the element in which they live is a stream which must be
constantly resisted.  From time to time they nibble the weeds at
the bottom or overhanging their nests, or dart after a fly or a
worm.  The dorsal fin, besides answering the purpose of a keel,
with the anal, serves to keep the fish upright, for in shallow
water, where this is not covered, they fall on their sides.  As
you stand thus stooping over the bream in its nest, the edges of
the dorsal and caudal fins have a singular dusty golden
reflection, and its eyes, which stand out from the head, are
transparent and colorless.  Seen in its native element, it is a
very beautiful and compact fish, perfect in all its parts, and
looks like a brilliant coin fresh from the mint.  It is a perfect
jewel of the river, the green, red, coppery, and golden
reflections of its mottled sides being the concentration of such
rays as struggle through the floating pads and flowers to the
sandy bottom, and in harmony with the sunlit brown and yellow
pebbles.  Behind its watery shield it dwells far from many
accidents inevitable to human life.

There is also another species of bream found in our river,
without the red spot on the operculum, which, according to
M.  Agassiz, is undescribed.

The Common Perch, _Perca flavescens_, which name describes well the
gleaming, golden reflections of its scales as it is drawn out of
the water, its red gills standing out in vain in the thin
element, is one of the handsomest and most regularly formed of
our fishes, and at such a moment as this reminds us of the fish
in the picture which wished to be restored to its native element
until it had grown larger; and indeed most of this species that
are caught are not half grown.  In the ponds there is a
light-colored and slender kind, which swim in shoals of many
hundreds in the sunny water, in company with the shiner,
averaging not more than six or seven inches in length, while only
a few larger specimens are found in the deepest water, which prey
upon their weaker brethren.  I have often attracted these small
perch to the shore at evening, by rippling the water with my
fingers, and they may sometimes be caught while attempting to
pass inside your hands.  It is a tough and heedless fish, biting
from impulse, without nibbling, and from impulse refraining to
bite, and sculling indifferently past.  It rather prefers the
clear water and sandy bottoms, though here it has not much
choice.  It is a true fish, such as the angler loves to put into
his basket or hang at the top of his willow twig, in shady
afternoons along the banks of the stream.  So many unquestionable
fishes he counts, and so many shiners, which he counts and then
throws away.  Old Josselyn in his "New England's Rarities,"
published in 1672, mentions the Perch or River Partridge.

The Chivin, Dace, Roach, Cousin Trout, or whatever else it is
called, _Leuciscus pulchellus_, white and red, always an unexpected
prize, which, however, any angler is glad to hook for its
rarity.  A name that reminds us of many an unsuccessful ramble by
swift streams, when the wind rose to disappoint the fisher.  It is
commonly a silvery soft-scaled fish, of graceful, scholarlike,
and classical look, like many a picture in an English book.  It
loves a swift current and a sandy bottom, and bites
inadvertently, yet not without appetite for the bait.  The
minnows are used as bait for pickerel in the winter.  The red
chivin, according to some, is still the same fish, only older, or
with its tints deepened as they think by the darker water it
inhabits, as the red clouds swim in the twilight atmosphere.  He
who has not hooked the red chivin is not yet a complete angler.
Other fishes, methinks, are slightly amphibious, but this is a
denizen of the water wholly.  The cork goes dancing down the
swift-rushing stream, amid the weeds and sands, when suddenly, by
a coincidence never to be remembered, emerges this fabulous
inhabitant of another element, a thing heard of but not seen, as
if it were the instant creation of an eddy, a true product of the
running stream.  And this bright cupreous dolphin was spawned and
has passed its life beneath the level of your feet in your native
fields.  Fishes too, as well as birds and clouds, derive their
armor from the mine.  I have heard of mackerel visiting the copper
banks at a particular season; this fish, perchance, has its
habitat in the Coppermine River.  I have caught white chivin of
great size in the Aboljacknagesic, where it empties into the
Penobscot, at the base of Mount Ktaadn, but no red ones
there.  The latter variety seems not to have been sufficiently
observed.

The Dace, _Leuciscus argenteus_, is a slight silvery minnow, found
generally in the middle of the stream, where the current is most
rapid, and frequently confounded with the last named.

The Shiner, _Leuciscus crysoleucas_, is a soft-scaled and tender
fish, the victim of its stronger neighbors, found in all places,
deep and shallow, clear and turbid; generally the first nibbler
at the bait, but, with its small mouth and nibbling propensities,
not easily caught.  It is a gold or silver bit that passes current
in the river, its limber tail dimpling the surface in sport or
flight.  I have seen the fry, when frightened by something thrown
into the water, leap out by dozens, together with the dace, and
wreck themselves upon a floating plank.  It is the little
light-infant of the river, with body armor of gold or silver
spangles, slipping, gliding its life through with a quirk of the
tail, half in the water, half in the air, upward and ever upward
with flitting fin to more crystalline tides, yet still abreast of
us dwellers on the bank.  It is almost dissolved by the summer
heats.  A slighter and lighter colored shiner is found in one of
our ponds.

The Pickerel, _Esox reticulatus_, the swiftest, wariest, and most
ravenous of fishes, which Josselyn calls the Fresh-Water or River
Wolf, is very common in the shallow and weedy lagoons along the
sides of the stream.  It is a solemn, stately, ruminant fish,
lurking under the shadow of a pad at noon, with still,
circumspect, voracious eye, motionless as a jewel set in water,
or moving slowly along to take up its position, darting from time
to time at such unlucky fish or frog or insect as comes within
its range, and swallowing it at a gulp.  I have caught one which
had swallowed a brother pickerel half as large as itself, with
the tail still visible in its mouth, while the head was already
digested in its stomach.  Sometimes a striped snake, bound to
greener meadows across the stream, ends its undulatory progress
in the same receptacle.  They are so greedy and impetuous that
they are frequently caught by being entangled in the line the
moment it is cast.  Fishermen also distinguish the brook pickerel,
a shorter and thicker fish than the former.

The Horned Pout, _Pimelodus nebulosus_, sometimes called Minister,
from the peculiar squeaking noise it makes when drawn out of the
water, is a dull and blundering fellow, and like the eel
vespertinal in his habits, and fond of the mud.  It bites
deliberately as if about its business.  They are taken at night
with a mass of worms strung on a thread, which catches in their
teeth, sometimes three or four, with an eel, at one pull.  They
are extremely tenacious of life, opening and shutting their
mouths for half an hour after their heads have been cut off.  A
bloodthirsty and bullying race of rangers, inhabiting the fertile
river bottoms, with ever a lance in rest, and ready to do battle
with their nearest neighbor.  I have observed them in summer, when
every other one had a long and bloody scar upon his back, where
the skin was gone, the mark, perhaps, of some fierce
encounter.  Sometimes the fry, not an inch long, are seen
darkening the shore with their myriads.

The Suckers, _Catostomi Bostonienses_ and _tuberculati_, Common and
Horned, perhaps on an average the largest of our fishes, may be
seen in shoals of a hundred or more, stemming the current in the
sun, on their mysterious migrations, and sometimes sucking in the
bait which the fisherman suffers to float toward them.  The
former, which sometimes grow to a large size, are frequently
caught by the hand in the brooks, or like the red chivin, are
jerked out by a hook fastened firmly to the end of a stick, and
placed under their jaws.  They are hardly known to the mere
angler, however, not often biting at his baits, though the
spearer carries home many a mess in the spring.  To our village
eyes, these shoals have a foreign and imposing aspect, realizing
the fertility of the seas.

The Common Eel, too, _Muraena Bostoniensis_, the only species of
eel known in the State, a slimy, squirming creature, informed of
mud, still squirming in the pan, is speared and hooked up with
various success.  Methinks it too occurs in picture, left after
the deluge, in many a meadow high and dry.

In the shallow parts of the river, where the current is rapid,
and the bottom pebbly, you may sometimes see the curious circular
nests of the Lamprey Eel, _Petromyzon Americanus_, the American
Stone-Sucker, as large as a cart-wheel, a foot or two in height,
and sometimes rising half a foot above the surface of the
water.  They collect these stones, of the size of a hen's egg,
with their mouths, as their name implies, and are said to fashion
them into circles with their tails.  They ascend falls by clinging
to the stones, which may sometimes be raised, by lifting the fish
by the tail.  As they are not seen on their way down the streams,
it is thought by fishermen that they never return, but waste away
and die, clinging to rocks and stumps of trees for an indefinite
period; a tragic feature in the scenery of the river bottoms
worthy to be remembered with Shakespeare's description of the
sea-floor.  They are rarely seen in our waters at present, on
account of the dams, though they are taken in great quantities at
the mouth of the river in Lowell.  Their nests, which are very
conspicuous, look more like art than anything in the river.

If we had leisure this afternoon, we might turn our prow up the
brooks in quest of the classical trout and the minnows.  Of the
last alone, according to M.  Agassiz, several of the species found
in this town are yet undescribed.  These would, perhaps, complete
the list of our finny contemporaries in the Concord waters.

Salmon, Shad, and Alewives were formerly abundant here, and taken
in weirs by the Indians, who taught this method to the whites, by
whom they were used as food and as manure, until the dam, and
afterward the canal at Billerica, and the factories at Lowell,
put an end to their migrations hitherward; though it is thought
that a few more enterprising shad may still occasionally be seen
in this part of the river.  It is said, to account for the
destruction of the fishery, that those who at that time
represented the interests of the fishermen and the fishes,
remembering between what dates they were accustomed to take the
grown shad, stipulated, that the dams should be left open for
that season only, and the fry, which go down a month later, were
consequently stopped and destroyed by myriads.  Others say that
the fish-ways were not properly constructed.  Perchance, after a
few thousands of years, if the fishes will be patient, and pass
their summers elsewhere, meanwhile, nature will have levelled the
Billerica dam, and the Lowell factories, and the Grass-ground
River run clear again, to be explored by new migratory shoals,
even as far as the Hopkinton pond and Westborough swamp.

One would like to know more of that race, now extinct, whose
seines lie rotting in the garrets of their children, who openly
professed the trade of fishermen, and even fed their townsmen
creditably, not skulking through the meadows to a rainy afternoon
sport.  Dim visions we still get of miraculous draughts of fishes,
and heaps uncountable by the river-side, from the tales of our
seniors sent on horseback in their childhood from the neighboring
towns, perched on saddle-bags, with instructions to get the one
bag filled with shad, the other with alewives.  At least one
memento of those days may still exist in the memory of this
generation, in the familiar appellation of a celebrated
train-band of this town, whose untrained ancestors stood
creditably at Concord North Bridge.  Their captain, a man of
piscatory tastes, having duly warned his company to turn out on a
certain day, they, like obedient soldiers, appeared promptly on
parade at the appointed time, but, unfortunately, they went
undrilled, except in the manuoevres of a soldier's wit and
unlicensed jesting, that May day; for their captain, forgetting
his own appointment, and warned only by the favorable aspect of
the heavens, as he had often done before, went a-fishing that
afternoon, and his company thenceforth was known to old and
young, grave and gay, as "The Shad," and by the youths of this
vicinity this was long regarded as the proper name of all the
irregular militia in Christendom.  But, alas! no record of these
fishers' lives remains that we know, unless it be one brief page
of hard but unquestionable history, which occurs in Day Book
No.  4, of an old trader of this town, long since dead, which
shows pretty plainly what constituted a fisherman's stock in
trade in those days.  It purports to be a Fisherman's Account
Current, probably for the fishing season of the year 1805, during
which months he purchased daily rum and sugar, sugar and rum,
N. E.  and W. I., "one cod line," "one brown mug," and "a line for
the seine"; rum and sugar, sugar and rum, "good loaf sugar," and
"good brown," W. I.  and N. E., in short and uniform entries to
the bottom of the page, all carried out in pounds, shillings, and
pence, from March 25th to June 5th, and promptly settled by
receiving "cash in full" at the last date.  But perhaps not so
settled altogether.  These were the necessaries of life in those
days; with salmon, shad, and alewives, fresh and pickled, he was
thereafter independent on the groceries.  Rather a preponderance
of the fluid elements; but such is the fisherman's nature.  I can
faintly remember to have seen this same fisher in my earliest
youth, still as near the river as he could get, with uncertain
undulatory step, after so many things had gone down stream,
swinging a scythe in the meadow, his bottle like a serpent hid in
the grass; himself as yet not cut down by the Great Mower.

Surely the fates are forever kind, though Nature's laws are more
immutable than any despot's, yet to man's daily life they rarely
seem rigid, but permit him to relax with license in summer
weather.  He is not harshly reminded of the things he may not
do.  She is very kind and liberal to all men of vicious habits,
and certainly does not deny them quarter; they do not die without
priest.  Still they maintain life along the way, keeping this side
the Styx, still hearty, still resolute, "never better in their
lives"; and again, after a dozen years have elapsed, they start
up from behind a hedge, asking for work and wages for able-bodied
men.  Who has not met such

       "a beggar on the way,
   Who sturdily could gang? ....
   Who cared neither for wind nor wet,
   In lands where'er he past?"

   "That bold adopts each house he views, his own;
   Makes every pulse his checquer, and, at pleasure,
   Walks forth, and taxes all the world, like Caesar";--

as if consistency were the secret of health, while the poor
inconsistent aspirant man, seeking to live a pure life, feeding
on air, divided against himself, cannot stand, but pines and dies
after a life of sickness, on beds of down.

The unwise are accustomed to speak as if some were not sick; but
methinks the difference between men in respect to health is not
great enough to lay much stress upon.  Some are reputed sick and
some are not.  It often happens that the sicker man is the nurse
to the sounder.

Shad are still taken in the basin of Concord River at Lowell,
where they are said to be a month earlier than the Merrimack
shad, on account of the warmth of the water.  Still patiently,
almost pathetically, with instinct not to be discouraged, not to
be _reasoned_ with, revisiting their old haunts, as if their
stern fates would relent, and still met by the Corporation with
its dam.  Poor shad!  where is thy redress?  When Nature gave thee
instinct, gave she thee the heart to bear thy fate?  Still
wandering the sea in thy scaly armor to inquire humbly at the
mouths of rivers if man has perchance left them free for thee to
enter.  By countless shoals loitering uncertain meanwhile, merely
stemming the tide there, in danger from sea foes in spite of thy
bright armor, awaiting new instructions, until the sands, until
the water itself, tell thee if it be so or not.  Thus by whole
migrating nations, full of instinct, which is thy faith, in this
backward spring, turned adrift, and perchance knowest not where
men do _not_ dwell, where there are _not_ factories, in these
days.  Armed with no sword, no electric shock, but mere Shad,
armed only with innocence and a just cause, with tender dumb
mouth only forward, and scales easy to be detached.  I for one am
with thee, and who knows what may avail a crow-bar against that
Billerica dam?--Not despairing when whole myriads have gone to
feed those sea monsters during thy suspense, but still brave,
indifferent, on easy fin there, like shad reserved for higher
destinies.  Willing to be decimated for man's behoof after the
spawning season.  Away with the superficial and selfish
phil-_anthropy_ of men,--who knows what admirable virtue of
fishes may be below low-water-mark, bearing up against a hard
destiny, not admired by that fellow-creature who alone can
appreciate it!  Who hears the fishes when they cry?  It will not
be forgotten by some memory that we were contemporaries.  Thou
shalt erelong have thy way up the rivers, up all the rivers of
the globe, if I am not mistaken.  Yea, even thy dull watery dream
shall be more than realized.  If it were not so, but thou wert to
be overlooked at first and at last, then would not I take their
heaven.  Yes, I say so, who think I know better than thou canst.
Keep a stiff fin then, and stem all the tides thou mayst meet.

At length it would seem that the interests, not of the fishes
only, but of the men of Wayland, of Sudbury, of Concord, demand
the levelling of that dam.  Innumerable acres of meadow are
waiting to be made dry land, wild native grass to give place to
English.  The farmers stand with scythes whet, waiting the
subsiding of the waters, by gravitation, by evaporation or
otherwise, but sometimes their eyes do not rest, their wheels do
not roll, on the quaking meadow ground during the haying season
at all.  So many sources of wealth inaccessible.  They rate the
loss hereby incurred in the single town of Wayland alone as equal
to the expense of keeping a hundred yoke of oxen the year
round.  One year, as I learn, not long ago, the farmers standing
ready to drive their teams afield as usual, the water gave no
signs of falling; without new attraction in the heavens, without
freshet or visible cause, still standing stagnant at an
unprecedented height.  All hydrometers were at fault; some
trembled for their English even.  But speedy emissaries revealed
the unnatural secret, in the new float-board, wholly a foot in
width, added to their already too high privileges by the dam
proprietors.  The hundred yoke of oxen, meanwhile, standing
patient, gazing wishfully meadowward, at that inaccessible waving
native grass, uncut but by the great mower Time, who cuts so
broad a swathe, without so much as a wisp to wind about their
horns.


That was a long pull from Ball's Hill to Carlisle Bridge, sitting
with our faces to the south, a slight breeze rising from the
north, but nevertheless water still runs and grass grows, for
now, having passed the bridge between Carlisle and Bedford, we
see men haying far off in the meadow, their heads waving like the
grass which they cut.  In the distance the wind seemed to bend all
alike.  As the night stole over, such a freshness was wafted
across the meadow that every blade of cut grass seemed to teem
with life.  Faint purple clouds began to be reflected in the
water, and the cow-bells tinkled louder along the banks, while,
like sly water-rats, we stole along nearer the shore, looking for
a place to pitch our camp.

At length, when we had made about seven miles, as far as
Billerica, we moored our boat on the west side of a little rising
ground which in the spring forms an island in the river.  Here we
found huckleberries still hanging upon the bushes, where they
seemed to have slowly ripened for our especial use.  Bread and
sugar, and cocoa boiled in river water, made our repast, and as
we had drank in the fluvial prospect all day, so now we took a
draft of the water with our evening meal to propitiate the river
gods, and whet our vision for the sights it was to behold.  The
sun was setting on the one hand, while our eminence was
contributing its shadow to the night, on the other.  It seemed
insensibly to grow lighter as the night shut in, and a distant
and solitary farm-house was revealed, which before lurked in the
shadows of the noon.  There was no other house in sight, nor any
cultivated field.  To the right and left, as far as the horizon,
were straggling pine woods with their plumes against the sky, and
across the river were rugged hills, covered with shrub oaks,
tangled with grape-vines and ivy, with here and there a gray rock
jutting out from the maze.  The sides of these cliffs, though a
quarter of a mile distant, were almost heard to rustle while we
looked at them, it was such a leafy wilderness; a place for fauns
and satyrs, and where bats hung all day to the rocks, and at
evening flitted over the water, and fire-flies husbanded their
light under the grass and leaves against the night.  When we had
pitched our tent on the hillside, a few rods from the shore, we
sat looking through its triangular door in the twilight at our
lonely mast on the shore, just seen above the alders, and hardly
yet come to a stand-still from the swaying of the stream; the
first encroachment of commerce on this land.  There was our port,
our Ostia.  That straight geometrical line against the water and
the sky stood for the last refinements of civilized life, and
what of sublimity there is in history was there symbolized.

For the most part, there was no recognition of human life in the
night, no human breathing was heard, only the breathing of the
wind.  As we sat up, kept awake by the novelty of our situation,
we heard at intervals foxes stepping about over the dead leaves,
and brushing the dewy grass close to our tent, and once a
musquash fumbling among the potatoes and melons in our boat, but
when we hastened to the shore we could detect only a ripple in
the water ruffling the disk of a star.  At intervals we were
serenaded by the song of a dreaming sparrow or the throttled cry
of an owl, but after each sound which near at hand broke the
stillness of the night, each crackling of the twigs, or rustling
among the leaves, there was a sudden pause, and deeper and more
conscious silence, as if the intruder were aware that no life was
rightfully abroad at that hour.  There was a fire in Lowell, as
we judged, this night, and we saw the horizon blazing, and heard
the distant alarm-bells, as it were a faint tinkling music borne
to these woods.  But the most constant and memorable sound of a
summer's night, which we did not fail to hear every night
afterward, though at no time so incessantly and so favorably as
now, was the barking of the house-dogs, from the loudest and
hoarsest bark to the faintest aerial palpitation under the eaves
of heaven, from the patient but anxious mastiff to the timid and
wakeful terrier, at first loud and rapid, then faint and slow, to
be imitated only in a whisper; wow-wow-wow-wow--wo--wo--w--w.
Even in a retired and uninhabited district like this, it was a
sufficiency of sound for the ear of night, and more impressive
than any music.  I have heard the voice of a hound, just before
daylight, while the stars were shining, from over the woods and
river, far in the horizon, when it sounded as sweet and melodious
as an instrument.  The hounding of a dog pursuing a fox or other
animal in the horizon, may have first suggested the notes of the
hunting-horn to alternate with and relieve the lungs of the dog.
This natural bugle long resounded in the woods of the ancient
world before the horn was invented.  The very dogs that sullenly
bay the moon from farm-yards in these nights excite more heroism
in our breasts than all the civil exhortations or war sermons of
the age.  "I would rather be a dog, and bay the moon," than many
a Roman that I know.  The night is equally indebted to the
clarion of the cock, with wakeful hope, from the very setting of
the sun, prematurely ushering in the dawn.  All these sounds, the
crowing of cocks, the baying of dogs, and the hum of insects at
noon, are the evidence of nature's health or _sound_ state.  Such
is the never-failing beauty and accuracy of language, the most
perfect art in the world; the chisel of a thousand years
retouches it.

At length the antepenultimate and drowsy hours drew on, and all
sounds were denied entrance to our ears.

     Who sleeps by day and walks by night,
     Will meet no spirit but some sprite.




[page]


                         SUNDAY.


           "The river calmly flows,
        Through shining banks, through lonely glen,
     Where the owl shrieks, though ne'er the cheer of men
           Has stirred its mute repose,
     Still if you should walk there, you would go there again."
                                          ^CHANNING.^


[page]


   "The Indians tell us of a beautiful River lying far to the south,
which they call Merrimack."

              ^Sieur de Monts^, _Relations of the jesuits_, 1604.


[page]



                        SUNDAY.

                        --*--


In the morning the river and adjacent country were covered with a
dense fog, through which the smoke of our fire curled up like a
still subtiler mist; but before we had rowed many rods, the sun
arose and the fog rapidly dispersed, leaving a slight steam only
to curl along the surface of the water.  It was a quiet Sunday
morning, with more of the auroral rosy and white than of the
yellow light in it, as if it dated from earlier than the fall of
man, and still preserved a heathenish integrity:--

     An early unconverted Saint,
     Free from noontide or evening taint,
     Heathen without reproach,
     That did upon the civil day encroach,
     And ever since its birth
     Had trod the outskirts of the earth.

But the impressions which the morning makes vanish with its dews,
and not even the most "persevering mortal" can preserve the
memory of its freshness to mid-day.  As we passed the various
islands, or what were islands in the spring, rowing with our
backs down stream, we gave names to them.  The one on which we had
camped we called Fox Island, and one fine densely wooded island
surrounded by deep water and overrun by grape-vines, which looked
like a mass of verdure and of flowers cast upon the waves, we
named Grape Island.  From Ball's Hill to Billerica meeting-house,
the river was still twice as broad as in Concord, a deep, dark,
and dead stream, flowing between gentle hills and sometimes
cliffs, and well wooded all the way.  It was a long woodland lake
bordered with willows.  For long reaches we could see neither
house nor cultivated field, nor any sign of the vicinity of
man.  Now we coasted along some shallow shore by the edge of a
dense palisade of bulrushes, which straightly bounded the water
as if clipt by art, reminding us of the reed forts of the
East-Indians, of which we had read; and now the bank slightly
raised was overhung with graceful grasses and various species of
brake, whose downy stems stood closely grouped and naked as in a
vase, while their heads spread several feet on either side.  The
dead limbs of the willow were rounded and adorned by the climbing
mikania, _Mikania scandens_, which filled every crevice in the
leafy bank, contrasting agreeably with the gray bark of its
supporter and the balls of the button-bush.  The water willow,
_Salix Purshiana_, when it is of large size and entire, is the most
graceful and ethereal of our trees.  Its masses of light green
foliage, piled one upon another to the height of twenty or thirty
feet, seemed to float on the surface of the water, while the
slight gray stems and the shore were hardly visible between
them.  No tree is so wedded to the water, and harmonizes so well
with still streams.  It is even more graceful than the weeping
willow, or any pendulous trees, which dip their branches in the
stream instead of being buoyed up by it.  Its limbs curved outward
over the surface as if attracted by it.  It had not a New England
but an Oriental character, reminding us of trim Persian gardens,
of Haroun Alraschid, and the artificial lakes of the East.

As we thus dipped our way along between fresh masses of foliage
overrun with the grape and smaller flowering vines, the surface
was so calm, and both air and water so transparent, that the
flight of a kingfisher or robin over the river was as distinctly
seen reflected in the water below as in the air above.  The birds
seemed to flit through submerged groves, alighting on the
yielding sprays, and their clear notes to come up from below.  We
were uncertain whether the water floated the land, or the land
held the water in its bosom.  It was such a season, in short, as
that in which one of our Concord poets sailed on its stream, and
sung its quiet glories.

   "There is an inward voice, that in the stream
   Sends forth its spirit to the listening ear,
   And in a calm content it floweth on,
   Like wisdom, welcome with its own respect.
   Clear in its breast lie all these beauteous thoughts,
   It doth receive the green and graceful trees,
   And the gray rocks smile in its peaceful arms."

And more he sung, but too serious for our page.  For every oak and
birch too growing on the hill-top, as well as for these elms and
willows, we knew that there was a graceful ethereal and ideal
tree making down from the roots, and sometimes Nature in high
tides brings her mirror to its foot and makes it visible.  The
stillness was intense and almost conscious, as if it were a
natural Sabbath, and we fancied that the morning was the evening
of a celestial day.  The air was so elastic and crystalline that
it had the same effect on the landscape that a glass has on a
picture, to give it an ideal remoteness and perfection.  The
landscape was clothed in a mild and quiet light, in which the
woods and fences checkered and partitioned it with new
regularity, and rough and uneven fields stretched away with
lawn-like smoothness to the horizon, and the clouds, finely
distinct and picturesque, seemed a fit drapery to hang over
fairy-land.  The world seemed decked for some holiday or prouder
pageantry, with silken streamers flying, and the course of our
lives to wind on before us like a green lane into a country maze,
at the season when fruit-trees are in blossom.

Why should not our whole life and its scenery be actually thus
fair and distinct?  All our lives want a suitable background.  They
should at least, like the life of the anchorite, be as impressive
to behold as objects in the desert, a broken shaft or crumbling
mound against a limitless horizon.  Character always secures for
itself this advantage, and is thus distinct and unrelated to near
or trivial objects, whether things or persons.  On this same
stream a maiden once sailed in my boat, thus unattended but by
invisible guardians, and as she sat in the prow there was nothing
but herself between the steersman and the sky.  I could then say
with the poet,--

         "Sweet falls the summer air
      Over her frame who sails with me;
      Her way like that is beautifully free,
         Her nature far more rare,
   And is her constant heart of virgin purity."

At evening still the very stars seem but this maiden's emissaries
and reporters of her progress.

   Low in the eastern sky
   Is set thy glancing eye;
   And though its gracious light
   Ne'er riseth to my sight,
   Yet every star that climbs
   Above the gnarled limbs
       Of yonder hill,
   Conveys thy gentle will.

   Believe I knew thy thought,
   And that the zephyrs brought
   Thy kindest wishes through,
   As mine they bear to you,
   That some attentive cloud
   Did pause amid the crowd
       Over my head,
   While gentle things were said.

   Believe the thrushes sung,
   And that the flower-bells rung,
   That herbs exhaled their scent,
   And beasts knew what was meant,
   The trees a welcome waved,
   And lakes their margins laved,
       When thy free mind
   To my retreat did wind.

   It was a summer eve,
   The air did gently heave
   While yet a low-hung cloud
   Thy eastern skies did shroud;
   The lightning's silent gleam,
   Startling my drowsy dream,
       Seemed like the flash
   Under thy dark eyelash.

   Still will I strive to be
   As if thou wert with me;
   Whatever path I take,
   It shall be for thy sake,
   Of gentle slope and wide,
   As thou wert by my side,
       Without a root
   To trip thy gentle foot.

   I 'll walk with gentle pace,
   And choose the smoothest place
   And careful dip the oar,
   And shun the winding shore,
   And gently steer my boat
   Where water-lilies float,
       And cardinal flowers
   Stand in their sylvan bowers.

It required some rudeness to disturb with our boat the
mirror-like surface of the water, in which every twig and blade
of grass was so faithfully reflected; too faithfully indeed for
art to imitate, for only Nature may exaggerate herself.  The
shallowest still water is unfathomable.  Wherever the trees and
skies are reflected, there is more than Atlantic depth, and no
danger of fancy running aground.  We notice that it required a
separate intention of the eye, a more free and abstracted vision,
to see the reflected trees and the sky, than to see the river
bottom merely; and so are there manifold visions in the direction
of every object, and even the most opaque reflect the heavens
from their surface.  Some men have their eyes naturally intended
to the one and some to the other object.

         "A man that looks on glass,
            On it may stay his eye,
          Or, if he pleaseth, through it pass,
            And the heavens espy."

Two men in a skiff, whom we passed hereabouts, floating buoyantly
amid the reflections of the trees, like a feather in mid-air, or
a leaf which is wafted gently from its twig to the water without
turning over, seemed still in their element, and to have very
delicately availed themselves of the natural laws.  Their floating
there was a beautiful and successful experiment in natural
philosophy, and it served to ennoble in our eyes the art of
navigation; for as birds fly and fishes swim, so these men
sailed.  It reminded us how much fairer and nobler all the actions
of man might be, and that our life in its whole economy might be
as beautiful as the fairest works of art or nature.

The sun lodged on the old gray cliffs, and glanced from every
pad; the bulrushes and flags seemed to rejoice in the delicious
light and air; the meadows were a-drinking at their leisure; the
frogs sat meditating, all sabbath thoughts, summing up their
week, with one eye out on the golden sun, and one toe upon a
reed, eying the wondrous universe in which they act their part;
the fishes swam more staid and soberly, as maidens go to church;
shoals of golden and silver minnows rose to the surface to behold
the heavens, and then sheered off into more sombre aisles; they
swept by as if moved by one mind, continually gliding past each
other, and yet preserving the form of their battalion unchanged,
as if they were still embraced by the transparent membrane which
held the spawn; a young band of brethren and sisters trying their
new fins; now they wheeled, now shot ahead, and when we drove
them to the shore and cut them off, they dexterously tacked and
passed underneath the boat.  Over the old wooden bridges no
traveller crossed, and neither the river nor the fishes avoided
to glide between the abutments.

Here was a village not far off behind the woods, Billerica,
settled not long ago, and the children still bear the names of
the first settlers in this late "howling wilderness"; yet to all
intents and purposes it is as old as Fernay or as Mantua, an old
gray town where men grow old and sleep already under moss-grown
monuments,--outgrow their usefulness.  This is ancient Billerica,
(Villarica?) now in its dotage, named from the English
Billericay, and whose Indian name was Shawshine.  I never heard
that it was young.  See, is not nature here gone to decay, farms
all run out, meeting-house grown gray and racked with age?  If
you would know of its early youth, ask those old gray rocks in
the pasture.  It has a bell that sounds sometimes as far as
Concord woods; I have heard that,--ay, hear it now.  No wonder
that such a sound startled the dreaming Indian, and frightened
his game, when the first bells were swung on trees, and sounded
through the forest beyond the plantations of the white man.  But
to-day I like best the echo amid these cliffs and woods.  It is
no feeble imitation, but rather its original, or as if some rural
Orpheus played over the strain again to show how it should sound.

   Dong, sounds the brass in the east,
   As if to a funeral feast,
   But I like that sound the best
   Out of the fluttering west.

   The steeple ringeth a knell,
   But the fairies' silvery bell
   Is the voice of that gentle folk,
   Or else the horizon that spoke.

   Its metal is not of brass,
   But air, and water, and glass,
   And under a cloud it is swung,
   And by the wind it is rung.

   When the steeple tolleth the noon,
   It soundeth not so soon,
   Yet it rings a far earlier hour,
   And the sun has not reached its tower.

On the other hand, the road runs up to Carlisle, city of the
woods, which, if it is less civil, is the more natural.  It does
well hold the earth together.  It gets laughed at because it is a
small town, I know, but nevertheless it is a place where great
men may be born any day, for fair winds and foul blow right on
over it without distinction.  It has a meeting-house and
horse-sheds, a tavern and a blacksmith's shop, for centre, and a
good deal of wood to cut and cord yet.  And

     "Bedford, most noble Bedford,
     I shall not thee forget."

History has remembered thee; especially that meek and humble
petition of thy old planters, like the wailing of the Lord's own
people, "To the gentlemen, the selectmen" of Concord, praying to
be erected into a separate parish.  We can hardly credit that so
plaintive a psalm resounded but little more than a century ago
along these Babylonish waters.  "In the extreme difficult seasons
of heat and cold," said they, "we were ready to say of the
Sabbath, Behold what a weariness is it."--"Gentlemen, if our
seeking to draw off proceed from any disaffection to our present
Reverend Pastor, or the Christian Society with whom we have taken
such sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God in
company, then hear us not this day, but we greatly desire, if God
please, to be eased of our burden on the Sabbath, the travel and
fatigue thereof, that the word of God may be nigh to us, near to
our houses and in our hearts, that we and our little ones may
serve the Lord.  We hope that God, who stirred up the spirit of
Cyrus to set forward temple work, has stirred us up to ask, and
will stir you up to grant, the prayer of our petition; so shall
your humble petitioners ever pray, as in duty bound--" And so the
temple work went forward here to a happy conclusion.  Yonder in
Carlisle the building of the temple was many wearisome years
delayed, not that there was wanting of Shittim wood, or the gold
of Ophir, but a site therefor convenient to all the worshippers;
whether on "Buttrick's Plain," or rather on "Poplar Hill."--It
was a tedious question.

In this Billerica solid men must have lived, select from year to
year; a series of town clerks, at least; and there are old
records that you may search.  Some spring the white man came,
built him a house, and made a clearing here, letting in the sun,
dried up a farm, piled up the old gray stones in fences, cut down
the pines around his dwelling, planted orchard seeds brought from
the old country, and persuaded the civil apple-tree to blossom
next to the wild pine and the juniper, shedding its perfume in
the wilderness.  Their old stocks still remain.  He culled the
graceful elm from out the woods and from the river-side, and so
refined and smoothed his village plot.  He rudely bridged the
stream, and drove his team afield into the river meadows, cut the
wild grass, and laid bare the homes of beaver, otter, muskrat,
and with the whetting of his scythe scared off the deer and bear.
He set up a mill, and fields of English grain sprang in the
virgin soil.  And with his grain he scattered the seeds of the
dandelion and the wild trefoil over the meadows, mingling his
English flowers with the wild native ones.  The bristling
burdock, the sweet-scented catnip, and the humble yarrow planted
themselves along his woodland road, they too seeking "freedom to
worship God" in their way.  And thus he plants a town.  The white
man's mullein soon reigned in Indian cornfields, and
sweet-scented English grasses clothed the new soil.  Where, then,
could the Red Man set his foot?  The honey-bee hummed through the
Massachusetts woods, and sipped the wild-flowers round the
Indian's wigwam, perchance unnoticed, when, with prophetic
warning, it stung the Red child's hand, forerunner of that
industrious tribe that was to come and pluck the wild-flower of
his race up by the root.

The white man comes, pale as the dawn, with a load of thought,
with a slumbering intelligence as a fire raked up, knowing well
what he knows, not guessing but calculating; strong in community,
yielding obedience to authority; of experienced race; of
wonderful, wonderful common sense; dull but capable, slow but
persevering, severe but just, of little humor but genuine; a
laboring man, despising game and sport; building a house that
endures, a framed house.  He buys the Indian's moccasins and
baskets, then buys his hunting-grounds, and at length forgets
where he is buried and ploughs up his bones.  And here town
records, old, tattered, time-worn, weather-stained chronicles,
contain the Indian sachem's mark perchance, an arrow or a beaver,
and the few fatal words by which he deeded his hunting-grounds
away.  He comes with a list of ancient Saxon, Norman, and Celtic
names, and strews them up and down this river,--Framingham,
Sudbury, Bedford, Carlisle, Billerica, Chelmsford,--and this is
New Angle-land, and these are the New West Saxons whom the Red
Men call, not Angle-ish or English, but Yengeese, and so at last
they are known for Yankees.

When we were opposite to the middle of Billerica, the fields on
either hand had a soft and cultivated English aspect, the village
spire being seen over the copses which skirt the river, and
sometimes an orchard straggled down to the water-side, though,
generally, our course this forenoon was the wildest part of our
voyage.  It seemed that men led a quiet and very civil life
there.  The inhabitants were plainly cultivators of the earth,
and lived under an organized political government.  The
school-house stood with a meek aspect, entreating a long truce to
war and savage life.  Every one finds by his own experience, as
well as in history, that the era in which men cultivate the
apple, and the amenities of the garden, is essentially different
from that of the hunter and forest life, and neither can displace
the other without loss.  We have all had our day-dreams, as well
as more prophetic nocturnal vision; but as for farming, I am
convinced that my genius dates from an older era than the
agricultural.  I would at least strike my spade into the earth
with such careless freedom but accuracy as the woodpecker his
bill into a tree.  There is in my nature, methinks, a singular
yearning toward all wildness.  I know of no redeeming qualities
in myself but a sincere love for some things, and when I am
reproved I fall back on to this ground.  What have I to do with
ploughs?  I cut another furrow than you see.  Where the off ox
treads, there is it not, it is farther off; where the nigh ox
walks, it will not be, it is nigher still.  If corn fails, my
crop fails not, and what are drought and rain to me?  The rude
Saxon pioneer will sometimes pine for that refinement and
artificial beauty which are English, and love to hear the sound
of such sweet and classical names as the Pentland and Malvern
Hills, the Cliffs of Dover and the Trosachs, Richmond, Derwent,
and Winandermere, which are to him now instead of the Acropolis
and Parthenon, of Baiae, and Athens with its sea-walls, and
Arcadia and Tempe.

     Greece, who am I that should remember thee,
     Thy Marathon and thy Thermopylae?
     Is my life vulgar, my fate mean,
     Which on these golden memories can lean?

We are apt enough to be pleased with such books as Evelyn's
Sylva, Acetarium, and Kalendarium Hortense, but they imply a
relaxed nerve in the reader.  Gardening is civil and social, but
it wants the vigor and freedom of the forest and the outlaw.
There may be an excess of cultivation as well as of anything
else, until civilization becomes pathetic.  A highly cultivated
man,--all whose bones can be bent!  whose heaven-born virtues are
but good manners!  The young pines springing up in the cornfields
from year to year are to me a refreshing fact.  We talk of
civilizing the Indian, but that is not the name for his
improvement.  By the wary independence and aloofness of his dim
forest life he preserves his intercourse with his native gods,
and is admitted from time to time to a rare and peculiar society
with Nature.  He has glances of starry recognition to which our
saloons are strangers.  The steady illumination of his genius,
dim only because distant, is like the faint but satisfying light
of the stars compared with the dazzling but ineffectual and
short-lived blaze of candles.  The Society-Islanders had their
day-born gods, but they were not supposed to be "of equal
antiquity with the _atua fauau po_, or night-born gods."  It is
true, there are the innocent pleasures of country life, and it is
sometimes pleasant to make the earth yield her increase, and
gather the fruits in their season, but the heroic spirit will not
fail to dream of remoter retirements and more rugged paths.  It
will have its garden-plots and its _parterres_ elsewhere than on
the earth, and gather nuts and berries by the way for its
subsistence, or orchard fruits with such heedlessness as berries.
We would not always be soothing and taming nature, breaking the
horse and the ox, but sometimes ride the horse wild and chase the
buffalo.  The Indian's intercourse with Nature is at least such
as admits of the greatest independence of each.  If he is
somewhat of a stranger in her midst, the gardener is too much of
a familiar.  There is something vulgar and foul in the latter's
closeness to his mistress, something noble and cleanly in the
former's distance.  In civilization, as in a southern latitude,
man degenerates at length, and yields to the incursion of more
northern tribes,

     "Some nation yet shut in
        With hills of ice."

There are other, savager, and more primeval aspects of nature
than our poets have sung.  It is only white man's poetry.  Homer
and Ossian even can never revive in London or Boston.  And yet
behold how these cities are refreshed by the mere tradition, or
the imperfectly transmitted fragrance and flavor of these wild
fruits.  If we could listen but for an instant to the chant of the
Indian muse, we should understand why he will not exchange his
savageness for civilization.  Nations are not whimsical.  Steel
and blankets are strong temptations; but the Indian does well to
continue Indian.

After sitting in my chamber many days, reading the poets, I have
been out early on a foggy morning, and heard the cry of an owl in
a neighboring wood as from a nature behind the common, unexplored
by science or by literature.  None of the feathered race has yet
realized my youthful conceptions of the woodland depths.  I had
seen the red Election-bird brought from their recesses on my
comrades' string, and fancied that their plumage would assume
stranger and more dazzling colors, like the tints of evening, in
proportion as I advanced farther into the darkness and solitude
of the forest.  Still less have I seen such strong and wilderness
tints on any poet's string.

These modern ingenious sciences and arts do not affect me as
those more venerable arts of hunting and fishing, and even of
husbandry in its primitive and simple form; as ancient and
honorable trades as the sun and moon and winds pursue, coeval
with the faculties of man, and invented when these were invented.
We do not know their John Gutenberg, or Richard Arkwright, though
the poets would fain make them to have been gradually learned and
taught.  According to Gower,--

     "And Iadahel, as saith the boke,
       Firste made nette, and fishes toke.
     Of huntyng eke he fond the chace,
     Whiche nowe is knowe in many place;
     A tent of clothe, with corde and stake,
     He sette up first, and did it make."

Also, Lydgate says:--

     "Jason first sayled, in story it is tolde,
     Toward Colchos, to wynne the flees of golde,
     Ceres the Goddess fond first the tilthe of londe;
           *        *       *       *      *
     Also, Aristeus fonde first the usage
     Of mylke, and cruddis, and of honey swote;
     Peryodes, for grete avauntage,
     From flyntes smote fuyre, daryng in the roote."

We read that Aristeus "obtained of Jupiter and Neptune, that the
pestilential heat of the dog-days, wherein was great mortality,
should be mitigated with wind." This is one of those dateless
benefits conferred on man, which have no record in our vulgar
day, though we still find some similitude to them in our dreams,
in which we have a more liberal and juster apprehension of
things, unconstrained by habit, which is then in some measure put
off, and divested of memory, which we call history.

According to fable, when the island of AEgina was depopulated by
sickness, at the instance of AEacus, Jupiter turned the ants into
men, that is, as some think, he made men of the inhabitants who
lived meanly like ants.  This is perhaps the fullest history of
those early days extant.


The fable which is naturally and truly composed, so as to satisfy
the imagination, ere it addresses the understanding, beautiful
though strange as a wild-flower, is to the wise man an apothegm,
and admits of his most generous interpretation.  When we read
that Bacchus made the Tyrrhenian mariners mad, so that they leapt
into the sea, mistaking it for a meadow full of flowers, and so
became dolphins, we are not concerned about the historical truth
of this, but rather a higher poetical truth.  We seem to hear the
music of a thought, and care not if the understanding be not
gratified.  For their beauty, consider the fables of Narcissus,
of Endymion, of Memnon son of Morning, the representative of all
promising youths who have died a premature death, and whose
memory is melodiously prolonged to the latest morning; the
beautiful stories of Phaeton, and of the Sirens whose isle shone
afar off white with the bones of unburied men; and the pregnant
ones of Pan, Prometheus, and the Sphinx; and that long list of
names which have already become part of the universal language of
civilized men, and from proper are becoming common names or
nouns,--the Sibyls, the Eumenides, the Parcae, the Graces, the
Muses, Nemesis, &c.

It is interesting to observe with what singular unanimity the
farthest sundered nations and generations consent to give
completeness and roundness to an ancient fable, of which they
indistinctly appreciate the beauty or the truth.  By a faint and
dream-like effort, though it be only by the vote of a scientific
body, the dullest posterity slowly add some trait to the mythus.
As when astronomers call the lately discovered planet Neptune; or
the asteroid Astraea, that the Virgin who was driven from earth
to heaven at the end of the golden age, may have her local
habitation in the heavens more distinctly assigned her,--for the
slightest recognition of poetic worth is significant.  By such
slow aggregation has mythology grown from the first.  The very
nursery tales of this generation, were the nursery tales of
primeval races.  They migrate from east to west, and again from
west to east; now expanded into the "tale divine" of bards, now
shrunk into a popular rhyme.  This is an approach to that
universal language which men have sought in vain.  This fond
reiteration of the oldest expressions of truth by the latest
posterity, content with slightly and religiously retouching the
old material, is the most impressive proof of a common humanity.

All nations love the same jests and tales, Jews, Christians, and
Mahometans, and the same translated suffice for all.  All men are
children, and of one family.  The same tale sends them all to
bed, and wakes them in the morning.  Joseph Wolff, the
missionary, distributed copies of Robinson Crusoe, translated
into Arabic, among the Arabs, and they made a great sensation.
"Robinson Crusoe's adventures and wisdom," says he, "were read by
Mahometans in the market-places of Sanaa, Hodyeda, and Loheya,
and admired and believed!" On reading the book, the Arabians
exclaimed, "O, that Robinson Crusoe must have been a great
prophet!"

To some extent, mythology is only the most ancient history and
biography.  So far from being false or fabulous in the common
sense, it contains only enduring and essential truth, the I and
you, the here and there, the now and then, being omitted.  Either
time or rare wisdom writes it.  Before printing was discovered, a
century was equal to a thousand years.  The poet is he who can
write some pure mythology to-day without the aid of posterity.
In how few words, for instance, the Greeks would have told the
story of Abelard and Heloise, making but a sentence for our
classical dictionary,--and then, perchance, have stuck up their
names to shine in some corner of the firmament.  We moderns, on
the other hand, collect only the raw materials of biography and
history, "memoirs to serve for a history," which itself is but
materials to serve for a mythology.  How many volumes folio would
the Life and Labors of Prometheus have filled, if perchance it
had fallen, as perchance it did first, in days of cheap printing!
Who knows what shape the fable of Columbus will at length assume,
to be confounded with that of Jason and the expedition of the
Argonauts.  And Franklin,--there may be a line for him in the
future classical dictionary, recording what that demigod did, and
referring him to some new genealogy.  "Son of----and----.  He
aided the Americans to gain their independence, instructed
mankind in economy, and drew down lightning from the clouds."

The hidden significance of these fables which is sometimes
thought to have been detected, the ethics running parallel to the
poetry and history, are not so remarkable as the readiness with
which they may be made to express a variety of truths.  As if
they were the skeletons of still older and more universal truths
than any whose flesh and blood they are for the time made to
wear.  It is like striving to make the sun, or the wind, or the
sea symbols to signify exclusively the particular thoughts of our
day.  But what signifies it?  In the mythus a superhuman
intelligence uses the unconscious thoughts and dreams of men as
its hieroglyphics to address men unborn.  In the history of the
human mind, these glowing and ruddy fables precede the noonday
thoughts of men, as Aurora the sun's rays.  The matutine
intellect of the poet, keeping in advance of the glare of
philosophy, always dwells in this auroral atmosphere.


As we said before, the Concord is a dead stream, but its scenery
is the more suggestive to the contemplative voyager, and this day
its water was fuller of reflections than our pages even.  Just
before it reaches the falls in Billerica, it is contracted, and
becomes swifter and shallower, with a yellow pebbly bottom,
hardly passable for a canal-boat, leaving the broader and more
stagnant portion above like a lake among the hills.  All through
the Concord, Bedford, and Billerica meadows we had heard no
murmur from its stream, except where some tributary runnel
tumbled in,--

     Some tumultuous little rill,
       Purling round its storied pebble,
     Tinkling to the selfsame tune,
     From September until June,
       Which no drought doth e'er enfeeble.

     Silent flows the parent stream,
       And if rocks do lie below,
     Smothers with her waves the din,
     As it were a youthful sin,
       Just as still, and just as slow.

But now at length we heard this staid and primitive river rushing
to her fall, like any rill.  We here left its channel, just above
the Billerica Falls, and entered the canal, which runs, or rather
is conducted, six miles through the woods to the Merrimack, at
Middlesex, and as we did not care to loiter in this part of our
voyage, while one ran along the tow-path drawing the boat by a
cord, the other kept it off the shore with a pole, so that we
accomplished the whole distance in little more than an hour.
This canal, which is the oldest in the country, and has even an
antique look beside the more modern railroads, is fed by the
Concord, so that we were still floating on its familiar waters.
It is so much water which the river _lets_ for the advantage of
commerce.  There appeared some want of harmony in its scenery,
since it was not of equal date with the woods and meadows through
which it is led, and we missed the conciliatory influence of time
on land and water; but in the lapse of ages, Nature will recover
and indemnify herself, and gradually plant fit shrubs and flowers
along its borders.  Already the kingfisher sat upon a pine over
the water, and the bream and pickerel swam below.  Thus all works
pass directly out of the hands of the architect into the hands of
Nature, to be perfected.

It was a retired and pleasant route, without houses or
travellers, except some young men who were lounging upon a bridge
in Chelmsford, who leaned impudently over the rails to pry into
our concerns, but we caught the eye of the most forward, and
looked at him till he was visibly discomfited.  Not that there
was any peculiar efficacy in our look, but rather a sense of
shame left in him which disarmed him.

It is a very true and expressive phrase, "He looked daggers at
me," for the first pattern and prototype of all daggers must have
been a glance of the eye.  First, there was the glance of Jove's
eye, then his fiery bolt, then, the material gradually hardening,
tridents, spears, javelins, and finally, for the convenience of
private men, daggers, krisses, and so forth, were invented.  It
is wonderful how we get about the streets without being wounded
by these delicate and glancing weapons, a man can so nimbly whip
out his rapier, or without being noticed carry it unsheathed.
Yet it is rare that one gets seriously looked at.

As we passed under the last bridge over the canal, just before
reaching the Merrimack, the people coming out of church paused to
look at us from above, and apparently, so strong is custom,
indulged in some heathenish comparisons; but we were the truest
observers of this sunny day.  According to Hesiod,

              "The seventh is a holy day,
   For then Latona brought forth golden-rayed Apollo,"

and by our reckoning this was the seventh day of the week, and
not the first.  I find among the papers of an old Justice of the
Peace and Deacon of the town of Concord, this singular
memorandum, which is worth preserving as a relic of an ancient
custom.  After reforming the spelling and grammar, it runs as
follows: "Men that travelled with teams on the Sabbath,
Dec. 18th, 1803, were Jeremiah Richardson and Jonas Parker, both
of Shirley.  They had teams with rigging such as is used to carry
barrels, and they were travelling westward.  Richardson was
questioned by the Hon. Ephraim Wood, Esq., and he said that Jonas
Parker was his fellow-traveller, and he further said that a
Mr. Longley was his employer, who promised to bear him out."  We
were the men that were gliding northward, this Sept. 1st, 1839,
with still team, and rigging not the most convenient to carry
barrels, unquestioned by any Squire or Church Deacon and ready to
bear ourselves out if need were.  In the latter part of the
seventeenth century, according to the historian of Dunstable,
"Towns were directed to erect '_a cage_' near the meeting-house,
and in this all offenders against the sanctity of the Sabbath
were confined."  Society has relaxed a little from its
strictness, one would say, but I presume that there is not less
_religion_ than formerly.  If the _ligature_ is found to be
loosened in one part, it is only drawn the tighter in another.

You can hardly convince a man of an error in a lifetime, but must
content yourself with the reflection that the progress of science
is slow.  If he is not convinced, his grandchildren may be.  The
geologists tell us that it took one hundred years to prove that
fossils are organic, and one hundred and fifty more, to prove
that they are not to be referred to the Noachian deluge.  I am
not sure but I should betake myself in extremities to the liberal
divinities of Greece, rather than to my country's God.  Jehovah,
though with us he has acquired new attributes, is more absolute
and unapproachable, but hardly more divine, than Jove.  He is not
so much of a gentleman, not so gracious and catholic, he does not
exert so intimate and genial an influence on nature, as many a
god of the Greeks.  I should fear the infinite power and
inflexible justice of the almighty mortal, hardly as yet
apotheosized, so wholly masculine, with no Sister Juno, no
Apollo, no Venus, nor Minerva, to intercede for me, <thum_o*i
phyle'ousa' te, k_edome'n_e te>.  The Grecian are youthful and
erring and fallen gods, with the vices of men, but in many
important respects essentially of the divine race.  In my
Pantheon, Pan still reigns in his pristine glory, with his ruddy
face, his flowing beard, and his shaggy body, his pipe and his
crook, his nymph Echo, and his chosen daughter Iambe; for the
great god Pan is not dead, as was rumored.  No god ever dies.
Perhaps of all the gods of New England and of ancient Greece, I
am most constant at his shrine.

It seems to me that the god that is commonly worshipped in
civilized countries is not at all divine, though he bears a
divine name, but is the overwhelming authority and respectability
of mankind combined.  Men reverence one another, not yet God.  If
I thought that I could speak with discrimination and impartiality
of the nations of Christendom, I should praise them, but it tasks
me too much.  They seem to be the most civil and humane, but I
may be mistaken.  Every people have gods to suit their
circumstances; the Society Islanders had a god called Toahitu,
"in shape like a dog; he saved such as were in danger of falling
from rocks and trees."  I think that we can do without him, as we
have not much climbing to do.  Among them a man could make
himself a god out of a piece of wood in a few minutes, which
would frighten him out of his wits.

I fancy that some indefatigable spinster of the old school, who
had the supreme felicity to be born in "days that tried men's
souls," hearing this, may say with Nestor, another of the old
school, "But you are younger than I.  For time was when I
conversed with greater men than you.  For not at any time have I
seen such men, nor shall see them, as Perithous, and Dryas, and
<poimena la_on>," that is probably Washington, sole "Shepherd of
the People." And when Apollo has now six times rolled westward,
or seemed to roll, and now for the seventh time shows his face in
the east, eyes wellnigh glazed, long glassed, which have
fluctuated only between lamb's wool and worsted, explore
ceaselessly some good sermon book.  For six days shalt thou labor
and do all thy knitting, but on the seventh, forsooth, thy
reading.  Happy we who can bask in this warm September sun, which
illumines all creatures, as well when they rest as when they
toil, not without a feeling of gratitude; whose life is as
blameless, how blameworthy soever it may be, on the Lord's
Mona-day as on his Suna-day.

There are various, nay, incredible faiths; why should we be
alarmed at any of them?  What man believes, God believes.  Long
as I have lived, and many blasphemers as I have heard and seen, I
have never yet heard or witnessed any direct and conscious
blasphemy or irreverence; but of indirect and habitual, enough.
Where is the man who is guilty of direct and personal insolence
to Him that made him?

One memorable addition to the old mythology is due to this
era,--the Christian fable.  With what pains, and tears, and blood
these centuries have woven this and added it to the mythology of
mankind.  The new Prometheus.  With what miraculous consent, and
patience, and persistency has this mythus been stamped on the
memory of the race!  It would seem as if it were in the progress
of our mythology to dethrone Jehovah, and crown Christ in his
stead.

If it is not a tragical life we live, then I know not what to
call it.  Such a story as that of Jesus Christ,--the history of
Jerusalem, say, being a part of the Universal History.  The
naked, the embalmed, unburied death of Jerusalem amid its
desolate hills,--think of it.  In Tasso's poem I trust some
things are sweetly buried.  Consider the snappish tenacity with
which they preach Christianity still.  What are time and space to
Christianity, eighteen hundred years, and a new world?--that the
humble life of a Jewish peasant should have force to make a New
York bishop so bigoted.  Forty-four lamps, the gift of kings, now
burning in a place called the Holy Sepulchre;--a church-bell
ringing;--some unaffected tears shed by a pilgrim on Mount
Calvary within the week.--

"Jerusalem, Jerusalem, when I forget thee, may my right hand
forget her cunning."

"By the waters of Babylon there we sat down, and we wept when we
remembered Zion."

I trust that some may be as near and dear to Buddha, or Christ,
or Swedenborg, who are without the pale of their churches.  It is
necessary not to be Christian to appreciate the beauty and
significance of the life of Christ.  I know that some will have
hard thoughts of me, when they hear their Christ named beside my
Buddha, yet I am sure that I am willing they should love their
Christ more than my Buddha, for the love is the main thing, and I
like him too.  "God is the letter Ku, as well as Khu."  Why need
Christians be still intolerant and superstitious?  The
simple-minded sailors were unwilling to cast overboard Jonah at
his own request.--

   "Where is this love become in later age?
   Alas! 'tis gone in endless pilgrimage
   From hence, and never to return, I doubt,
   Till revolution wheel those times about."

One man says,--

   "The world's a popular disease, that reigns
   Within the froward heart and frantic brains
   Of poor distempered mortals."

Another, that

              "all the world's a stage,
   And all the men and women merely players."

The world is a strange place for a playhouse to stand within it.
Old Drayton thought that a man that lived here, and would be a
poet, for instance, should have in him certain "brave,
translunary things," and a "fine madness" should possess his
brain.  Certainly it were as well, that he might be up to the
occasion.  That is a superfluous wonder, which Dr.  Johnson
expresses at the assertion of Sir Thomas Browne that "his life
has been a miracle of thirty years, which to relate, were not
history but a piece of poetry, and would sound like a fable." The
wonder is, rather, that all men do not assert as much.  That
would be a rare praise, if it were true, which was addressed to
Francis Beaumont,--"Spectators sate part in your tragedies."

Think what a mean and wretched place this world is; that half the
time we have to light a lamp that we may see to live in it.  This
is half our life.  Who would undertake the enterprise if it were
all?  And, pray, what more has day to offer?  A lamp that burns
more clear, a purer oil, say winter-strained, that so we may
pursue our idleness with less obstruction.  Bribed with a little
sunlight and a few prismatic tints, we bless our Maker, and stave
off his wrath with hymns.

   I make ye an offer,
   Ye gods, hear the scoffer,
   The scheme will not hurt you,
   If ye will find goodness, I will find virtue.
   Though I am your creature,
   And child of your nature,
   I have pride still unbended,
   And blood undescended,
   Some free independence,
   And my own descendants.
   I cannot toil blindly,
   Though ye behave kindly,
   And I swear by the rood,
   I'll be slave to no God.
   If ye will deal plainly,
   I will strive mainly,
   If ye will discover,
   Great plans to your lover,
   And give him a sphere
   Somewhat larger than here.

"Verily, my angels! I was abashed on account of my servant, who
had no Providence but me; therefore did I pardon him."--_The
Gulistan of Sadi._


Most people with whom I talk, men and women even of some
originality and genius, have their scheme of the universe all cut
and dried,--very _dry_, I assure you, to hear, dry enough to
burn, dry-rotted and powder-post, methinks,--which they set up
between you and them in the shortest intercourse; an ancient and
tottering frame with all its boards blown off.  They do not walk
without their bed.  Some, to me, seemingly very unimportant and
unsubstantial things and relations, are for them everlastingly
settled,--as Father, Son, and Holy Ghost, and the like.  These
are like the everlasting hills to them.  But in all my wanderings
I never came across the least vestige of authority for these
things.  They have not left so distinct a trace as the delicate
flower of a remote geological period on the coal in my grate.
The wisest man preaches no doctrines; he has no scheme; he sees
no rafter, not even a cobweb, against the heavens.  It is clear
sky.  If I ever see more clearly at one time than at another, the
medium through which I see is clearer.  To see from earth to
heaven, and see there standing, still a fixture, that old Jewish
scheme!  What right have you to hold up this obstacle to my
understanding you, to your understanding me!  You did not invent
it; it was imposed on you.  Examine your authority.  Even Christ,
we fear, had his scheme, his conformity to tradition, which
slightly vitiates his teaching.  He had not swallowed all
formulas.  He preached some mere doctrines.  As for me, Abraham,
Isaac, and Jacob are now only the subtilest imaginable essences,
which would not stain the morning sky.  Your scheme must be the
framework of the universe; all other schemes will soon be ruins.
The perfect God in his revelations of himself has never got to
the length of one such proposition as you, his prophets, state.
Have you learned the alphabet of heaven and can count three?  Do
you know the number of God's family?  Can you put mysteries into
words?  Do you presume to fable of the ineffable?  Pray, what
geographer are you, that speak of heaven's topography?  Whose
friend are you that speak of God's personality?  Do you, Miles
Howard, think that he has made you his confidant?  Tell me of the
height of the mountains of the moon, or of the diameter of space,
and I may believe you, but of the secret history of the Almighty,
and I shall pronounce thee mad.  Yet we have a sort of family
history of our God,--so have the Tahitians of theirs,--and some
old poet's grand imagination is imposed on us as adamantine
everlasting truth, and God's own word!  Pythagoras says, truly
enough, "A true assertion respecting God, is an assertion of
God"; but we may well doubt if there is any example of this in
literature.

The New Testament is an invaluable book, though I confess to
having been slightly prejudiced against it in my very early days
by the church and the Sabbath school, so that it seemed, before I
read it, to be the yellowest book in the catalogue.  Yet I early
escaped from their meshes.  It was hard to get the commentaries
out of one's head and taste its true flavor.--I think that
Pilgrim's Progress is the best sermon which has been preached
from this text; almost all other sermons that I have heard, or
heard of, have been but poor imitations of this.--It would be a
poor story to be prejudiced against the Life of Christ because
the book has been edited by Christians.  In fact, I love this
book rarely, though it is a sort of castle in the air to me,
which I am permitted to dream.  Having come to it so recently and
freshly, it has the greater charm, so that I cannot find any to
talk with about it.  I never read a novel, they have so little
real life and thought in them.  The reading which I love best is
the scriptures of the several nations, though it happens that I
am better acquainted with those of the Hindoos, the Chinese, and
the Persians, than of the Hebrews, which I have come to last.
Give me one of these Bibles and you have silenced me for a while.
When I recover the use of my tongue, I am wont to worry my
neighbors with the new sentences; but commonly they cannot see
that there is any wit in them.  Such has been my experience with
the New Testament.  I have not yet got to the crucifixion, I have
read it over so many times.  I should love dearly to read it
aloud to my friends, some of whom are seriously inclined; it is
so good, and I am sure that they have never heard it, it fits
their case exactly, and we should enjoy it so much together,--but
I instinctively despair of getting their ears.  They soon show,
by signs not to be mistaken, that it is inexpressibly wearisome
to them.  I do not mean to imply that I am any better than my
neighbors; for, alas!  I know that I am only as good, though I
love better books than they.

It is remarkable that, notwithstanding the universal favor with
which the New Testament is outwardly received, and even the
bigotry with which it is defended, there is no hospitality shown
to, there is no appreciation of, the order of truth with which it
deals.  I know of no book that has so few readers.  There is none
so truly strange, and heretical, and unpopular.  To Christians,
no less than Greeks and Jews, it is foolishness and a
stumbling-block.  There are, indeed, severe things in it which no
man should read aloud more than once.--"Seek first the kingdom of
heaven."--"Lay not up for yourselves treasures on earth."--"If
thou wilt be perfect, go and sell that thou hast, and give to the
poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven."--"For what is a
man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own
soul?  or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul?"--Think
of this, Yankees!--"Verily, I say unto you, if ye have faith as a
grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove
hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be
impossible unto you."--Think of repeating these things to a New
England audience!  thirdly, fourthly, fifteenthly, till there are
three barrels of sermons!  Who, without cant, can read them
aloud?  Who, without cant, can hear them, and not go out of the
meeting-house?  They never _were_ read, they never _were_ heard.
Let but one of these sentences be rightly read, from any pulpit
in the land, and there would not be left one stone of that
meeting-house upon another.

Yet the New Testament treats of man and man's so-called spiritual
affairs too exclusively, and is too constantly moral and
personal, to alone content me, who am not interested solely in
man's religious or moral nature, or in man even.  I have not the
most definite designs on the future.  Absolutely speaking, Do
unto others as you would that they should do unto you, is by no
means a golden rule, but the best of current silver.  An honest
man would have but little occasion for it.  It is golden not to
have any rule at all in such a case.  The book has never been
written which is to be accepted without any allowance.  Christ
was a sublime actor on the stage of the world.  He knew what he
was thinking of when he said, "Heaven and earth shall pass away,
but my words shall not pass away." I draw near to him at such a
time.  Yet he taught mankind but imperfectly how to live; his
thoughts were all directed toward another world.  There is
another kind of success than his.  Even here we have a sort of
living to get, and must buffet it somewhat longer.  There are
various tough problems yet to solve, and we must make shift to
live, betwixt spirit and matter, such a human life as we can.

A healthy man, with steady employment, as wood-chopping at fifty
cents a cord, and a camp in the woods, will not be a good subject
for Christianity.  The New Testament may be a choice book to him
on some, but not on all or most of his days.  He will rather go
a-fishing in his leisure hours.  The Apostles, though they were
fishers too, were of the solemn race of sea-fishers, and never
trolled for pickerel on inland streams.

Men have a singular desire to be good without being good for
anything, because, perchance, they think vaguely that so it will
be good for them in the end.  The sort of morality which the
priests inculcate is a very subtle policy, far finer than the
politicians, and the world is very successfully ruled by them as
the policemen.  It is not worth the while to let our imperfections
disturb us always.  The conscience really does not, and ought not
to monopolize the whole of our lives, any more than the heart or
the head.  It is as liable to disease as any other part.  I have
seen some whose consciences, owing undoubtedly to former
indulgence, had grown to be as irritable as spoilt children, and
at length gave them no peace.  They did not know when to swallow
their cud, and their lives of course yielded no milk.

    Conscience is instinct bred in the house,
    Feeling and Thinking propagate the sin
    By an unnatural breeding in and in.
    I say, Turn it out doors,
    Into the moors.
    I love a life whose plot is simple,
    And does not thicken with every pimple,
    A soul so sound no sickly conscience binds it,
    That makes the universe no worse than 't finds it.
    I love an earnest soul,
    Whose mighty joy and sorrow
    Are not drowned in a bowl,
    And brought to life to-morrow;
    That lives one tragedy,
    And not seventy;
    A conscience worth keeping,
    Laughing not weeping;
    A conscience wise and steady,
    And forever ready;
    Not changing with events,
    Dealing in compliments;
    A conscience exercised about
    Large things, where one _may_ doubt.
    I love a soul not all of wood,
    Predestinated to be good,
    But true to the backbone
    Unto itself alone,
    And false to none;
    Born to its own affairs,
    Its own joys and own cares;
    By whom the work which God begun
    Is finished, and not undone;
    Taken up where he left off,
    Whether to worship or to scoff;
    If not good, why then evil,
    If not good god, good devil.
    Goodness!--you hypocrite, come out of that,
    Live your life, do your work, then take your hat.
    I have no patience towards
    Such conscientious cowards.
    Give me simple laboring folk,
    Who love their work,
    Whose virtue is a song
    To cheer God along.

I was once reproved by a minister who was driving a poor beast to
some meeting-house horse-sheds among the hills of New Hampshire,
because I was bending my steps to a mountain-top on the Sabbath,
instead of a church, when I would have gone farther than he to
hear a true word spoken on that or any day.  He declared that I
was "breaking the Lord's fourth commandment," and proceeded to
enumerate, in a sepulchral tone, the disasters which had befallen
him whenever he had done any ordinary work on the Sabbath.  He
really thought that a god was on the watch to trip up those men
who followed any secular work on this day, and did not see that
it was the evil conscience of the workers that did it.  The
country is full of this superstition, so that when one enters a
village, the church, not only really but from association, is the
ugliest looking building in it, because it is the one in which
human nature stoops the lowest and is most disgraced.  Certainly,
such temples as these shall erelong cease to deform the
landscape.  There are few things more disheartening and disgusting
than when you are walking the streets of a strange village on the
Sabbath, to hear a preacher shouting like a boatswain in a gale
of wind, and thus harshly profaning the quiet atmosphere of the
day.  You fancy him to have taken off his coat, as when men are
about to do hot and dirty work.

If I should ask the minister of Middlesex to let me speak in his
pulpit on a Sunday, he would object, because I do not _pray_ as
he does, or because I am not _ordained_.  What under the sun are
these things?

Really, there is no infidelity, now-a-days, so great as that
which prays, and keeps the Sabbath, and rebuilds the churches.
The sealer of the South Pacific preaches a truer doctrine.  The
church is a sort of hospital for men's souls, and as full of
quackery as the hospital for their bodies.  Those who are taken
into it live like pensioners in their Retreat or Sailor's Sung
Harbor, where you may see a row of religious cripples sitting
outside in sunny weather.  Let not the apprehension that he may
one day have to occupy a ward therein, discourage the cheerful
labors of the able-souled man.  While he remembers the sick in
their extremities, let him not look thither as to his goal.  One
is sick at heart of this pagoda worship.  It is like the beating
of gongs in a Hindoo subterranean temple.  In dark places and
dungeons the preacher's words might perhaps strike root and grow,
but not in broad daylight in any part of the world that I know.
The sound of the Sabbath bell far away, now breaking on these
shores, does not awaken pleasing associations, but melancholy and
sombre ones rather.  One involuntarily rests on his oar, to humor
his unusually meditative mood.  It is as the sound of many
catechisms and religious books twanging a canting peal round the
earth, seeming to issue from some Egyptian temple and echo along
the shore of the Nile, right opposite to Pharaoh's palace and
Moses in the bulrushes, startling a multitude of storks and
alligators basking in the sun.

Everywhere "good men" sound a retreat, and the word has gone
forth to fall back on innocence.  Fall forward rather on to
whatever there is there.  Christianity only hopes.  It has hung
its harp on the willows, and cannot sing a song in a strange
land.  It has dreamed a sad dream, and does not yet welcome the
morning with joy.  The mother tells her falsehoods to her child,
but, thank Heaven, the child does not grow up in its parent's
shadow.  Our mother's faith has not grown with her experience.
Her experience has been too much for her.  The lesson of life was
too hard for her to learn.

It is remarkable, that almost all speakers and writers feel it to
be incumbent on them, sooner or later, to prove or to acknowledge
the personality of God.  Some Earl of Bridgewater, thinking it
better late than never, has provided for it in his will.  It is a
sad mistake.  In reading a work on agriculture, we have to skip
the author's moral reflections, and the words "Providence" and
"He" scattered along the page, to come at the profitable level of
what he has to say.  What he calls his religion is for the most
part offensive to the nostrils.  He should know better than
expose himself, and keep his foul sores covered till they are
quite healed.  There is more religion in men's science than there
is science in their religion.  Let us make haste to the report of
the committee on swine.

A man's real faith is never contained in his creed, nor is his
creed an article of his faith.  The last is never adopted.  This
it is that permits him to smile ever, and to live even as bravely
as he does.  And yet he clings anxiously to his creed, as to a
straw, thinking that that does him good service because his sheet
anchor does not drag.

In most men's religion, the ligature, which should be its
umbilical cord connecting them with divinity, is rather like that
thread which the accomplices of Cylon held in their hands when
they went abroad from the temple of Minerva, the other end being
attached to the statue of the goddess.  But frequently, as in
their case, the thread breaks, being stretched, and they are left
without an asylum.

  "A good and pious man reclined his head on the bosom of
  contemplation, and was absorbed in the ocean of a revery.  At
  the instant when he awaked from his vision, one of his friends,
  by way of pleasantry, said, What rare gift have you brought us
  from that garden, where you have been recreating?  He replied,
  I fancied to myself and said, when I can reach the rose-bower,
  I will fill my lap with the flowers, and bring them as a
  present to my friends; but when I got there, the fragrance of
  the roses so intoxicated me, that the skirt dropped from my
  hands.----`O bird of dawn! learn the warmth of affection from
  the moth; for that scorched creature gave up the ghost, and
  uttered not a groan: These vain pretenders are ignorant of him
  they seek after; for of him that knew him we never heard
  again:--O thou! who towerest above the flights of conjecture,
  opinion, and comprehension; whatever has been reported of thee
  we have heard and read; the congregation is dismissed, and life
  drawn to a close; and we still rest at our first encomium of
  thee!'"--_Sadi_.

By noon we were let down into the Merrimack through the locks at
Middlesex, just above Pawtucket Falls, by a serene and
liberal-minded man, who came quietly from his book, though his
duties, we supposed, did not require him to open the locks on
Sundays.  With him we had a just and equal encounter of the eyes,
as between two honest men.

The movements of the eyes express the perpetual and unconscious
courtesy of the parties.  It is said, that a rogue does not look
you in the face, neither does an honest man look at you as if he
had his reputation to establish.  I have seen some who did not
know when to turn aside their eyes in meeting yours.  A truly
confident and magnanimous spirit is wiser than to contend for the
mastery in such encounters.  Serpents alone conquer by the
steadiness of their gaze.  My friend looks me in the face and
sees me, that is all.

The best relations were at once established between us and this
man, and though few words were spoken, he could not conceal a
visible interest in us and our excursion.  He was a lover of the
higher mathematics, as we found, and in the midst of some vast
sunny problem, when we overtook him and whispered our conjectures.
By this man we were presented with the freedom of the Merrimack.
We now felt as if we were fairly launched on the ocean-stream of
our voyage, and were pleased to find that our boat would float on
Merrimack water.  We began again busily to put in practice those
old arts of rowing, steering, and paddling.  It seemed a strange
phenomenon to us that the two rivers should mingle their waters
so readily, since we had never associated them in our thoughts.

As we glided over the broad bosom of the Merrimack, between
Chelmsford and Dracut, at noon, here a quarter of a mile wide,
the rattling of our oars was echoed over the water to those
villages, and their slight sounds to us.  Their harbors lay as
smooth and fairy-like as the Lido, or Syracuse, or Rhodes, in our
imagination, while, like some strange roving craft, we flitted
past what seemed the dwellings of noble home-staying men, seemingly
as conspicuous as if on an eminence, or floating upon a tide
which came up to those villagers' breasts.  At a third of a mile
over the water we heard distinctly some children repeating their
catechism in a cottage near the shore, while in the broad
shallows between, a herd of cows stood lashing their sides, and
waging war with the flies.

Two hundred years ago other catechizing than this was going on
here; for here came the Sachem Wannalancet, and his people, and
sometimes Tahatawan, our Concord Sachem, who afterwards had a
church at home, to catch fish at the falls; and here also came
John Eliot, with the Bible and Catechism, and Baxter's Call to
the Unconverted, and other tracts, done into the Massachusetts
tongue, and taught them Christianity meanwhile.  "This place,"
says Gookin, referring to Wamesit,

  "being an ancient and capital seat of Indians, they come to
  fish; and this good man takes this opportunity to spread the
  net of the gospel, to fish for their souls."--"May 5th, 1674,"
  he continues, "according to our usual custom, Mr. Eliot and
  myself took our journey to Wamesit, or Pawtuckett; and arriving
  there that evening, Mr. Eliot preached to as many of them as
  could be got together, out of Matt.  xxii.  1-14, the parable
  of the marriage of the king's son.  We met at the wigwam of one
  called Wannalancet, about two miles from the town, near
  Pawtuckett falls, and bordering upon Merrimak river.  This
  person, Wannalancet, is the eldest son of old Pasaconaway, the
  chiefest sachem of Pawtuckett.  He is a sober and grave person,
  and of years, between fifty and sixty.  He hath been always
  loving and friendly to the English."  As yet, however, they had
  not prevailed on him to embrace the Christian religion.  "But
  at this time," says Gookin, "May 6, 1674,"--"after some
  deliberation and serious pause, he stood up, and made a speech
  to this effect:--`I must acknowledge I have, all my days, used
  to pass in an old canoe, (alluding to his frequent custom to
  pass in a canoe upon the river,) and now you exhort me to
  change and leave my old canoe, and embark in a new canoe, to
  which I have hitherto been unwilling; but now I yield up myself
  to your advice, and enter into a new canoe, and do engage to
  pray to God hereafter.'"  One "Mr. Richard Daniel, a gentleman
  that lived in Billerica," who with other "persons of quality"
  was present, "desired brother Eliot to tell the sachem from
  him, that it may be, while he went in his old canoe, he passed
  in a quiet stream; but the end thereof was death and
  destruction to soul and body.  But now he went into a new
  canoe, perhaps he would meet with storms and trials, but yet he
  should be encouraged to persevere, for the end of his voyage
  would be everlasting rest."--"Since that time, I hear this
  sachem doth persevere, and is a constant and diligent hearer of
  God's word, and sanctifieth the Sabbath, though he doth travel
  to Wamesit meeting every Sabbath, which is above two miles; and
  though sundry of his people have deserted him, since he
  subjected to the gospel, yet he continues and   persists."--
  _Gookin's Hist. Coll. of the Indians in New England_, 1674.

Already, as appears from the records, "At a General Court
held at Boston in New England, the 7th of the first month,
1643-4."--"Wassamequin, Nashoonon, Kutchamaquin, Massaconomet,
and Squaw Sachem, did voluntarily submit themselves" to the
English; and among other things did "promise to be willing from
time to time to be instructed in the knowledge of God." Being
asked "Not to do any unnecessary work on the Sabbath day,
especially within the gates of Christian towns," they answered,
"It is easy to them; they have not much to do on any day, and
they can well take their rest on that day."--"So," says Winthrop,
in his Journal, "we causing them to understand the articles, and
all the ten commandments of God, and they freely assenting to
all, they were solemnly received, and then presented the Court
with twenty-six fathom more of wampom; and the Court gave each of
them a coat of two yards of cloth, and their dinner; and to them
and their men, every of them, a cup of sack at their departure;
so they took leave and went away."

What journeyings on foot and on horseback through the wilderness,
to preach the Gospel to these minks and muskrats! who first, no
doubt, listened with their red ears out of a natural hospitality
and courtesy, and afterward from curiosity or even interest, till
at length there were "praying Indians," and, as the General Court
wrote to Cromwell, the "work is brought to this perfection, that
some of the Indians themselves can pray and prophesy in a
comfortable manner."

It was in fact an old battle and hunting ground through which we
had been floating, the ancient dwelling-place of a race of
hunters and warriors.  Their weirs of stone, their arrowheads and
hatchets, their pestles, and the mortars in which they pounded
Indian corn before the white man had tasted it, lay concealed in
the mud of the river bottom.  Tradition still points out the
spots where they took fish in the greatest numbers, by such arts
as they possessed.  It is a rapid story the historian will have
to put together.  Miantonimo,--Winthrop,--Webster.  Soon he comes
from Montaup to Bunker Hill, from bear-skins, parched corn, bows
and arrows, to tiled roofs, wheat-fields, guns and swords.
Pawtucket and Wamesit, where the Indians resorted in the fishing
season, are now Lowell, the city of spindles and Manchester of
America, which sends its cotton cloth round the globe.  Even we
youthful voyagers had spent a part of our lives in the village of
Chelmsford, when the present city, whose bells we heard, was its
obscure north district only, and the giant weaver was not yet
fairly born.  So old are we; so young is it.


We were thus entering the State of New Hampshire on the bosom of
the flood formed by the tribute of its innumerable valleys.  The
river was the only key which could unlock its maze, presenting
its hills and valleys, its lakes and streams, in their natural
order and position.  The MERRIMACK, or Sturgeon River, is formed
by the confluence of the Pemigewasset, which rises near the Notch
of the White Mountains, and the Winnipiseogee, which drains the
lake of the same name, signifying "The Smile of the Great
Spirit." From their junction it runs south seventy-eight miles to
Massachusetts, and thence east thirty-five miles to the sea.  I
have traced its stream from where it bubbles out of the rocks of
the White Mountains above the clouds, to where it is lost amid
the salt billows of the ocean on Plum Island beach.  At first it
comes on murmuring to itself by the base of stately and retired
mountains, through moist primitive woods whose juices it
receives, where the bear still drinks it, and the cabins of
settlers are far between, and there are few to cross its stream;
enjoying in solitude its cascades still unknown to fame; by long
ranges of mountains of Sandwich and of Squam, slumbering like
tumuli of Titans, with the peaks of Moosehillock, the Haystack,
and Kearsarge reflected in its waters; where the maple and the
raspberry, those lovers of the hills, flourish amid temperate
dews;--flowing long and full of meaning, but untranslatable as
its name Pemigewasset, by many a pastured Pelion and Ossa, where
unnamed muses haunt, tended by Oreads, Dryads, Naiads, and
receiving the tribute of many an untasted Hippocrene.  There are
earth, air, fire, and water,--very well, this is water, and down
it comes.

   Such water do the gods distil,
   And pour down every hill
      For their New England men;
   A draught of this wild nectar bring,
   And I'll not taste the spring
      Of Helicon again.

Falling all the way, and yet not discouraged by the lowest fall.
By the law of its birth never to become stagnant, for it has come
out of the clouds, and down the sides of precipices worn in the
flood, through beaver-dams broke loose, not splitting but
splicing and mending itself, until it found a breathing-place in
this low land.  There is no danger now that the sun will steal it
back to heaven again before it reach the sea, for it has a
warrant even to recover its own dews into its bosom again with
interest at every eve.

It was already the water of Squam and Newfound Lake and
Winnipiseogee, and White Mountain snow dissolved, on which we
were floating, and Smith's and Baker's and Mad Rivers, and Nashua
and Souhegan and Piscataquoag, and Suncook and Soucook and
Contoocook, mingled in incalculable proportions, still fluid,
yellowish, restless all, with an ancient, ineradicable
inclination to the sea.

So it flows on down by Lowell and Haverhill, at which last place
it first suffers a sea change, and a few masts betray the
vicinity of the ocean.  Between the towns of Amesbury and Newbury
it is a broad commercial river, from a third to half a mile in
width, no longer skirted with yellow and crumbling banks, but
backed by high green hills and pastures, with frequent white
beaches on which the fishermen draw up their nets.  I have passed
down this portion of the river in a steamboat, and it was a
pleasant sight to watch from its deck the fishermen dragging
their seines on the distant shore, as in pictures of a foreign
strand.  At intervals you may meet with a schooner laden with
lumber, standing up to Haverhill, or else lying at anchor or
aground, waiting for wind or tide; until, at last, you glide
under the famous Chain Bridge, and are landed at Newburyport.
Thus she who at first was "poore of waters, naked of renowne,"
having received so many fair tributaries, as was said of the
Forth,

   "Doth grow the greater still, the further downe;
      Till that abounding both in power and fame,
      She long doth strive to give the sea her name";

or if not her name, in this case, at least the impulse of her
stream.  From the steeples of Newburyport you may review this
river stretching far up into the country, with many a white sail
glancing over it like an inland sea, and behold, as one wrote who
was born on its head-waters, "Down out at its mouth, the dark
inky main blending with the blue above.  Plum Island, its sand
ridges scolloping along the horizon like the sea-serpent, and the
distant outline broken by many a tall ship, leaning, _still_,
against the sky."

Rising at an equal height with the Connecticut, the Merrimack
reaches the sea by a course only half as long, and hence has no
leisure to form broad and fertile meadows, like the former, but
is hurried along rapids, and down numerous falls, without long
delay.  The banks are generally steep and high, with a narrow
interval reaching back to the hills, which is only rarely or
partially overflown at present, and is much valued by the
farmers.  Between Chelmsford and Concord, in New Hampshire, it
varies from twenty to seventy-five rods in width.  It is probably
wider than it was formerly, in many places, owing to the trees
having been cut down, and the consequent wasting away of its
banks.  The influence of the Pawtucket Dam is felt as far up as
Cromwell's Falls, and many think that the banks are being abraded
and the river filled up again by this cause.  Like all our
rivers, it is liable to freshets, and the Pemigewasset has been
known to rise twenty-five feet in a few hours.  It is navigable
for vessels of burden about twenty miles; for canal-boats, by
means of locks, as far as Concord in New Hampshire, about
seventy-five miles from its mouth; and for smaller boats to
Plymouth, one hundred and thirteen miles.  A small steamboat once
plied between Lowell and Nashua, before the railroad was built,
and one now runs from Newburyport to Haverhill.

Unfitted to some extent for the purposes of commerce by the
sand-bar at its mouth, see how this river was devoted from the
first to the service of manufactures.  Issuing from the iron
region of Franconia, and flowing through still uncut forests, by
inexhaustible ledges of granite, with Squam, and Winnipiseogee,
and Newfound, and Massabesic Lakes for its mill-ponds, it falls
over a succession of natural dams, where it has been offering its
_privileges_ in vain for ages, until at last the Yankee race came
to _improve_ them.  Standing at its mouth, look up its sparkling
stream to its source,--a silver cascade which falls all the way
from the White Mountains to the sea,--and behold a city on each
successive plateau, a busy colony of human beaver around every
fall.  Not to mention Newburyport and Haverhill, see Lawrence,
and Lowell, and Nashua, and Manchester, and Concord, gleaming one
above the other.  When at length it has escaped from under the
last of the factories, it has a level and unmolested passage to
the sea, a mere _waste water_, as it were, bearing little with it
but its fame; its pleasant course revealed by the morning fog
which hangs over it, and the sails of the few small vessels which
transact the commerce of Haverhill and Newburyport.  But its real
vessels are railroad cars, and its true and main stream, flowing
by an iron channel farther south, may be traced by a long line of
vapor amid the hills, which no morning wind ever disperses, to
where it empties into the sea at Boston.  This side is the louder
murmur now.  Instead of the scream of a fish-hawk scaring the
fishes, is heard the whistle of the steam-engine, arousing a
country to its progress.


This river too was at length discovered by the white man,
"trending up into the land," he knew not how far, possibly an
inlet to the South Sea.  Its valley, as far as the Winnipiseogee,
was first surveyed in 1652.  The first settlers of Massachusetts
supposed that the Connecticut, in one part of its course, ran
northwest, "so near the great lake as the Indians do pass their
canoes into it over land."  From which lake and the "hideous
swamps" about it, as they supposed, came all the beaver that was
traded between Virginia and Canada,--and the Potomac was thought
to come out of or from very near it.  Afterward the Connecticut
came so near the course of the Merrimack that, with a little
pains, they expected to divert the current of the trade into the
latter river, and its profits from their Dutch neighbors into
their own pockets.

Unlike the Concord, the Merrimack is not a dead but a living
stream, though it has less life within its waters and on its
banks.  It has a swift current, and, in this part of its course,
a clayey bottom, almost no weeds, and comparatively few fishes.
We looked down into its yellow water with the more curiosity, who
were accustomed to the Nile-like blackness of the former river.
Shad and alewives are taken here in their season, but salmon,
though at one time more numerous than shad, are now more rare.
Bass, also, are taken occasionally; but locks and dams have
proved more or less destructive to the fisheries.  The shad make
their appearance early in May, at the same time with the blossoms
of the pyrus, one of the most conspicuous early flowers, which is
for this reason called the shad-blossom.  An insect called the
shad-fly also appears at the same time, covering the houses and
fences.  We are told that "their greatest run is when the
apple-trees are in full blossom.  The old shad return in August;
the young, three or four inches long, in September.  These are
very fond of flies." A rather picturesque and luxurious mode of
fishing was formerly practised on the Connecticut, at Bellows
Falls, where a large rock divides the stream.  "On the steep
sides of the island rock," says Belknap, "hang several
arm-chairs, fastened to ladders, and secured by a counterpoise,
in which fishermen sit to catch salmon and shad with dipping
nets." The remains of Indian weirs, made of large stones, are
still to be seen in the Winnipiseogee, one of the head-waters of
this river.

It cannot but affect our philosophy favorably to be reminded of
these shoals of migratory fishes, of salmon, shad, alewives,
marsh-bankers, and others, which penetrate up the innumerable
rivers of our coast in the spring, even to the interior lakes,
their scales gleaming in the sun; and again, of the fry which in
still greater numbers wend their way downward to the sea.  "And
is it not pretty sport," wrote Captain John Smith, who was on
this coast as early as 1614, "to pull up twopence, sixpence, and
twelvepence, as fast as you can haul and veer a line?"--"And what
sport doth yield a more pleasing content, and less hurt or
charge, than angling with a hook, and crossing the sweet air from
isle to isle, over the silent streams of a calm sea."


On the sandy shore, opposite the Glass-house village in
Chelmsford, at the Great Bend where we landed to rest us and
gather a few wild plums, we discovered the _Campanula
rotundifolia_, a new flower to us, the harebell of the poets,
which is common to both hemispheres, growing close to the water.
Here, in the shady branches of an apple-tree on the sand, we took
our nooning, where there was not a zephyr to disturb the repose
of this glorious Sabbath day, and we reflected serenely on the
long past and successful labors of Latona.

     "So silent is the cessile air,
        That every cry and call,
     The hills, and dales, and forest fair
        Again repeats them all.

     "The herds beneath some leafy trees,
        Amidst the flowers they lie,
     The stable ships upon the seas
        Tend up their sails to dry."

As we thus rested in the shade, or rowed leisurely along, we had
recourse, from time to time, to the Gazetteer, which was our
Navigator, and from its bald natural facts extracted the pleasure
of poetry.  Beaver River comes in a little lower down, draining
the meadows of Pelham, Windham, and Londonderry.  The Scotch-Irish
settlers of the latter town, according to this authority, were
the first to introduce the potato into New England, as well as
the manufacture of linen cloth.

Everything that is printed and bound in a book contains some echo
at least of the best that is in literature.  Indeed, the best
books have a use, like sticks and stones, which is above or
beside their design, not anticipated in the preface, nor
concluded in the appendix.  Even Virgil's poetry serves a very
different use to me to-day from what it did to his contemporaries.
It has often an acquired and accidental value merely, proving
that man is still man in the world.  It is pleasant to meet with
such still lines as,

    "Jam laeto turgent in palmite gemmae";
     Now the buds swell on the joyful stem.

    "Strata jacent passim sua quaeque sub arbore poma";
     The apples lie scattered everywhere, each under its tree.

In an ancient and dead language, any recognition of living nature
attracts us.  These are such sentences as were written while grass
grew and water ran.  It is no small recommendation when a book
will stand the test of mere unobstructed sunshine and daylight.

What would we not give for some great poem to read now, which
would be in harmony with the scenery,--for if men read aright,
methinks they would never read anything but poems.  No history nor
philosophy can supply their place.

The wisest definition of poetry the poet will instantly prove
false by setting aside its requisitions.  We can, therefore,
publish only our advertisement of it.

There is no doubt that the loftiest written wisdom is either
rhymed, or in some way musically measured,--is, in form as well
as substance, poetry; and a volume which should contain the
condensed wisdom of mankind need not have one rhythmless line.

Yet poetry, though the last and finest result, is a natural
fruit.  As naturally as the oak bears an acorn, and the vine a
gourd, man bears a poem, either spoken or done.  It is the chief
and most memorable success, for history is but a prose narrative
of poetic deeds.  What else have the Hindoos, the Persians, the
Babylonians, the Egyptians done, that can be told?  It is the
simplest relation of phenomena, and describes the commonest
sensations with more truth than science does, and the latter at a
distance slowly mimics its style and methods.  The poet sings how
the blood flows in his veins.  He performs his functions, and is
so well that he needs such stimulus to sing only as plants to put
forth leaves and blossoms.  He would strive in vain to modulate
the remote and transient music which he sometimes hears, since
his song is a vital function like breathing, and an integral
result like weight.  It is not the overflowing of life but its
subsidence rather, and is drawn from under the feet of the poet.
It is enough if Homer but say the sun sets.  He is as serene as
nature, and we can hardly detect the enthusiasm of the bard.  It
is as if nature spoke.  He presents to us the simplest pictures
of human life, so the child itself can understand them, and the
man must not think twice to appreciate his naturalness.  Each
reader discovers for himself that, with respect to the simpler
features of nature, succeeding poets have done little else than
copy his similes.  His more memorable passages are as naturally
bright as gleams of sunshine in misty weather.  Nature furnishes
him not only with words, but with stereotyped lines and sentences
from her mint.

   "As from the clouds appears the full moon,
   All shining, and then again it goes behind the shadowy clouds,
   So Hector, at one time appeared among the foremost,
   And at another in the rear, commanding; and all with brass
   He shone, like to the lightning of aegis-bearing Zeus."

He conveys the least information, even the hour of the day, with
such magnificence and vast expense of natural imagery, as if it
were a message from the gods.

   "While it was dawn, and sacred day was advancing,
   For that space the weapons of both flew fast, and the people fell;
   But when now the woodcutter was preparing his morning meal,
   In the recesses of the mountain, and had wearied his hands
   With cutting lofty trees, and satiety came to his mind,
   And the desire of sweet food took possession of his thoughts;
   Then the Danaans, by their valor, broke the phalanxes,
   Shouting to their companions from rank to rank."

When the army of the Trojans passed the night under arms, keeping
watch lest the enemy should re-embark under cover of the dark,

   "They, thinking great things, upon the neutral ground of war
   Sat all the night; and many fires burned for them.
   As when in the heavens the stars round the bright moon
   Appear beautiful, and the air is without wind;
   And all the heights, and the extreme summits,
   And the wooded sides of the mountains appear; and from the
        heavens an Infinite ether is diffused,
   And all the stars are seen, and the shepherd rejoices in his heart;
   So between the ships and the streams of Xanthus
   Appeared the fires of the Trojans before Ilium.
   A thousand fires burned on the plain, and by each
   Sat fifty, in the light of the blazing fire;
   And horses eating white barley and corn,
   Standing by the chariots, awaited fair-throned Aurora."


The "white-armed goddess Juno," sent by the Father of gods and
men for Iris and Apollo,


   "Went down the Idaean mountains to far Olympus,
   As when the mind of a man, who has come over much earth,
   Sallies forth, and he reflects with rapid thoughts,
   There was I, and there, and remembers many things;
   So swiftly the august Juno hastening flew through the air,
   And came to high Olympus."

His scenery is always true, and not invented.  He does not leap in
imagination from Asia to Greece, through mid air,

   <epei_e` ma'la polla` metaxy'
    Ourea' te skioe'nta, thala'ssa te _ech_e'essa.>

        for there are very many
   Shady mountains and resounding seas between.

If his messengers repair but to the tent of Achilles, we do not
wonder how they got there, but accompany them step by step along
the shore of the resounding sea.  Nestor's account of the march
of the Pylians against the Epeians is extremely lifelike:--

   "Then rose up to them sweet-worded Nestor, the shrill orator
       of the Pylians,
   And words sweeter than honey flowed from his tongue."

This time, however, he addresses Patroclus alone: "A certain
river, Minyas by name, leaps seaward near to Arene, where we
Pylians wait the dawn, both horse and foot.  Thence with all
haste we sped us on the morrow ere 't was noonday, accoutred for
the fight, even to Alpheus's sacred source," &c.  We fancy that
we hear the subdued murmuring of the Minyas discharging its
waters into the main the livelong night, and the hollow sound of
the waves breaking on the shore,--until at length we are cheered
at the close of a toilsome march by the gurgling fountains of
Alpheus.

There are few books which are fit to be remembered in our wisest
hours, but the Iliad is brightest in the serenest days, and
embodies still all the sunlight that fell on Asia Minor.  No
modern joy or ecstasy of ours can lower its height or dim its
lustre, but there it lies in the east of literature, as it were
the earliest and latest production of the mind.  The ruins of
Egypt oppress and stifle us with their dust, foulness preserved
in cassia and pitch, and swathed in linen; the death of that
which never lived.  But the rays of Greek poetry struggle down to
us, and mingle with the sunbeams of the recent day.  The statue
of Memnon is cast down, but the shaft of the Iliad still meets
the sun in his rising.

     "Homer is gone; and where is Jove? and where
      The rival cities seven?  His song outlives
      Time, tower, and god,--all that then was, save Heaven."

So too, no doubt, Homer had his Homer, and Orpheus his Orpheus,
in the dim antiquity which preceded them.  The mythological
system of the ancients, and it is still the mythology of the
moderns, the poem of mankind, interwoven so wonderfully with
their astronomy, and matching in grandeur and harmony the
architecture of the heavens themselves, seems to point to a time
when a mightier genius inhabited the earth.  But, after all, man
is the great poet, and not Homer nor Shakespeare; and our
language itself, and the common arts of life, are his work.
Poetry is so universally true and independent of experience, that
it does not need any particular biography to illustrate it, but
we refer it sooner or later to some Orpheus or Linus, and after
ages to the genius of humanity and the gods themselves.


It would be worth the while to select our reading, for books are
the society we keep; to read only the serenely true; never
statistics, nor fiction, nor news, nor reports, nor periodicals,
but only great poems, and when they failed, read them again, or
perchance write more.  Instead of other sacrifice, we might offer
up our perfect (<telei'a>) thoughts to the gods daily, in hymns or
psalms.  For we should be at the helm at least once a day.  The
whole of the day should not be daytime; there should be one hour,
if no more, which the day did not bring forth.  Scholars are wont
to sell their birthright for a mess of learning.  But is it
necessary to know what the speculator prints, or the thoughtless
study, or the idle read, the literature of the Russians and the
Chinese, or even French philosophy and much of German criticism.
Read the best books first, or you may not have a chance to read
them at all.  "There are the worshippers with offerings, and the
worshippers with mortifications; and again the worshippers with
enthusiastic devotion; so there are those the wisdom of whose
reading is their worship, men of subdued passions and severe
manners;--This world is not for him who doth not worship; and
where, O Arjoon, is there another?"  Certainly, we do not need to
be soothed and entertained always like children.  He who resorts
to the easy novel, because he is languid, does no better than if
he took a nap.  The front aspect of great thoughts can only be
enjoyed by those who stand on the side whence they arrive.
Books, not which afford us a cowering enjoyment, but in which
each thought is of unusual daring; such as an idle man cannot
read, and a timid one would not be entertained by, which even
make us dangerous to existing institutions,--such call I good
books.

All that are printed and bound are not books; they do not
necessarily belong to letters, but are oftener to be ranked with
the other luxuries and appendages of civilized life.  Base wares
are palmed off under a thousand disguises.  "The way to trade,"
as a pedler once told me, "is to _put it right through_," no
matter what it is, anything that is agreed on.

    "You grov'ling worldlings, you whose wisdom trades
     Where light ne'er shot his golden ray."

By dint of able writing and pen-craft, books are cunningly
compiled, and have their run and success even among the learned,
as if they were the result of a new man's thinking, and their
birth were attended with some natural throes.  But in a little
while their covers fall off, for no binding will avail, and it
appears that they are not Books or Bibles at all.  There are new
and patented inventions in this shape, purporting to be for the
elevation of the race, which many a pure scholar and genius who
has learned to read is for a moment deceived by, and finds
himself reading a horse-rake, or spinning-jenny, or wooden
nutmeg, or oak-leaf cigar, or steam-power press, or kitchen
range, perchance, when he was seeking serene and biblical truths.

                          "Merchants, arise,
     And mingle conscience with your merchandise."

Paper is cheap, and authors need not now erase one book before
they write another.  Instead of cultivating the earth for wheat
and potatoes, they cultivate literature, and fill a place in the
Republic of Letters.  Or they would fain write for fame merely,
as others actually raise crops of grain to be distilled into
brandy.  Books are for the most part wilfully and hastily
written, as parts of a system, to supply a want real or imagined.
Books of natural history aim commonly to be hasty schedules, or
inventories of God's property, by some clerk.  They do not in the
least teach the divine view of nature, but the popular view, or
rather the popular method of studying nature, and make haste to
conduct the persevering pupil only into that dilemma where the
professors always dwell.

    "To Athens gowned he goes, and from that school
     Returns unsped, a more instructed fool."

They teach the elements really of ignorance, not of knowledge,
for, to speak deliberately and in view of the highest truths, it
is not easy to distinguish elementary knowledge.  There is a
chasm between knowledge and ignorance which the arches of science
can never span.  A book should contain pure discoveries, glimpses
of _terra firma_, though by shipwrecked mariners, and not the art
of navigation by those who have never been out of sight of land.
_They_ must not yield wheat and potatoes, but must themselves be
the unconstrained and natural harvest of their author's lives.

    "What I have learned is mine; I've had my thought,
     And me the Muses noble truths have taught."

We do not learn much from learned books, but from true, sincere,
human books, from frank and honest biographies.  The life of a
good man will hardly improve us more than the life of a
freebooter, for the inevitable laws appear as plainly in the
infringement as in the observance, and our lives are sustained by
a nearly equal expense of virtue of some kind.  The decaying
tree, while yet it lives, demands sun, wind, and rain no less
than the green one.  It secretes sap and performs the functions
of health.  If we choose, we may study the alburnum only.  The
gnarled stump has as tender a bud as the sapling.

At least let us have healthy books, a stout horse-rake or a
kitchen range which is not cracked.  Let not the poet shed tears
only for the public weal.  He should be as vigorous as a
sugar-maple, with sap enough to maintain his own verdure, beside
what runs into the troughs, and not like a vine, which being cut
in the spring bears no fruit, but bleeds to death in the endeavor
to heal its wounds.  The poet is he that hath fat enough, like
bears and marmots, to suck his claws all winter.  He hibernates
in this world, and feeds on his own marrow.  We love to think in
winter, as we walk over the snowy pastures, of those happy
dreamers that lie under the sod, of dormice and all that race of
dormant creatures, which have such a superfluity of life
enveloped in thick folds of fur, impervious to cold.  Alas, the
poet too is, in one sense, a sort of dormouse gone into winter
quarters of deep and serene thoughts, insensible to surrounding
circumstances; his words are the relation of his oldest and
finest memory, a wisdom drawn from the remotest experience.
Other men lead a starved existence, meanwhile, like hawks, that
would fain keep on the wing, and trust to pick up a sparrow now
and then.


There are already essays and poems, the growth of this land,
which are not in vain, all which, however, we could conveniently
have stowed in the till of our chest.  If the gods permitted
their own inspiration to be breathed in vain, these might be
overlooked in the crowd, but the accents of truth are as sure to
be heard at last on earth as in heaven.  They already seem
ancient, and in some measure have lost the traces of their modern
birth.  Here are they who

   "ask for that which is our whole life's light,
   For the perpetual, true and clear insight."

I remember a few sentences which spring like the sward in its
native pasture, where its roots were never disturbed, and not as
if spread over a sandy embankment; answering to the poet's
prayer,

                "Let us set so just
   A rate on knowledge, that the world may trust
   The poet's sentence, and not still aver
   Each art is to itself a flatterer."

But, above all, in our native port, did we not frequent the
peaceful games of the Lyceum, from which a new era will be dated
to New England, as from the games of Greece.  For if Herodotus
carried his history to Olympia to read, after the cestus and the
race, have we not heard such histories recited there, which since
our countrymen have read, as made Greece sometimes to be
forgotten?--Philosophy, too, has there her grove and portico, not
wholly unfrequented in these days.

Lately the victor, whom all Pindars praised, has won another
palm, contending with

   "Olympian bards who sung
   Divine ideas below,
   Which always find us young,
   And always keep us so."

What earth or sea, mountain or stream, or Muses' spring or grove,
is safe from his all-searching ardent eye, who drives off
Phoebus' beaten track, visits unwonted zones, makes the gelid
Hyperboreans glow, and the old polar serpent writhe, and many a
Nile flow back and hide his head!

   That Phaeton of our day,
   Who'd make another milky way,
   And burn the world up with his ray;

   By us an undisputed seer,--
   Who'd drive his flaming car so near
   Unto our shuddering mortal sphere,

   Disgracing all our slender worth,
   And scorching up the living earth,
   To prove his heavenly birth.

   The silver spokes, the golden tire,
   Are glowing with unwonted fire,
   And ever nigher roll and nigher;

   The pins and axle melted are,
   The silver radii fly afar,
   Ah, he will spoil his Father's car!

   Who let him have the steeds he cannot steer?
   Henceforth the sun will not shine for a year;
   And we shall Ethiops all appear.

From _his_

           "lips of cunning fell
   The thrilling Delphic oracle."

And yet, sometimes,

   We should not mind if on our ear there fell
   Some less of cunning, more of oracle.

It is Apollo shining in your face.  O rare Contemporary, let us
have far-off heats.  Give us the subtler, the heavenlier though
fleeting beauty, which passes through and through, and dwells not
in the verse; even pure water, which but reflects those tints
which wine wears in its grain.  Let epic trade-winds blow, and
cease this waltz of inspirations.  Let us oftener feel even the
gentle southwest wind upon our cheeks blowing from the Indian's
heaven.  What though we lose a thousand meteors from the sky, if
skyey depths, if star-dust and undissolvable nebulae remain?
What though we lose a thousand wise responses of the oracle, if
we may have instead some natural acres of Ionian earth?

Though we know well,

   "That't is not in the power of kings [or presidents] to raise
    A spirit for verse that is not born thereto,
    Nor are they born in every prince's days";

yet spite of all they sang in praise of their "Eliza's reign," we
have evidence that poets may be born and sing in _our_ day, in
the presidency of James K.  Polk,

    "And that the utmost powers of English rhyme,"
    _Were not_ "within _her_ peaceful reign confined."

The prophecy of the poet Daniel is already how much more than
fulfilled!

    "And who in time knows whither we may vent
    The treasure of our tongue?  To what strange shores
    This gain of our best glory shall be sent,
    T' enrich unknowing nations with our stores?
    What worlds in th' yet unformed occident,
    May come refined with the accents that are ours."

Enough has been said in these days of the charm of fluent
writing.  We hear it complained of some works of genius, that
they have fine thoughts, but are irregular and have no flow.  But
even the mountain peaks in the horizon are, to the eye of
science, parts of one range.  We should consider that the flow of
thought is more like a tidal wave than a prone river, and is the
result of a celestial influence, not of any declivity in its
channel.  The river flows because it runs down hill, and flows
the faster the faster it descends.  The reader who expects to
float down stream for the whole voyage, may well complain of
nauseating swells and choppings of the sea when his frail
shore-craft gets amidst the billows of the ocean stream, which
flows as much to sun and moon as lesser streams to it.  But if we
would appreciate the flow that is in these books, we must expect
to feel it rise from the page like an exhalation, and wash away
our critical brains like burr millstones, flowing to higher
levels above and behind ourselves.  There is many a book which
ripples on like a freshet, and flows as glibly as a mill-stream
sucking under a causeway; and when their authors are in the full
tide of their discourse, Pythagoras and Plato and Jamblichus halt
beside them.  Their long, stringy, slimy sentences are of that
consistency that they naturally flow and run together.  They read
as if written for military men, for men of business, there is
such a despatch in them.  Compared with these, the grave thinkers
and philosophers seem not to have got their swaddling-clothes
off; they are slower than a Roman army in its march, the rear
camping to-night where the van camped last night.  The wise
Jamblichus eddies and gleams like a watery slough.

    "How many thousands never heard the name
    Of Sidney, or of Spenser, or their books?
    And yet brave fellows, and presume of fame,
    And seem to bear down all the world with looks."

The ready writer seizes the pen, and shouts, Forward!  Alamo and
Fanning!  and after rolls the tide of war.  The very walls and
fences seem to travel.  But the most rapid trot is no flow after
all; and thither, reader, you and I, at least, will not follow.

A perfectly healthy sentence, it is true, is extremely rare.  For
the most part we miss the hue and fragrance of the thought; as if
we could be satisfied with the dews of the morning or evening
without their colors, or the heavens without their azure.  The
most attractive sentences are, perhaps, not the wisest, but the
surest and roundest.  They are spoken firmly and conclusively, as
if the speaker had a right to know what he says, and if not wise,
they have at least been well learned.  Sir Walter Raleigh might
well be studied if only for the excellence of his style, for he
is remarkable in the midst of so many masters.  There is a
natural emphasis in his style, like a man's tread, and a
breathing space between the sentences, which the best of modern
writing does not furnish.  His chapters are like English parks,
or say rather like a Western forest, where the larger growth
keeps down the underwood, and one may ride on horseback through
the openings.  All the distinguished writers of that period
possess a greater vigor and naturalness than the more
modern,--for it is allowed to slander our own time,--and when we
read a quotation from one of them in the midst of a modern
author, we seem to have come suddenly upon a greener ground, a
greater depth and strength of soil.  It is as if a green bough
were laid across the page, and we are refreshed as by the sight
of fresh grass in midwinter or early spring.  You have constantly
the warrant of life and experience in what you read.  The little
that is said is eked out by implication of the much that was
done.  The sentences are verdurous and blooming as evergreen and
flowers, because they are rooted in fact and experience, but our
false and florid sentence have only the tints of flowers without
their sap or roots.  All men are really most attracted by the
beauty of plain speech, and they even write in a florid style in
imitation of this.  They prefer to be misunderstood rather than
to come short of its exuberance.  Hussein Effendi praised the
epistolary style of Ibrahim Pasha to the French traveller Botta,
because of "the difficulty of understanding it; there was," he
said, "but one person at Jidda, who was capable of understanding
and explaining the Pasha's correspondence." A man's whole life is
taxed for the least thing well done.  It is its net result.
Every sentence is the result of a long probation.  Where shall we
look for standard English, but to the words of a standard man?
The word which is best said came nearest to not being spoken at
all, for it is cousin to a deed which the speaker could have
better done.  Nay, almost it must have taken the place of a deed
by some urgent necessity, even by some misfortune, so that the
truest writer will be some captive knight, after all.  And
perhaps the fates had such a design, when, having stored Raleigh
so richly with the substance of life and experience, they made
him a fast prisoner, and compelled him to make his words his
deeds, and transfer to his expression the emphasis and sincerity
of his action.

Men have a respect for scholarship and learning greatly out of
proportion to the use they commonly serve.  We are amused to read
how Ben Jonson engaged, that the dull masks with which the royal
family and nobility were to be entertained should be "grounded
upon antiquity and solid learning." Can there be any greater
reproach than an idle learning?  Learn to split wood, at least.
The necessity of labor and conversation with many men and things,
to the scholar is rarely well remembered; steady labor with the
hands, which engrosses the attention also, is unquestionably the
best method of removing palaver and sentimentality out of one's
style, both of speaking and writing.  If he has worked hard from
morning till night, though he may have grieved that he could not
be watching the train of his thoughts during that time, yet the
few hasty lines which at evening record his day's experience will
be more musical and true than his freest but idle fancy could
have furnished.  Surely the writer is to address a world of
laborers, and such therefore must be his own discipline.  He will
not idly dance at his work who has wood to cut and cord before
nightfall in the short days of winter; but every stroke will be
husbanded, and ring soberly through the wood; and so will the
strokes of that scholar's pen, which at evening record the story
of the day, ring soberly, yet cheerily, on the ear of the reader,
long after the echoes of his axe have died away.  The scholar may
be sure that he writes the tougher truth for the calluses on his
palms.  They give firmness to the sentence.  Indeed, the mind
never makes a great and successful effort, without a
corresponding energy of the body.  We are often struck by the
force and precision of style to which hard-working men,
unpractised in writing, easily attain when required to make the
effort.  As if plainness, and vigor, and sincerity, the ornaments
of style, were better learned on the farm and in the workshop,
than in the schools.  The sentences written by such rude hands
are nervous and tough, like hardened thongs, the sinews of the
deer, or the roots of the pine.  As for the graces of expression,
a great thought is never found in a mean dress; but though it
proceed from the lips of the Woloffs, the nine Muses and the
three Graces will have conspired to clothe it in fit phrase.  Its
education has always been liberal, and its implied wit can endow
a college.  The world, which the Greeks called Beauty, has been
made such by being gradually divested of every ornament which was
not fitted to endure.  The Sibyl, "speaking with inspired mouth,
smileless, inornate, and unperfumed, pierces through centuries by
the power of the god."  The scholar might frequently emulate the
propriety and emphasis of the farmer's call to his team, and
confess that if that were written it would surpass his labored
sentences.  Whose are the truly _labored_ sentences?  From the
weak and flimsy periods of the politician and literary man, we
are glad to turn even to the description of work, the simple
record of the month's labor in the farmer's almanac, to restore
our tone and spirits.  A sentence should read as if its author,
had he held a plough instead of a pen, could have drawn a furrow
deep and straight to the end.  The scholar requires hard and
serious labor to give an impetus to his thought.  He will learn
to grasp the pen firmly so, and wield it gracefully and
effectively, as an axe or a sword.  When we consider the weak and
nerveless periods of some literary men, who perchance in feet and
inches come up to the standard of their race, and are not
deficient in girth also, we are amazed at the immense sacrifice
of thews and sinews.  What! these proportions,--these bones,--and
this their work!  Hands which could have felled an ox have hewed
this fragile matter which would not have tasked a lady's fingers!
Can this be a stalwart man's work, who has a marrow in his back
and a tendon Achilles in his heel?  They who set up the blocks of
Stonehenge did somewhat, if they only laid out their strength for
once, and stretched themselves.

Yet, after all, the truly efficient laborer will not crowd his
day with work, but will saunter to his task surrounded by a wide
halo of ease and leisure, and then do but what he loves best.  He
is anxious only about the fruitful kernels of time.  Though the
hen should sit all day, she could lay only one egg, and, besides,
would not have picked up materials for another.  Let a man take
time enough for the most trivial deed, though it be but the
paring of his nails.  The buds swell imperceptibly, without hurry
or confusion, as if the short spring days were an eternity.

     Then spend an age in whetting thy desire,
     Thou needs't not _hasten_ if thou dost _stand fast_.

Some hours seem not to be occasion for any deed, but for resolves
to draw breath in.  We do not directly go about the execution of
the purpose that thrills us, but shut our doors behind us and
ramble with prepared mind, as if the half were already done.  Our
resolution is taking root or hold on the earth then, as seeds
first send a shoot downward which is fed by their own albumen,
ere they send one upward to the light.


There is a sort of homely truth and naturalness in some books
which is very rare to find, and yet looks cheap enough.  There
may be nothing lofty in the sentiment, or fine in the expression,
but it is careless country talk.  Homeliness is almost as great a
merit in a book as in a house, if the reader would abide there.
It is next to beauty, and a very high art.  Some have this merit
only.  The scholar is not apt to make his most familiar
experience come gracefully to the aid of his expression.  Very
few men can speak of Nature, for instance, with any truth.  They
overstep her modesty, somehow or other, and confer no favor.
They do not speak a good word for her.  Most cry better than they
speak, and you can get more nature out of them by pinching than
by addressing them.  The surliness with which the woodchopper
speaks of his woods, handling them as indifferently as his axe,
is better than the mealy-mouthed enthusiasm of the lover of
nature.  Better that the primrose by the river's brim be a yellow
primrose, and nothing more, than that it be something less.
Aubrey relates of Thomas Fuller that his was "a very working
head, insomuch that, walking and meditating before dinner, he
would eat up a penny loaf, not knowing that he did it.  His
natural memory was very great, to which he added the art of
memory.  He would repeat to you forwards and backwards all the
signs from Ludgate to Charing Cross." He says of Mr. John Hales,
that, "He loved Canarie," and was buried "under an altar monument
of black marble--------with a too long epitaph"; of Edmund
Halley, that he "at sixteen could make a dial, and then, he said,
he thought himself a brave fellow"; of William Holder, who wrote
a book upon his curing one Popham who was deaf and dumb, "he was
beholding to no author; did only consult with nature." For the
most part, an author consults only with all who have written
before him upon a subject, and his book is but the advice of so
many.  But a good book will never have been forestalled, but the
topic itself will in one sense be new, and its author, by
consulting with nature, will consult not only with those who have
gone before, but with those who may come after.  There is always
room and occasion enough for a true book on any subject; as there
is room for more light the brightest day and more rays will not
interfere with the first.

We thus worked our way up this river, gradually adjusting our
thoughts to novelties, beholding from its placid bosom a new
nature and new works of men, and, as it were with increasing
confidence, finding nature still habitable, genial, and
propitious to us; not following any beaten path, but the windings
of the river, as ever the nearest way for us.  Fortunately we had
no business in this country.  The Concord had rarely been a
river, or _rivus_, but barely _fluvius_, or between _fluvius_ and
_lacus_.  This Merrimack was neither _rivus_ nor _fluvius_ nor
_lacus_, but rather _amnis_ here, a gently swelling and stately
rolling flood approaching the sea.  We could even sympathize with
its buoyant tide, going to seek its fortune in the ocean, and,
anticipating the time when "being received within the plain of
its freer water," it should "beat the shores for banks,"--

   "campoque recepta
   Liberioris aquae, pro ripis litora pulsant."

At length we doubled a low shrubby islet, called Rabbit Island,
subjected alternately to the sun and to the waves, as desolate as
if it lay some leagues within the icy sea, and found ourselves in
a narrower part of the river, near the sheds and yards for
picking the stone known as the Chelmsford granite, which is
quarried in Westford and the neighboring towns.  We passed
Wicasuck Island, which contains seventy acres or more, on our
right, between Chelmsford and Tyngsborough.  This was a favorite
residence of the Indians.  According to the History of Dunstable,
"About 1663, the eldest son of Passaconaway [Chief of the
Penacooks] was thrown into jail for a debt of (pounds)45, due to John
Tinker, by one of his tribe, and which he had promised verbally
should be paid.  To relieve him from his imprisonment, his
brother Wannalancet and others, who owned Wicasuck Island, sold
it and paid the debt." It was, however, restored to the Indians
by the General Court in 1665.  After the departure of the Indians
in 1683, it was granted to Jonathan Tyng in payment for his
services to the colony, in maintaining a garrison at his house.
Tyng's house stood not far from Wicasuck Falls.  Gookin, who, in
his Epistle Dedicatory to Robert Boyle, apologizes for presenting
his "matter clothed in a wilderness dress," says that on the
breaking out of Philip's war in 1675, there were taken up by the
Christian Indians and the English in Marlborough, and sent to
Cambridge, seven "Indians belonging to Narragansett, Long Island,
and Pequod, who had all been at work about seven weeks with one
Mr. Jonathan Tyng, of Dunstable, upon Merrimack River; and,
hearing of the war, they reckoned with their master, and getting
their wages, conveyed themselves away without his privity, and,
being afraid, marched secretly through the woods, designing to go
to their own country." However, they were released soon after.
Such were the hired men in those days.  Tyng was the first
permanent settler of Dunstable, which then embraced what is now
Tyngsborough and many other towns.  In the winter of 1675, in
Philip's war, every other settler left the town, but "he," says
the historian of Dunstable, "fortified his house; and, although
`obliged to send to Boston for his food,' sat himself down in the
midst of his savage enemies, alone, in the wilderness, to defend
his home.  Deeming his position an important one for the defence
of the frontiers, in February, 1676, he petitioned the Colony for
aid, "humbly showing, as his petition runs, that, as he lived "in
the uppermost house on Merrimac river, lying open to ye enemy,
yet being so seated that it is, as it were, a watch-house to the
neighboring towns, "he could render important service to his
country if only he had some assistance," there being, "he said,"
never an inhabitant left in the town but myself." Wherefore he
requests that their "Honors would be pleased to order him _three
or four men_ to help garrison his said house," which they did.
But methinks that such a garrison would be weakened by the
addition of a man.

    "Make bandog thy scout watch to bark at a thief,
     Make courage for life, to be capitain chief;
     Make trap-door thy bulwark, make bell to begin,
     Make gunstone and arrow show who is within."

Thus he earned the title of first permanent settler.  In 1694 a
law was passed "that every settler who deserted a town for fear
of the Indians should forfeit all his rights therein." But now,
at any rate, as I have frequently observed, a man may desert the
fertile frontier territories of truth and justice, which are the
State's best lands, for fear of far more insignificant foes,
without forfeiting any of his civil rights therein.  Nay,
townships are granted to deserters, and the General Court, as I
am sometimes inclined to regard it, is but a deserters' camp
itself.

As we rowed along near the shore of Wicasuck Island, which was
then covered with wood, in order to avoid the current, two men,
who looked as if they had just run out of Lowell, where they had
been waylaid by the Sabbath, meaning to go to Nashua, and who now
found themselves in the strange, natural, uncultivated, and
unsettled part of the globe which intervenes, full of walls and
barriers, a rough and uncivil place to them, seeing our boat
moving so smoothly up the stream, called out from the high bank
above our heads to know if we would take them as passengers, as
if this were the street they had missed; that they might sit and
chat and drive away the time, and so at last find themselves in
Nashua.  This smooth way they much preferred.  But our boat was
crowded with necessary furniture, and sunk low in the water, and
moreover required to be worked, for even _it_ did not progress
against the stream without effort; so we were obliged to deny
them passage.  As we glided away with even sweeps, while the
fates scattered oil in our course, the sun now sinking behind the
alders on the distant shore, we could still see them far off over
the water, running along the shore and climbing over the rocks
and fallen trees like insects,--for they did not know any better
than we that they were on an island,--the unsympathizing river
ever flowing in an opposite direction; until, having reached the
entrance of the island brook, which they had probably crossed
upon the locks below, they found a more effectual barrier to
their progress.  They seemed to be learning much in a little
time.  They ran about like ants on a burning brand, and once more
they tried the river here, and once more there, to see if water
still indeed was not to be walked on, as if a new thought
inspired them, and by some peculiar disposition of the limbs they
could accomplish it.  At length sober common sense seemed to have
resumed its sway, and they concluded that what they had so long
heard must be true, and resolved to ford the shallower stream.
When nearly a mile distant we could see them stripping off their
clothes and preparing for this experiment; yet it seemed likely
that a new dilemma would arise, they were so thoughtlessly
throwing away their clothes on the wrong side of the stream, as
in the case of the countryman with his corn, his fox, and his
goose, which had to be transported one at a time.  Whether they
got safely through, or went round by the locks, we never learned.
We could not help being struck by the seeming, though innocent
indifference of Nature to these men's necessities, while
elsewhere she was equally serving others.  Like a true
benefactress, the secret of her service is unchangeableness.
Thus is the busiest merchant, though within sight of his Lowell,
put to pilgrim's shifts, and soon comes to staff and scrip and
scallop shell.

We, too, who held the middle of the stream, came near
experiencing a pilgrim's fate, being tempted to pursue what
seemed a sturgeon or larger fish, for we remembered that this was
the Sturgeon River, its dark and monstrous back alternately
rising and sinking in mid-stream.  We kept falling behind, but
the fish kept his back well out, and did not dive, and seemed to
prefer to swim against the stream, so, at any rate, he would not
escape us by going out to sea.  At length, having got as near as
was convenient, and looking out not to get a blow from his tail,
now the bow-gunner delivered his charge, while the stern-man held
his ground.  But the halibut-skinned monster, in one of these
swift-gliding pregnant moments, without ever ceasing his bobbing
up and down, saw fit, without a chuckle or other prelude, to
proclaim himself a huge imprisoned spar, placed there as a buoy,
to warn sailors of sunken rocks.  So, each casting some blame
upon the other, we withdrew quickly to safer waters.

The Scene-shifter saw fit here to close the drama, of this day,
without regard to any unities which we mortals prize.  Whether it
might have proved tragedy, or comedy, or tragi-comedy, or
pastoral, we cannot tell.  This Sunday ended by the going down of
the sun, leaving us still on the waves.  But they who are on the
water enjoy a longer and brighter twilight than they who are on
the land, for here the water, as well as the atmosphere, absorbs
and reflects the light, and some of the day seems to have sunk
down into the waves.  The light gradually forsook the deep water,
as well as the deeper air, and the gloaming came to the fishes as
well as to us, and more dim and gloomy to them, whose day is a
perpetual twilight, though sufficiently bright for their weak and
watery eyes.  Vespers had already rung in many a dim and watery
chapel down below, where the shadows of the weeds were extended
in length over the sandy floor.  The vespertinal pout had already
begun to flit on leathern fin, and the finny gossips withdrew
from the fluvial street to creeks and coves, and other private
haunts, excepting a few of stronger fin, which anchored in the
stream, stemming the tide even in their dreams.  Meanwhile, like
a dark evening cloud, we were wafted over the cope of their sky,
deepening the shadows on their deluged fields.

Having reached a retired part of the river where it spread out to
sixty rods in width, we pitched our tent on the east side, in
Tyngsborough, just above some patches of the beach plum, which
was now nearly ripe, where the sloping bank was a sufficient
pillow, and with the bustle of sailors making the land, we
transferred such stores as were required from boat to tent, and
hung a lantern to the tent-pole, and so our house was ready.
With a buffalo spread on the grass, and a blanket for our
covering our bed was soon made.  A fire crackled merrily before
the entrance, so near that we could tend it without stepping
abroad, and when we had supped, we put out the blaze, and closed
the door, and with the semblance of domestic comfort, sat up to
read the Gazetteer, to learn our latitude and longitude, and
write the journal of the voyage, or listened to the wind and the
rippling of the river till sleep overtook us.  There we lay under
an oak on the bank of the stream, near to some farmer's
cornfield, getting sleep, and forgetting where we were; a great
blessing, that we are obliged to forget our enterprises every
twelve hours.  Minks, muskrats, meadow-mice, woodchucks,
squirrels, skunks, rabbits, foxes, and weasels, all inhabit near,
but keep very close while you are there.  The river sucking and
eddying away all night down toward the marts and the seaboard, a
great wash and freshet, and no small enterprise to reflect on.
Instead of the Scythian vastness of the Billerica night, and its
wild musical sounds, we were kept awake by the boisterous sport
of some Irish laborers on the railroad, wafted to us over the
water, still unwearied and unresting on this seventh day, who
would not have done with whirling up and down the track with ever
increasing velocity and still reviving shouts, till late in the
night.

One sailor was visited in his dreams this night by the Evil
Destinies, and all those powers that are hostile to human life,
which constrain and oppress the minds of men, and make their path
seem difficult and narrow, and beset with dangers, so that the
most innocent and worthy enterprises appear insolent and a
tempting of fate, and the gods go not with us.  But the other
happily passed a serene and even ambrosial or immortal night, and
his sleep was dreamless, or only the atmosphere of pleasant
dreams remained, a happy natural sleep until the morning; and his
cheerful spirit soothed and reassured his brother, for whenever
they meet, the Good Genius is sure to prevail.




[page]


                        MONDAY.


       "I thynke for to touche also
       The worlde whiche neweth everie daie,
       So as I can, so as I maie."

                          ^Gower^.


          "The hye sheryfe of Notynghame,
            Hym holde in your mynd."
                       _Robin Hood Ballads_.


[page]


            "His shoote it was but loosely shott,
              Yet flewe not the arrowe in vaine,
             For it mett one of the sheriffe's men,
              And William a Trent was slaine."
                                     _Robin Hood Ballads_

    "Gazed on the heavens for what he missed on Earth."
                                   _Britania's Pastorale_


[page]



                       MONDAY.

                        --*--


When the first light dawned on the earth and the birds, awoke,
and the brave river was heard rippling confidently seaward, and
the nimble early rising wind rustled the oak leaves about our
tent, all men having reinforced their bodies and their souls with
sleep, and cast aside doubt and fear, were invited to unattempted
adventures.

     "All courageous knichtis
      Agains the day dichtis
      The breest-plate that bricht is,
           To feght with their foue.
      The stoned steed stampis
      Throw curage and crampis,
      Syne on the land lampis;
           The night is neir gone."

One of us took the boat over to the opposite shore, which was
flat and accessible, a quarter of a mile distant, to empty it of
water and wash out the clay, while the other kindled a fire and
got breakfast ready.  At an early hour we were again on our way,
rowing through the fog as before, the river already awake, and a
million crisped waves come forth to meet the sun when he should
show himself.  The countrymen, recruited by their day of rest,
were already stirring, and had begun to cross the ferry on the
business of the week.  This ferry was as busy as a beaver dam,
and all the world seemed anxious to get across the Merrimack
River at this particular point, waiting to get set over,--children
 with their two cents done up in paper, jail-birds broke loose
and constable with warrant, travellers from distant lands to
distant lands, men and women to whom the Merrimack River was a
bar.  There stands a gig in the gray morning, in the mist, the
impatient traveller pacing the wet shore with whip in hand, and
shouting through the fog after the regardless Charon and his
retreating ark, as if he might throw that passenger overboard and
return forthwith for himself; he will compensate him.  He is to
break his fast at some unseen place on the opposite side.  It may
be Ledyard or the Wandering Jew.  Whence, pray, did he come out
of the foggy night?  and whither through the sunny day will he
go?  We observe only his transit; important to us, forgotten by
him, transiting all day.  There are two of them.  May be, they
are Virgil and Dante.  But when they crossed the Styx, none were
seen bound up or down the stream, that I remember.  It is only a
_transjectus_, a transitory voyage, like life itself, none but
the long-lived gods bound up or down the stream.  Many of these
Monday men are ministers, no doubt, reseeking their parishes with
hired horses, with sermons in their valises all read and gutted,
the day after never with them.  They cross each other's routes
all the country over like woof and warp, making a garment of
loose texture; vacation now for six days.  They stop to pick nuts
and berries, and gather apples by the wayside at their leisure.
Good religious men, with the love of men in their hearts, and the
means to pay their toll in their pockets.  We got over this ferry
chain without scraping, rowing athwart the tide of travel,--no
toll for us that day.

The fog dispersed and we rowed leisurely along through
Tyngsborough, with a clear sky and a mild atmosphere, leaving
the habitations of men behind and penetrating yet farther into
the territory of ancient Dunstable.  It was from Dunstable, then
a frontier town, that the famous Captain Lovewell, with his
company, marched in quest of the Indians on the 18th of April,
1725.  He was the son of "an ensign in the army of Oliver
Cromwell, who came to this country, and settled at Dunstable,
where he died at the great age of one hundred and twenty years."
In the words of the old nursery tale, sung about a hundred years
ago,--

     "He and his valiant soldiers did range the woods full wide,
      And hardships they endured to quell the Indian's pride."

In the shaggy pine forest of Pequawket they met the "rebel
Indians," and prevailed, after a bloody fight, and a remnant
returned home to enjoy the fame of their victory.  A township
called Lovewell's Town, but now, for some reason, or perhaps
without reason, Pembroke, was granted them by the State.

     "Of all our valiant English, there were but thirty-four,
      And of the rebel Indians, there were about four-score;
      And sixteen of our English did safely home return,
      The rest were killed and wounded, for which we all must mourn.

     "Our worthy Capt.  Lovewell among them there did die,
      They killed Lieut.  Robbins, and wounded good young Frye,
      Who was our English Chaplin; he many Indians slew,
      And some of them he scalped while bullets round him flew."

Our brave forefathers have exterminated all the Indians, and
their degenerate children no longer dwell in garrisoned houses
nor hear any war-whoop in their path.  It would be well,
perchance, if many an "English Chaplin" in these days could
exhibit as unquestionable trophies of his valor as did "good
young Frye."  We have need to be as sturdy pioneers still as
Miles Standish, or Church, or Lovewell.  We are to follow on
another trail, it is true, but one as convenient for ambushes.
What if the Indians are exterminated, are not savages as grim
prowling about the clearings to-day?--

     "And braving many dangers and hardships in the way,
     They safe arrived at Dunstable the thirteenth (?) day of May."

But they did not all "safe arrive in Dunstable the thirteenth,"
or the fifteenth, or the thirtieth "day of May."  Eleazer Davis
and Josiah Jones, both of Concord, for our native town had seven
men in this fight, Lieutenant Farwell, of Dunstable, and Jonathan
Frye, of Andover, who were all wounded, were left behind,
creeping toward the settlements.  "After travelling several
miles, Frye was left and lost," though a more recent poet has
assigned him company in his last hours.

     "A man he was of comely form,
       Polished and brave, well learned and kind;
     Old Harvard's learned halls he left
       Far in the wilds a grave to find.

     "Ah! now his blood-red arm he lifts;
       His closing lids he tries to raise;
     And speak once more before he dies,
       In supplication and in praise.

     "He prays kind Heaven to grant success,
       Brave Lovewell's men to guide and bless,
     And when they've shed their heart-blood true,
       To raise them all to happiness."
           *   *   *   *   *
     "Lieutenant Farwell took his hand,
       His arm around his neck he threw,
     And said, `Brave Chaplain, I could wish
       That Heaven had made me die for you.'"
           *   *   *   *   *


Farwell held out eleven days.  "A tradition says," as we learn
from the History of Concord, "that arriving at a pond with
Lieut. Farwell, Davis pulled off one of his moccasins, cut it in
strings, on which he fastened a hook, caught some fish, fried and
ate them.  They refreshed him, but were injurious to Farwell, who
died soon after."  Davis had a ball lodged in his body, and his
right hand shot off; but on the whole, he seems to have been less
damaged than his companion.  He came into Berwick after being out
fourteen days.  Jones also had a ball lodged in his body, but he
likewise got into Saco after fourteen days, though not in the
best condition imaginable.  "He had subsisted," says an old
journal, "on the spontaneous vegetables of the forest; and
cranberries which he had eaten came out of wounds he had received
in his body."  This was also the case with Davis.  The last two
reached home at length, safe if not sound, and lived many years
in a crippled state to enjoy their pension.

But alas! of the crippled Indians, and their adventures in the
woods,--

     "For as we are informed, so thick and fast they fell,
     Scarce twenty of their number at night did get home well,"--

how many balls lodged with them, how fared their cranberries,
what Berwick or Saco they got into, and finally what pension or
township was granted them, there is no journal to tell.

It is stated in the History of Dunstable, that just before his
last march, Lovewell was warned to beware of the ambuscades of
the enemy, but "he replied, `that he did not care for them,' and
bending down a small elm beside which he was standing into a bow,
declared `that he would treat the Indians in the same way.' This
elm is still standing [in Nashua], a venerable and magnificent
tree."


Meanwhile, having passed the Horseshoe Interval in Tyngsborough,
where the river makes a sudden bend to the northwest,--for our
reflections have anticipated our progress somewhat,--we were
advancing farther into the country and into the day, which last
proved almost as golden as the preceding, though the slight
bustle and activity of the Monday seemed to penetrate even to
this scenery.  Now and then we had to muster all our energy to get
round a point, where the river broke rippling over rocks, and the
maples trailed their branches in the stream, but there was
generally a backwater or eddy on the side, of which we took
advantage.  The river was here about forty rods wide and fifteen
feet deep.  Occasionally one ran along the shore, examining the
country, and visiting the nearest farm-houses, while the other
followed the windings of the stream alone, to meet his companion
at some distant point, and hear the report of his adventures; how
the farmer praised the coolness of his well, and his wife offered
the stranger a draught of milk, or the children quarrelled for
the only transparency in the window that they might get sight of
the man at the well.  For though the country seemed so new, and no
house was observed by us, shut in between the banks that sunny
day, we did not have to travel far to find where men inhabited,
like wild bees, and had sunk wells in the loose sand and loam of
the Merrimack.  There dwelt the subject of the Hebrew scriptures,
and the Esprit des Lois, where a thin vaporous smoke curled up
through the noon.  All that is told of mankind, of the inhabitants
of the Upper Nile, and the Sunderbunds, and Timbuctoo, and the
Orinoko, was experience here.  Every race and class of men was
represented.  According to Belknap, the historian of New Hampshire,
who wrote sixty years ago, here too, perchance, dwelt "new lights,"
and free thinking men even then.  "The people in general throughout
the State," it is written, "are professors of the Christian
religion in some form or other.  There is, however, a sort of
_wise men_ who pretend to reject it; but they have not yet been
able to substitute a better in its place."

The other voyageur, perhaps, would in the mean while have seen
a brown hawk, or a woodchuck, or a musquash creeping under the
alders.

We occasionally rested in the shade of a maple or a willow, and
drew forth a melon for our refreshment, while we contemplated at
our leisure the lapse of the river and of human life; and as that
current, with its floating twigs and leaves, so did all things
pass in review before us, while far away in cities and marts on
this very stream, the old routine was proceeding still.  There
is, indeed, a tide in the affairs of men, as the poet says, and
yet as things flow they circulate, and the ebb always balances
the flow.  All streams are but tributary to the ocean, which
itself does not stream, and the shores are unchanged, but in
longer periods than man can measure.  Go where we will, we
discover infinite change in particulars only, not in generals.
When I go into a museum and see the mummies wrapped in their
linen bandages, I see that the lives of men began to need reform
as long ago as when they walked the earth.  I come out into the
streets, and meet men who declare that the time is near at hand
for the redemption of the race.  But as men lived in Thebes, so
do they live in Dunstable to-day.  "Time drinketh up the essence
of every great and noble action which ought to be performed, and
is delayed in the execution." So says Veeshnoo Sarma; and we
perceive that the schemers return again and again to common sense
and labor.  Such is the evidence of history.

   "Yet I doubt not through the ages one increasing purpose runs,
   And the thoughts of men are widened with the process of the Suns."

There are secret articles in our treaties with the gods, of more
importance than all the rest, which the historian can never know.

There are many skilful apprentices, but few master workmen.  On
every hand we observe a truly wise practice, in education, in
morals, and in the arts of life, the embodied wisdom of many an
ancient philosopher.  Who does not see that heresies have some
time prevailed, that reforms have already taken place?  All this
worldly wisdom might be regarded as the once unamiable heresy of
some wise man.  Some interests have got a footing on the earth
which we have not made sufficient allowance for.  Even they who
first built these barns and cleared the land thus, had some
valor.  The abrupt epochs and chasms are smoothed down in history
as the inequalities of the plain are concealed by distance.  But
unless we do more than simply learn the trade of our time, we are
but apprentices, and not yet masters of the art of life.

Now that we are casting away these melon seeds, how can we help
feeling reproach?  He who eats the fruit, should at least plant
the seed; aye, if possible, a better seed than that whose fruit
he has enjoyed.  Seeds!  there are seeds enough which need only
to be stirred in with the soil where they lie, by an inspired
voice or pen, to bear fruit of a divine flavor.  O thou
spendthrift!  Defray thy debt to the world; eat not the seed of
institutions, as the luxurious do, but plant it rather, while
thou devourest the pulp and tuber for thy subsistence; that so,
perchance, one variety may at last be found worthy of
preservation.

There are moments when all anxiety and stated toil are becalmed
in the infinite leisure and repose of nature.  All laborers must
have their nooning, and at this season of the day, we are all,
more or less, Asiatics, and give over all work and reform.  While
lying thus on our oars by the side of the stream, in the heat of
the day, our boat held by an osier put through the staple in its
prow, and slicing the melons, which are a fruit of the East, our
thoughts reverted to Arabia, Persia, and Hindostan, the lands of
contemplation and dwelling-places of the ruminant nations.  In
the experience of this noontide we could find some apology even
for the instinct of the opium, betel, and tobacco chewers.  Mount
Saber, according to the French traveller and naturalist, Botta,
is celebrated for producing the Kat-tree, of which "the soft tops
of the twigs and tender leaves are eaten," says his reviewer,
"and produce an agreeable soothing excitement, restoring from
fatigue, banishing sleep, and disposing to the enjoyment of
conversation."  We thought that we might lead a dignified
Oriental life along this stream as well, and the maple and alders
would be our Kat-trees.

It is a great pleasure to escape sometimes from the restless
class of Reformers.  What if these grievances exist?  So do you
and I.  Think you that sitting hens are troubled with ennui these
long summer days, sitting on and on in the crevice of a hay-loft,
without active employment?  By the faint cackling in distant
barns, I judge that dame Nature is interested still to know how
many eggs her hens lay.  The Universal Soul, as it is called, has
an interest in the stacking of hay, the foddering of cattle, and
the draining of peat-meadows.  Away in Scythia, away in India, it
makes butter and cheese.  Suppose that all farms _are_ run out,
and we youths must buy old land and bring it to, still everywhere
the relentless opponents of reform bear a strange resemblance to
ourselves; or, perchance, they are a few old maids and bachelors,
who sit round the kitchen hearth and listen to the singing of the
kettle.  "The oracles often give victory to our choice, and not
to the order alone of the mundane periods.  As, for instance,
when they say that our voluntary sorrows germinate in us as the
growth of the particular life we lead." The reform which you talk
about can be undertaken any morning before unbarring our doors.
We need not call any convention.  When two neighbors begin to eat
corn bread, who before ate wheat, then the gods smile from ear to
ear, for it is very pleasant to them.  Why do you not try it?
Don't let me hinder you.

There are theoretical reformers at all times, and all the world
over, living on anticipation.  Wolff, travelling in the deserts
of Bokhara, says, "Another party of derveeshes came to me and
observed, `The time will come when there shall be no difference
between rich and poor, between high and low, when property will
be in common, even wives and children.'" But forever I ask of
such, What then?  The derveeshes in the deserts of Bokhara and
the reformers in Marlboro' Chapel sing the same song.  "There's a
good time coming, boys," but, asked one of the audience, in good
faith, "Can you fix the date?" Said I, "Will you help it along?"

The nonchalance and _dolce-far-niente_ air of nature and society
hint at infinite periods in the progress of mankind.  The States
have leisure to laugh from Maine to Texas at some newspaper joke,
and New England shakes at the double-entendres of Australian
circles, while the poor reformer cannot get a hearing.

Men do not fail commonly for want of knowledge, but for want of
prudence to give wisdom the preference.  What we need to know in
any case is very simple.  It is but too easy to establish another
durable and harmonious routine.  Immediately all parts of nature
consent to it.  Only make something to take the place of something,
and men will behave as if it was the very thing they wanted.
They _must_ behave, at any rate, and will work up any material.
There is always a present and extant life, be it better or worse,
which all combine to uphold.  We should be slow to mend, my
friends, as slow to require mending, "Not hurling, according to
the oracle, a transcendent foot towards piety."  The language of
excitement is at best picturesque merely.  You must be calm
before you can utter oracles.  What was the excitement of the
Delphic priestess compared with the calm wisdom of Socrates?--or
whoever it was that was wise.--Enthusiasm is a supernatural
serenity.

     "Men find that action is another thing
       Than what they in discoursing papers read;
     The world's affairs require in managing
       More arts than those wherein you clerks proceed."

As in geology, so in social institutions, we may discover the
causes of all past change in the present invariable order of
society.  The greatest appreciable physical revolutions are the
work of the light-footed air, the stealthy-paced water, and the
subterranean fire.  Aristotle said, "As time never fails, and the
universe is eternal, neither the Tanais nor the Nile can have
flowed forever." We are independent of the change we detect.
The longer the lever the less perceptible its motion.  It is the
slowest pulsation which is the most vital.  The hero then will
know how to wait, as well as to make haste.  All good abides with
him who waiteth _wisely_; we shall sooner overtake the dawn by
remaining here than by hurrying over the hills of the west.  Be
assured that every man's success is in proportion to his
_average_ ability.  The meadow flowers spring and bloom where the
waters annually deposit their slime, not where they reach in some
freshet only.  A man is not his hope, nor his despair, nor yet
his past deed.  We know not yet what we have done, still less
what we are doing.  Wait till evening, and other parts of our
day's work will shine than we had thought at noon, and we shall
discover the real purport of our toil.  As when the farmer has
reached the end of the furrow and looks back, he can tell best
where the pressed earth shines most.


To one who habitually endeavors to contemplate the true state
of things, the political state can hardly be said to have any
existence whatever.  It is unreal, incredible, and insignificant
to him, and for him to endeavor to extract the truth from such
lean material is like making sugar from linen rags, when
sugar-cane may be had.  Generally speaking, the political news,
whether domestic or foreign, might be written to-day for the next
ten years, with sufficient accuracy.  Most revolutions in society
have not power to interest, still less alarm us; but tell me that
our rivers are drying up, or the genus pine dying out in the
country, and I might attend.  Most events recorded in history are
more remarkable than important, like eclipses of the sun and
moon, by which all are attracted, but whose effects no one takes
the trouble to calculate.

But will the government never be so well administered, inquired
one, that we private men shall hear nothing about it?  "The king
answered: At all events, I require a prudent and able man, who
is capable of managing the state affairs of my kingdom.  The
ex-minister said: The criterion, O Sire! of a wise and competent
man is, that he will not meddle with such like matters."  Alas
that the ex-minister should have been so nearly right!

In my short experience of human life, the _outward_ obstacles,
if there were any such, have not been living men, but the
institutions of the dead.  It is grateful to make one's way
through this latest generation as through dewy grass.  Men are
as innocent as the morning to the unsuspicious.

     "And round about good morrows fly,
     As if day taught humanity."

Not being Reve of this Shire,

     "The early pilgrim blithe he hailed,
     That o'er the hills did stray,
     And many an early husbandman,
     That he met on the way";--

thieves and robbers all, nevertheless.  I have not so surely
foreseen that any Cossack or Chippeway would come to disturb the
honest and simple commonwealth, as that some monster institution
would at length embrace and crush its free members in its scaly
folds; for it is not to be forgotten, that while the law holds
fast the thief and murderer, it lets itself go loose.  When I
have not paid the tax which the State demanded for that
protection which I did not want, itself has robbed me; when I
have asserted the liberty it presumed to declare, itself has
imprisoned me.  Poor creature! if it knows no better I will not
blame it.  If it cannot live but by these means, I can.  I do not
wish, it happens, to be associated with Massachusetts, either in
holding slaves or in conquering Mexico.  I am a little better
than herself in these respects.--As for Massachusetts, that huge
she Briareus, Argus and Colchian Dragon conjoined, set to watch
the Heifer of the Constitution and the Golden Fleece, we would
not warrant our respect for her, like some compositions, to
preserve its qualities through all weathers.--Thus it has
happened, that not the Arch Fiend himself has been in my way, but
these toils which tradition says were originally spun to obstruct
him.  They are cobwebs and trifling obstacles in an earnest man's
path, it is true, and at length one even becomes attached to his
unswept and undusted garret.  I love man--kind, but I hate the
institutions of the dead un-kind.  Men execute nothing so
faithfully as the wills of the dead, to the last codicil and
letter.  _They_ rule this world, and the living are but their
executors.  Such foundation too have our lectures and our
sermons, commonly.  They are all _Dudleian;_ and piety derives
its origin still from that exploit of _pius Aeneas_, who bore his
father, Anchises, on his shoulders from the ruins of Troy.  Or
rather, like some Indian tribes, we bear about with us the
mouldering relics of our ancestors on our shoulders.  If, for
instance, a man asserts the value of individual liberty over the
merely political commonweal, his neighbor still tolerates him,
that he who is _living near_ him, sometimes even sustains him,
but never the State.  Its officer, as a living man, may have
human virtues and a thought in his brain, but as the tool of an
institution, a jailer or constable it may be, he is not a whit
superior to his prison key or his staff.  Herein is the tragedy;
that men doing outrage to their proper natures, even those called
wise and good, lend themselves to perform the office of inferior
and brutal ones.  Hence come war and slavery in; and what else
may not come in by this opening?  But certainly there are modes
by which a man may put bread into his mouth which will not
prejudice him as a companion and neighbor.

     "Now turn again, turn again, said the pinder,
     For a wrong way you have gone,
     For you have forsaken the king's highway,
     And made a path over the corn."

Undoubtedly, countless reforms are called for, because society is
not animated, or instinct enough with life, but in the condition
of some snakes which I have seen in early spring, with alternate
portions of their bodies torpid and flexible, so that they could
wriggle neither way.  All men are partially buried in the grave
of custom, and of some we see only the crown of the head above
ground.  Better are the physically dead, for they more lively
rot.  Even virtue is no longer such if it be stagnant.  A man's
life should be constantly as fresh as this river.  It should be
the same channel, but a new water every instant.

               "Virtues as rivers pass,
     But still remains that virtuous man there was."

Most men have no inclination, no rapids, no cascades, but
marshes, and alligators, and miasma instead.  We read that when
in the expedition of Alexander, Onesicritus was sent forward to
meet certain of the Indian sect of Gymnosophists, and he had told
them of those new philosophers of the West, Pythagoras, Socrates,
and Diogenes, and their doctrines, one of them named Dandamis
answered, that "They appeared to him to have been men of genius,
but to have lived with too passive a regard for the laws." The
philosophers of the West are liable to this rebuke still.  "They
say that Lieou-hia-hoei, and Chao-lien did not sustain to the end
their resolutions, and that they dishonored their character.
Their language was in harmony with reason and justice; while
their acts were in harmony with the sentiments of men."

Chateaubriand said: "There are two things which grow stronger in
the breast of man, in proportion as he advances in years: the
love of country and religion.  Let them be never so much
forgotten in youth, they sooner or later present themselves to us
arrayed in all their charms, and excite in the recesses of our
hearts an attachment justly due to their beauty." It may be so.
But even this infirmity of noble minds marks the gradual decay of
youthful hope and faith.  It is the allowed infidelity of age.
There is a saying of the Yoloffs, "He who was born first has the
greatest number of old clothes," consequently M.  Chateaubriand
has more old clothes than I have.  It is comparatively a faint
and reflected beauty that is admired, not an essential and
intrinsic one.  It is because the old are weak, feel their
mortality, and think that they have measured the strength of man.
They will not boast; they will be frank and humble.  Well, let
them have the few poor comforts they can keep.  Humility is still
a very human virtue.  They look back on life, and so see not into
the future.  The prospect of the young is forward and unbounded,
mingling the future with the present.  In the declining day the
thoughts make haste to rest in darkness, and hardly look forward
to the ensuing morning.  The thoughts of the old prepare for
night and slumber.  The same hopes and prospects are not for him
who stands upon the rosy mountain-tops of life, and him who
expects the setting of his earthly day.

I must conclude that Conscience, if that be the name of it, was
not given us for no purpose, or for a hinderance.  However
flattering order and expediency may look, it is but the repose of
a lethargy, and we will choose rather to be awake, though it be
stormy, and maintain ourselves on this earth and in this life, as
we may, without signing our death-warrant.  Let us see if we
cannot stay here, where He has put us, on his own
conditions.  Does not his law reach as far as his light?  The
expedients of the nations clash with one another, only the
absolutely right is expedient for all.

There are some passages in the Antigone of Sophocles, well known
to scholars, of which I am reminded in this connection.  Antigone
has resolved to sprinkle sand on the dead body of her brother
Polynices, notwithstanding the edict of King Creon condemning to
death that one who should perform this service, which the Greeks
deemed so important, for the enemy of his country; but Ismene,
who is of a less resolute and noble spirit, declines taking part
with her sister in this work, and says,--

"I, therefore, asking those under the earth to consider me, that
I am compelled to do thus, will obey those who are placed in
office; for to do extreme things is not wise."

                           ANTIGONE

"I would not ask you, nor would you, if you still wished, do it
joyfully with me.  Be such as seems good to you.  But I will bury
him.  It is glorious for me doing this to die.  I beloved will
lie with him beloved, having, like a criminal, done what is holy;
since the time is longer which it is necessary for me to please
those below, than those here, for there I shall always lie.  But
if it seems good to you, hold in dishonor things which are
honored by the gods."


                            ISMENE

"I indeed do not hold them in dishonor; but to act in opposition
to the citizens I am by nature unable."


Antigone being at length brought before King Creon, he asks,--


"Did you then dare to transgress these laws?"


                            ANTIGONE

"For it was not Zeus who proclaimed these to me, nor Justice who
dwells with the gods below; it was not they who established these
laws among men.  Nor did I think that your proclamations were so
strong, as, being a mortal, to be able to transcend the unwritten
and immovable laws of the gods.  For not something now and
yesterday, but forever these live, and no one knows from what
time they appeared.  I was not about to pay the penalty of
violating these to the gods, fearing the presumption of any man.
For I well knew that I should die, and why not? even if you had
not proclaimed it."

This was concerning the burial of a dead body.


The wisest conservatism is that of the Hindoos.  "Immemorial
custom is transcendent law," says Menu.  That is, it was the
custom of the gods before men used it.  The fault of our New
England custom is that it is memorial.  What is morality but
immemorial custom?  Conscience is the chief of conservatives.
"Perform the settled functions," says Kreeshna in the
Bhagvat-Geeta; "action is preferable to inaction.  The journey of
thy mortal frame may not succeed from inaction."--"A man's own
calling with all its faults, ought not to be forsaken.  Every
undertaking is involved in its faults as the fire in its
smoke."--"The man who is acquainted with the whole, should not
drive those from their works who are slow of comprehension, and
less experienced than himself."--"Wherefore, O Arjoon, resolve to
fight," is the advice of the God to the irresolute soldier who
fears to slay his best friends.  It is a sublime conservatism; as
wide as the world, and as unwearied as time; preserving the
universe with Asiatic anxiety, in that state in which it appeared
to their minds.  These philosophers dwell on the inevitability
and unchangeableness of laws, on the power of temperament and
constitution, the three goon or qualities, and the circumstances
of birth and affinity.  The end is an immense consolation;
eternal absorption in Brahma.  Their speculations never venture
beyond their own table-lands, though they are high and vast as
they.  Buoyancy, freedom, flexibility, variety, possibility,
which also are qualities of the Unnamed, they deal not with.  The
undeserved reward is to be earned by an everlasting moral
drudgery; the incalculable promise of the morrow is, as it were,
weighed.  And who will say that their conservatism has not been
effectual?  "Assuredly," says a French translator, speaking of
the antiquity and durability of the Chinese and Indian nations,
and of the wisdom of their legislators, "there are there some
vestiges of the eternal laws which govern the world."

Christianity, on the other hand, is humane, practical, and, in a
large sense, radical.  So many years and ages of the gods those
Eastern sages sat contemplating Brahm, uttering in silence the
mystic "Om," being absorbed into the essence of the Supreme
Being, never going out of themselves, but subsiding farther and
deeper within; so infinitely wise, yet infinitely stagnant;
until, at last, in that same Asia, but in the western part of it,
appeared a youth, wholly unforetold by them,--not being absorbed
into Brahm, but bringing Brahm down to earth and to mankind; in
whom Brahm had awaked from his long sleep, and exerted himself,
and the day began,--a new avatar.  The Brahman had never thought
to be a brother of mankind as well as a child of God.  Christ is
the prince of Reformers and Radicals.  Many expressions in the
New Testament come naturally to the lips of all Protestants, and
it furnishes the most pregnant and practical texts.  There is no
harmless dreaming, no wise speculation in it, but everywhere a
substratum of good sense.  It never _reflects_, but it _repents_.
There is no poetry in it, we may say nothing regarded in the
light of beauty merely, but moral truth is its object.  All
mortals are convicted by its conscience.

The New Testament is remarkable for its pure morality; the best
of the Hindo Scripture, for its pure intellectuality.  The reader
is nowhere raised into and sustained in a higher, purer, or _rarer_
region of thought than in the Bhagvat-Geeta.  Warren Hastings, in
his sensible letter recommending the translation of this book to
the Chairman of the East India Company, declares the original to
be "of a sublimity of conception, reasoning, and diction almost
unequalled," and that the writings of the Indian philosophers
"will survive when the British dominion in India shall have long
ceased to exist, and when the sources which it once yielded of
wealth and power are lost to remembrance." It is unquestionably
one of the noblest and most sacred scriptures which have come
down to us.  Books are to be distinguished by the grandeur of
their topics, even more than by the manner in which they are
treated.  The Oriental philosophy approaches, easily, loftier
themes than the modern aspires to; and no wonder if it sometimes
prattle about them.  _It_ only assigns their due rank respectively
to Action and Contemplation, or rather does full justice to the
latter.  Western philosophers have not conceived of the
significance of Contemplation in their sense.  Speaking of the
spiritual discipline to which the Brahmans subjected themselves,
and the wonderful power of abstraction to which they attained,
instances of which had come under his notice, Hastings says:--

  "To those who have never been accustomed to the separation of
  the mind from the notices of the senses, it may not be easy to
  conceive by what means such a power is to be attained; since
  even the most studious men of our hemisphere will find it
  difficult so to restrain their attention, but that it will
  wander to some object of present sense or recollection; and
  even the buzzing of a fly will sometimes have the power to
  disturb it.  But if we are told that there have been men who
  were successively, for ages past, in the daily habit of
  abstracted contemplation, begun in the earliest period of
  youth, and continued in many to the maturity of age, each
  adding some portion of knowledge to the store accumulated by
  his predecessors; it is not assuming too much to conclude, that
  as the mind ever gathers strength, like the body, by exercise,
  so in such an exercise it may in each have acquired the faculty
  to which they aspired, and that their collective studies may
  have led them to the discovery of new tracts and combinations
  of sentiment, totally different from the doctrines with which
  the learned of other nations are acquainted; doctrines which,
  however speculative and subtle, still as they possess the
  advantage of being derived from a source so free from every
  adventitious mixture, may be equally founded in truth with the
  most simple of our own."

"The forsaking of works" was taught by Kreeshna to the most
ancient of men, and handed down from age to age,

  "until at length, in the course of time, the mighty art was lost.

  "In wisdom is to be found every work without exception," says
  Kreeshna.

  "Although thou wert the greatest of all offenders, thou shalt
  be able to cross the gulf of sin with the bark of wisdom."

  "There is not anything in this world to be compared with wisdom
  for purity."

  "The action stands at a distance inferior to the application of
  wisdom."

  The wisdom of a Moonee "is confirmed, when, like the tortoise,
  he can draw in all his members, and restrain them from their
  wonted purposes."

  "Children only, and not the learned, speak of the speculative
  and the practical doctrines as two.  They are but one.  For
  both obtain the selfsame end, and the place which is gained by
  the followers of the one is gained by the followers of the
  other."

  "The man enjoyeth not freedom from action, from the
  non-commencement of that which he hath to do; nor doth he
  obtain happiness from a total inactivity.  No one ever resteth
  a moment inactive.  Every man is involuntarily urged to act by
  those principles which are inherent in his nature.  The man who
  restraineth his active faculties, and sitteth down with his
  mind attentive to the objects of his senses, is called one of
  an astrayed soul, and the practiser of deceit.  So the man is
  praised, who, having subdued all his passions, performeth with
  his active faculties all the functions of life, unconcerned
  about the event."

  "Let the motive be in the deed and not in the event.  Be not
  one whose motive for action is the hope of reward.  Let not thy
  life be spent in inaction."

  "For the man who doeth that which he hath to do, without
  affection, obtaineth the Supreme."

  "He who may behold, as it were inaction in action, and action
  in inaction, is wise amongst mankind.  He is a perfect
  performer of all duty."

  "Wise men call him a _Pandeet_, whose every undertaking is free
  from the idea of desire, and whose actions are consumed by the
  fire of wisdom.  He abandoneth the desire of a reward of his
  actions; he is always contented and independent; and although
  he may be engaged in a work, he, as it were, doeth nothing."

  "He is both a Yogee and a Sannyasee who performeth that which
  he hath to do independent of the fruit thereof; not he who
  liveth without the sacrificial fire and without action."

  "He who enjoyeth but the Amreeta which is left of his
  offerings, obtaineth the eternal spirit of Brahm, the Supreme."


What, after all, does the practicalness of life amount to?  The
things immediate to be done are very trivial.  I could postpone
them all to hear this locust sing.  The most glorious fact in my
experience is not anything that I have done or may hope to do,
but a transient thought, or vision, or dream, which I have had.
I would give all the wealth of the world, and all the deeds of
all the heroes, for one true vision.  But how can I communicate
with the gods who am a pencil-maker on the earth, and not be
insane?

  "I am the same to all mankind," says Kreeshna; "there is not
  one who is worthy of my love or hatred."

This teaching is not practical in the sense in which the New
Testament is.  It is not always sound sense inpractice.  The
Brahman never proposes courageously to assault evil, but
patiently to starve it out.  His active faculties are paralyzed
by the idea of cast, of impassable limits, of destiny and the
tyranny of time.  Kreeshna's argument, it must be allowed, is
defective.  No sufficient reason is given why Arjoon should
fight.  Arjoon may be convinced, but the reader is not, for his
judgment is _not_ "formed upon the speculative doctrines of the
_Sankhya Sastra_."  "Seek an asylum in wisdom alone"; but what is
wisdom to a Western mind?  The duty of which he speaks is an
arbitrary one.  When was it established?  The Brahman's virtue
consists in doing, not right, but arbitrary things.  What is that
which a man "hath to do"?  What is "action"?  What are the
"settled functions"?  What is "a man's own religion," which is so
much better than another's?  What is "a man's own particular
calling"?  What are the duties which are appointed by one's
birth?  It is a defence of the institution of casts, of what is
called the "natural duty" of the Kshetree, or soldier, "to attach
himself to the discipline," "not to flee from the field," and the
like.  But they who are unconcerned about the consequences of
their actions are not therefore unconcerned about their actions.

Behold the difference between the Oriental and the Occidental.
The former has nothing to do in this world; the latter is full of
activity.  The one looks in the sun till his eyes are put out;
the other follows him prone in his westward course.  There is
such a thing as caste, even in the West; but it is comparatively
faint; it is conservatism here.  It says, forsake not your
calling, outrage no institution, use no violence, rend no bonds;
the State is thy parent.  Its virtue or manhood is wholly filial.
There is a struggle between the Oriental and Occidental in every
nation; some who would be forever contemplating the sun, and some
who are hastening toward the sunset.  The former class says to
the latter, When you have reached the sunset, you will be no
nearer to the sun.  To which the latter replies, But we so
prolong the day.  The former "walketh but in that night, when all
things go to rest the night of _time_.  The contemplative Moonee
sleepeth but in the day of _time_, when all things wake."

To conclude these extracts, I can say, in the words of Sanjay,
"As, O mighty Prince!  I recollect again and again this holy and
wonderful dialogue of Kreeshna and Arjoon, I continue more and
more to rejoice; and as I recall to my memory the more than
miraculous form of Haree, my astonishment is great, and I marvel
and rejoice again and again!  Wherever Kreeshna the God of
devotion may be, wherever Arjoon the mighty bowman may be, there
too, without doubt, are fortune, riches, victory, and good
conduct.  This is my firm belief."

I would say to the readers of Scriptures, if they wish for a good
book, read the Bhagvat-Geeta, an episode to the Mahabharat, said
to have been written by Kreeshna Dwypayen Veias,--known to have
been written by----, more than four thousand years ago,--it
matters not whether three or four, or when,--translated by
Charles Wilkins.  It deserves to be read with reverence even by
Yankees, as a part of the sacred writings of a devout people; and
the intelligent Hebrew will rejoice to find in it a moral
grandeur and sublimity akin to those of his own Scriptures.

To an American reader, who, by the advantage of his position, can
see over that strip of Atlantic coast to Asia and the Pacific,
who, as it were, sees the shore slope upward over the Alps to the
Himmaleh Mountains, the comparatively recent literature of Europe
often appears partial and clannish, and, notwithstanding the
limited range of his own sympathies and studies, the European
writer who presumes that he is speaking for the world, is
perceived by him to speak only for that corner of it which he
inhabits.  One of the rarest of England's scholars and critics,
in his classification of the worthies of the world, betrays the
narrowness of his European culture and the exclusiveness of his
reading.  None of her children has done justice to the poets and
philosophers of Persia or of India.  They have even been better
known to her merchant scholars than to her poets and thinkers by
profession.  You may look in vain through English poetry for a
single memorable verse inspired by these themes.  Nor is Germany
to be excepted, though her philological industry is indirectly
serving the cause of philosophy and poetry.  Even Goethe wanted
that universality of genius which could have appreciated the
philosophy of India, if he had more nearly approached it.  His
genius was more practical, dwelling much more in the regions of
the understanding, and was less native to contemplation than the
genius of those sages.  It is remarkable that Homer and a few
Hebrews are the most Oriental names which modern Europe, whose
literature has taken its rise since the decline of the Persian,
has admitted into her list of Worthies, and perhaps the _worthiest_
of mankind, and the fathers of modern thinking,--for the
contemplations of those Indian sages have influenced, and still
influence, the intellectual development of mankind,--whose works
even yet survive in wonderful completeness, are, for the most
part, not recognized as ever having existed.  If the lions had
been the painters it would have been otherwise.  In every one's
youthful dreams philosophy is still vaguely but inseparably, and
with singular truth, associated with the East, nor do after years
discover its local habitation in the Western world.  In comparison
with the philosophers of the East, we may say that modern Europe
has yet given birth to none.  Beside the vast and cosmogonal
philosophy of the Bhagvat-Geeta, even our Shakespeare seems
sometimes youthfully green and practical merely.  Some of these
sublime sentences, as the Chaldaean oracles of Zoroaster, still
surviving after a thousand revolutions and translations, alone
make us doubt if the poetic form and dress are not transitory,
and not essential to the most effective and enduring expression
of thought.  _Ex oriente lux_ may still be the motto of scholars,
for the Western world has not yet derived from the East all the
light which it is destined to receive thence.

It would be worthy of the age to print together the collected
Scriptures or Sacred Writings of the several nations, the
Chinese, the Hindoos, the Persians, the Hebrews, and others, as
the Scripture of mankind.  The New Testament is still, perhaps,
too much on the lips and in the hearts of men to be called a
Scripture in this sense.  Such a juxtaposition and comparison
might help to liberalize the faith of men.  This is a work which
Time will surely edit, reserved to crown the labors of the
printing-press.  This would be the Bible, or Book of Books, which
let the missionaries carry to the uttermost parts of the earth.


While engaged in these reflections, thinking ourselves the only
navigators of these waters, suddenly a canal-boat, with its sail
set, glided round a point before us, like some huge river beast,
and changed the scene in an instant; and then another and another
glided into sight, and we found ourselves in the current of
commerce once more.  So we threw our rinds in the water for the
fishes to nibble, and added our breath to the life of living men.
Little did we think, in the distant garden in which we had
planted the seed and reared this fruit, where it would be eaten.
Our melons lay at home on the sandy bottom of the Merrimack, and
our potatoes in the sun and water at the bottom of the boat
looked like a fruit of the country.  Soon, however, we were
delivered from this fleet of junks, and possessed the river in
solitude, once more rowing steadily upward through the noon,
between the territories of Nashua on the one hand, and Hudson,
once Nottingham, on the other.  From time to time we scared up a
kingfisher or a summer duck, the former flying rather by vigorous
impulses than by steady and patient steering with that short
rudder of his, sounding his rattle along the fluvial street.

Erelong another scow hove in sight, creeping down the river; and
hailing it, we attached ourselves to its side, and floated back
in company, chatting with the boatmen, and obtaining a draught of
cooler water from their jug.  They appeared to be green hands
from far among the hills, who had taken this means to get to the
seaboard, and see the world; and would possibly visit the
Falkland Isles, and the China seas, before they again saw the
waters of the Merrimack, or, perchance, they would not return
this way forever.  They had already embarked the private
interests of the landsman in the larger venture of the race, and
were ready to mess with mankind, reserving only the till of a
chest to themselves.  But they too were soon lost behind a point,
and we went croaking on our way alone.  What grievance has its
root among the New Hampshire hills? we asked; what is wanting to
human life here, that these men should make such haste to the
antipodes?  We prayed that their bright anticipations might not
be rudely disappointed.

     Though all the fates should prove unkind,
     Leave not your native land behind.
     The ship, becalmed, at length stands still;
     The steed must rest beneath the hill;
     But swiftly still our fortunes pace
     To find us out in every place.

     The vessel, though her masts be firm,
     Beneath her copper bears a worm;
     Around the cape, across the line,
     Till fields of ice her course confine;
     It matters not how smooth the breeze,
     How shallow or how deep the seas,
     Whether she bears Manilla twine,
     Or in her hold Madeira wine,
     Or China teas, or Spanish hides,
     In port or quarantine she rides;
     Far from New England's blustering shore,
     New England's worm her hulk shall bore,
     And sink her in the Indian seas,
     Twine, wine, and hides, and China teas.

We passed a small desert here on the east bank, between
Tyngsborough and Hudson, which was interesting and even
refreshing to our eyes in the midst of the almost universal
greenness.  This sand was indeed somewhat impressive and
beautiful to us.  A very old inhabitant, who was at work in a
field on the Nashua side, told us that he remembered when corn
and grain grew there, and it was a cultivated field.  But at
length the fishermen, for this was a fishing place, pulled up the
bushes on the shore, for greater convenience in hauling their
seines, and when the bank was thus broken, the wind began to blow
up the sand from the shore, until at length it had covered about
fifteen acres several feet deep.  We saw near the river, where
the sand was blown off down to some ancient surface, the
foundation of an Indian wigwam exposed, a perfect circle of burnt
stones, four or five feet in diameter, mingled with fine
charcoal, and the bones of small animals which had been preserved
in the sand.  The surrounding sand was sprinkled with other burnt
stones on which their fires had been built, as well as with
flakes of arrow-head stone, and we found one perfect arrow-head.
In one place we noticed where an Indian had sat to manufacture
arrow-heads out of quartz, and the sand was sprinkled with a
quart of small glass-like chips about as big as a fourpence,
which he had broken off in his work.  Here, then, the Indians
must have fished before the whites arrived.  There was another
similar sandy tract about half a mile above this.


Still the noon prevailed, and we turned the prow aside to bathe,
and recline ourselves under some buttonwoods, by a ledge of
rocks, in a retired pasture sloping to the water's edge, and
skirted with pines and hazels, in the town of Hudson.  Still had
India, and that old noontide philosophy, the better part of our
thoughts.

It is always singular, but encouraging, to meet with common sense
in very old books, as the Heetopades of Veeshnoo Sarma; a playful
wisdom which has eyes behind as well as before, and oversees
itself.  It asserts their health and independence of the
experience of later times.  This pledge of sanity cannot be
spared in a book, that it sometimes pleasantly reflect upon
itself.  The story and fabulous portion of this book winds
loosely from sentence to sentence as so many oases in a desert,
and is as indistinct as a camel's track between Mourzouk and
Darfour.  It is a comment on the flow and freshet of modern
books.  The reader leaps from sentence to sentence, as from one
stepping-stone to another, while the stream of the story rushes
past unregarded.  The Bhagvat-Geeta is less sententious and
poetic, perhaps, but still more wonderfully sustained and
developed.  Its sanity and sublimity have impressed the minds
even of soldiers and merchants.  It is the characteristic of
great poems that they will yield of their sense in due proportion
to the hasty and the deliberate reader.  To the practical they
will be common sense, and to the wise wisdom; as either the
traveller may wet his lips, or an army may fill its water-casks
at a full stream.

One of the most attractive of those ancient books that I have met
with is the Laws of Menu.  According to Sir William Jones,
"Vyasa, the son of Parasara, has decided that the Veda, with its
Angas, or the six compositions deduced from it, the revealed
system of medicine, the Puranas or sacred histories, and the code
of Menu, were four works of supreme authority, which ought never
to be shaken by arguments merely human." The last is believed by
the Hindoos "to have been promulged in the beginning of time, by
Menu, son or grandson of Brahma," and "first of created beings";
and Brahma is said to have "taught his laws to Menu in a hundred
thousand verses, which Menu explained to the primitive world in
the very words of the book now translated." Others affirm that
they have undergone successive abridgments for the convenience of
mortals, "while the gods of the lower heaven and the band of
celestial musicians are engaged in studying the primary
code."--"A number of glosses or comments on Menu were composed by
the Munis, or old philosophers, whose treatises, together with
that before us, constitute the Dherma Sastra, in a collective
sense, or Body of Law." Culluca Bhatta was one of the more modern
of these.

Every sacred book, successively, has been accepted in the faith
that it was to be the final resting-place of the sojourning soul;
but after all, it was but a caravansary which supplied refreshment
to the traveller, and directed him farther on his way to Isphahan
or Bagdat.  Thank God, no Hindoo tyranny prevailed at the framing
of the world, but we are freemen of the universe, and not
sentenced to any caste.

I know of no book which has come down to us with grander
pretensions than this, and it is so impersonal and sincere that
it is never offensive nor ridiculous.  Compare the modes in which
modern literature is advertised with the prospectus of this book,
and think what a reading public it addresses, what criticism it
expects.  It seems to have been uttered from some eastern summit,
with a sober morning prescience in the dawn of time, and you
cannot read a sentence without being elevated as upon the
table-land of the Ghauts.  It has such a rhythm as the winds of
the desert, such a tide as the Ganges, and is as superior to
criticism as the Himmaleh Mountains.  Its tone is of such
unrelaxed fibre, that even at this late day, unworn by time, it
wears the English and the Sanscrit dress indifferently; and its
fixed sentences keep up their distant fires still, like the
stars, by whose dissipated rays this lower world is illumined.
The whole book by noble gestures and inclinations renders many
words unnecessary.  English sense has toiled, but Hindoo wisdom
never perspired.  Though the sentences open as we read them,
unexpensively, and at first almost unmeaningly, as the petals of
a flower, they sometimes startle us with that rare kind of wisdom
which could only have been learned from the most trivial
experience; but it comes to us as refined as the porcelain earth
which subsides to the bottom of the ocean.  They are clean and
dry as fossil truths, which have been exposed to the elements for
thousands of years, so impersonally and scientifically true that
they are the ornament of the parlor and the cabinet.  Any _moral_
philosophy is exceedingly rare.  This of Menu addresses our
privacy more than most.  It is a more private and familiar, and,
at the same time, a more public and universal word, than is
spoken in parlor or pulpit now-a-days.  As our domestic fowls are
said to have their original in the wild pheasant of India, so our
domestic thoughts have their prototypes in the thoughts of her
philosophers.  We are dabbling in the very elements of our
present conventional and actual life; as if it were the primeval
conventicle where how to eat, and to drink, and to sleep, and
maintain life with adequate dignity and sincerity, were the
questions to be decided.  It is later and more intimate with us
even than the advice of our nearest friends.  And yet it is true
for the widest horizon, and read out of doors has relation to the
dim mountain line, and is native and aboriginal there.  Most
books belong to the house and street only, and in the fields
their leaves feel very thin.  They are bare and obvious, and have
no halo nor haze about them.  Nature lies far and fair behind
them all.  But this, as it proceeds from, so it addresses, what
is deepest and most abiding in man.  It belongs to the noontide
of the day, the midsummer of the year, and after the snows have
melted, and the waters evaporated in the spring, still its truth
speaks freshly to our experience.  It helps the sun to shine, and
his rays fall on its page to illustrate it.  It spends the
mornings and the evenings, and makes such an impression on us
overnight as to awaken us before dawn, and its influence lingers
around us like a fragrance late into the day.  It conveys a new
gloss to the meadows and the depths of the wood, and its spirit,
like a more subtile ether, sweeps along with the prevailing winds
of a country.  The very locusts and crickets of a summer day are
but later or earlier glosses on the Dherma Sastra of the Hindoos,
a continuation of the sacred code.  As we have said, there is an
orientalism in the most restless pioneer, and the farthest west
is but the farthest east.  While we are reading these sentences,
this fair modern world seems only a reprint of the Laws of Menu
with the gloss of Culluca.  Tried by a New England eye, or the
mere practical wisdom of modern times, they are the oracles of a
race already in its dotage, but held up to the sky, which is the
only impartial and incorruptible ordeal, they are of a piece with
its depth and serenity, and I am assured that they will have a
place and significance as long as there is a sky to test them by.

Give me a sentence which no intelligence can understand.  There
must be a kind of life and palpitation to it, and under its words
a kind of blood must circulate forever.  It is wonderful that
this sound should have come down to us from so far, when the
voice of man can be heard so little way, and we are not now
within ear-shot of any contemporary.  The woodcutters have here
felled an ancient pine forest, and brought to light to these
distant hills a fair lake in the southwest; and now in an instant
it is distinctly shown to these woods as if its image had
travelled hither from eternity.  Perhaps these old stumps upon
the knoll remember when anciently this lake gleamed in the
horizon.  One wonders if the bare earth itself did not experience
emotion at beholding again so fair a prospect.  That fair water
lies there in the sun thus revealed, so much the prouder and
fairer because its beauty needed not to be seen.  It seems yet
lonely, sufficient to itself, and superior to observation.--So
are these old sentences like serene lakes in the southwest, at
length revealed to us, which have so long been reflecting our own
sky in their bosom.

The great plain of India lies as in a cup between the Himmaleh and
the ocean on the north and south, and the Brahmapootra and Indus,
on the east and west, wherein the primeval race was received.
We will not dispute the story.  We are pleased to read in the
natural history of the country, of the "pine, larch, spruce, and
silver fir," which cover the southern face of the Himmaleh range;
of the "gooseberry, raspberry, strawberry," which from an
imminent temperate zone overlook the torrid plains.  So did this
active modern life have even then a foothold and lurking-place in
the midst of the stateliness and contemplativeness of those
Eastern plains.  In another era the "lily of the valley, cowslip,
dandelion," were to work their way down into the plain, and bloom
in a level zone of their own reaching round the earth.  Already
has the era of the temperate zone arrived, the era of the pine
and the oak, for the palm and the banian do not supply the wants
of this age.  The lichens on the summits of the rocks will
perchance find their level erelong.

As for the tenets of the Brahmans, we are not so much concerned
to know what doctrines they held, as that they were held by any.
We can tolerate all philosophies, Atomists, Pneumatologists,
Atheists, Theists,--Plato, Aristotle, Leucippus, Democritus,
Pythagoras, Zoroaster, and Confucius.  It is the attitude of
these men, more than any communication which they make, that
attracts us.  Between them and their commentators, it is true,
there is an endless dispute.  But if it comes to this, that you
compare notes, then you are all wrong.  As it is, each takes us
up into the serene heavens, whither the smallest bubble rises as
surely as the largest, and paints earth and sky for us.  Any
sincere thought is irresistible.  The very austerity of the
Brahmans is tempting to the devotional soul, as a more refined
and nobler luxury.  Wants so easily and gracefully satisfied seem
like a more refined pleasure.  Their conception of creation is
peaceful as a dream.  "When that power awakes, then has this
world its full expansion; but when he slumbers with a tranquil
spirit, then the whole system fades away."  In the very
indistinctness of their theogony a sublime truth is implied.  It
hardly allows the reader to rest in any supreme first cause, but
directly it hints at a supremer still which created the last, and
the Creator is still behind increate.

Nor will we disturb the antiquity of this Scripture; "From fire,
from air, and from the sun," it was "milked out." One might as
well investigate the chronology of light and heat.  Let the sun
shine.  Menu understood this matter best, when he said, "Those
best know the divisions of days and nights who understand that
the day of Brahma, which endures to the end of a thousand such
ages, [infinite ages, nevertheless, according to mortal
reckoning,] gives rise to virtuous exertions; and that his night
endures as long as his day." Indeed, the Mussulman and Tartar
dynasties are beyond all dating.  Methinks I have lived under
them myself.  In every man's brain is the Sanscrit.  The Vedas
and their Angas are not so ancient as serene contemplation.  Why
will we be imposed on by antiquity?  Is the babe young?  When I
behold it, it seems more venerable than the oldest man; it is
more ancient than Nestor or the Sibyls, and bears the wrinkles of
father Saturn himself.  And do we live but in the present?  How
broad a line is that?  I sit now on a stump whose rings number
centuries of growth.  If I look around I see that the soil is
composed of the remains of just such stumps, ancestors to this.
The earth is covered with mould.  I thrust this stick many aeons
deep into its surface, and with my heel make a deeper furrow than
the elements have ploughed here for a thousand years.  If I
listen, I hear the peep of frogs which is older than the slime of
Egypt, and the distant drumming of a partridge on a log, as if it
were the pulse-beat of the summer air.  I raise my fairest and
freshest flowers in the old mould.  Why, what we would fain call
new is not skin deep; the earth is not yet stained by it.  It is
not the fertile ground which we walk on, but the leaves which
flutter over our heads.  The newest is but the oldest made
visible to our senses.  When we dig up the soil from a thousand
feet below the surface, we call it new, and the plants which
spring from it; and when our vision pierces deeper into space,
and detects a remoter star, we call that new also.  The place
where we sit is called Hudson,--once it was Nottingham,--once --


We should read history as little critically as we consider the
landscape, and be more interested by the atmospheric tints and
various lights and shades which the intervening spaces create,
than by its groundwork and composition.  It is the morning now
turned evening and seen in the west,--the same sun, but a new
light and atmosphere.  Its beauty is like the sunset; not a
fresco painting on a wall, flat and bounded, but atmospheric and
roving or free.  In reality, history fluctuates as the face of
the landscape from morning to evening.  What is of moment is its
hue and color.  Time hides no treasures; we want not its _then_,
but its _now_.  We do not complain that the mountains in the
horizon are blue and indistinct; they are the more like the
heavens.

Of what moment are facts that can be lost,--which need to be
commemorated?  The monument of death will outlast the memory of
the dead.  The pyramids do not tell the tale which was confided
to them; the living fact commemorates itself.  Why look in the
dark for light?  Strictly speaking, the historical societies have
not recovered one fact from oblivion, but are themselves, instead
of the fact, that is lost.  The researcher is more memorable than
the researched.  The crowd stood admiring the mist and the dim
outlines of the trees seen through it, when one of their number
advanced to explore the phenomenon, and with fresh admiration all
eyes were turned on his dimly retreating figure.  It is astonishing
with how little co-operation of the societies the past is remembered.
Its story has indeed had another muse than has been assigned it.
There is a good instance of the manner in which all history
began, in Alwakidis' Arabian Chronicle: "I was informed by _Ahmed
Almatin Aljorhami_, who had it from _Rephaa Ebn Kais Alamiri_,
who had it from _Saiph Ebn Fabalah Alchatquarmi_, who had it from
_Thabet Ebn Alkamah_, who said he was present at the action."
These fathers of history were not anxious to preserve, but to
learn the fact; and hence it was not forgotten.  Critical acumen
is exerted in vain to uncover the past; the _past_ cannot be
_presented_; we cannot know what we are not.  But one veil hangs
over past, present, and future, and it is the province of the
historian to find out, not what was, but what is.  Where a battle
has been fought, you will find nothing but the bones of men and
beasts; where a battle is being fought, there are hearts beating.
We will sit on a mound and muse, and not try to make these
skeletons stand on their legs again.  Does Nature remember, think
you, that they _were_ men, or not rather that they _are_ bones?

Ancient history has an air of antiquity.  It should be more
modern.  It is written as if the spectator should be thinking of
the backside of the picture on the wall, or as if the author
expected that the dead would be his readers, and wished to detail
to them their own experience.  Men seem anxious to accomplish an
orderly retreat through the centuries, earnestly rebuilding the
works behind, as they are battered down by the encroachments of
time; but while they loiter, they and their works both fall a
prey to the arch enemy.  History has neither the venerableness of
antiquity, nor the freshness of the modern.  It does as if it
would go to the beginning of things, which natural history might
with reason assume to do; but consider the Universal History, and
then tell us,--when did burdock and plantain sprout first?  It
has been so written for the most part, that the times it
describes are with remarkable propriety called _dark ages_.  They
are dark, as one has observed, because we are so in the dark
about them.  The sun rarely shines in history, what with the dust
and confusion; and when we meet with any cheering fact which
implies the presence of this luminary, we excerpt and modernize
it.  As when we read in the history of the Saxons that Edwin of
Northumbria "caused stakes to be fixed in the highways where he
had seen a clear spring," and "brazen dishes were chained to them
to refresh the weary sojourner, whose fatigues Edwin had himself
experienced."  This is worth all Arthur's twelve battles.

   "Through the shadow of the world we sweep into the younger day:
    Better fifty years of Europe than a cycle of Cathay."
    Than fifty years of Europe better one New England ray!

Biography, too, is liable to the same objection; it should be
autobiography.  Let us not, as the Germans advise, endeavor to go
abroad and vex our bowels that we may be somebody else to explain
him.  If I am not I, who will be?

But it is fit that the Past should be dark; though the darkness
is not so much a quality of the past as of tradition.  It is not
a distance of time, but a distance of relation, which makes thus
dusky its memorials.  What is near to the heart of this
generation is fair and bright still.  Greece lies outspread fair
and sunshiny in floods of light, for there is the sun and
daylight in her literature and art.  Homer does not allow us to
forget that the sun shone,--nor Phidias, nor the Parthenon.  Yet
no era has been wholly dark, nor will we too hastily submit to
the historian, and congratulate ourselves on a blaze of light.
If we could pierce the obscurity of those remote years, we should
find it light enough; only _there_ is not our day.  Some
creatures are made to see in the dark.  There has always been the
same amount of light in the world.  The new and missing stars,
the comets and eclipses, do not affect the general illumination,
for only our glasses appreciate them.  The eyes of the oldest
fossil remains, they tell us, indicate that the same laws of
light prevailed then as now.  Always the laws of light are the
same, but the modes and degrees of seeing vary.  The gods are
partial to no era, but steadily shines their light in the
heavens, while the eye of the beholder is turned to stone.  There
was but the sun and the eye from the first.  The ages have not
added a new ray to the one, nor altered a fibre of the other.

If we will admit time into our thoughts at all, the mythologies,
those vestiges of ancient poems, wrecks of poems, so to speak,
the world's inheritance, still reflecting some of their original
splendor, like the fragments of clouds tinted by the rays of the
departed sun; reaching into the latest summer day, and allying
this hour to the morning of creation; as the poet sings:--

     "Fragments of the lofty strain
       Float down the tide of years,
     As buoyant on the stormy main
       A parted wreck appears."

These are the materials and hints for a history of the rise and
progress of the race; how, from the condition of ants, it arrived
at the condition of men, and arts were gradually invented.  Let a
thousand surmises shed some light on this story.  We will not be
confined by historical, even geological periods which would allow
us to doubt of a progress in human affairs.  If we rise above
this wisdom for the day, we shall expect that this morning of the
race, in which it has been supplied with the simplest necessaries,
with corn, and wine, and honey, and oil, and fire, and articulate
speech, and agricultural and other arts, reared up by degrees
from the condition of ants to men, will be succeeded by a day of
equally progressive splendor; that, in the lapse of the divine
periods, other divine agents and godlike men will assist to
elevate the race as much above its present condition.

But we do not know much about it.


Thus did one voyageur waking dream, while his companion slumbered
on the bank.  Suddenly a boatman's horn was heard echoing from
shore to shore, to give notice of his approach to the farmer's
wife with whom he was to take his dinner, though in that place
only muskrats and kingfishers seemed to hear.  The current of our
reflections and our slumbers being thus disturbed, we weighed
anchor once more.

As we proceeded on our way in the afternoon, the western bank
became lower, or receded farther from the channel in some places,
leaving a few trees only to fringe the water's edge; while the
eastern rose abruptly here and there into wooded hills fifty or
sixty feet high.  The bass, _Tilia Americana_, also called the
lime or linden, which was a new tree to us, overhung the water
with its broad and rounded leaf, interspersed with clusters of
small hard berries now nearly ripe, and made an agreeable shade
for us sailors.  The inner bark of this genus is the bast, the
material of the fisherman's matting, and the ropes and peasant's
shoes of which the Russians make so much use, and also of nets
and a coarse cloth in some places.  According to poets, this was
once Philyra, one of the Oceanides.  The ancients are said to
have used its bark for the roofs of cottages, for baskets, and
for a kind of paper called Philyra.  They also made bucklers of
its wood, "on account of its flexibility, lightness, and
resiliency."  It was once much used for carving, and is still in
demand for sounding-boards of piano-fortes and panels of
carriages, and for various uses for which toughness and
flexibility are required.  Baskets and cradles are made of the
twigs.  Its sap affords sugar, and the honey made from its
flowers is said to be preferred to any other.  Its leaves are in
some countries given to cattle, a kind of chocolate has been made
of its fruit, a medicine has been prepared from an infusion of
its flowers, and finally, the charcoal made of its wood is
greatly valued for gunpowder.

The sight of this tree reminded us that we had reached a strange
land to us.  As we sailed under this canopy of leaves we saw the
sky through its chinks, and, as it were, the meaning and idea of
the tree stamped in a thousand hieroglyphics on the heavens.  The
universe is so aptly fitted to our organization that the eye
wanders and reposes at the same time.  On every side there is
something to soothe and refresh this sense.  Look up at the
tree-tops and see how finely Nature finishes off her work there.
See how the pines spire without end higher and higher, and make a
graceful fringe to the earth.  And who shall count the finer
cobwebs that soar and float away from their utmost tops, and the
myriad insects that dodge between them.  Leaves are of more
various forms than the alphabets of all languages put together;
of the oaks alone there are hardly two alike, and each expresses
its own character.

In all her products Nature only develops her simplest germs.  One
would say that it was no great stretch of invention to create
birds.  The hawk, which now takes his flight over the top of the
wood, was at first, perchance, only a leaf which fluttered in its
aisles.  From rustling leaves she came in the course of ages to
the loftier flight and clear carol of the bird.

Salmon Brook comes in from the west under the railroad, a mile
and a half below the village of Nashua.  We rowed up far enough
into the meadows which border it to learn its piscatorial history
from a haymaker on its banks.  He told us that the silver eel was
formerly abundant here, and pointed to some sunken creels at its
mouth.  This man's memory and imagination were fertile in
fishermen's tales of floating isles in bottomless ponds, and of
lakes mysteriously stocked with fishes, and would have kept us
till nightfall to listen, but we could not afford to loiter in
this roadstead, and so stood out to our sea again.  Though we
never trod in those meadows, but only touched their margin with
our hands, we still retain a pleasant memory of them.

Salmon Brook, whose name is said to be a translation from the
Indian, was a favorite haunt of the aborigines.  Here, too, the
first white settlers of Nashua planted, and some dents in the
earth where their houses stood and the wrecks of ancient
apple-trees are still visible.  About one mile up this stream
stood the house of old John Lovewell, who was an ensign in the
army of Oliver Cromwell, and the father of "famous Captain
Lovewell."  He settled here before 1690, and died about 1754, at
the age of one hundred and twenty years.  He is thought to have
been engaged in the famous Narragansett swamp fight, which took
place in 1675, before he came here.  The Indians are said to have
spared him in succeeding wars on account of his kindness to them.
Even in 1700 he was so old and gray-headed that his scalp was
worth nothing, since the French Governor offered no bounty for
such.  I have stood in the dent of his cellar on the bank of the
brook, and talked there with one whose grandfather had, whose
father might have, talked with Lovewell.  Here also he had a mill
in his old age, and kept a small store.  He was remembered by
some who were recently living, as a hale old man who drove the
boys out of his orchard with his cane.  Consider the triumphs of
the mortal man, and what poor trophies it would have to show, to
wit:--He cobbled shoes without glasses at a hundred, and cut a
handsome swath at a hundred and five!  Lovewell's house is said
to have been the first which Mrs.  Dustan reached on her escape
from the Indians.  Here probably the hero of Pequawket was born
and bred.  Close by may be seen the cellar and the gravestone of
Joseph Hassell, who, as is elsewhere recorded, with his wife
Anna, and son Benjamin, and Mary Marks, "were slain by our Indian
enemies on September 2d, [1691,] in the evening." As Gookin
observed on a previous occasion, "The Indian rod upon the English
backs had not yet done God's errand." Salmon Brook near its mouth
is still a solitary stream, meandering through woods and meadows,
while the then uninhabited mouth of the Nashua now resounds with
the din of a manufacturing town.

A stream from Otternic Pond in Hudson comes in just above Salmon
Brook, on the opposite side.  There was a good view of Uncannunuc,
the most conspicuous mountain in these parts, from the bank here,
seen rising over the west end of the bridge above.  We soon after
passed the village of Nashua, on the river of the same name,
where there is a covered bridge over the Merrimack.  The Nashua,
which is one of the largest tributaries, flows from Wachusett
Mountain, through Lancaster, Groton, and other towns, where it
has formed well-known elm-shaded meadows, but near its mouth it
is obstructed by falls and factories, and did not tempt us to
explore it.

Far away from here, in Lancaster, with another companion, I have
crossed the broad valley of the Nashua, over which we had so long
looked westward from the Concord hills without seeing it to the
blue mountains in the horizon.  So many streams, so many meadows
and woods and quiet dwellings of men had lain concealed between
us and those Delectable Mountains;--from yonder hill on the road
to Tyngsborough you may get a good view of them.  There where it
seemed uninterrupted forest to our youthful eyes, between two
neighboring pines in the horizon, lay the valley of the Nashua,
and this very stream was even then winding at its bottom, and
then, as now, it was here silently mingling its waters with the
Merrimack.  The clouds which floated over its meadows and were
born there, seen far in the west, gilded by the rays of the
setting sun, had adorned a thousand evening skies for us.  But as
it were, by a turf wall this valley was concealed, and in our
journey to those hills it was first gradually revealed to us.
Summer and winter our eyes had rested on the dim outline of the
mountains, to which distance and indistinctness lent a grandeur
not their own, so that they served to interpret all the allusions
of poets and travellers.  Standing on the Concord Cliffs we thus
spoke our mind to them:--

     With frontier strength ye stand your ground,
     With grand content ye circle round,
     Tumultuous silence for all sound,
     Ye distant nursery of rills,
     Monadnock and the Peterborough Hills;--
     Firm argument that never stirs,
     Outcircling the philosophers,--
     Like some vast fleet,
     Sailing through rain and sleet,
     Through winter's cold and summer's heat;
     Still holding on upon your high emprise,
     Until ye find a shore amid the skies;
     Not skulking close to land,
     With cargo contraband,
     For they who sent a venture out by ye
     Have set the Sun to see
     Their honesty.
     Ships of the line, each one,
     Ye westward run,
     Convoying clouds,
     Which cluster in your shrouds,
     Always before the gale,
     Under a press of sail,
     With weight of metal all untold,--
     I seem to feel ye in my firm seat here,
     Immeasurable depth of hold,
     And breadth of beam, and length of running gear

     Methinks ye take luxurious pleasure
     In your novel western leisure;
     So cool your brows and freshly blue,
     As Time had naught for ye to do;
     For  ye lie at your length,
     An unappropriated strength,
     Unhewn primeval timber,
     For knees so stiff, for masts so limber;
     The stock of which new earths are made,
     One day to be our _western_ trade,
     Fit for the stanchions of a world
     Which through the seas of space is hurled.

     While we enjoy a lingering ray,
     Ye still o'ertop the western day,
     Reposing yonder on God's croft
     Like solid stacks of hay;
     So bold a line as ne'er was writ
     On any page by human wit;
     The forest glows as if
     An enemy's camp-fires shone
     Along the horizon,
     Or the day's funeral pyre
     Were lighted there;
     Edged with silver and with gold,
     The clouds hang o'er in damask fold,
     And with such depth of amber light
     The west is dight,
     Where still a few rays slant,
     That even Heaven seems extravagant.
     Watatic Hill
     Lies on the horizon's sill
     Like a child's toy left overnight,
     And other duds to left and right,
     On the earth's edge, mountains and trees
     Stand as they were on air graven,
     Or as the vessels in a haven
     Await the morning breeze.
     I fancy even
     Through your defiles windeth the way to heaven;
     And yonder still, in spite of history's page,
     Linger the golden and the silver age;
     Upon the laboring gale
     The news of future centuries is brought,
     And of new dynasties of thought,
     From your remotest vale.

     But special I remember thee,
     Wachusett, who like me
     Standest alone without society.
     Thy far blue eye,
     A remnant of the sky,
     Seen through the clearing or the gorge,
     Or from the windows of the forge,
     Doth leaven all it passes by.
     Nothing is true
     But stands 'tween me and you,
     Thou western pioneer,
     Who know'st not shame nor fear,
     By venturous spirit driven
     Under the eaves of heaven;
     And canst expand thee there,
     And breathe enough of air?
     Even beyond the West
     Thou migratest,
     Into unclouded tracts,
     Without a pilgrim's axe,
     Cleaving thy road on high
     With thy well-tempered brow,
     And mak'st thyself a clearing in the sky.
     Upholding heaven, holding down earth,
     Thy pastime from thy birth;
     Not steadied by the one, nor leaning on the other,
     May I approve myself thy worthy brother!

At length, like Rasselas and other inhabitants of happy valleys,
we had resolved to scale the blue wall which bounded the western
horizon, though not without misgivings that thereafter no visible
fairy-land would exist for us.  But it would be long to tell of
our adventures, and we have no time this afternoon, transporting
ourselves in imagination up this hazy Nashua valley, to go over
again that pilgrimage.  We have since made many similar
excursions to the principal mountains of New England and New
York, and even far in the wilderness, and have passed a night on
the summit of many of them.  And now, when we look again westward
from our native hills, Wachusett and Monadnock have retreated
once more among the blue and fabulous mountains in the horizon,
though our eyes rest on the very rocks on both of them, where we
have pitched our tent for a night, and boiled our hasty-pudding
amid the clouds.


As late as 1724 there was no house on the north side of the
Nashua, but only scattered wigwams and grisly forests between
this frontier and Canada.  In September of that year, two men who
were engaged in making turpentine on that side, for such were the
first enterprises in the wilderness, were taken captive and
carried to Canada by a party of thirty Indians.  Ten of the
inhabitants of Dunstable, going to look for them, found the hoops
of their barrel cut, and the turpentine spread on the ground.  I
have been told by an inhabitant of Tyngsborough, who had the
story from his ancestors, that one of these captives, when the
Indians were about to upset his barrel of turpentine, seized a
pine knot and flourishing it, swore so resolutely that he would
kill the first who touched it, that they refrained, and when at
length he returned from Canada he found it still standing.
Perhaps there was more than one barrel.  However this may have
been, the scouts knew by marks on the trees, made with coal mixed
with grease, that the men were not killed, but taken prisoners.
One of the company, named Farwell, perceiving that the turpentine
had not done spreading, concluded that the Indians had been gone
but a short time, and they accordingly went in instant pursuit.
Contrary to the advice of Farwell, following directly on their
trail up the Merrimack, they fell into an ambuscade near
Thornton's Ferry, in the present town of Merrimack, and nine were
killed, only one, Farwell, escaping after a vigorous pursuit.
The men of Dunstable went out and picked up their bodies, and
carried them all down to Dunstable and buried them.  It is almost
word for word as in the Robin Hood ballad:--

     "They carried these foresters into fair Nottingham,
       As many there did know,
     They digged them graves in their churchyard,
       And they buried them all a-row."

Nottingham is only the other side of the river, and they were not
exactly all a-row.  You may read in the churchyard at Dunstable,
under the "Memento Mori," and the name of one of them, how they
"departed this life," and

      "This man with seven more that lies in
      this grave was slew all in a day by
                    the Indians."

The stones of some others of the company stand around the common
grave with their separate inscriptions.  Eight were buried here,
but nine were killed, according to the best authorities.

     "Gentle river, gentle river,
       Lo, thy streams are stained with gore,
     Many a brave and noble captain
       Floats along thy willowed shore.

     "All beside thy limpid waters,
       All beside thy sands so bright,
     _Indian_ Chiefs and Christian warriors
       Joined in fierce and mortal fight."

It is related in the History of Dunstable, that on the return of
Farwell the Indians were engaged by a fresh party which they
compelled to retreat, and pursued as far as the Nashua, where
they fought across the stream at its mouth.  After the departure
of the Indians, the figure of an Indian's head was found carved
by them on a large tree by the shore, which circumstance has
given its name to this part of the village of Nashville,--the
"Indian Head."  "It was observed by some judicious," says Gookin,
referring to Philip's war, "that at the beginning of the war the
English soldiers made a nothing of the Indians, and many spake
words to this effect: that one Englishman was sufficient to chase
ten Indians; many reckoned it was no other but _Veni, vidi,
vici._" But we may conclude that the judicious would by this time
have made a different observation.

Farwell appears to have been the only one who had studied his
profession, and understood the business of hunting Indians.  He
lived to fight another day, for the next year he was Lovewell's
lieutenant at Pequawket, but that time, as we have related, he
left his bones in the wilderness.  His name still reminds us of
twilight days and forest scouts on Indian trails, with an uneasy
scalp;--an indispensable hero to New England.  As the more recent
poet of Lovewell's fight has sung, halting a little but bravely
still:--

     "Then did the crimson streams that flowed
       Seem like the waters of the brook,
     That brightly shine, that loudly dash,
       Far down the cliffs of Agiochook."

These battles sound incredible to us.  I think that posterity
will doubt if such things ever were; if our bold ancestors who
settled this land were not struggling rather with the forest
shadows, and not with a copper-colored race of men.  They were
vapors, fever and ague of the unsettled woods.  Now, only a few
arrow-heads are turned up by the plough.  In the Pelasgic, the
Etruscan, or the British story, there is nothing so shadowy and
unreal.

It is a wild and antiquated looking graveyard, overgrown with
bushes, on the high-road, about a quarter of a mile from and
overlooking the Merrimack, with a deserted mill-stream bounding
it on one side, where lie the earthly remains of the ancient
inhabitants of Dunstable.  We passed it three or four miles below
here.  You may read there the names of Lovewell, Farwell, and
many others whose families were distinguished in Indian warfare.
We noticed there two large masses of granite more than a foot
thick and rudely squared, lying flat on the ground over the
remains of the first pastor and his wife.


It is remarkable that the dead lie everywhere under stones,--

     "Strata jacent passim _suo_ quseque sub" _lapide_--

_corpora_, we might say, if the measure allowed.  When the stone
is a slight one, it does not oppress the spirits of the traveller
to meditate by it; but these did seem a little heathenish to us;
and so are all large monuments over men's bodies, from the
pyramids down.  A monument should at least be "star-y-pointing,"
to indicate whither the spirit is gone, and not prostrate, like
the body it has deserted.  There have been some nations who could
do nothing but construct tombs, and these are the only traces
which they have left.  They are the heathen.  But why these
stones, so upright and emphatic, like exclamation-points?  What
was there so remarkable that lived?  Why should the monument be
so much more enduring than the fame which it is designed to
perpetuate,--a stone to a bone?  "Here lies,"--"Here lies";--why
do they not sometimes write, There rises?  Is it a monument to
the body only that is intended?  "Having reached the term of his
_natural_ life";--would it not be truer to say, Having reached
the term of his _unnatural_ life?  The rarest quality in an
epitaph is truth.  If any character is given, it should be as
severely true as the decision of the three judges below, and not
the partial testimony of friends.  Friends and contemporaries
should supply only the name and date, and leave it to posterity
to write the epitaph.

               Here lies an honest man,
               Rear-Admiral Van.

                      -------

               Faith, then ye have
               Two in one grave,
               For in his favor,
               Here too lies the Engraver.

Fame itself is but an epitaph; as late, as false, as true.  But
they only are the true epitaphs which Old Mortality retouches.

A man might well pray that he may not taboo or curse any portion
of nature by being buried in it.  For the most part, the best
man's spirit makes a fearful sprite to haunt his grave, and it is
therefore much to the credit of Little John, the famous follower
of Robin Hood, and reflecting favorably on his character, that
his grave was "long celebrous for the yielding of excellent
whetstones."  I confess that I have but little love for such
collections as they have at the Catacombs, Pere la Chaise, Mount
Auburn, and even this Dunstable graveyard.  At any rate, nothing
but great antiquity can make graveyards interesting to me.  I
have no friends there.  It may be that I am not competent to
write the poetry of the grave.  The farmer who has skimmed his
farm might perchance leave his body to Nature to be ploughed in,
and in some measure restore its fertility.  We should not retard
but forward her economies.

Soon the village of Nashua was out of sight, and the woods were
gained again, and we rowed slowly on before sunset, looking for a
solitary place in which to spend the night.  A few evening clouds
began to be reflected in the water and the surface was dimpled
only here and there by a muskrat crossing the stream.  We camped
at length near Penichook Brook, on the confines of what is now
Nashville, by a deep ravine, under the skirts of a pine wood,
where the dead pine-leaves were our carpet, and their tawny
boughs stretched overhead.  But fire and smoke soon tamed the
scene; the rocks consented to be our walls, and the pines our
roof.  A woodside was already the fittest locality for us.

The wilderness is near as well as dear to every man.  Even the
oldest villages are indebted to the border of wild wood which
surrounds them, more than to the gardens of men.  There is
something indescribably inspiriting and beautiful in the aspect
of the forest skirting and occasionally jutting into the midst of
new towns, which, like the sand-heaps of fresh fox-burrows, have
sprung up in their midst.  The very uprightness of the pines and
maples asserts the ancient rectitude and vigor of nature.  Our
lives need the relief of such a background, where the pine
flourishes and the jay still screams.

We had found a safe harbor for our boat, and as the sun was
setting carried up our furniture, and soon arranged our house
upon the bank, and while the kettle steamed at the tent door, we
chatted of distant friends and of the sights which we were to
behold, and wondered which way the towns lay from us.  Our cocoa
was soon boiled, and supper set upon our chest, and we lengthened
out this meal, like old voyageurs, with our talk.  Meanwhile we
spread the map on the ground, and read in the Gazetteer when the
first settlers came here and got a township granted.  Then, when
supper was done and we had written the journal of our voyage, we
wrapped our buffaloes about us and lay down with our heads
pillowed on our arms listening awhile to the distant baying of a
dog, or the murmurs of the river, or to the wind, which had not
gone to rest:--

     The western wind came lumbering in,
     Bearing a faint Pacific din,
     Our evening mail, swift at the call
     Of its Postmaster General;
     Laden with news from Californ',
     Whate'er transpired hath since morn,
     How wags the world by brier and brake
     From hence to Athabasca Lake;--

or half awake and half asleep, dreaming of a star which glimmered
through our cotton roof.  Perhaps at midnight one was awakened by
a cricket shrilly singing on his shoulder, or by a hunting spider
in his eye, and was lulled asleep again by some streamlet purling
its way along at the bottom of a wooded and rocky ravine in our
neighborhood.  It was pleasant to lie with our heads so low in
the grass, and hear what a tinkling ever-busy laboratory it was.
A thousand little artisans beat on their anvils all night long.

Far in the night as we were falling asleep on the bank of the
Merrimack, we heard some tyro beating a drum incessantly, in
preparation for a country muster, as we learned, and we thought
of the line,--

     "When the drum beat at dead of night."

We could have assured him that his beat would be answered, and
the forces be mustered.  Fear not, thou drummer of the night, we
too will be there.  And still he drummed on in the silence and
the dark.  This stray sound from a far-off sphere came to our
ears from time to time, far, sweet, and significant, and we
listened with such an unprejudiced sense as if for the first time
we heard at all.  No doubt he was an insignificant drummer
enough, but his music afforded us a prime and leisure hour, and
we felt that we were in season wholly.  These simple sounds
related us to the stars.  Ay, there was a logic in them so
convincing that the combined sense of mankind could never make me
doubt their conclusions.  I stop my habitual thinking, as if the
plough had suddenly run deeper in its furrow through the crust of
the world.  How can I go on, who have just stepped over such a
bottomless skylight in the bog of my life.  Suddenly old Time
winked at me,--Ah, you know me, you rogue,--and news had come
that IT was well.  That ancient universe is in such capital
health, I think undoubtedly it will never die.  Heal yourselves,
doctors; by God, I live.

                Then idle Time ran gadding by
                And left me with Eternity alone;
            I hear beyond the range of sound,
            I see beyond the verge of sight,--

I see, smell, taste, hear, feel, that everlasting Something to
which we are allied, at once our maker, our abode, our destiny,
our very Selves; the one historic truth, the most remarkable fact
which can become the distinct and uninvited subject of our
thought, the actual glory of the universe; the only fact which a
human being cannot avoid recognizing, or in some way forget or
dispense with.

           It doth expand my privacies
       To all, and leave me single in the crowd.

I have seen how the foundations of the world are laid, and I have
not the least doubt that it will stand a good while.

         Now chiefly is my natal hour,
         And only now my prime of life.
         I will not doubt the love untold,
         Which not my worth nor want hath bought,
         Which wooed me young and wooes me old,
         And to this evening hath me brought.

What are ears? what is Time? that this particular series of
sounds called a strain of music, an invisible and fairy troop
which never brushed the dew from any mead, can be wafted down
through the centuries from Homer to me, and he have been
conversant with that same aerial and mysterious charm which now
so tingles my ears?  What a fine communication from age to age,
of the fairest and noblest thoughts, the aspirations of ancient
men, even such as were never communicated by speech, is music!
It is the flower of language, thought colored and curved, fluent
and flexible, its crystal fountain tinged with the sun's rays,
and its purling ripples reflecting the grass and the clouds.  A
strain of music reminds me of a passage of the Vedas, and I
associate with it the idea of infinite remoteness, as well as of
beauty and serenity, for to the senses that is farthest from us
which addresses the greatest depth within us.  It teaches us
again and again to trust the remotest and finest as the divinest
instinct, and makes a dream our only real experience.  We feel a
sad cheer when we hear it, perchance because we that hear are not
one with that which is heard.

        Therefore a torrent of sadness deep,
        Through the strains of thy triumph is heard to sweep.

The sadness is ours.  The Indian poet Calidas says in the
Sacontala: "Perhaps the sadness of men on seeing beautiful forms
and hearing sweet music arises from some faint remembrance of
past joys, and the traces of connections in a former state of
existence." As polishing expresses the vein in marble, and grain
in wood, so music brings out what of heroic lurks anywhere.  The
hero is the sole patron of music.  That harmony which exists
naturally between the hero's moods and the universe the soldier
would fain imitate with drum and trumpet.  When we are in health
all sounds fife and drum for us; we hear the notes of music in
the air, or catch its echoes dying away when we awake in the
dawn.  Marching is when the pulse of the hero beats in unison
with the pulse of Nature, and he steps to the measure of the
universe; then there is true courage and invincible strength.

Plutarch says that "Plato thinks the gods never gave men music,
the science of melody and harmony, for mere delectation or to
tickle the ear; but that the discordant parts of the circulations
and beauteous fabric of the soul, and that of it that roves about
the body, and many times, for want of tune and air, breaks forth
into many extravagances and excesses, might be sweetly recalled
and artfully wound up to their former consent and agreement."

Music is the sound of the universal laws promulgated.  It is the
only assured tone.  There are in it such strains as far surpass
any man's faith in the loftiness of his destiny.  Things are to
be learned which it will be worth the while to learn.  Formerly I
heard these

         ^Rumors from an Aeolian Harp^.

      There is a vale which none hath seen,
      Where foot of man has never been,
      Such as here lives with toil and strife,
      An anxious and a sinful life.

     There every virtue has its birth,
     Ere it descends upon the earth,
     And thither every deed returns,
     Which in the generous bosom burns.

     There love is warm, and youth is young,
     And poetry is yet unsung,
     For Virtue still adventures there,
     And freely breathes her native air.

     And ever, if you hearken well,
     You still may hear its vesper bell,
     And tread of high-souled men go by,
     Their thoughts conversing with the sky.

According to Jamblichus, "Pythagoras did not procure for himself
a thing of this kind through instruments or the voice, but
employing a certain ineffable divinity, and which it is difficult
to apprehend, he extended his ears and fixed his intellect in the
sublime symphonies of the world, he alone hearing and
understanding, as it appears, the universal harmony and
consonance of the spheres, and the stars that are moved through
them, and which produce a fuller and more intense melody than
anything effected by mortal sounds."

Travelling on foot very early one morning due east from here
about twenty miles, from Caleb Harriman's tavern in Hampstead
toward Haverhill, when I reached the railroad in Plaistow, I
heard at some distance a faint music in the air like an Aeolian
harp, which I immediately suspected to proceed from the cord of
the telegraph vibrating in the just awakening morning wind, and
applying my ear to one of the posts I was convinced that it was
so.  It was the telegraph harp singing its message through the
country, its message sent not by men, but by gods.  Perchance,
like the statue of Memnon, it resounds only in the morning, when
the first rays of the sun fall on it.  It was like the first lyre
or shell heard on the sea-shore,--that vibrating cord high in the
air over the shores of earth.  So have all things their higher
and their lower uses.  I heard a fairer news than the journals
ever print.  It told of things worthy to hear, and worthy of the
electric fluid to carry the news of, not of the price of cotton
and flour, but it hinted at the price of the world itself and of
things which are priceless, of absolute truth and beauty.

Still the drum rolled on, and stirred our blood to fresh
extravagance that night.  The clarion sound and clang of corselet
and buckler were heard from many a hamlet of the soul, and many a
knight was arming for the fight behind the encamped stars.

                                "Before each van
         Prick forth the aery knights, and couch their spears
         Till thickest legions close; with feats of arms
         From either end of Heaven the welkin burns."

                     --------------


           Away! away! away! away!
             Ye have not kept your secret well,
           I will abide that other day,
             Those other lands ye tell.

           Has time no leisure left for these,
             The acts that ye rehearse?
           Is not eternity a lease
             For better deeds than verse?

           'T is sweet to hear of heroes dead,
             To know them still alive,
           But sweeter if we earn their bread,
              And in us they survive.

           Our life should feed the springs of fame
              With a perennial wave.
           As ocean feeds the babbling founts
              Which find in it their grave.

          Ye skies drop gently round my breast,
            And be my corselet blue,
          Ye earth receive my lance in rest,
            My faithful charger you;

          Ye stars my spear-heads in the sky,
            My arrow-tips ye are;
          I see the routed foemen fly,
            My bright spears fixed are.

          Give me an angel for a foe,
            Fix now the place and time,
          And straight to meet him I will go
            Above the starry chime.

          And with our clashing bucklers' clang
            The heavenly spheres shall ring,
          While bright the northern lights shall hang
            Beside our tourneying.

          And if she lose her champion true,
            Tell Heaven not despair,
          For I will be her champion new,
            Her fame I will repair.

There was a high wind this night, which we afterwards learned had
been still more violent elsewhere, and had done much injury to
the cornfields far and near; but we only heard it sigh from time
to time, as if it had no license to shake the foundations of our
tent; the pines murmured, the water rippled, and the tent rocked
a little, but we only laid our ears closer to the ground, while
the blast swept on to alarm other men, and long before sunrise we
were ready to pursue our voyage as usual.




[page]


                       TUESDAY.


            "On either side the river lie
             Long fields of barley and of rye,
             That clothe the wold and meet the sky;
             And through the fields the road runs by
                          To many-towered Camelot."
                                            ^Tennyson.^


[page]



                       TUESDAY.

                        --*--


Long before daylight we ranged abroad, hatchet in hand, in search
of fuel, and made the yet slumbering and dreaming wood resound
with our blows.  Then with our fire we burned up a portion of the
loitering night, while the kettle sang its homely strain to the
morning star.  We tramped about the shore, waked all the
muskrats, and scared up the bittern and birds that were asleep
upon their roosts; we hauled up and upset our boat and washed it
and rinsed out the clay, talking aloud as if it were broad day,
until at length, by three o'clock, we had completed our
preparations and were ready to pursue our voyage as usual; so,
shaking the clay from our feet, we pushed into the fog.

Though we were enveloped in mist as usual, we trusted that there
was a bright day behind it.

     Ply the oars! away! away!
     In each dew-drop of the morning
     Lies the promise of a day.

     Rivers from the sunrise flow,
     Springing with the dewy morn;
     Voyageurs 'gainst time do row,
     Idle noon nor sunset know,
     Ever even with the dawn.

Belknap, the historian of this State, says that, "In the
neighborhood of fresh rivers and ponds, a whitish fog in the
morning lying over the water is a sure indication of fair weather
for that day; and when no fog is seen, rain is expected before
night." That which seemed to us to invest the world was only a
narrow and shallow wreath of vapor stretched over the channel of
the Merrimack from the seaboard to the mountains.  More extensive
fogs, however, have their own limits.  I once saw the day break
from the top of Saddle-back Mountain in Massachusetts, above the
clouds.  As we cannot distinguish objects through this dense fog,
let me tell this story more at length.


I had come over the hills on foot and alone in serene summer
days, plucking the raspberries by the wayside, and occasionally
buying a loaf of bread at a farmer's house, with a knapsack on my
back which held a few traveller's books and a change of clothing,
and a staff in my hand.  I had that morning looked down from the
Hoosack Mountain, where the road crosses it, on the village of
North Adams in the valley three miles away under my feet, showing
how uneven the earth may sometimes be, and making it seem an
accident that it should ever be level and convenient for the feet
of man.  Putting a little rice and sugar and a tin cup into my
knapsack at this village, I began in the afternoon to ascend the
mountain, whose summit is three thousand six hundred feet above
the level of the sea, and was seven or eight miles distant by the
path.  My route lay up a long and spacious valley called the
Bellows, because the winds rush up or down it with violence in
storms, sloping up to the very clouds between the principal range
and a lower mountain.  There were a few farms scattered along at
different elevations, each commanding a fine prospect of the
mountains to the north, and a stream ran down the middle of the
valley on which near the head there was a mill.  It seemed a road
for the pilgrim to enter upon who would climb to the gates of
heaven.  Now I crossed a hay-field, and now over the brook on a
slight bridge, still gradually ascending all the while with a
sort of awe, and filled with indefinite expectations as to what
kind of inhabitants and what kind of nature I should come to at
last.  It now seemed some advantage that the earth was uneven,
for one could not imagine a more noble position for a farm-house
than this vale afforded, farther from or nearer to its head, from
a glen-like seclusion overlooking the country at a great
elevation between these two mountain walls.

It reminded me of the homesteads of the Huguenots, on Staten
Island, off the coast of New Jersey.  The hills in the interior
of this island, though comparatively low, are penetrated in
various directions by similar sloping valleys on a humble scale,
gradually narrowing and rising to the centre, and at the head of
these the Huguenots, who were the first settlers, placed their
houses quite within the land, in rural and sheltered places, in
leafy recesses where the breeze played with the poplar and the
gum-tree, from which, with equal security in calm and storm, they
looked out through a widening vista, over miles of forest and
stretching salt marsh, to the Huguenot's Tree, an old elm on the
shore at whose root they had landed, and across the spacious
outer bay of New York to Sandy Hook and the Highlands of
Neversink, and thence over leagues of the Atlantic, perchance to
some faint vessel in the horizon, almost a day's sail on her
voyage to that Europe whence they had come.  When walking in the
interior there, in the midst of rural scenery, where there was as
little to remind me of the ocean as amid the New Hampshire hills,
I have suddenly, through a gap, a cleft or "clove road," as the
Dutch settlers called it, caught sight of a ship under full sail,
over a field of corn, twenty or thirty miles at sea.  The effect
was similar, since I had no means of measuring distances, to
seeing a painted ship passed backwards and forwards through a
magic-lantern.

But to return to the mountain.  It seemed as if he must be the
most singular and heavenly minded man whose dwelling stood
highest up the valley.  The thunder had rumbled at my heels all
the way, but the shower passed off in another direction, though
if it had not, I half believed that I should get above it.  I at
length reached the last house but one, where the path to the
summit diverged to the right, while the summit itself rose
directly in front.  But I determined to follow up the valley to
its head, and then find my own route up the steep as the shorter
and more adventurous way.  I had thoughts of returning to this
house, which was well kept and so nobly placed, the next day, and
perhaps remaining a week there, if I could have entertainment.
Its mistress was a frank and hospitable young woman, who stood
before me in a dishabille, busily and unconcernedly combing her
long black hair while she talked, giving her head the necessary
toss with each sweep of the comb, with lively, sparkling eyes,
and full of interest in that lower world from which I had come,
talking all the while as familiarly as if she had known me for
years, and reminding me of a cousin of mine.  She at first had
taken me for a student from Williamstown, for they went by in
parties, she said, either riding or walking, almost every
pleasant day, and were a pretty wild set of fellows; but they
never went by the way I was going.  As I passed the last house, a
man called out to know what I had to sell, for seeing my
knapsack, he thought that I might be a pedler who was taking this
unusual route over the ridge of the valley into South Adams.  He
told me that it was still four or five miles to the summit by the
path which I had left, though not more than two in a straight
line from where I was, but that nobody ever went this way; there
was no path, and I should find it as steep as the roof of a
house.  But I knew that I was more used to woods and mountains
than he, and went along through his cow-yard, while he, looking
at the sun, shouted after me that I should not get to the top
that night.  I soon reached the head of the valley, but as I
could not see the summit from this point, I ascended a low
mountain on the opposite side, and took its bearing with my
compass.  I at once entered the woods, and began to climb the
steep side of the mountain in a diagonal direction, taking the
bearing of a tree every dozen rods.  The ascent was by no means
difficult or unpleasant, and occupied much less time than it
would have taken to follow the path.  Even country people, I have
observed, magnify the difficulty of travelling in the forest, and
especially among mountains.  They seem to lack their usual common
sense in this.  I have climbed several higher mountains without
guide or path, and have found, as might be expected, that it
takes only more time and patience commonly than to travel the
smoothest highway.  It is very rare that you meet with obstacles
in this world which the humblest man has not faculties to
surmount.  It is true we may come to a perpendicular precipice,
but we need not jump off nor run our heads against it.  A man may
jump down his own cellar stairs or dash his brains out against
his chimney, if he is mad.  So far as my experience goes,
travellers generally exaggerate the difficulties of the way.
Like most evil, the difficulty is imaginary; for what's the
hurry?  If a person lost would conclude that after all he is not
lost, he is not beside himself, but standing in his own old shoes
on the very spot where he is, and that for the time being he will
live there; but the places that have known him, _they_ are
lost,--how much anxiety and danger would vanish.  I am not alone
if I stand by myself.  Who knows where in space this globe is
rolling?  Yet we will not give ourselves up for lost, let it go
where it will.

I made my way steadily upward in a straight line through a dense
undergrowth of mountain laurel, until the trees began to have a
scraggy and infernal look, as if contending with frost goblins,
and at length I reached the summit, just as the sun was setting.
Several acres here had been cleared, and were covered with rocks
and stumps, and there was a rude observatory in the middle which
overlooked the woods.  I had one fair view of the country before
the sun went down, but I was too thirsty to waste any light in
viewing the prospect, and set out directly to find water.  First,
going down a well-beaten path for half a mile through the low
scrubby wood, till I came to where the water stood in the tracks
of the horses which had carried travellers up, I lay down flat,
and drank these dry, one after another, a pure, cold, spring-like
water, but yet I could not fill my dipper, though I contrived
little siphons of grass-stems, and ingenious aqueducts on a small
scale; it was too slow a process.  Then remembering that I had
passed a moist place near the top, on my way up, I returned to
find it again, and here, with sharp stones and my hands, in the
twilight, I made a well about two feet deep, which was soon
filled with pure cold water, and the birds too came and drank at
it.  So I filled my dipper, and, making my way back to the
observatory, collected some dry sticks, and made a fire on some
flat stones which had been placed on the floor for that purpose,
and so I soon cooked my supper of rice, having already whittled a
wooden spoon to eat it with.

I sat up during the evening, reading by the light of the fire the
scraps of newspapers in which some party had wrapped their
luncheon; the prices current in New York and Boston, the
advertisements, and the singular editorials which some had seen
fit to publish, not foreseeing under what critical circumstances
they would be read.  I read these things at a vast advantage
there, and it seemed to me that the advertisements, or what is
called the business part of a paper, were greatly the best, the
most useful, natural, and respectable.  Almost all the opinions
and sentiments expressed were so little considered, so shallow
and flimsy, that I thought the very texture of the paper must be
weaker in that part and tear the more easily.  The advertisements
and the prices current were more closely allied to nature, and
were respectable in some measure as tide and meteorological
tables are; but the reading-matter, which I remembered was most
prized down below, unless it was some humble record of science,
or an extract from some old classic, struck me as strangely
whimsical, and crude, and one-idea'd, like a school-boy's theme,
such as youths write and after burn.  The opinions were of that
kind that are doomed to wear a different aspect to-morrow, like
last year's fashions; as if mankind were very green indeed, and
would be ashamed of themselves in a few years, when they had
outgrown this verdant period.  There was, moreover, a singular
disposition to wit and humor, but rarely the slightest real
success; and the apparent success was a terrible satire on the
attempt; the Evil Genius of man laughed the loudest at his best
jokes.  The advertisements, as I have said, such as were serious,
and not of the modern quack kind, suggested pleasing and poetic
thoughts; for commerce is really as interesting as nature.  The
very names of the commodities were poetic, and as suggestive as
if they had been inserted in a pleasing poem,--Lumber, Cotton,
Sugar, Hides, Guano, Logwood.  Some sober, private, and original
thought would have been grateful to read there, and as much in
harmony with the circumstances as if it had been written on a
mountain-top; for it is of a fashion which never changes, and as
respectable as hides and logwood, or any natural product.  What
an inestimable companion such a scrap of paper would have been,
containing some fruit of a mature life.  What a relic!  What a
recipe!  It seemed a divine invention, by which not mere shining
coin, but shining and current thoughts, could be brought up and
left there.

As it was cold, I collected quite a pile of wood and lay down on
a board against the side of the building, not having any blanket
to cover me, with my head to the fire, that I might look after
it, which is not the Indian rule.  But as it grew colder towards
midnight, I at length encased myself completely in boards,
managing even to put a board on top of me, with a large stone on
it, to keep it down, and so slept comfortably.  I was reminded,
it is true, of the Irish children, who inquired what their
neighbors did who had no door to put over them in winter nights
as they had; but I am convinced that there was nothing very
strange in the inquiry.  Those who have never tried it can have
no idea how far a door, which keeps the single blanket down, may
go toward making one comfortable.  We are constituted a good deal
like chickens, which taken from the hen, and put in a basket of
cotton in the chimney-corner, will often peep till they die,
nevertheless, but if you put in a book, or anything heavy, which
will press down the cotton, and feel like the hen, they go to
sleep directly.  My only companions were the mice, which came to
pick up the crumbs that had been left in those scraps of paper;
still, as everywhere, pensioners on man, and not unwisely
improving this elevated tract for their habitation.  They nibbled
what was for them; I nibbled what was for me.  Once or twice in
the night, when I looked up, I saw a white cloud drifting through
the windows, and filling the whole upper story.

This observatory was a building of considerable size, erected by
the students of Williamstown College, whose buildings might be
seen by daylight gleaming far down in the valley.  It would be no
small advantage if every college were thus located at the base of
a mountain, as good at least as one well-endowed professorship.
It were as well to be educated in the shadow of a mountain as in
more classical shades.  Some will remember, no doubt, not only
that they went to the college, but that they went to the
mountain.  Every visit to its summit would, as it were,
generalize the particular information gained below, and subject
it to more catholic tests.

I was up early and perched upon the top of this tower to see the
daybreak, for some time reading the names that had been engraved
there, before I could distinguish more distant objects.  An
"untamable fly" buzzed at my elbow with the same nonchalance as
on a molasses hogshead at the end of Long Wharf.  Even there I
must attend to his stale humdrum.  But now I come to the pith of
this long digression.--As the light increased I discovered around
me an ocean of mist, which by chance reached up exactly to the
base of the tower, and shut out every vestige of the earth, while
I was left floating on this fragment of the wreck of a world, on
my carved plank, in cloudland; a situation which required no aid
from the imagination to render it impressive.  As the light in
the east steadily increased, it revealed to me more clearly the
new world into which I had risen in the night, the new _terra
firma_ perchance of my future life.  There was not a crevice left
through which the trivial places we name Massachusetts or Vermont
or New York could be seen, while I still inhaled the clear
atmosphere of a July morning,--if it were July there.  All around
beneath me was spread for a hundred miles on every side, as far
as the eye could reach, an undulating country of clouds,
answering in the varied swell of its surface to the terrestrial
world it veiled.  It was such a country as we might see in
dreams, with all the delights of paradise.  There were immense
snowy pastures, apparently smooth-shaven and firm, and shady
vales between the vaporous mountains; and far in the horizon I
could see where some luxurious misty timber jutted into the
prairie, and trace the windings of a water-course, some
unimagined Amazon or Orinoko, by the misty trees on its brink.
As there was wanting the symbol, so there was not the substance
of impurity, no spot nor stain.  It was a favor for which to be
forever silent to be shown this vision.  The earth beneath had
become such a flitting thing of lights and shadows as the clouds
had been before.  It was not merely veiled to me, but it had
passed away like the phantom of a shadow, <skia's o'nar>, and
this new platform was gained.  As I had climbed above storm and
cloud, so by successive days' journeys I might reach the region
of eternal day, beyond the tapering shadow of the earth; ay,

             "Heaven itself shall slide,
        And roll away, like melting stars that glide
        Along their oily threads."

But when its own sun began to rise on this pure world, I found
myself a dweller in the dazzling halls of Aurora, into which
poets have had but a partial glance over the eastern hills,
drifting amid the saffron-colored clouds, and playing with the
rosy fingers of the Dawn, in the very path of the Sun's chariot,
and sprinkled with its dewy dust, enjoying the benignant smile,
and near at hand the far-darting glances of the god.  The
inhabitants of earth behold commonly but the dark and shadowy
under-side of heaven's pavement; it is only when seen at a
favorable angle in the horizon, morning or evening, that some
faint streaks of the rich lining of the clouds are revealed.  But
my muse would fail to convey an impression of the gorgeous
tapestry by which I was surrounded, such as men see faintly
reflected afar off in the chambers of the east.  Here, as on
earth, I saw the gracious god

        "Flatter the mountain-tops with sovereign eye,
             .      .      .      .      .      .
          Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy."

But never here did "Heaven's sun" stain himself.

But, alas, owing, as I think, to some unworthiness in myself, my
private sun did stain himself, and

             "Anon permit the basest clouds to ride
              With ugly wrack on his celestial face,"--

for before the god had reached the zenith the heavenly pavement
rose and embraced my wavering virtue, or rather I sank down again
into that "forlorn world," from which the celestial sun had hid
his visage,--

      "How may a worm that crawls along the dust,
       Clamber the azure mountains, thrown so high,
       And fetch from thence thy fair idea just,
       That in those sunny courts doth hidden lie,
       Clothed with such light as blinds the angel's eye?
          How may weak mortal ever hope to file
          His unsmooth tongue, and his deprostrate style?
       O, raise thou from his corse thy now entombed exile!"

In the preceding evening I had seen the summits of new and yet
higher mountains, the Catskills, by which I might hope to climb
to heaven again, and had set my compass for a fair lake in the
southwest, which lay in my way, for which I now steered,
descending the mountain by my own route, on the side opposite to
that by which I had ascended, and soon found myself in the region
of cloud and drizzling rain, and the inhabitants affirmed that it
had been a cloudy and drizzling day wholly.

But now we must make haste back before the fog disperses to the
blithe Merrimack water.

      Since that first "Away! away!"
           Many a lengthy reach we've rowed,
      Still the sparrow on the spray
      Hastes to usher in the day
           With her simple stanza'd ode.

We passed a canal-boat before sunrise, groping its way to the
seaboard, and, though we could not see it on account of the fog,
the few dull, thumping, stertorous sounds which we heard,
impressed us with a sense of weight and irresistible motion.  One
little rill of commerce already awake on this distant New
Hampshire river.  The fog, as it required more skill in the
steering, enhanced the interest of our early voyage, and made the
river seem indefinitely broad.  A slight mist, through which
objects are faintly visible, has the effect of expanding even
ordinary streams, by a singular mirage, into arms of the sea or
inland lakes.  In the present instance it was even fragrant and
invigorating, and we enjoyed it as a sort of earlier sunshine, or
dewy and embryo light.

         Low-anchored cloud,
         Newfoundland air,
         Fountain-head and source of rivers,
         Dew-cloth, dream drapery,
         And napkin spread by fays;
         Drifting meadow of the air,
         Where bloom the daisied banks and violets,
         And in whose fenny labyrinth
         The bittern booms and heron wades;
         Spirit of lakes and seas and rivers,
         Bear only perfumes and the scent
         Of healing herbs to just men's fields!

The same pleasant and observant historian whom we quoted above
says, that, "In the mountainous parts of the country, the ascent
of vapors, and their formation into clouds, is a curious and
entertaining object.  The vapors are seen rising in small columns
like smoke from many chimneys.  When risen to a certain height,
they spread, meet, condense, and are attracted to the mountains,
where they either distil in gentle dews, and replenish the
springs, or descend in showers, accompanied with thunder.  After
short intermissions, the process is repeated many times in the
course of a summer day, affording to travellers a lively
illustration of what is observed in the Book of Job, `They are
wet with the showers of the mountains.'"

Fogs and clouds which conceal the overshadowing mountains lend
the breadth of the plains to mountain vales.  Even a
small-featured country acquires some grandeur in stormy weather
when clouds are seen drifting between the beholder and the
neighboring hills.  When, in travelling toward Haverhill through
Hampstead in this State, on the height of land between the
Merrimack and the Piscataqua or the sea, you commence the descent
eastward, the view toward the coast is so distant and unexpected,
though the sea is invisible, that you at first suppose the
unobstructed atmosphere to be a fog in the lowlands concealing
hills of corresponding elevation to that you are upon; but it is
the mist of prejudice alone, which the winds will not disperse.
The most stupendous scenery ceases to be sublime when it becomes
distinct, or in other words limited, and the imagination is no
longer encouraged to exaggerate it.  The actual height and
breadth of a mountain or a waterfall are always ridiculously
small; they are the imagined only that content us.  Nature is not
made after such a fashion as we would have her.  We piously
exaggerate her wonders, as the scenery around our home.

Such was the heaviness of the dews along this river that we were
generally obliged to leave our tent spread over the bows of the
boat till the sun had dried it, to avoid mildew.  We passed the
mouth of Penichook Brook, a wild salmon-stream, in the fog,
without seeing it.  At length the sun's rays struggled through
the mist and showed us the pines on shore dripping with dew, and
springs trickling from the moist banks,--

      "And now the taller sons, whom Titan warms,
       Of unshorn mountains blown with easy winds,
       Dandle the morning's childhood in their arms,
       And, if they chanced to slip the prouder pines,
       The under corylets did catch their shines,
       To gild their leaves."

We rowed for some hours between glistening banks before the sun
had dried the grass and leaves, or the day had established its
character.  Its serenity at last seemed the more profound and
secure for the denseness of the morning's fog.  The river became
swifter, and the scenery more pleasing than before.  The banks
were steep and clayey for the most part, and trickling with
water, and where a spring oozed out a few feet above the river
the boatmen had cut a trough out of a slab with their axes, and
placed it so as to receive the water and fill their jugs
conveniently.  Sometimes this purer and cooler water, bursting
out from under a pine or a rock, was collected into a basin close
to the edge of and level with the river, a fountain-head of the
Merrimack.  So near along life's stream are the fountains of
innocence and youth making fertile its sandy margin; and the
voyageur will do well to replenish his vessels often at these
uncontaminated sources.  Some youthful spring, perchance, still
empties with tinkling music into the oldest river, even when it
is falling into the sea, and we imagine that its music is
distinguished by the river-gods from the general lapse of the
stream, and falls sweeter on their ears in proportion as it is
nearer to the ocean.  As the evaporations of the river feed thus
these unsuspected springs which filter through its banks, so,
perchance, our aspirations fall back again in springs on the
margin of life's stream to refresh and purify it.  The yellow and
tepid river may float his scow, and cheer his eye with its
reflections and its ripples, but the boatman quenches his thirst
at this small rill alone.  It is this purer and cooler element
that chiefly sustains his life.  The race will long survive that
is thus discreet.

Our course this morning lay between the territories of Merrimack,
on the west, and Litchfield, once called Brenton's Farm, on the
east, which townships were anciently the Indian Naticook.
Brenton was a fur-trader among the Indians, and these lands were
granted to him in 1656.  The latter township contains about five
hundred inhabitants, of whom, however, we saw none, and but few
of their dwellings.  Being on the river, whose banks are always
high and generally conceal the few houses, the country appeared
much more wild and primitive than to the traveller on the
neighboring roads.  The river is by far the most attractive
highway, and those boatmen who have spent twenty or twenty-five
years on it must have had a much fairer, more wild, and memorable
experience than the dusty and jarring one of the teamster who has
driven, during the same time, on the roads which run parallel
with the stream.  As one ascends the Merrimack he rarely sees a
village, but for the most part alternate wood and pasture lands,
and sometimes a field of corn or potatoes, of rye or oats or
English grass, with a few straggling apple-trees, and, at still
longer intervals, a farmer's house.  The soil, excepting the best
of the interval, is commonly as light and sandy as a patriot
could desire.  Sometimes this forenoon the country appeared in
its primitive state, and as if the Indian still inhabited it,
and, again, as if many free, new settlers occupied it, their
slight fences straggling down to the water's edge; and the
barking of dogs, and even the prattle of children, were heard,
and smoke was seen to go up from some hearthstone, and the banks
were divided into patches of pasture, mowing, tillage, and
woodland.  But when the river spread out broader, with an
uninhabited islet, or a long, low sandy shore which ran on single
and devious, not answering to its opposite, but far off as if it
were sea-shore or single coast, and the land no longer nursed the
river in its bosom, but they conversed as equals, the rustling
leaves with rippling waves, and few fences were seen, but high
oak woods on one side, and large herds of cattle, and all tracks
seemed a point to one centre behind some statelier grove,--we
imagined that the river flowed through an extensive manor, and
that the few inhabitants were retainers to a lord, and a feudal
state of things prevailed.

When there was a suitable reach, we caught sight of the Goffstown
mountain, the Indian Uncannunuc, rising before us on the west
side.  It was a calm and beautiful day, with only a slight zephyr
to ripple the surface of the water, and rustle the woods on
shore, and just warmth enough to prove the kindly disposition of
Nature to her children.  With buoyant spirits and vigorous
impulses we tossed our boat rapidly along into the very middle of
this forenoon.  The fish-hawk sailed and screamed overhead.  The
chipping or striped squirrel, _Sciurus striatus_ (_Tamias
Lysteri_, Aud.), sat upon the end of some Virginia fence or rider
reaching over the stream, twirling a green nut with one paw, as
in a lathe, while the other held it fast against its incisors as
chisels.  Like an independent russet leaf, with a will of its
own, rustling whither it could; now under the fence, now over it,
now peeping at the voyageurs through a crack with only its tail
visible, now at its lunch deep in the toothsome kernel, and now a
rod off playing at hide-and-seek, with the nut stowed away in its
chops, where were half a dozen more besides, extending its cheeks
to a ludicrous breadth,--as if it were devising through what safe
valve of frisk or somerset to let its superfluous life escape;
the stream passing harmlessly off, even while it sits, in
constant electric flashes through its tail.  And now with a
chuckling squeak it dives into the root of a hazel, and we see no
more of it.  Or the larger red squirrel or chickaree, sometimes
called the Hudson Bay squirrel (_Scriurus Hudsonius_), gave
warning of our approach by that peculiar alarum of his, like the
winding up of some strong clock, in the top of a pine-tree, and
dodged behind its stem, or leaped from tree to tree with such
caution and adroitness, as if much depended on the fidelity of
his scout, running along the white-pine boughs sometimes twenty
rods by our side, with such speed, and by such unerring routes,
as if it were some well-worn familiar path to him; and presently,
when we have passed, he returns to his work of cutting off the
pine-cones, and letting them fall to the ground.

We passed Cromwell's Falls, the first we met with on this river,
this forenoon, by means of locks, without using our wheels.
These falls are the Nesenkeag of the Indians.  Great Nesenkeag
Stream comes in on the right just above, and Little Nesenkeag
some distance below, both in Litchfield.  We read in the
Gazetteer, under the head of Merrimack, that "The first house in
this town was erected on the margin of the river [soon after
1665] for a house of traffic with the Indians.  For some time one
Cromwell carried on a lucrative trade with them, weighing their
furs with his foot, till, enraged at his supposed or real
deception, they formed the resolution to murder him.  This
intention being communicated to Cromwell, he buried his wealth
and made his escape.  Within a few hours after his flight, a
party of the Penacook tribe arrived, and, not finding the object
of their resentment, burnt his habitation." Upon the top of the
high bank here, close to the river, was still to be seen his
cellar, now overgrown with trees.  It was a convenient spot for
such a traffic, at the foot of the first falls above the
settlements, and commanding a pleasant view up the river, where
he could see the Indians coming down with their furs.  The
lock-man told us that his shovel and tongs had been ploughed up
here, and also a stone with his name on it.  But we will not
vouch for the truth of this story.  In the New Hampshire
Historical Collections for 1815 it says, "Some time after pewter
was found in the well, and an iron pot and trammel in the sand;
the latter are preserved."  These were the traces of the white
trader.  On the opposite bank, where it jutted over the stream
cape-wise, we picked up four arrow-heads and a small Indian tool
made of stone, as soon as we had climbed it, where plainly there
had once stood a wigwam of the Indians with whom Cromwell traded,
and who fished and hunted here before he came.

As usual the gossips have not been silent respecting Cromwell's
buried wealth, and it is said that some years ago a farmer's
plough, not far from here, slid over a flat stone which emitted a
hollow sound, and, on its being raised, a small hole six inches
in diameter was discovered, stoned about, from which a sum of
money was taken.  The lock-man told us another similar story about
a farmer in a neighboring town, who had been a poor man, but who
suddenly bought a good farm, and was well to do in the world,
and, when he was questioned, did not give a satisfactory account
of the matter; how few, alas, could!  This caused his hired man to
remember that one day, as they were ploughing together, the
plough struck something, and his employer, going back to look,
concluded not to go round again, saying that the sky looked
rather lowering, and so put up his team.  The like urgency has
caused many things to be remembered which never transpired.  The
truth is, there is money buried everywhere, and you have only to
go to work to find it.

Not far from these falls stands an oak-tree, on the interval,
about a quarter of a mile from the river, on the farm of a
Mr. Lund, which was pointed out to us as the spot where French,
the leader of the party which went in pursuit of the Indians from
Dunstable, was killed.  Farwell dodged them in the thick woods
near.  It did not look as if men had ever had to run for their
lives on this now open and peaceful interval.

Here too was another extensive desert by the side of the road in
Litchfield, visible from the bank of the river.  The sand was
blown off in some places to the depth of ten or twelve feet,
leaving small grotesque hillocks of that height, where there was
a clump of bushes firmly rooted.  Thirty or forty years ago, as
we were told, it was a sheep-pasture, but the sheep, being
worried by the fleas, began to paw the ground, till they broke
the sod, and so the sand began to blow, till now it had extended
over forty or fifty acres.  This evil might easily have been
remedied, at first, by spreading birches with their leaves on
over the sand, and fastening them down with stakes, to break the
wind.  The fleas bit the sheep, and the sheep bit the ground, and
the sore had spread to this extent.  It is astonishing what a
great sore a little scratch breedeth.  Who knows but Sahara,
where caravans and cities are buried, began with the bite of an
African flea?  This poor globe, how it must itch in many places!
Will no god be kind enough to spread a salve of birches over its
sores?  Here too we noticed where the Indians had gathered a heap
of stones, perhaps for their council-fire, which, by their weight
having prevented the sand under them from blowing away, were left
on the summit of a mound.  They told us that arrow-heads, and
also bullets of lead and iron, had been found here.  We noticed
several other sandy tracts in our voyage; and the course of the
Merrimack can be traced from the nearest mountain by its yellow
sandbanks, though the river itself is for the most part invisible.
Lawsuits, as we hear, have in some cases grown out of these causes.
Railroads have been made through certain irritable districts,
breaking their sod, and so have set the sand to blowing, till it
has converted fertile farms into deserts, and the company has had
to pay the damages.

This sand seemed to us the connecting link between land and
water.  It was a kind of water on which you could walk, and you
could see the ripple-marks on its surface, produced by the winds,
precisely like those at the bottom of a brook or lake.  We had
read that Mussulmen are permitted by the Koran to perform their
ablutions in sand when they cannot get water, a necessary
indulgence in Arabia, and we now understood the propriety of this
provision.

Plum Island, at the mouth of this river, to whose formation,
perhaps, these very banks have sent their contribution, is a
similar desert of drifting sand, of various colors, blown into
graceful curves by the wind.  It is a mere sand-bar exposed,
stretching nine miles parallel to the coast, and, exclusive of
the marsh on the inside, rarely more than half a mile wide.
There are but half a dozen houses on it, and it is almost without
a tree, or a sod, or any green thing with which a countryman is
familiar.  The thin vegetation stands half buried in sand, as in
drifting snow.  The only shrub, the beach-plum, which gives the
island its name, grows but a few feet high; but this is so
abundant that parties of a hundred at once come from the
main-land and down the Merrimack, in September, pitch their
tents, and gather the plums, which are good to eat raw and to
preserve.  The graceful and delicate beach-pea, too, grows
abundantly amid the sand, and several strange, moss-like and
succulent plants.  The island for its whole length is scalloped
into low hills, not more than twenty feet high, by the wind, and,
excepting a faint trail on the edge of the marsh, is as trackless
as Sahara.  There are dreary bluffs of sand and valleys ploughed
by the wind, where you might expect to discover the bones of a
caravan.  Schooners come from Boston to load with the sand for
masons' uses, and in a few hours the wind obliterates all traces
of their work.  Yet you have only to dig a foot or two anywhere
to come to fresh water; and you are surprised to learn that
woodchucks abound here, and foxes are found, though you see not
where they can burrow or hide themselves.  I have walked down the
whole length of its broad beach at low tide, at which time alone
you can find a firm ground to walk on, and probably Massachusetts
does not furnish a more grand and dreary walk.  On the seaside
there are only a distant sail and a few coots to break the grand
monotony.  A solitary stake stuck up, or a sharper sand-hill than
usual, is remarkable as a landmark for miles; while for music you
hear only the ceaseless sound of the surf, and the dreary peep of
the beach-birds.


There were several canal-boats at Cromwell's Falls passing
through the locks, for which we waited.  In the forward part of
one stood a brawny New Hampshire man, leaning on his pole,
bareheaded and in shirt and trousers only, a rude Apollo of a
man, coming down from that "vast uplandish country" to the main;
of nameless age, with flaxen hair, and vigorous, weather-bleached
countenance, in whose wrinkles the sun still lodged, as little
touched by the heats and frosts and withering cares of life as a
maple of the mountain; an undressed, unkempt, uncivil man, with
whom we parleyed awhile, and parted not without a sincere
interest in one another.  His humanity was genuine and
instinctive, and his rudeness only a manner.  He inquired, just
as we were passing out of earshot, if we had killed anything, and
we shouted after him that we had shot a _buoy_, and could see him
for a long while scratching his head in vain to know if he had
heard aright.

There is reason in the distinction of civil and uncivil.  The
manners are sometimes so rough a rind that we doubt whether they
cover any core or sap-wood at all.  We sometimes meet uncivil
men, children of Amazons, who dwell by mountain paths, and are
said to be inhospitable to strangers; whose salutation is as rude
as the grasp of their brawny hands, and who deal with men as
unceremoniously as they are wont to deal with the elements.  They
need only to extend their clearings, and let in more sunlight, to
seek out the southern slopes of the hills, from which they may
look down on the civil plain or ocean, and temper their diet duly
with the cereal fruits, consuming less wild meat and acorns, to
become like the inhabitants of cities.  A true politeness does
not result from any hasty and artificial polishing, it is true,
but grows naturally in characters of the right grain and quality,
through a long fronting of men and events, and rubbing on good
and bad fortune.  Perhaps I can tell a tale to the purpose while
the lock is filling,--for our voyage this forenoon furnishes but
few incidents of importance.


Early one summer morning I had left the shores of the
Connecticut, and for the livelong day travelled up the bank of a
river, which came in from the west; now looking down on the
stream, foaming and rippling through the forest a mile off, from
the hills over which the road led, and now sitting on its rocky
brink and dipping my feet in its rapids, or bathing adventurously
in mid-channel.  The hills grew more and more frequent, and
gradually swelled into mountains as I advanced, hemming in the
course of the river, so that at last I could not see where it
came from, and was at liberty to imagine the most wonderful
meanderings and descents.  At noon I slept on the grass in the
shade of a maple, where the river had found a broader channel
than usual, and was spread out shallow, with frequent sand-bars
exposed.  In the names of the towns I recognized some which I had
long ago read on teamsters' wagons, that had come from far up
country; quiet, uplandish towns, of mountainous fame.  I walked
along, musing and enchanted, by rows of sugar-maples, through the
small and uninquisitive villages, and sometimes was pleased with
the sight of a boat drawn up on a sand-bar, where there appeared
no inhabitants to use it.  It seemed, however, as essential to
the river as a fish, and to lend a certain dignity to it.  It was
like the trout of mountain streams to the fishes of the sea, or
like the young of the land-crab born far in the interior, who
have never yet heard the sound of the ocean's surf.  The hills
approached nearer and nearer to the stream, until at last they
closed behind me, and I found myself just before nightfall in a
romantic and retired valley, about half a mile in length, and
barely wide enough for the stream at its bottom.  I thought that
there could be no finer site for a cottage among mountains.  You
could anywhere run across the stream on the rocks, and its
constant murmuring would quiet the passions of mankind forever.
Suddenly the road, which seemed aiming for the mountain-side,
turned short to the left, and another valley opened, concealing
the former, and of the same character with it.  It was the most
remarkable and pleasing scenery I had ever seen.  I found here a
few mild and hospitable inhabitants, who, as the day was not
quite spent, and I was anxious to improve the light, directed me
four or five miles farther on my way to the dwelling of a man
whose name was Rice, who occupied the last and highest of the
valleys that lay in my path, and who, they said, was a rather
rude and uncivil man.  But "what is a foreign country to those
who have science?  Who is a stranger to those who have the habit
of speaking kindly?"

At length, as the sun was setting behind the mountains in a still
darker and more solitary vale, I reached the dwelling of this
man.  Except for the narrowness of the plain, and that the stones
were solid granite, it was the counterpart of that retreat to
which Belphoebe bore the wounded Timias,--

                        "In a pleasant glade,
     With mountains round about environed,
     And mighty woods, which did the valley shade,
     And like a stately theatre it made,
     Spreading itself into a spacious plain;
     And in the midst a little river played
     Amongst the pumy stones which seemed to plain,
     With gentle murmur, that his course they did restrain."

I observed, as I drew near, that he was not so rude as I had
anticipated, for he kept many cattle, and dogs to watch them, and
I saw where he had made maple-sugar on the sides of the
mountains, and above all distinguished the voices of children
mingling with the murmur of the torrent before the door.  As I
passed his stable I met one whom I supposed to be a hired man,
attending to his cattle, and I inquired if they entertained
travellers at that house.  "Sometimes we do," he answered,
gruffly, and immediately went to the farthest stall from me, and
I perceived that it was Rice himself whom I had addressed.  But
pardoning this incivility to the wildness of the scenery, I bent
my steps to the house.  There was no sign-post before it, nor any
of the usual invitations to the traveller, though I saw by the
road that many went and came there, but the owner's name only was
fastened to the outside; a sort of implied and sullen invitation,
as I thought.  I passed from room to room without meeting any
one, till I came to what seemed the guests' apartment, which was
neat, and even had an air of refinement about it, and I was glad
to find a map against the wall which would direct me on my
journey on the morrow.  At length I heard a step in a distant
apartment, which was the first I had entered, and went to see if
the landlord had come in; but it proved to be only a child, one
of those whose voices I had heard, probably his son, and between
him and me stood in the doorway a large watch-dog, which growled
at me, and looked as if he would presently spring, but the boy
did not speak to him; and when I asked for a glass of water, he
briefly said, "It runs in the corner." So I took a mug from the
counter and went out of doors, and searched round the corner of
the house, but could find neither well nor spring, nor any water
but the stream which ran all along the front.  I came back,
therefore, and, setting down the mug, asked the child if the
stream was good to drink; whereupon he seized the mug, and, going
to the corner of the room, where a cool spring which issued from
the mountain behind trickled through a pipe into the apartment,
filled it, and drank, and gave it to me empty again, and, calling
to the dog, rushed out of doors.  Erelong some of the hired men
made their appearance, and drank at the spring, and lazily washed
themselves and combed their hair in silence, and some sat down as
if weary, and fell asleep in their seats.  But all the while I
saw no women, though I sometimes heard a bustle in that part of
the house from which the spring came.

At length Rice himself came in, for it was now dark, with an
ox-whip in his hand, breathing hard, and he too soon settled down
into his seat not far from me, as if, now that his day's work was
done, he had no farther to travel, but only to digest his supper
at his leisure.  When I asked him if he could give me a bed, he
said there was one ready, in such a tone as implied that I ought
to have known it, and the less said about that the better.  So
far so good.  And yet he continued to look at me as if he would
fain have me say something further like a traveller.  I remarked,
that it was a wild and rugged country he inhabited, and worth
coming many miles to see.  "Not so very rough neither," said he,
and appealed to his men to bear witness to the breadth and
smoothness of his fields, which consisted in all of one small
interval, and to the size of his crops; "and if we have some
hills," added he, "there's no better pasturage anywhere." I then
asked if this place was the one I had heard of, calling it by a
name I had seen on the map, or if it was a certain other; and he
answered, gruffly, that it was neither the one nor the other;
that he had settled it and cultivated it, and made it what it
was, and I could know nothing about it.  Observing some guns and
other implements of hunting hanging on brackets around the room,
and his hounds now sleeping on the floor, I took occasion to
change the discourse, and inquired if there was much game in that
country, and he answered this question more graciously, having
some glimmering of my drift; but when I inquired if there were
any bears, he answered impatiently that he was no more in danger
of losing his sheep than his neighbors; he had tamed and
civilized that region.  After a pause, thinking of my journey on
the morrow, and the few hours of daylight in that hollow and
mountainous country, which would require me to be on my way
betimes, I remarked that the day must be shorter by an hour there
than on the neighboring plains; at which he gruffly asked what I
knew about it, and affirmed that he had as much daylight as his
neighbors; he ventured to say, the days were longer there than
where I lived, as I should find if I stayed; that in some way, I
could not be expected to understand how, the sun came over the
mountains half an hour earlier, and stayed half an hour later
there than on the neighboring plains.  And more of like sort he
said.  He was, indeed, as rude as a fabled satyr.  But I suffered
him to pass for what he was,--for why should I quarrel with
nature?--and was even pleased at the discovery of such a singular
natural phenomenon.  I dealt with him as if to me all manners
were indifferent, and he had a sweet, wild way with him.  I would
not question nature, and I would rather have him as he was than
as I would have him.  For I had come up here not for sympathy, or
kindness, or society, but for novelty and adventure, and to see
what nature had produced here.  I therefore did not repel his
rudeness, but quite innocently welcomed it all, and knew how to
appreciate it, as if I were reading in an old drama a part well
sustained.  He was indeed a coarse and sensual man, and, as I
have said, uncivil, but he had his just quarrel with nature and
mankind, I have no doubt, only he had no artificial covering to
his ill-humors.  He was earthy enough, but yet there was good
soil in him, and even a long-suffering Saxon probity at bottom.
If you could represent the case to him, he would not let the race
die out in him, like a red Indian.

At length I told him that he was a fortunate man, and I trusted
that he was grateful for so much light; and, rising, said I would
take a lamp, and that I would pay him then for my lodging, for I
expected to recommence my journey even as early as the sun rose
in his country; but he answered in haste, and this time civilly,
that I should not fail to find some of his household stirring,
however early, for they were no sluggards, and I could take my
breakfast with them before I started, if I chose; and as he
lighted the lamp I detected a gleam of true hospitality and
ancient civility, a beam of pure and even gentle humanity, from
his bleared and moist eyes.  It was a look more intimate with me,
and more explanatory, than any words of his could have been if he
had tried to his dying day.  It was more significant than any
Rice of those parts could even comprehend, and long anticipated
this man's culture,--a glance of his pure genius, which did not
much enlighten him, but did impress and rule him for the moment,
and faintly constrain his voice and manner.  He cheerfully led
the way to my apartment, stepping over the limbs of his men, who
were asleep on the floor in an intervening chamber, and showed me
a clean and comfortable bed.  For many pleasant hours after the
household was asleep I sat at the open window, for it was a
sultry night, and heard the little river

   "Amongst the pumy stones, which seemed to plain,
     With gentle murmur, that his course they did restrain."

But I arose as usual by starlight the next morning, before my
host, or his men, or even his dogs, were awake; and, having left
a ninepence on the counter, was already half-way over the
mountain with the sun before they had broken their fast.

Before I had left the country of my host, while the first rays of
the sun slanted over the mountains, as I stopped by the wayside
to gather some raspberries, a very old man, not far from a
hundred, came along with a milking-pail in his hand, and turning
aside began to pluck the berries near me:--

          "His reverend locks
     In comelye curles did wave;
     And on his aged temples grew
        The blossoms of the grave."

But when I inquired the way, he answered in a low, rough voice,
without looking up or seeming to regard my presence, which I
imputed to his years; and presently, muttering to himself, he
proceeded to collect his cows in a neighboring pasture; and when
he had again returned near to the wayside, he suddenly stopped,
while his cows went on before, and, uncovering his head, prayed
aloud in the cool morning air, as if he had forgotten this
exercise before, for his daily bread, and also that He who
letteth his rain fall on the just and on the unjust, and without
whom not a sparrow falleth to the ground, would not neglect the
stranger (meaning me), and with even more direct and personal
applications, though mainly according to the long-established
formula common to lowlanders and the inhabitants of mountains.
When he had done praying, I made bold to ask him if he had any
cheese in his hut which he would sell me, but he answered without
looking up, and in the same low and repulsive voice as before,
that they did not make any, and went to milking.  It is written,
"The stranger who turneth away from a house with disappointed
hopes, leaveth there his own offences, and departeth, taking with
him all the good actions of the owner."


Being now fairly in the stream of this week's commerce, we began
to meet with boats more frequently, and hailed them from time to
time with the freedom of sailors.  The boatmen appeared to lead
an easy and contented life, and we thought that we should prefer
their employment ourselves to many professions which are much
more sought after.  They suggested how few circumstances are
necessary to the well-being and serenity of man, how indifferent
all employments are, and that any may seem noble and poetic to
the eyes of men, if pursued with sufficient buoyancy and freedom.
With liberty and pleasant weather, the simplest occupation, any
unquestioned country mode of life which detains us in the open
air, is alluring.  The man who picks peas steadily for a living
is more than respectable, he is even envied by his shop-worn
neighbors.  We are as happy as the birds when our Good Genius
permits us to pursue any out-door work, without a sense of
dissipation.  Our penknife glitters in the sun; our voice is
echoed by yonder wood; if an oar drops, we are fain to let it
drop again.

The canal-boat is of very simple construction, requiring but
little ship-timber, and, as we were told, costs about two hundred
dollars.  They are managed by two men.  In ascending the stream
they use poles fourteen or fifteen feet long, pointed with iron,
walking about one third the length of the boat from the forward
end.  Going down, they commonly keep in the middle of the stream,
using an oar at each end; or if the wind is favorable they raise
their broad sail, and have only to steer.  They commonly carry
down wood or bricks,--fifteen or sixteen cords of wood, and as
many thousand bricks, at a time,--and bring back stores for the
country, consuming two or three days each way between Concord and
Charlestown.  They sometimes pile the wood so as to leave a
shelter in one part where they may retire from the rain.  One can
hardly imagine a more healthful employment, or one more favorable
to contemplation and the observation of nature.  Unlike the
mariner, they have the constantly varying panorama of the shore
to relieve the monotony of their labor, and it seemed to us that
as they thus glided noiselessly from town to town, with all their
furniture about them, for their very homestead is a movable, they
could comment on the character of the inhabitants with greater
advantage and security to themselves than the traveller in a
coach, who would be unable to indulge in such broadsides of wit
and humor in so small a vessel for fear of the recoil.  They are
not subject to great exposure, like the lumberers of Maine, in
any weather, but inhale the healthfullest breezes, being slightly
encumbered with clothing, frequently with the head and feet bare.
When we met them at noon as they were leisurely descending the
stream, their busy commerce did not look like toil, but rather
like some ancient Oriental game still played on a large scale, as
the game of chess, for instance, handed down to this generation.
From morning till night, unless the wind is so fair that his
single sail will suffice without other labor than steering, the
boatman walks backwards and forwards on the side of his boat, now
stooping with his shoulder to the pole, then drawing it back
slowly to set it again, meanwhile moving steadily forward through
an endless valley and an everchanging scenery, now distinguishing
his course for a mile or two, and now shut in by a sudden turn of
the river in a small woodland lake.  All the phenomena which
surround him are simple and grand, and there is something
impressive, even majestic, in the very motion he causes, which
will naturally be communicated to his own character, and he feels
the slow, irresistible movement under him with pride, as if it
were his own energy.

The news spread like wildfire among us youths, when formerly,
once in a year or two, one of these boats came up the Concord
River, and was seen stealing mysteriously through the meadows and
past the village.  It came and departed as silently as a cloud,
without noise or dust, and was witnessed by few.  One summer day
this huge traveller might be seen moored at some meadow's wharf,
and another summer day it was not there.  Where precisely it came
from, or who these men were who knew the rocks and soundings
better than we who bathed there, we could never tell.  We knew
some river's bay only, but they took rivers from end to end.
They were a sort of fabulous river-men to us.  It was
inconceivable by what sort of mediation any mere landsman could
hold communication with them.  Would they heave to, to gratify
his wishes?  No, it was favor enough to know faintly of their
destination, or the time of their possible return.  I have seen
them in the summer when the stream ran low, mowing the weeds in
mid-channel, and with hayers' jests cutting broad swaths in three
feet of water, that they might make a passage for their scow,
while the grass in long windrows was carried down the stream,
undried by the rarest hay-weather.  We admired unweariedly how
their vessel would float, like a huge chip, sustaining so many
casks of lime, and thousands of bricks, and such heaps of iron
ore, with wheelbarrows aboard, and that, when we stepped on it,
it did not yield to the pressure of our feet.  It gave us
confidence in the prevalence of the law of buoyancy, and we
imagined to what infinite uses it might be put.  The men appeared
to lead a kind of life on it, and it was whispered that they
slept aboard.  Some affirmed that it carried sail, and that such
winds blew here as filled the sails of vessels on the ocean;
which again others much doubted.  They had been seen to sail
across our Fair Haven bay by lucky fishers who were out, but
unfortunately others were not there to see.  We might then say
that our river was navigable,--why not?  In after-years I read in
print, with no little satisfaction, that it was thought by some
that, with a little expense in removing rocks and deepening the
channel, "there might be a profitable inland navigation." _I_
then lived some-where to tell of.

Such is Commerce, which shakes the cocoa-nut and bread-fruit tree
in the remotest isle, and sooner or later dawns on the duskiest
and most simple-minded savage.  If we may be pardoned the
digression, who can help being affected at the thought of the
very fine and slight, but positive relation, in which the savage
inhabitants of some remote isle stand to the mysterious white
mariner, the child of the sun?--as if _we_ were to have dealings
with an animal higher in the scale of being than ourselves.  It
is a barely recognized fact to the natives that he exists, and
has his home far away somewhere, and is glad to buy their fresh
fruits with his superfluous commodities.  Under the same catholic
sun glances his white ship over Pacific waves into their smooth
bays, and the poor savage's paddle gleams in the air.

     Man's little acts are grand,
     Beheld from land to land,
     There as they lie in time,
     Within their native clime
          Ships with the noontide weigh,
          And glide before its ray
          To some retired bay,
          Their haunt,
          Whence, under tropic sun,
          Again they run,
          Bearing gum Senegal and Tragicant.
     For this was ocean meant,
     For this the sun was sent,
     And moon was lent,
     And winds in distant caverns pent.

Since our voyage the railroad on the bank has been extended, and
there is now but little boating on the Merrimack.  All kinds of
produce and stores were formerly conveyed by water, but now
nothing is carried up the stream, and almost wood and bricks
alone are carried down, and these are also carried on the
railroad.  The locks are fast wearing out, and will soon be
impassable, since the tolls will not pay the expense of repairing
them, and so in a few years there will be an end of boating on
this river.  The boating at present is principally between
Merrimack and Lowell, or Hooksett and Manchester.  They make two
or three trips in a week, according to wind and weather, from
Merrimack to Lowell and back, about twenty-five miles each way.
The boatman comes singing in to shore late at night, and moors
his empty boat, and gets his supper and lodging in some house
near at hand, and again early in the morning, by starlight
perhaps, he pushes away up stream, and, by a shout, or the
fragment of a song, gives notice of his approach to the lock-man,
with whom he is to take his breakfast.  If he gets up to his
wood-pile before noon he proceeds to load his boat, with the help
of his single "hand," and is on his way down again before night.
When he gets to Lowell he unloads his boat, and gets his receipt
for his cargo, and, having heard the news at the public house at
Middlesex or elsewhere, goes back with his empty boat and his
receipt in his pocket to the owner, and to get a new load.  We
were frequently advertised of their approach by some faint sound
behind us, and looking round saw them a mile off, creeping
stealthily up the side of the stream like alligators.  It was
pleasant to hail these sailors of the Merrimack from time to
time, and learn the news which circulated with them.  We imagined
that the sun shining on their bare heads had stamped a liberal
and public character on their most private thoughts.

The open and sunny interval still stretched away from the river
sometimes by two or more terraces, to the distant hill-country,
and when we climbed the bank we commonly found an irregular
copse-wood skirting the river, the primitive having floated
down-stream long ago to----the "King's navy." Sometimes we saw
the river-road a quarter or half a mile distant, and the
particolored Concord stage, with its cloud of dust, its van of
earnest travelling faces, and its rear of dusty trunks, reminding
us that the country had its places of rendezvous for restless
Yankee men.  There dwelt along at considerable distances on this
interval a quiet agricultural and pastoral people, with every
house its well, as we sometimes proved, and every household,
though never so still and remote it appeared in the noontide, its
dinner about these times.  There they lived on, those New England
people, farmer lives, father and grandfather and great-grandfather,
on and on without noise, keeping up tradition, and expecting,
beside fair weather and abundant harvests, we did not learn what.
They were contented to live, since it was so contrived for them,
and where their lines had fallen.

     Our uninquiring corpses lie more low
     Than our life's curiosity doth go.

Yet these men had no need to travel to be as wise as Solomon in
all his glory, so similar are the lives of men in all countries,
and fraught with the same homely experiences.  One half the world
_knows_ how the other half lives.

About noon we passed a small village in Merrimack at Thornton's
Ferry, and tasted of the waters of Naticook Brook on the same
side, where French and his companions, whose grave we saw in
Dunstable, were ambuscaded by the Indians.  The humble village of
Litchfield, with its steepleless meeting-house, stood on the
opposite or east bank, near where a dense grove of willows
backed by maples skirted the shore.  There also we noticed some
shagbark-trees, which, as they do not grow in Concord, were as
strange a sight to us as the palm would be, whose fruit only we
have seen.  Our course now curved gracefully to the north,
leaving a low, flat shore on the Merrimack side, which forms a
sort of harbor for canal-boats.  We observed some fair elms
and particularly large and handsome white-maples standing
conspicuously on this interval; and the opposite shore, a quarter
of a mile below, was covered with young elms and maples six
inches high, which had probably sprung from the seeds which had
been washed across.

Some carpenters were at work here mending a scow on the green and
sloping bank.  The strokes of their mallets echoed from shore to
shore, and up and down the river, and their tools gleamed in the
sun a quarter of a mile from us, and we realized that boat-building
was as ancient and honorable an art as agriculture, and that
there might be a naval as well as a pastoral life.  The whole
history of commerce was made manifest in that scow turned bottom
upward on the shore.  Thus did men begin to go down upon the sea
in ships; _quaeque diu steterant in montibus altis, Fluctibus
ignotis insultavere carinae;_ "and keels which had long stood on
high mountains careered insultingly (_insultavere_) over unknown
waves." (Ovid, Met.  I. 133.) We thought that it would be well
for the traveller to build his boat on the bank of a stream,
instead of finding a ferry or a bridge.  In the Adventures of
Henry the fur-trader, it is pleasant to read that when with his
Indians he reached the shore of Ontario, they consumed two days
in making two canoes of the bark of the elm-tree, in which to
transport themselves to Fort Niagara.  It is a worthy incident in
a journey, a delay as good as much rapid travelling.  A good
share of our interest in Xenophon's story of his retreat is in
the manoeuvres to get the army safely over the rivers, whether on
rafts of logs or fagots, or sheep-skins blown up.  And where
could they better afford to tarry meanwhile than on the banks of
a river?

As we glided past at a distance, these out-door workmen appeared
to have added some dignity to their labor by its very publicness.
It was a part of the industry of nature, like the work of hornets
and mud-wasps.

      The waves slowly beat,
      Just to keep the noon sweet,
      And no sound is floated o'er,
      Save the mallet on shore,
      Which echoing on high
      Seems a-calking the sky.

The haze, the sun's dust of travel, had a Lethean influence on
the land and its inhabitants, and all creatures resigned
themselves to float upon the inappreciable tides of nature.

     Woof of the sun, ethereal gauze,
     Woven of Nature's richest stuffs,
     Visible heat, air-water, and dry sea,
     Last conquest of the eye;
     Toil of the day displayed sun-dust,
     Aerial surf upon the shores of earth.
     Ethereal estuary, frith of light,
     Breakers of air, billows of heat
     Fine summer spray on inland seas;
     Bird of the sun, transparent-winged
     Owlet of noon, soft-pinioned,
     From heath or stubble rising without song;
     Establish thy serenity o'er the fields

The routine which is in the sunshine and the finest days, as that
which has conquered and prevailed, commends itself to us by its
very antiquity and apparent solidity and necessity.  Our weakness
needs it, and our strength uses it.  We cannot draw on our boots
without bracing ourselves against it.  If there were but one
erect and solid standing tree in the woods, all creatures would
go to rub against it and make sure of their footing.  During the
many hours which we spend in this waking sleep, the hand stands
still on the face of the clock, and we grow like corn in the
night.  Men are as busy as the brooks or bees, and postpone
everything to their business; as carpenters discuss politics
between the strokes of the hammer while they are shingling a
roof.


This noontide was a fit occasion to make some pleasant harbor,
and there read the journal of some voyageur like ourselves, not
too moral nor inquisitive, and which would not disturb the noon;
or else some old classic, the very flower of all reading, which
we had postponed to such a season

     "Of Syrian peace, immortal leisure."

But, alas, our chest, like the cabin of a coaster, contained only
its well-thumbed "Navigator" for all literature, and we were
obliged to draw on our memory for these things.

We naturally remembered Alexander Henry's Adventures here, as a
sort of classic among books of American travel.  It contains
scenery and rough sketching of men and incidents enough to
inspire poets for many years, and to my fancy is as full of
sounding names as any page of history,--Lake Winnipeg, Hudson
Bay, Ottaway, and portages innumerable; Chipeways, Gens de
Terres, Les Pilleurs, The Weepers; with reminiscences of Hearne's
journey, and the like; an immense and shaggy but sincere country,
summer and winter, adorned with chains of lakes and rivers,
covered with snows, with hemlocks, and fir-trees.  There is a
naturalness, an unpretending and cold life in this traveller, as
in a Canadian winter, what life was preserved through low
temperatures and frontier dangers by furs within a stout heart.
He has truth and moderation worthy of the father of history,
which belong only to an intimate experience, and he does not
defer too much to literature.  The unlearned traveller may quote
his single line from the poets with as good right as the scholar.
He too may speak of the stars, for he sees them shoot perhaps
when the astronomer does not.  The good sense of this author is
very conspicuous.  He is a traveller who does not exaggerate, but
writes for the information of his readers, for science, and for
history.  His story is told with as much good faith and
directness as if it were a report to his brother traders, or the
Directors of the Hudson Bay Company, and is fitly dedicated to
Sir Joseph Banks.  It reads like the argument to a great poem on
the primitive state of the country and its inhabitants, and the
reader imagines what in each case, with the invocation of the
Muse, might be sung, and leaves off with suspended interest, as
if the full account were to follow.  In what school was this
fur-trader educated?  He seems to travel the immense snowy
country with such purpose only as the reader who accompanies him,
and to the latter's imagination, it is, as it were, momentarily
created to be the scene of his adventures.  What is most
interesting and valuable in it, however, is not the materials for
the history of Pontiac, or Braddock, or the Northwest, which it
furnishes; not the _annals_ of the country, but the natural
facts, or _perennials_, which are ever without date.  When out of
history the truth shall be extracted, it will have shed its dates
like withered leaves.


The Souhegan, or _Crooked_ River, as some translate it, comes in
from the west about a mile and a half above Thornton's Ferry.
Babboosuck Brook empties into it near its mouth.  There are said
to be some of the finest water privileges in the country still
unimproved on the former stream, at a short distance from the
Merrimack.  One spring morning, March 22, in the year 1677, an
incident occurred on the banks of the river here, which is
interesting to us as a slight memorial of an interview between
two ancient tribes of men, one of which is now extinct, while the
other, though it is still represented by a miserable remnant, has
long since disappeared from its ancient hunting-grounds.  A
Mr. James Parker, at "Mr. Hinchmanne's farme ner Meremack," wrote
thus "to the Honred Governer and Council at Bostown, _Hast, Post
Hast":_--

  "Sagamore Wanalancet come this morning to informe me, and then
  went to Mr. Tyng's to informe him, that his son being on ye
  other sid of Meremack river over against Souhegan upon the 22
  day of this instant, about tene of the clock in the morning, he
  discovered 15 Indians on this sid the river, which he soposed
  to be Mohokes by ther spech.  He called to them; they answered,
  but he could not understand ther spech; and he having a conow
  ther in the river, he went to breck his conow that they might
  not have ani ues of it.  In the mean time they shot about
  thirty guns at him, and he being much frighted fled, and come
  home forthwith to Nahamcock [Pawtucket Falls or Lowell], wher
  ther wigowames now stand."

Penacooks and Mohawks! _ubique gentium sunt?_ In the year 1670, a
Mohawk warrior scalped a Naamkeak or else a Wamesit Indian maiden
near where Lowell now stands.  She, however, recovered.  Even as
late as 1685, John Hogkins, a Penacook Indian, who describes his
grandfather as having lived "at place called Malamake rever,
other name chef Natukkog and Panukkog, that one rever great many
names," wrote thus to the governor:--

                                                 "May 15th, 1685.

  "Honor governor my friend,--

  "You my friend I desire your worship and your power, because I
  hope you can do som great matters this one.  I am poor and
  naked and I have no men at my place because I afraid allwayes
  Mohogs he will kill me every day and night.  If your worship
  when please pray help me you no let Mohogs kill me at my place
  at Malamake river called Pannukkog and Natukkog, I will submit
  your worship and your power.  And now I want pouder and such
  alminishon shatt and guns, because I have forth at my hom and I
  plant theare.

  "This all Indian hand, but pray you do consider your humble
  servant,

                                                ^John Hogkins^."

  Signed also by Simon Detogkom, King Hary, Sam Linis, Mr. Jorge
  Rodunnonukgus, John Owamosimmin, and nine other Indians, with
  their marks against their names.

But now, one hundred and fifty-four years having elapsed since
the date of this letter, we went unalarmed on our way without
"brecking" our "conow," reading the New England Gazetteer, and
seeing no traces of "Mohogs" on the banks.

The Souhegan, though a rapid river, seemed to-day to have
borrowed its character from the noon.

     Where gleaming fields of haze
     Meet the voyageur's gaze,
     And above, the heated air
     Seems to make a river there,
     The pines stand up with pride
     By the Souhegan's side,
     And the hemlock and the larch
     With their triumphal arch
     Are waving o'er its march
        To the sea.
     No wind stirs its waves,
     But the spirits of the braves
        Hov'ring o'er,
     Whose antiquated graves
     Its still water laves
        On the shore.
     With an Indian's stealthy tread
     It goes sleeping in its bed,
     Without joy or grief,
     Or the rustle of a leaf,
     Without a ripple or a billow,
     Or the sigh of a willow,
     From the Lyndeboro' hills
     To the Merrimack mills.
     With a louder din
     Did its current begin,
     When melted the snow
     On the far mountain's brow,
     And the drops came together
     In that rainy weather.
     Experienced river,
     Hast thou flowed forever?
     Souhegan soundeth old,
     But the half is not told,
     What names hast thou borne,
     In the ages far gone,
     When the Xanthus and Meander
     Commenced to wander,
     Ere the black bear haunted
        Thy red forest-floor,
     Or Nature had planted
        The pines by thy shore?

During the heat of the day, we rested on a large island a mile
above the mouth of this river, pastured by a herd of cattle, with
steep banks and scattered elms and oaks, and a sufficient channel
for canal-boats on each side.  When we made a fire to boil some
rice for our dinner, the flames spreading amid the dry grass, and
the smoke curling silently upward and casting grotesque shadows
on the ground, seemed phenomena of the noon, and we fancied that
we progressed up the stream without effort, and as naturally as
the wind and tide went down, not outraging the calm days by
unworthy bustle or impatience.  The woods on the neighboring
shore were alive with pigeons, which were moving south, looking
for mast, but now, like ourselves, spending their noon in the
shade.  We could hear the slight, wiry, winnowing sound of their
wings as they changed their roosts from time to time, and their
gentle and tremulous cooing.  They sojourned with us during the
noontide, greater travellers far than we.  You may frequently
discover a single pair sitting upon the lower branches of the
white-pine in the depths of the wood, at this hour of the day, so
silent and solitary, and with such a hermit-like appearance, as
if they had never strayed beyond its skirts, while the acorn
which was gathered in the forests of Maine is still undigested in
their crops.  We obtained one of these handsome birds, which
lingered too long upon its perch, and plucked and broiled it here
with som